Five Billion Vodka Bottles to the Moon: Tales of a Soviet Scientist.. By Iosif Shklovsky. Translated by Mary and Harold Zirin. Norton: 1991. Pp. 268. $19.95, £14.95Echoes of War: The Story of H2S Radar. By Bernard Lovell. Adam Hilger/AIP: 1991. Pp. 287. £17.50, $30.THE recA protein catalyses the ATP-driven homologous pairing and strand exchange of DNA molecules^1–3. It is an allosteric enzyme: the ATPase activity is DNA-dependent^4,5, and ATP-bound recA protein has a high affinity for DNA, whereas the ADP-bound form has a low affinity^6. In the absence of ATP hydrolysis, recA protein can still promote homologous pairing, apparently through the formation of a triple-stranded intermediate^1,7–9. The exact role of ATP hydrolysis is not clear, but it presumably drives the triplex intermediate towards products^1,9,10. Here we determine the position of bound ADP diffused into the recA crystal. We show that only the phosphates are bound in the same way as in other NTPases containing the G/AXXXXGKT/S motif. We propose that recA protein may change its conformation upon ATP hydrolysis in a manner analogous to one such protein, the p21 protein from the ras oncogene. A model is presented to account for the allosteric stimulation of DNA binding by ATP. The mechanism by which nucleoside triphosphate hydrolysis is coupled to the binding of another ligand in recA protein and p21 may be typical of the large class of NTPases containing this conserved motif.THE hydrophobic cores of proteins are generally well packed, with few cavities^1,2. Mutations in which a bulky buried residue such as leucine or phenylalanine is replaced with a small residue such as alanine can create cavities in the core of a protein (our unpublished results). The sizes and shapes of such cavities can vary substantially depending on factors such as local geometry, whether or not a cavity already exists at the site of substitution, and the degree to which the protein structure relaxes to occupy the space vacated by the substituted residue. We show by crystallographic and thermodynamic analysis that the cavity created by the replacement Leu 99 → Ala in T4 lysozyme is large enough to bind benzene and that ligand binding increases the melting temperature of the protein by 6.0 °C at pH 3.0. Benzene does not, however, bind to the cavity created by the Phe 153→ Ala replacement. The results show that cavities can be engineered in proteins and suggest that such cavities might be tailored to bind specific ligands. The binding of benzene at an internal site 7 Å from the molecular surface also illustrates the dynamic nature of proteins, even in crystals.PROGRESSION from G2 to M phase in eukaryotes requires activation of a protein kinase composed of p34^cdc2/CDC28 associated with Gl-specific cyclins (reviewed in ref. 1). In some organisms the activation of the kinase at the G2/M boundary is due to dephosphorylation of a highly conserved tyrosine residue at posi-tion 15 (Y15) of the cdc2 protein^2–6. Here we report that in the budding yeast Saccharomyces cervisiae , p^34^CDC28 also undergoes cell-cycle regulated dephosphorylation on an equivalent tyrosine residue (Y19). However, in contrast to previous observations in S. pombe ^6, Xenopus ^2,3 and mammalian cells^4,5, dephosphorylation of Y19 is not required for the activation of the CDC28/cyclin kinase. Furthermore, mutation of this tyrosine residue does not affect dependence of mitosis on DNA synthesis nor does it abolish G2 arrest induced by DNA damage. Our data imply that regulated phosphorylation of this tyrosine residue is not the 'universal' means by which the onset of mitosis is determined. We propose that there are other unidentified controls that regulate entry into mitosis.IN somatic cells, entry into mitosis depends on the completion of DNA synthesis. This dependency is established by S-phase feed-back controls that arrest cell division when damaged or unreplicated DNA is present^1. In the fission yeast Schizosaccharomyces pombe , mutations that interfere with the phosphorylation of tyrosine 15 (Y15) of p^34^cdc2, the protein kinase subunit of maturation promoting factor, accelerate the entry into mitosis and abolish the ability of unreplicated DNA to arrest cells in G2 (ref. 2). Because the tyrosine phosphorylation of p^34^cdc2 is conserved in S. pombe ^3, Xenopus ^4, chicken^5 and human^6cells, the regulation of p^34^cdc2-Y15 phosphorylation could be a universal mechanism mediating the S-phase feedback control and regulating the initiation of mitosis^7,8. We have investigated these phenomena in the budding yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae . We report here that the CDC28 gene product (the S. cerevisiae homologue of cdc2 ) is phosphorylated on the equivalent tyrosine (Y19) during S phase but that mutations that prevent tyrosine phosphorylation do not lead to premature mitosis and do not abolish feedback controls. We have therefore demonstrated a mechanism that does not involve tyrosine phosphorylation of p^34 by which cells arrest their division in response to the presence of unreplicated or damaged DNA. We speculate that this mechanism may not involve the inactivation of p^34 catalytic activity.HERPESVIRUS saimiri (HVS) is a T-lymphotropic gammaherpes-virus which establishes asymptomatic infections in its natural host the squirrel monkey ( Saimiri sciureus ), but which causes fatal lymphoproliferative diseases in other New World primates^1. Sequencing studies show HVS is closely related to the human B-lymphotropic gammaherpesvirus Epstein-Barr virus (EBV)^2–4. However, despite the general collinearity between the genomes of HVS and EBV, HVS contains genes not found in EBV or in the genomes of any of the other sequenced herpesviruses^5–8. We have identified two genes, occurring in a region of divergence between HVS and EBV, that have cellular homologues. One of these, ECRF3 , is homologous to the genes encoding the human cytomegalovirus (HCMV) and cellular G protein-coupled receptor family of proteins^9. The other HVS gene, ECLF2 , is homologous to the genes encoding cellular cyclins and to our knowledge is the first reported example of a viral cyclin. The presence of G protein-coupled receptor and cyclin homologues in HVS suggests that these genes may be important in the regulation of viral and cellular processes during productive and/or latent infection of host cells, and in particular may be of relevance in the transformation and rapid proliferation of T cells during HVS infections of hosts susceptible to HVS-induced lymphoproliferative diseases.VITAMIN A (retinol) and its natural derivatives are required for many physiological processes^1–3. The activity of retinoids is thought to be mediated by interactions with two subfamilies of nuclear retinoic acid receptors, RAR and RXR. The RARs bind all- trans retinoic acid ( t -RA) with high affinity and alter gene expression as a consequence of this direct ligand interaction^4–10. RXRα is activated by t -RA, yet has little binding affinity for this ligand (ref. 11) t -RA may be converted to a more proximate ligand that directly binds and activates RXRα, and we have developed a method of nuclear receptor-dependent ligand trapping to test this hypothesis. Here we report the identification of a stereoisomer of retinoic acid, 9- cis retinoic acid, which directly binds and activates RXRα. These results suggest a new role for isomerization in the physiology of natural retinoids.RECEPTOR-MEDIATED increases in the cytosolic free calcium ion concentration in most mammalian cells result from mobilization of Ca^2+ from intracellular stores as well as transmembrane Ca^2+ influx. Inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate (InsP_3) releases calcium from intracellular stores_1 by opening a Ca^2+-permeable channel in the endoplasmic reticulum^2–4. But the mechanism and regulation of Ca^2+ entry into nonexcitable cells has remained elusive because the entry pathway has not been defined. Here we characterize a novel inositol 1,3,4,5-tetrakisphosphate (InsP^4) and Ca^2+-sensitive Ca^2+-permeable channel in endothelial cells. We find that InsP_4, which induces Ca^2+ influx into acinar cells^5,6, enhances the activity of the Ca^2+-permeable channel when exposed to the intracellular surface of endothelial cell inside-out patches. Our results suggest a molecular mechanism which is likely to be important for receptor-mediated Ca^2+ entry.IN many cell types, receptor-mediated Ca^2+ release from internal stores is followed by Ca^2+ influx across the plasma membrane^1–3. The sustained entry of Ca^2+ is thought to result partly from the depletion of intracellular Ca^2+ pools^4,5. Most investigations have characterized Ca^2+ influx indirectly by measuring Ca^2+-activated currents^6–9 or using Fura-2 quenching by Mn^2, which in some cells enters the cells by the same influx pathway^10,11. But only a few studies have investigated this Ca^2+ entry pathway more directly^12–14. We have combined patch-clamp and Fura-2 measurements to monitor membrane currents in mast cells under conditions where intracellular Ca^2+ stores were emptied by either inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate, ionomycin, or excess of the Ca^2+ chelator EGTA. The depletion of Ca^2+ pools by these independent mechanisms commonly induced activation of a sustained calcium inward current that was highly selective for Ca^2+ ions over Ba^2+, Sr^2+ and Mn^2+. This Ca^2+ current, which we term I _CRAC (calcium release-activated calcium), is not voltage-activated and shows a characteristic inward rectification. It may be the mechanism by which electrically nonexcitable cells maintain raised intracellular Ca^2+ concentrations and replenish their empty Ca^2+ stores after receptor stimulation.NIAZI and Saxena^1 first observed that vitamin A has an inhibitory and modifying influence on tail regeneration in Bufo andersonii tadpoles. A positive relationship was later found between the inhibiting influence of vitamin A and the developmental stage of the regenerating tail in the same species^2. There have been several subsequent reports^3–7 on the effects of vitamin A and its derivatives on limb development and regeneration. Thus in regenerating amphibian limbs, application of retinoids produces pattern duplication in the proximodistal and anteroposterior axes of the limb^3,8,9, and local application of retinoic acid to the anterior side of developing chick limbs causes duplications in the anteroposterior axis of limb^10,11. Here we show that vitamin A can cause limb development when applied to amputated tail stumps of the tadpoles of the marbled balloon frog Uperodon systoma (Anura Microhylidae). This is the first report of homeotic transformation mediated through vitamin A in vertebrates.EXCITABLE media can support spiral waves rotating around an organizing centre^1–7. Spiral waves have been discovered in different types of autocatalytic chemical reactions^8,9 and in biological systems^10–12. The so-called 're-entrant excitation' of myocardial cells^13, causing the most dangerous cardiac arrhythmias, including ventricular tachycardia and fibrillation, could be the result of spiral waves^1,2. Here we use a potentiometric dye^14,15 in combination with CCD (charge-coupled device) imaging technology^16,17 to demonstrate spiral waves in the heart muscle. The spirals were elongated and the rotation period, T _s, was about 180 ms (3–5 times faster than normal heart rate). In most episodes, the spiral was anchored to small arteries or bands of connective tissue, and gave rise to stationary rotations. In some cases, the core drifted away from its site of origin and dissipated at a tissue border. Drift was associated with a Doppler shift in the local excitation period, T with T ahead of the core being about 20% shorter than T behind the core.COMPETITION among nestmate females for reproductive opportunities is a fundamental property of insect societies, the outcome of which defines the form of colony social organization and the nature of subsequent social evolution^1–3. Several factors influencing the outcome of competition among potential reproductives have been identified in eusocial Hymenoptera, including age^4, size^5–7 and degree of ovary or exocrine gland development^7–10. In no case is the genetic basis of traits associated with success in these social contests understood, although there is a heritable component to their expression in laying worker honey bees^11. I report here the existence of a single mendelian factor that strongly influences success in reproductive competition in multiple-queen societies of an ant, and I also propose a mechanism by which variation is maintained at this gene despite the presence of strong directional selection.Dynamics of Gas–Surface Interactions.. Edited By C. T. Rettner andM. N. R. Ashfold Royal Society of Chemistry: 1991. Pp. 366. $97.50.WHEN we perceive motion on a television or cinema screen, there must be some process that allows us to track moving objects over time: if not, the result would be a conflicting mass of motion signals in all directions. A possible mechanism, suggested by studies of motion displacement in spatially random patterns, is that low-level motion detectors have a limited spatial range, which ensures that they tend to be stimulated over time by the same object^1–3. This model predicts that the direction of displacement of random patterns cannot be detected reliably above a critical absolute displacement value ( D _max) that is independent of the size or density of elements in the display^1,4,5. It has been inferred that Anax is a measure of the size of motion detectors in the visual pathway^1,3. Other studies, however, have shown that Dmax increases with element size^6–8, in which case the most likely interpretation is that D _max depends on the probability of false matches between pattern elements following a displacement. These conflicting accounts are reconciled here by showing that Umax is indeed determined by the spacing between the elements in the pattern, but only after fine detail has been removed by a physiological prefiltering stage: the filter required to explain the data has a similar size to the receptive field of neurons in the primate mag-nocellular pathway. The model explains why D _max can be increased by removing high spatial frequencies from random patterns, and simplifies our view of early motion detection.THE role of changing atmospheric CO_2 concentrations in controlling global temperature can be investigated by examining variations in both CO_2 and climate preserved in the Earth's geological record. A model of the Earth's carbon cycle over the past 570 Myr suggests that, compared to its present value, the partial pressure of CO_2 ( P C O 2 ) may have been an order of magnitude higher in the early Palaeozoic, and about 4–6 times higher in the middle Mesozoic^1,2. Cerling^3 used carbon isotope ratios in soil carbonate minerals to constrain atmospheric P C O 2 m portions of the Mesozoic and Cenozoic eras. Studies of the common mineral goethite (α-FeOOH) have shown that it contains small quantities of a carbonate component (Fe(CO_3)OH), the concentration and carbon isotope content of which preserves a record of ambient P C O 2 at the time of formation^4–7. Here we present data for goethites from an ironstone in the Upper Ordovician Neda Formation (Wisconsin, USA)^8, which suggest that 440 Myr ago atmospheric P CO 2 was ~ 16 times higher than today. However, this enhanced level of atmospheric CO_2 does not seem to have been accompanied by unusually warm temperatures in the tropics, and in fact may have been contemporaneous with high-latitude continental glaciation on Gondwanaland^9,10.The Science of Love: Understanding Love and Its Effects on Mind and Body.. By Anthony Walsh Prometheus: 1991. Pp. 276. $22.95, £14.50.METHANE concentrations in the atmosphere have increased from about 0.75 to 1.7 p.p.m.v. since pre-industrial times^1,2. The current annual rate of increase of about 0.8% yr^−1 (ref. 2) is due to increases in industrial and agricultural emissions. This increase in atmospheric methane concentrations not only influences the climate directly, but also indirectly through chemical reactions. Here we show that the climate effects of methane's atmospheric chemistry have previously been overestimated, notably by the Inter-governmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC)^3, largely owing to neglect of the height dependence of certain atmospheric radiative processes. Using available estimates of fossil-fuel-related leaks of methane, our results show that switching from coal and oil to natural gas as an energy source would reduce climate warming. A significant fraction of methane emissions cannot, however, be accounted for by known sources; should leakages from gas production and distribution be underestimated for some countries, then it might be unwise to switch to using natural gas.RECENTLY Bakker and Janssen^1 have reported experiments suggesting that water leaks out of bubbles in quartz preferentially along dislocations against thermodynamic gradients in fugacity, chemical potential and pressure. This effect indicates that the density of gas-rich fluid inclusions cannot be calculated from metamorphic pressure–temperature conditions and, conversely, that the density of the fluid cannot be used to infer metamorphic pressure–temperature conditions. Using computer modelling techniques, I show here that water not only diffuses easily along dislocations in quartz, but can also be 'pumped' along them. The simulations indicate that in dislocation cores, water molecules dissociate and the protons and hydroxyl groups become strongly bound to kinks. A shear stress can do work on kinks to move them along a dislocation, dragging with them these water-bearing species and sweeping other, undissociated water molecules before them.THE possibility of obtaining information about solids on a truly microscopic scale has stimulated several recent advances in the optical detection and spectroscopy of single impurity centres in solids. For the system composed of pentacene impurity molecules in the crystal p -terphenyl, absorption^1and fluorescence excitation^2 studies at liquid-helium temperatures have led to direct observations of the lifetime-limited homogeneous linewidth of a single pentacene molecule^3, as well as the surprising observation of spontaneous spectral diffusion in a crystal^4. Spectral diffusion—changes in the resonance frequency of an impurity molecule with time as a result of structural relaxation processes in the molecular environment—is generally expected in amorphous hosts. We report here the observation of optical spectra of single perylene impurity molecules in a polymeric (polyethylene) host. At 1.5 K, individual perylene molecules show the expected spectral diffusion; further-more, we observe light-induced changes in resonance frequency (that is, persistent spectral hole-burning^5) for certain single molecules. These observations suggest the possibility of optical storage at the single-molecule level.BY analogy with the positively curved carbon networks that comprise the fullerenes^1–3, it has been suggested^4 that negative curvature might be possible in graphitic carbon sheets, giving rise to extended structures corresponding to periodic minimal surfaces^5 that divide space into two disjoint labyrinths. Whereas the positive curvature of fullerenes results from the presence of five-membered rings, negative curvature would derive from seven-membered rings. Here we present calculations of the cohesive energy and bulk moduli of two such hypothetical, negatively curved carbon networks. We find that both have a cohesive energy smaller than that of graphite but significantly greater than that of C_60, even though the proportion of odd-membered rings is comparable. We therefore suggest that it is worth scrutinizing the insoluble residue generated in the carbon-arc preparation of fullerenes^6 for possible evidence of fragments of negatively curved graphitic carbon.IN the brief time since the development of techniques for the purification of condensed phases of C_60 (refs 1, 2), compounds of C_60 have been synthesized that exhibit the important solid-state properties of superconductivity^3,4 and ferromagnetism^5. The fact that the C_60 molecule participates in these two disparate effects is in itself striking; furthermore, the C_60-based material has the highest T _c of any molecular organic ferromagnet^6. An understanding of the physical origin of this ferromagnetism is sure to require a knowledge of the crystal structure. Here we report on an X-ray diffraction study of the ferromagnet TDAE–C_60, where TDAE is tetrakis(dimethylamino)ethylene, C_2N_4(CH_3)_8. We find that the composition is stoichiometric with 1:1 ratio of TDAE to C_60. The structure has a c -centred monoclinic unit cell suggestive of an anisotropic, low-dimensional band structure. Any theory for the ferromagnetic behaviour will have to take this anisotropy into account.THE formation of nanometre-scale surface structures for quantum electronic devices, and the possibility of using the scanning tunnelling microscope and related instruments for atomic-scale surface modification^1–6, make necessary a detailed understanding of surface atomic processes. It has been observed previously^7– 11 that surface diffusion of an atom can take place by a series of exchanges with atoms in the surface layer. Here we use the field ion microscope to observe surface atomic processes when the chemical nature of the adatom differs from that of the surface atoms. On the iridium {001} surface, an adsorbed rhenium atom will displace an iridium atom from the substrate to form a Re–Ir–vacancy bound complex at about 230 K. On heating the sample to about 300 K, we find that this complex dissociates and the rhenium atom becomes incorporated into the surface—a kind of atomic-scale surface alloying. Alternatively, the Re–Ir cluster can be removed by field evaporation to leave a lattice vacancy, into which another adatom can subsequently diffuse.THE Received 28 November; accepted 5 December 1991. superconducting copper oxide system Bi–Sr–Ca–Cu–O (BSCCO) has attracted much attention owing to its high transition temperatures T _c and its stability on exposure to air, relative to the corresponding properties of the Y–Ba–Cu– O system. But despite intense effort, growth techniques capable of yielding as-deposited films with high T _c and high critical current density, J _c, have not yet been forthcoming. Here we report the preparation and properties of c-axis-oriented single-phase Bi_2Sr_2Ca_2Cu_3O_x films grown in situ without post-annealing by metalorganic chemical vapour deposition (MOCVD). Our films have the highest T _c and J _c at 77 K reported so far for BSCCO films grown in situ ; one film had a zero-resistance T _c of 97 K, and a J _c of 3.8 × 10^5 A cm^−2 at 77 K in zero magnetic field. This film showed little degradation of J _c in magnetic fields of up to 8 T applied parallel to the crystallographic a–b plane. The magnetic-field dependence of J _c and observed surface morphologies strongly suggest that these as-grown films have no weak links, which is a promising characteristic for device applications.FOLLOWING the first report^1 of an object of planetary mass orbiting a pulsar, Wolszczan and Frail^2 have now reported the even more surprising discovery of two planet-size companions in orbit around the nearby millisecond pulsar PSR1257+12. The orbital periods of the two planets are about 98 days and 67 days, very close to a 3:2 ratio. Here we point out that, because of this near commensurability, the mutual gravitational perturbations of the two planets should produce not only small secular changes, but also larger periodic changes in their orbital elements. In particular, we find that changes in the eccentricities and orbital periods should become measurable within a few years. Such a measurement would help determine the three masses in the system and the inclinations of the orbits. More importantly, a detection of these changes, if they accord with the theoretical predictions presented here, would provide irrefutable confirmation that the periodic residuals observed by Wolszczan and Frail are indeed caused by orbiting planets, rather than some other effect. For the single planet-size object previously reported^1 around the pulsar PS R1829–10, there is no dynamical test analogous to the one proposed here to confirm the planetary interpretation.To test models of T-cell recognition, mice transgenic for T-cell receptor α or β chain have been immunized with variant peptides that force changes in the resulting T-cell response. In particular, charge substitutions on the peptide often elicit reciprocal charges in the junctional (CDR3) sequences of T-cell receptor V_αor V_β chains, indicating direct T-cell receptor–peptide contact, and allowing derivation of a topology for the T-cell receptor–MHC interaction. At one position on the peptide, variants transformed a homogeneous V^β response into a very heterogeneous one.Britain urgently needs to return to traditional, but now abandoned, values in science. Scientific administrators and EC directorates should revise their policies in the light of Japan's experience.The increasingly detailed biochemical definition of the protein complexes that regulate gene transcription has led to the re-emergence of questions about the role of histones. Much recent evidence suggests that transcriptional activation requires that transcription factors successfully compete with histones for binding to promoters, and that there may be more than one mechanism by which this is achieved.Strange Weather: Culture, Science, and Technology in the Age of Limits. By Andrew Ross. Verso: 1991. Pp. 275. $59.95, £32.95 (hbk); $16.95, £10.95 (pbk). Distributed in North America by Routledge, Chapman and Hall.Biological Asymmetry and Handedness, Ciba Foundation Symposium 162. By GregoryR. Bock and Joan Marsh. Chairman: L. Wolpert. Wiley: 1991. Pp. 327. £39.50, $69.50.Darwin. By Adrian Desmond and James Moore. Michael Joseph: 1991. Pp. 808. £20. To be published in the United States by Warner Books later this year.The Zoological Society of London seems still uncertain about its running of the London Zoo.President George Bush's mission to Japan last week began as if it were the most serious trade mission ever mounted from the United States, but it proved predictably a flop.New product developments In gene technology include 22 new probes for detecting human MER sequences and a bacterial electrode for electroporation.The great successes of the past few years suggest that living processes consist of well-ordered events executed under strict control, but a few numbers would give a different and more fuzzy impression.Large disk-like mixed micelles composed of a drug and biological lipid are thermodynamically stable and represent a novel drug delivery system. Their unique physical properties are reflected in a significantly improved therapeutic index.IOLOGICAL processes frequently require the formation of multi-protein or nucleoprotein complexes. Some of these complexes have been produced in homogeneous form, crystallized, and analysed at high resolution by X-ray crystallography (for example, see refs 1–3). Most, however, are too large or too unstable to crystallize. Individual components of such complexes can often be purified and analysed by crystallography. Here we report how the coordi-nated application of cryoelectron microscopy, three-dimensional image reconstruction, and X-ray crystallography provides a power-ful approach to study large, unstable macromolecular complexes. Three-dimensional reconstructions of native cowpea mosaic virus (CMPV) and a complex of CPMV saturated with a Fab fragment of a monoclonal antibody against the virus have been determined at 23 Å resolution from low-irradiation images of unstained, frozen-hydrated samples. Despite the nominal resolution of the complex, the physical footprint of the Fab on the capsid surface and the orientation and position of the Fab have been determined to within a few ångstroms by fitting atomic models of CPMV^4 and Fab (Kol)^5 to reconstructed density maps.ERRORS in the replication of DNA are a major source of spontaneous mutations, and a number of cellular functions are involved in correction of these errors to keep the frequency of spontaneous mutations very low^1. We report here a novel mechanism which prevents replicational errors by degrading a potent mutagenic substrate for DNA synthesis. This error-avoiding process is catalysed by a protein encoded by the mutT gene of Escherichia coli , mutations of which increase the occurrence of A · T-→ C · G transversions 100 to 10,000 times the level of the wild type^2. Spontaneous oxidation of dGTP forms 8-oxo-7,8-dihydro-2'-dGTP (8-oxodGTP), which is inserted opposite dA and dC residues of template DNA with almost equal efficiency, and the MutT protein specifically degrades 8-oxodGTP to the monophosphate. This indicates that elimination from the nucleotide pool of the oxidized form of guanine nucleotide is important for the high fidelity of DNA synthesis.HUMAN plasminogen activator inhibitor-1 (PAI-1)^1,2 is the fast-acting inhibitor of tissue plasminogen activator and urokinase^3 and is a member of the serpin family of protease inhibitors^4. Serpins normally form complexes with their target proteases that dissociate very slowly as cleaved species and then fold into a highly stable inactive state^5 in which the residues that flank the scissile bond (P1 and P1'; ref. 6) are separated by about 70 Å (refs 7–9). PAI-1 also spontaneously folds into a stable^10 inactive state without cleavage; this state is termed 'latent' because inhibitory activity can be restored through denaturation and renaturation^2,10. Here we report the structure of intact latent PAI-1 determined by single-crystal X-ray diffraction to 2.6 Å resolution. The three-dimensional structure reveals that residues on the N-terminal side of the primary recognition site are inserted as a central strand of the largest βsheet, in positions similar to the corresponding residues in the cleaved form of the serpin α_1proteinase inhibitor (α_1-PI)^7. Residues C-terminal to the recognition site occupy positions on the surface of the molecule distinct from those of the corresponding residues in cleaved serpins^7–9 or in the intact inactive serpin homologue, ovalbumin^11, and its cleavage product, plakal-bumin^12. The structure of latent PAI-1 is similar to one formed after cleavage in other serpins, and the stability of both latent PAI-1 and cleaved serpins may be derived from the same structural features^13,14.Experiments in our Solar System can test relativistic gravity only in the weak-field limit, but systems containing pulsars necessarily involve the effects of strong-field gravity. Timing observations of three binary pulsars yield tight constraints on the nature of gravity in the strong-field regime, allowing the measurement of velocity-dependent and nonlinear phenomena separately from the effects of gravitational radiation. General relativity passes these new experimental tests with complete success.Blinded by the Light: The Secret Life of the Sun. By John Gribbin. Bantam 1991. Pp. 226. £14.99.Wishing for better things is an old habit at this time of the year, but wishing for more money is less worthy (and less likely to be worthwhile) than wishing for tangible success.New products for the new year include a system for rapid separation and membrane transfer without blotting, a range of cell culture flasks for the selection of specific cell phenotypes and a PC-based nuclear structure physics software program.1992's anniversarial celebration encompasses the Old World and the New, by route of Tasmania. The Celsius scale and the revolutionary calendar join other births (Babbage) and deaths (Schrapnel) in this year's cornucopia.THE bacteriophage 434 represser regulates gene expression by binding with differing affinities to the six operator sites on the phage chromosome^1,2. The symmetrically arrayed outer eight base pairs (four in each half-site) of these 14-base-pair operators are highly conserved but the middle four bases are divergent^3. Although these four base pairs are not in contact with represser^4,5, operators with A·T or T·A base pairs at these positions bind represser more strongly than those bearing C·G or G·C^5, suggestiong that these bases are important for the represser's ability to discriminate between operators. There is evidence that the central base pairs influence operator function by constraining the twisting and/or bending of DNA^5–7. Here we show that there is a relationship between the intrinsic twist of an operator, as determined by the sequence of its central bases, and its affinity for represser; an operator with a lower affinity is undertwisted relative to an operator with higher affinity. In complex with repressor, the twist of both high- and low-affinity operators is the same. These results indicate that the intrinsic twist of DNA and its twisting flexibility both affect the affinity of 434 operator for repressor.POSITIVE control of transcription often involves stimulatory protein-protein interactions between regulatory factors and RNA polymerase^1. Critical steps in the activation process itself are seldom ascribed to protein–DNA distortions. Activator-induced DNA bending is typically assigned a role in binding-site recognition^2, alterations in DNA loop structures^3 or optimal positioning of the activator for interaction with polymerase^4. Here we present a transcriptional activation mechanism that does not require a signal-induced DNA bend but rather a receptor-induced untwisting of duplex DNA. The allosterically modulated transcription factor MerR is a represser and an Hg(II)-responsive activator of bacterial mercury-resistance genes^5–7. Escherichia coli RNA polymerase binds to the MerR–promoter complex but cannot proceed to a transcriptionally active open complex until Hg(II) binds to MerR (ref. 6). Chemical nuclease studies show that the activator form, but not the represser, induces a unique alteration of the helical structure localized at the centre of the DNA-binding site^6. Data presented here indicate that this Hg–MerR-induced DNA distortion corresponds to a local underwinding of the spacer region of the promoter by about 33° relative to the MerR–operator complex. The magnitude and the direction of the Hg–MerR-induced change in twist angle are consistent with a positive control mechanism involving reorientation of conserved, but suboptimally phased, promoter elements and are consistent with a role for torsional stress in formation of an open complex.MITOCHONDRIA contain a complex machinery for the import of nuclear-encoded proteins^1,2. Receptor proteins exposed on the outer membrane surface are required for the specific binding of precursor proteins to mitochondria, either by binding of cytosolic signal recognition factors or by direct recognition of the precursor polypeptides^1–5. Subsequently, the precursors are inserted into the outer membrane at the general insertion site GIP (general insertion protein)^6–10. Here we report the analysis of receptors and GIP by crosslinking of translocation intermediates and by coimmunoprecipitation. Surface-accumulated precursors were cross-linked to the receptors MOM19 and MOM72, suggesting a direct interaction of preproteins with surface receptors. We identified three novel mitochondrial outer membrane proteins, MOM7, MOMS, and MOM30 that, together with the previously identified MOM38, seem to form the GIP site and are present in the mitochondrial receptor complex.MAMMALIAN spermatogenesis consists of a series of complex developmental processes controlled by the pituitary–hypothalamic axis^1. This flow of biochemical information is directly regulated by the adenylate cyclase signal transaction pathway^2. We have previously described the CREM (cyclic AMP-responsive element modulator) gene which generates, by cell-specific splicing, alternative antagonists of the cAMP transcriptional response^3. Here we report the expression of a novel CREM isoform (CREMτ) in adult testis. CREMτ differs from the previously characterized CREM antagonists by the coordinate insertion of two glutamine-rich domains that confer transcriptional activation function. During spermatogenesis there was an abrupt switch in CREM expression. In premeiotic germ cells CREM is expressed at low amounts in the antagonist form. Subsequently, from the pachytene spermatocyte stage onwards, a splicing event generates exclusively the CREMτ activator, which accumulates in extremely high amounts. This splicing-dependent reversal in CREM function represents an important example of developmental modulation in gene expression.US scientific organizations want (and need) to find ways to help colleagues in the former Soviet Union.The republics that were formerly part of the Soviet Union embark on a journey full of hazard: sooner or later they will have to transform the structure of science left by Mr Mikhail Gorbachev.THE high-affinity IgE receptor (FcɛRI), which is expressed on the surface of mast cells and basophils, has a central role in immediate allergic responses. In the rat basophilic leukaemia cell line RBL-2H3, which is a model system for the analysis of FcɛRI-mediated signal transduction, surface engagement of FcɛRI induces histamine release and the tyrosine phosphorylation of several distinct proteins^1. Although the α, β and γ subunits of FcɛRI lack intrinsic tyrosine protein kinase (TPK) activity, a kinase that copurifies with FcɛRI phosphorylates the β and γ subunits of the receptor on tyrosine residues^2,3. We report here that in RBL-2H3 cells, p56^ lyn and pp60^ c-src are activated after FcɛRI crosslinking, and p56^ lyn coimmunoprecipitates with FcɛRI. In the mouse mastcell line PT-18, another cell type used to study FCɛRI-mediated signalling, tyrosine phosphorylation of proteins is also an immediate consequence of receptor crosslinking. Notably, the only detectable src protein-related TPK in PT-18 cells is p62^ c-yes , and it is this TPK that is activated on FcɛRI engagement and coimmunoprecipitates with the receptor. Therefore, it seems that different src protein-related TPKs can associate with the same receptor and become activated after receptor engagement.THE central terminals of primary afferent neurons are topographically highly ordered in the spinal cord^1. Peripheral receptor sensitivity is reflected by dorsal horn laminar location: low-threshold mechanoreceptors terminate in laminae III and IV (refs 2, 3) and high-threshold nociceptors in laminae I, II and V (refs 4, 5). Unmyelinated C fibres, most of which are nociceptors^6, terminate predominantly in lamina II (refs 5,7). There is therefore an anatomical framework for the transfer of specific inputs to localized subsets of dorsal horn neurons. This specificity must contribute to the relationship between a low-intensity stimulus and an innocuous sensation and a noxious stimulus and pain. We now show that after peripheral nerve injury the central terminals of axotomized myelinated afferents, including the large Aβ fibres, sprout into lamina II. This structural reorganization in the adult central nervous system may contribute to the development of the pain mediated by A-fibres that can follow nerve lesions in humans^8,9.THE idea that the connections between species in ecological assemblages are characterized by a trait called 'interaction strength' has become a cornerstone of modern ecology. Since the classic paper of Watt^1, ecologists have acknowledged the importance of distinguishing pattern (static community features) from process (dynamically based mechanisms), which can determine the immediate observed details. Food webs display pathways of implied dynamics, and thus potentially unite pattern and process in a single framework^2,3. Most analyses^4–8 have focused entirely on web topology and the derived descriptive properties. By contrast, attempts to generalize how natural communities are organized^9,10 or summary statements about whole communities^6,11–13 have emphasized critical processes. Elton's^2 insights and May's^3generalizations and analyses have stimulated current developments. In May's approach, the idea of interaction strength is precise, reflecting coefficients in a jacobian matrix associated with a community dynamics model. He found striking dependence of community stability both on web complexity and on the number and strength of interactions. By contrast, empiricists have usually determined relative interaction strength from single-species removals analysed by multivariate statistics^14,15.I report here the first experimental study designed to estimate interaction strengths in a species-rich herbivore guild, documenting on a per capita basis mainly weak or positive interactions, and a few strong interactions, a pattern which has profound implications for community dynamics.THE constant ' b value ' observed in frequency–magnitude distributions of earthquakes has been taken as an indication of self-similarity at all magnitudes. Hence, earthquake properties should scale uniformly in the same way from small to large earthquakes. It has often been observed, however, that the seismic moment released in small earthquakes scales differently with rupture length than it does for large events^1,2, where the crossover between small and large events is defined at a rupture dimension equal to the down-dip width of the seismogenic zone. A possible explanation for this contradiction is that frequency–size distributions are biased by small earthquakes. Small events dominate most global earthquake catalogues because of the short time-period covered. Another source of bias in size distributions is the saturation of earthquake magnitudes for large events. Here we correct biases in calculations of b values and present evidence for a change in b value in frequency–size distributions. We find that a break in self-similarity, from small to large earthquakes, occurs at a point where the dimension of the event equals the down-dip width of the seismogenic layer.ACTUAL and potential increases in aircraft traffic are causing concern about the effects of aircraft exhaust emission on atmos-pheric chemistry. Model results^1–3 and measurements^4–6 in the Northern Hemisphere have shown that growth in surface emissions of nitrogen oxides and hydrocarbons leads to increases in concentration of tropospheric ozone. Tropospheric ozone is toxic to plants, humans and other organisms, and it is a greenhouse gas^7–9. The radiative forcing of surface temperature is most sensitive to changes in tropospheric ozone at a height of ∼12 km (ref. 8), where aircraft emissions of nitrogen oxides are at a maximum and where the model sensitivity of ozone to nitrogen oxide emissions is enhanced. Our model results show that the radiative forcing of surface temperature is about thirty times more sensitive to aircraft emissions of nitrogen oxides than to surface emissions. We also find that the impact on global warming of increases in tropospheric ozone caused by increases in surface emissions of nitrogen oxides has previously been overestimated by a factor of five^1,10, owing to an error in the calculation of the ozone budget.THE critical stage in a chemical reaction — the progression through the transition state from reagents to products — occurs in less than a picosecond (10^−12 s). Using laser pulses of femtosecond (10^−15 s) duration it is possible to probe the nuclear motions throughout formation and break-up of the transition state^1,2. The coherence and very short duration of these femtosecond pulses provides a means to influence the course of the reaction during this stage if the time resolution is made sufficiently short. Here we describe a demonstration of such control of a chemical reaction on the femtosecond timescale. Using two sequential coherent laser pulses, we can control the reaction of iodine molecules with xenon atoms to form the product XeI by exciting the reactants through the transition state, in a two-step process. The yield of product XeI is modulated as the delay between the pulses is varied, reflecting its dependence on the nuclear motions of the reactants.A COMPLETE understanding of heterogeneous catalytic processes requires quantitative in situ information on the concentrations of reactants present on the catalyst surface, but few techniques are available to supply this information. Here we show that positron-emitter labelling and scanning, using the isotopes^11C, ^13N and^15O, can be used to study the reactions taking place during the catalytic conversion of automotive exhaust. By introducing small pulses of labelled molecules into a reactant stream passing through the catalyst, in situ quantitative information on the concentrations and residence times of reactants in the reactor is obtained. The labels are detected using a positron camera, an imaging device adapted from nuclear medicine, and the recorded data are presented as 'reaction images', showing quantitatively the distribution of the label in the catalyst bed as a function of position and time. These data can then be used to quantify reaction kinetics by serving as the input to mathematical simulations based on elementary reaction steps.DETAILED understanding of the evolution of main-sequence stars into white dwarfs depends on knowledge of the chemical composition of white-dwarf atmospheres, but the hottest white dwarfs emit much of their radiation in the extreme ultraviolet (EUV), a part of the spectrum that has been generally inaccessible to astronomers. We report here the discovery of a new white dwarf as a bright EUV source found during the first observations using the Wide Field Camera^1 on the Rosat satellite. Within the 1-arcmin error box of the EUV source is an unusually blue star, which we show to be a binary system consisting of a DA white dwarf and a cool companion in the classification range dM2–dM5. There are some similarities between this new object and the binary system Feige 24 (ref. 2), but spectral differences in the EUV emission can be attributed to significantly different atmospheric compositions for the two white dwarfs.CONTINUING observations of the nebula around SN1987A, which is about 3 arcseconds across, show it to be surprisingly regular. The brightest part of it is a highly axisymmetric structure, perhaps a simple ring^1–4. This structure, which may be related to similar structures in planetary nebulae and around Wolf–Rayet stars, poses a challenge for current nebular formation theories. Here we discuss the formation of an axisymmetric nebula in terms of the interaction between the slow wind ejected by the progenitor of SN1987A while it was a red supergiant (RSG) and the subsequent fast wind produced by the same star after it had evolved into a blue supergiant (BSG). In our model, an initial small asymmetry in the RSG wind, due to rotation of the red giant, is amplified by the action of the fast BSG wind. Structures that are significantly axisymmetric, and perhaps even ring-like, can be produced. We suggest that such phenomena should be common in the formation of nebulae, as evidenced by the fact that only a small fraction of the observed circumstellar nebulae appear to be spherically symmetric.RECENT observations of faint galaxies at near-infrared wavelengths^1–3 reveal a surprisingly low surface density when compared to the excess of blue galaxies seen at optical wavelengths^4. Attempts to determine the cosmological curvature from the asymptotic surface density of faint galaxies thus produce conflicting results^3,5–7. We propose to resolve this conflict with an evolutionary model in which galaxies merge at recent look-back times. The contrast between optical and infrared galaxy counts then follows from the very different lifetimes of stellar types contributing to emission in the galactic rest-frame. Together with evidence we present an increased star formation rate in galaxies at moderate redshift, the merging model can account for both the number–magnitude relations and available redshift distributions. A clear prediction is that there should be an absence of high-redshift galaxies in deep infrared-selected surveys. If correct, the model confirms earlier suspicions that galaxies cannot be used as reliable tracers of the geometry of the Universe.Miniature excitatory synaptic currents were recorded from CA1 pyramidal cells in hippocampal slices to study the site of the persistent change in synaptic efficacy during long-term potentiation. Induction of long-term potentiation produced a large increase in the amplitude of these currents. Such a change in amplitude suggests an increase in postsynaptic transmitter sensitivity.A new global S-wave velocity model reveals that although mid-ocean ridges and hotspots are both underlain by low-velocity anomalies in the mantle, these have distinctly different structures. This implies that there are differences between the upwelling mechanisms under ridges and under hot-spots. The velocity model also shows that there may be interactions between ridges and hotspots near Afar and St Helena.In the cell, as in vitro , the final conformation of a protein is determined by its amino-acid sequence. But whereas some isolated proteins can be denatured and refolded in vitro in the absence of other macromolecular cellular components, folding and assembly of polypeptides in vivo involves other proteins, many of which belong to families that have been highly conserved during evolution.Water Baby: The Story of Alvin. By Victoria A. Kaharl. published by Oxford University Press: 1991. Pp.356. £15, $21.95. Fire Under the Sea: The Discovery of the Most Extraordinary Environment on Earth — Volcanic Hot Springs on the Ocean Floor. By Joseph Cone. published by William Morrow: 1991. Pp.287. $25.Origins of the Modern Mind: Three Stages in the Evolution of Culture and Cognition. By Merlin Donald. published by Harvard University Press: 1991. Pp. 413. $27.95, £22.25.Recent cosmological surveys suggest a wholesale streaming motion of galaxies across the sky, conflicting with the idea that local galaxies move under the influence of a Great Attractor. But the issue is not settled.Britain's new government has an unexpectedly intelligent recipe for managing research.Worry about the integrity of the ozone layer — a long-term problem — might vanish If the greenhouse cost of ozone-unfriendly chemicals were charged out at the market rate.A History of Regeneration Research: Milestones in the Evolution of a Science. Edited byCharles E. Dinsmore. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 228. £30, $54.95.A Conceptual History of Modern Embryology. Volume 7 of Developmental Biology: A Comprehensive Synthesis. Edited by Scott F. Gilbert. Plenum: 1991. Pp. 266. $83.40.Molecular Ge4etic Approaches to Neuropsychiatric Diseases. Edited by Jurgen Brosius and Robert T. Fremeau. Academic: 1991. Pp. 493. $69.95, £47.CYCLOBUTANE pyrimidine dimers (CPDs) are the predominant product of photodamage in DNA after exposure of cells to ultraviolet light^1,2 and are cytotoxic, mutagenic and carcinogenic in a variety of cellular and animal systems^3–5. In prokaryotes, enzymes and protein complexes have been characterized that remove or reverse CPDs in DNA^6–8. Micrococcus luteus and T4 phage-infected Escherichia coli contain a specific N -glyco-sylase/apurinic-apyrimidinic lyase that catalyses a two-step DNA incision process at sites of CPDs, thus initiating base excision repair of these lesions^7,9–2. It is well established that CPDs are recognized and removed from eukaryotic DNA by excision repair processes but very little information exists concerning the nature of the proteins involved in CPD recognition and DNA incision events^7,12,13. We report here that an enzyme functionally similar to the prokaryotic N -glycosylase/apurinic–apyrimidinic lyases exists in Saccharomyces cerevisiae . To our knowledge, this is the first time such an activity has been found in a eukaryote and is also the first example of an organism having both direct reversal and base excision repair pathways for the removal of CPDs from DNA.STUDIES of organelle movement in axoplasm extruded from the squid giant axon have led to the basic discoveries of microtubule-dependent organelle motility^1–3 and the characterization of the microtubule-based motor proteins kinesin and cytoplasmic dynein^4,5. Rapid organelle movement in higher animal cells, especially in ,neurons, is considered to be microtubule-based. The role of actin filaments, which are also abundant in axonal cytoplasm^6,7, has remained unclear. The inhibition of organelle movement in axoplasm by actin-binding proteins^8–11 such as DNase I, gelsolin and synapsin I has been attributed to their ability to disorganize the microtubule domains where most of the actin-fi laments are located^7. Here we provide evidence of a new type of organelle movement in squid axoplasm which is independent of both microtubules and microtubule-based motors. This movement is ATP-dependent, unidirectional, actin-dependent, and probably generated by a myosin-like motor. These results demonstrate that an actomyosin-like mechanism can be directly involved in the generation of rapid organelle transport in nerve cells.MATURITY-ONSET diabetes of the young (MODY) is a form of non-insulin-dependent (type 2) diabetes mellitus (NIDDM) which is characterized by an early age at onset and an autosomal dominant mode of inheritance^1. Except for these features, the clinical characteristics of patients with MODY are similar to those with the more common late-onset form(s) of NIDDM. Previously^2 we observed tight linkage between DNA polymorphisms in the glucokinase gene on the short arm of chromosome 7 and NIDDM in a cohort of sixteen French families having MODY. Glucokinase is an enzyme that catalyses the formation of glucose-6-phosphate from glucose and may be involved in the regulation of insulin secretion and integration of hepatic intermediary metabolism^3. Because the glucokinase gene was a candidate for the site of the genetic lesion in these families, we scanned this gene for mutations. Here we report the identification of a nonsense mutation in the gene encoding glucokinase and its linkage with early-onset diabetes in one family. To our knowledge, this result is the first evidence implicating a mutation in a gene involved in glucose metabolism in the pathogenesis of NIDDM.THE amount of dissolved organic carbon (DOC) in sea water is controversial^1,2 Using a high-temperature catalytic oxidation (HTCO) technique, Sugimura and Suzuki^3 reported that surface waters contained ^2–4 times as much DOC as that measured previously using wet chemistry and ultraviolet oxidation techniques^4,5. They also observed a relationship between DOC content and apparent oxygen utilization suggesting that the consumption of DOC is responsible for oxygen depletion in the deep sea. How to reconcile the apparent differences between these techniques has not been clear. Here we provide independent confirmation of the findings of Sugimura and Suzuki. We collected surface and deep waters from the equatorial Pacific Ocean, the Drake passage and the Atlantic Ocean south of Iceland, and analysed their DOC content using the HTCO methodology^3. We found DOC concentrations ^2–3 times higher than those measured previously. These results imply that the carbon content of the oceans has previously been underestimated by 10^12 (1,000 billion) tonnes, and that the new estimated total of 1,800 billion tonnes represents one of the largest carbon reservoirs on Earth^6. We found no evidence of a cause-and-effect relationship between DOC and apparent oxygen utilization.RECENT measurements^1 of the amount of dissolved organic carbon (DOC) in sea water using a high-temperature catalytic oxidation (HTCO) method have generated intense interest because they indicated concentrations several times greater than those obtained from conventional wet chemical oxidation (WCO) methods^2–4. As dissolved organic matter in the oceans represents one of the major pools of organic matter in the biosphere^5,6, these findings of 'new' DOC have prompted important revisions to models of the oceanic carbon cycle^7–9. A satisfactory explanation for the origin of the 'new' DOC, however, which seems to be chemically refractory^1, biologically labile^10 and of high molecular mass^1, has not been forthcoming. Here we present a comparison of measurements of seawater DOC using the HTCO and WCO methods. We obtain fairly good agreement between the two methods, with the HTCO results being considerably lower than those reported previously^1. Our data suggest that the WCO technique may not fail to detect so much DOC as had been previously supposed, and that any carbon that is missed by this method may be in the low- rather than the high-molecular-mass fraction.THE exchange of gases between the ocean and the atmosphere exerts an important influence on the cycling and global budget of trace gases. Air–sea gas flux is normally parameterized as the product of a gas-transfer velocity and the air–sea concentration difference^1,2. Despite suggestions^3–8 that the parameterization might be inappropriate when air-bubble penetration occurs, this 'thin-film' model remains widely accepted^9 and is employed regularly in regional^10 and global-scale^11 models. Here we present a time series of ear-surface dissolved O_2 from November to March in coastal waters. The time series is punctuated by sudden large increases in dissolved O_2 associated with surface wave activity. A numerical simulation including air injection by bubbles shows similar behaviour. If the observed O_2 'events' reflect the air–sea O_2 flux, our results imply that conventional parameterizations might seriously underestimate gas invasion of surface waters under storm conditions. Our study confirms that important questions remain concerning air–sea gas transfer at high wind speeds.MANY astrophysical magnetic fields are thought to arise by dynamo action due to internal fluid motions, but the natural timescale for magnetic field growth is the diffusion timescale, which in realistic astrophysical applications is very large^1. A fast dynamo is one that operates on the much shorter turnover timescale of the generating fluid flow, and the analytical intractability of smooth flows with diffusion has prompted the use of many ingenious models^2–10, differing from the true problem in having a modified or time-dependent diffusion or singularities in the flow field. Here we adopt a straightforward approach and present numerical computations of linear kinematic dynamos associated with periodic smooth flows, with diffusion explicitly included. Examples of time-varying flows depending on two spatial coordinates give convincing evidence of fast dynamo action for diffusion times up to 10,000 times greater than the turnover time. A three-dimensional steady flow shows similar behaviour, although computations have not beencarried out so far and the asymptotic behaviour is less clear. All these flows have large regions where particle paths are chaotic.ON 7 December 185, astronomers at the imperial observatory of Lo-Yang, in central China, reported a 'guest star' in the southern sky. Their records of its appearance, gradual fading and disappearance constitute the oldest compelling historical account of a supernova. It is widely believed that the remnant of this explosion is MSH14–6 3 , but the identification is problematic, in particular because the position of MSH14–6 3 with respect to the Sun and the horizon would have made it invisible for some of the time when the guest star was said to be visible. I argue here that the Chinese astronomers actually witnessed the birth of the pulsar PSR1509–58 in the supernova remnant MSH15–5 2 . This is then only the second pulsar, after that in the Crab nebula (PSR0531 + 21), to have a known age. Timing measurements of the age of PSR1509–58 are consistent with its birth ∼1,800 years ago, and future measurements of the distance to MSH15–5 2 and its rate of expansion should conclusively establish or disprove this identification.MATURE T cells express either CD4 or CD8 on their surface. Most helper T cells express CD4, which binds to class II major histocompatibility complex (MHC) proteins, and most cytotoxic T cells express CD8, which binds to class I MHC proteins. In the thymus, mature CD4^+CD8^− and CD4^− CD8^+ T cells expressing αβ T-cell antigen receptors (TCR) develop from immature thymocytes through CD4^+CD8^+ αβ TCR^+ intermediates^1. Experiments using mice transgenic for αβ TCR^2–5 suggest that the specificity of the TCR determines the CD4/CD8 phenotype of mature T cells. These results, however, do not indicate how a T cell differentiates into the CD4 or CD8 lineage. Here we show that the CD4 transmembrane region and/or cytoplasmic tail mediates the delivery of a specific signal that directs differentiation of T cells to a CD4 lineage. We generated transgenic mice expressing a hybrid molecule composed of the CD8 α extracellular domains linked to the CD4 transmembrane region and cytoplasmic tail. We predicted that this hybrid molecule would bind to class I MHC proteins through the extracellular domains but deliver the intracellular signals characteristic of CD4. By crossing our transgenic mice with mice expressing a transgenic αβ TCR specific for a particular antigen plus class I MHC protein, we were able to express the hybrid molecule in developing thymocytes expressing the class I MHC-restricted TCR. Our results show that the signal transduced by the hybrid molecule results in the differentiation of immature thymocytes expressing a class I-restricted TCR into mature T cells expressing CD4.HUMAN colour vision depends on three classes of cone photoreceptors, those sensitive to short (S), medium (M) or long (L) wavelengths, and on how signals from these cones are combined by neurons in the retina and brain. Macaque monkey colour vision is similar to human, and the receptive fields of macaque visual neurons have been used as an animal model of human colour processing^1. P retinal ganglion cells and parvocellular neurons are colour-selective neurons in macaque retina and lateral geniculate nucleus. Interactions between cone signals feeding into these neurons are still unclear. On the basis of experimental results with chromatic adaptation, excitatory and inhibitory inputs from L and M cones onto P cells (and parvocellular neurons) were thought to be quite specific^2,3 (Fig. l a ). But these experiments with spatially diffuse adaptation did not rule out the 'mixed-surround' hypothesis: that there might be one cone-specific mechanism, the receptive field centre, and a surround mechanism connected to all cone types indiscriminately (Fig. l e ). Recent work has tended to support the mixed-surround hypothesis^4–8. We report here the development of new stimuli to measure spatial maps of the linear L-, M- and S-cone inputs to test the hypothesis definitively. Our measurements contradict the mixed-surround hypothesis and imply cone specificity in both centre and surround.DEFECTS in the NF1 gene have been implicated in the inherited disorder neurofibromatosis type 1, which is characterized by several developmental abnormalities including an increased frequency of benign and malignant tumours of neural crest origin (neuro-fibromas and neurofibrosarcomas respectively)^1. The NF1 gene encodes a ubiquitous protein homologous to p!20^GAP, the GTPase-activating protein (GAP) for the products of the ras proto-oncogenes^2–6. When expressed in non-mammalian systems, the region of the NF1 gene homologous to p!20^GAP produces a protein with GAP-like activity^7–9. Here we present evidence that the ras proteins in malignant tumour cell lines from patients with type 1 neurofibromatosis are in a constitutively activated state, as judged by the guanine nucleotide bound to them, and are necessary for cellular proliferation. These cells contain P21^ ras and p120^GAP that are both functionally wild type, but barely any functional NF1 protein. Our results show that the NF1 protein is normally essential for correct negative regulation of ras proteins in the cell, even in the presence of normal p120^GAP, and they support the hypothesis that NF1 is a tumour-suppressor gene whose product acts upstream of ras .THE chilling sensitivity of plants is closely correlated with the degree of unsaturation of fatty acids in the phosphatidylglycerol of chloroplast membranes^1–5. Plants with a high proportion of cis -unsaturated fatty acids, such as spinach and Arabidopsis thaliana , are resistant to chilling, whereas species like squash with only a small proportion are not. The chloroplast enzyme glycerol-3-phosphate acyltransferase seems to be important for determining the level of phosphatidylglycerol fatty acid unsaturation^6–9. Here we report that the level of fatty acid unsaturation of phosphatidylglycerol and the degree of chilling sensitivity of Nicotiana tabacum var. Samsum (tobacco) can be manipulated by transformation with complementary DNAs for glycerol-3-phosphate acyltransferases from squash and Arabidopsis . The genetic manipulation of fatty acid unsaturation is known to alter the chilling sensitivity of prokaryotes^10, and we have now demonstrated that it can also do so in higher plants.The main stress proteins of Escherichia coli function in an ordered protein-folding reaction. DnaK (heat-shock protein 70) recognizes the folding poly-peptide as an extended chain and cooperates with DnaJ in stabilizing an intermediate conformational state lacking ordered tertiary structure. Dependent on GrpE and ATP hydrolysis, the protein is then transferred to GroEL (heat-shock protein 60) which acts catalytically in the production of the native state. This sequential mechanism of chaperone action may represent an important pathway for the folding of newly synthesized polypeptides.IN eastern North America there are populations of all-female salamanders that incorporate the nuclear genomes of two or three of four sympatric bisexual species. The hybrids can be diploid, triploid, tetraploid or pentaploid, and 18 different combinations have been reported. All hybrids require sperm from a sympatric male of one of the bisexual species to reproduce, but the sperm may or may not be incorporated in the egg. Some of the hybrids are believed to represent separate, clonal species, but little is known of the origin of this hybrid complex. Vertebrate mitochondrial DNA is inherited maternally, allowing identification of the female parent that gave rise to hybrid lineages. A portion of the cytochrome b gene was sequenced from diploid and triploid hybrids that represent combinations of all four species. Nearly all hybrids had a similar mitochondrial genome sequence, independent of nuclear genome composition and ploidy, and the sequence was distinct from that of any of the four bisexual species. The hybrids maintain a mitochondrial lineage that has evolved independently of their nuclear genome and represent the most ancient known unisexual vertebrate lineage.THE existence of clonally reproducing vertebrates has often served as a foil in attempts to explain the near-ubiquity of sexual reproduction in eukaryotes, but the absence of recombination, with its attendant limitation of new genotypes to those produced through mutations, restricts the adaptive ability of clonal organisms^1–3. It has been argued, therefore, that clonal vertebrate taxa have short lifespans^4–14. Variation in mitochondrial DNA (mtDNA) within clonal populations is interpreted instead as reflecting multiple, although limited, independent hybridization events^8–13,15. On the basis of an analysis of an average of 373 nucleotide pairs, we report here that the mtDNA of clonal, hybrid, gynogenetic mole salamanders ( Ambystoma , Ambystomatidae) differs by 5% or more from mtDNA of their closest possible sexual relatives (A. jeffersonianum, A. laterale and A. texanum) . Assuming usual rates of mtDNA divergence, these lineages have persisted for about 5 million years, far longer than estimated for other clonal vertebrate populations. The low mtDNA variability in the clonal lineages suggests that they have undergone population reductions during the Pleistocene.OCCUPANCY of the T-cell antigen receptor is insufficient to induce T-cell activation optimally; a second co-stimulatory signal is required^1. Exposure of T-cell clones to complexes of antigen with major histocompatibility complex molecules in the absence of the co-stimulatory signal induces a state of clonal anergy. This requirement for two stimuli for T-cell activation could have an important role in vivo in establishing peripheral tolerance to antigens not encountered in the thymus^1,2. The receptor on T cells required for the co-stimulatory stimulus involved in the prevention of anergy has not been identified. The human T-cell antigen CD28 provides a signal that can synergize with T-cell antigen receptor stimulation in activating T cells to proliferate and secrete lymphokines^3–6. Here we report that a monoclonal antibody against the murine homologue of CD28 (ref. 7; J.A.G. et al ., manuscript in preparation) can provide a co-stimulatory signal to naive CD4^+ T cells and to T-cell clones. Moreover, we demonstrate that this co-stimulatory signal can block the induction of anergy in T-cell clones.SCHISTOSOMIASIS (bilharzia) is a parasitic disease caused by several species of schistosome worms (blood flukes). The key pathogenic event in this disease is the formation of granulomas around schistosome eggs trapped in portal venules of the liver^1–9. Granulomas are a distinctive form of chronic inflammation characterized by localized aggregation of activated macrophages around an inciting stimulus^10. Each granuloma evolves to form a fibrous scar; in schistosomiasis, the result is widespread hepatic fibrosis and portal hypertension. To identify the specific immune signal molecules necessary for granuloma formation, we studied schistosome infections in severe combined immunodeficient (SCID) mice, which have normal macrophages but lack functional B or T lymphocytes^11,12. Here we report that the immunoregulatory cytokine tumour necrosis factor α is necessary and sufficient to reconstitute granuloma formation in schistosome-infected SCID mice. Moreover, we find that the parasitic worms require tumour necrosis factor α for egg-laying and for excretion of eggs from the host. The implication of this latter result is that the parasite has adapted so successfully to its host that it uses a host-derived immuno-regulatory protein as a signal for replication and transmission.Dr Bernadette Healy has rid the Human Genome Project of Dr J. D. Watson in a distasteful way.PERSISTENT changes in synaptic efficacy are thought to underlie the formation of learning and memory in the brain^1. High-frequency activation of an afferent excitatory fibre system can induce long-term potentiation^2,3, and conjunctive activation of two distinct excitatory synaptic inputs to the cerebellar Purkinje cells can lead to long-term depression of the synaptic activity of one of the inputs^4. Here we report a new form of neural plasticity in which activation of an excitatory synaptic input can induce a potentiation of inhibitory synaptic signals to the same cell. In cerebellar Purkinje cells stimulation of the excitatory climbing fibre synapses is followed by a long-lasting (up to 75 min) potentiation of γ-aminobutyric acid A (GABA_A) receptor-mediated inhibitory postsynaptic currents (i.p.s.cs), a phenomenon that we term rebound potentiation. Using whole-cell patch-clamp recordings in combination with fluorometric video imaging of intracel-lular calcium ion concentration, we find that a climbing fibre-induced transient increase in postsynaptic calcium concentration triggers the induction of rebound potentiation. Because the response of Purkinje cells to bath-applied exogenous GABA is also potentiated after climbing fibre-stimulation with a time course similar to that of the rebound potentiation of i.p.s.cs, we conclude that the potentiation is caused by a calcium-dependent upregula-tion of postsynaptic GABA_A receptor function. We propose that rebound potentiation is a mechanism by which in vivo block of climbing fibre activity induces an increase in excitability in Purkinje cells^5,6. Moreover, rebound potentiation of i.p.s.cs is a cellular mechanism which, in addition to the long-term depression of parallel fibre synaptic activity^4, may have an important role for motor learning in the cerebellum.PrP^c is a host protein anchored to the outer surface of neurons and to a lesser extent of lymphocytes and other cells. The transmissible agent (prion) responsible for scrapie is believed to be a modified form of PrP^c. Mice homozygous for disrupted PrP genes have been generated. Surprisingly, they develop and behave normally for at least seven months, and no immunological defects are apparent. It is now feasible to determine whether mice devoid of PrP^c can propagate prions and are susceptible to scrapie pathogenesis.A combined GLORIA sidescan and Hydrosweep multi-narrow-beam sonar survey shows striking evidence for fan-shaped spreading systems, bounding pseudofaults and compression ridges associated with 90° of clockwise rotation of the Juan Fernandez microplate in the past 4 Myr. A quantitative analysis of this evolution suggests that the microplate has rotated as a rigid 'roller bearing' for most of its history, driven at its edges by shear between the surrounding major plates. The remarkable similarity between the Juan Fernandez and Easter microplates, despite their different tectonic settings, suggests that this is a general model for microplate tectonics.A conference on changing patterns of journal publication suggests that electronic journals may already have arrived, but that their management remains a problem for the future.Control of the chronic diseases of middle age is increasingly important, in developed and in developing countries, as other causes of premature death decrease. It requires bigger clinical trials, and better epidemiology.The US National Science Foundation (NSF) should apply to its own studies the rigour it expects of grant-applicants.The surprise re-election of the Conservative British government may not be as bad for British science as the past decade would suggest. Much will depend on new people's willingness to listen to the truth.Pride and a Daily Marathon. By Jonathan Cole Duckworth: 1991. Pp. 194. £14.99.Diversity and the Tropical Rainforest. By John Terborgh Scientific American Library/W. H. Freeman: 1992. Pp. 242. $32.95, £17.95.MANY growth factors upon stimulation of their receptors induce the activity of extracellular signal-regulated kinases, ERKs, also known as MAP kinases^1,2. Several of these growth factors also activate the ras proto-oncogene product, p21^ ras (Ras), by stimulating the conversion of the inactive GDP-bound form of Ras to the active GTP-bound form^3–6. We have shown that direct introduction of p21^ ras oncoprotein into cells in the absence of growth factors activates ERKs within five minutes^7, which indicates that normal p21^ ras may be involved in the activation of ERKs by growth factors. Here we use a recombinant vaccinia virus expressing an interfering mutant of p21^ ras , Ras^Asn17, to investigate this question. In NIH3T3 cells that overexpress the insulin receptor, this recombinant virus inhibits insulin-induced activation of ERK2 completely, but there is no inhibition of insulin-induced activation of phosphatidyl-inositol-3-kinase. In rat-1 cells the recombinant virus inhibited ERK2 activity induced by platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) but not by phorbol ester. We conclude that p21^ ras mediates insulin-and PDGF-induced activation of ERK2.THE observed trend of increasing oceanic ^87Sr/^86Sr ratios during the late Cenozoic led Raymo et al .^1 to propose that chemical weathering rates increased at this time as a result of enhanced weatherability of silicate rocks. They suggested that this was due in turn to continential uplift, primarily in the Himalayas and the Andes. Because weathering involves the reaction of silicates with atmospheric carbon dioxide, considerations of changes in weathering rates must take into account the need to balance the global carbon cycle. To maintain this balance on timescales greater than 10^6yr, enhanced weathering requires an increased flux of CO_2, into the atmosphere^2. Without such an increased flux, weathering rates could not increase, and one is then forced to search for other explanations for the observed ^87Sr/^86Sr trend, such as a changing riverine strontium isotope composition^3–6. Here I assume that the strontium isotope record does indeed reflect enhanced weathering in the late Cenozoic, but propose that its cause may have been an increased CO_2 flux arising from the recycling of pelagic sedimentary carbon at subduction zones. Since the Jurassic, sedimentary carbonate accumulation has shifted from primarily cratonic to primarily pelagic environments^7–11; because sea-floor spreading transports pelagic carbonate to, and recycles it through, metamorphic environments in subduction zones, this shift to pelagic carbonate accumulation would provide the increased CO_2 flux needed to increase weathering rates^12,13BERYLLIUM-10 (half-life 1.5 Myr) is produced by spallation of nitrogen and oxygen atoms by cosmic rays in the upper atmosphere. Its production rate is proportional to the flux of cosmic rays, which is modulated by solar activity and the strength of the Earth's magnetic field^1,2. Weakening of the magnetic field allows more cosmic rays to impinge on the Earth's atmosphere, thereby increasing ^10Be production. Here we report that the ocean-wide average accumulation rate of ^10Be in Pacific sediments, which reflects the global average production rate of 10Be (ref. 3), was at least 25% greater during the height of the most recent ice age (∼ 24,000–16,000 yr ago) than during the Holocene (the past 10,000 yr). The higher production rate of ^10Be records the lower intensity of the geomagnetic field during that period and is consistent with the hypothesis developed to explain the younger ^14C ages of fossil corals compared with ages obtained by U–Th dating^4. These results also point to a more general need to consider variations in production rate in geochronological studies using other cosmogenic nuclides.RECENT use of tektites as evidence for a bolide impact at the Cretaceous/Tertiary (K/T) boundary has focused attention on their long-term stability^1–5. It was proposed in these studies that residual clay features with the spherical tektite morphology result from in situ alteration of the original glassy material. By contrast, examination of tektite alteration as an analogue for the long-term degradation of nuclear waste glass has revealed no evidence of alteration, hydration or devitrification either for samples found in nature or for those reacted in the laboratory^6–9: no residual clay minerals were observed, and therefore the glass was interpreted as having reacted by a complete dissolution or etching process^10–12. Here we show that these apparently incongruent observations can be reconciled through understanding the relationship between the environment in which the glass reacts and the chemical processes that control the reaction rate. We have examined both natural and experimental alteration of tektites and have found that, under conditions of restricted water contact, tektite reaction is dominated by water diffusion and in situ hydrolysis of the glass structure, followed by restructuring of the silicate network to form clays. Over time, the effective rate for these processes is lower than that for etching. Thus alteration of tektites to clays, as observed at the K/T boundary, can proceed only under conditions of limited water contact.ONE of the principal long-term problems associated with nuclear fission reactions is the generation of large amounts of radioactive strontium isotopes, particularly ^90Sr. An effective method for the removal and entrapment of strontium from contaminated environments is therefore desirable to prevent potential health problems associated with radionuclide ingestion^1–5. In this context, inorganic cation exchangers have been useful by virtue of their capacity for structure-specific ion exchange^6–12. We report here that 'Na-4-mica'^13–15, a highly charged sodium fluorophlogopite mica (Na_4Mg_6Al_4Si_4O_20F_4), can be used for the selective removal of strontium ions from solution and for strontium immobilization at room temperature. We also report a novel method for bulk synthesis of 'Na-4-mica' as a pure phase. This material is unique among highly charged or brittle micas because of its ability to undergo a hydration reaction, which allows the material to be used as a highly selective strontium-ion sieve. This or similar compounds could find potential application in the decontamination and disposal of nuclear waste.MANY planets have been shown to have chaotic instabilities in their orbital motions, but the long-term significance of this is not fully understood^1. The eccentricity of Mercury, for example, changes by about 25% of its value over 40 times the Lyapunov time^2,3(the e-folding time for divergence of nearby orbits), but the orbit of Pluto, in an integration lasting 50 Lyapunov times^4, shows no significant change. Here we show that the orbit of the near-Jupiter asteroid 522 Helga is chaotic, with an unusually short Lyapunov time of 6,900 yr. We integrate its motion, including perturbations from the outer giant planets, over a period 1,000 times longer than this, and find no significant instability. Chaos in the orbit of 522 Helga is caused by a 7:12 resonance with the orbit of Jupiter, but the size of the chaotic region in phase space is small; stability is ensured because the eccentricity and precession of the orbit are such that it avoids close encounters with Jupiter. Asteroid orbits with larger proper eccentricity would, we suggest, be genuinely unstable, consistent with the sparse asteroid population near Helga. Although Helga is the first clear-cut example of a stable chaotic orbit, we argue that 'stable chaos' may be a rather common feature of Solar System dynamics.A novel G protein α -subunit ( α -gustducin) has been identified and cloned from taste tissue, α -Gustducin messenger RNA is expressed in taste buds of all taste papillae (circumvallate, foliate and fungiform); it is not expressed in non-sensory portions of the tongue, nor is it expressed in the other tissues examined, α -Gustducin most closely resembles the transducins (the rod and cone photoreceptor G proteins), suggesting that gustducin's role in taste transduction is analogous to that of transducin in light transduction.Nature 356, 162-164 (1992) THE following was omitted from the Acknowledgements section of this Letter: "This work was supported in part by a NIH grant to M.A.P. Y.T. was a recipient of a mentor based fellowship award of the American Diabetes Association."Concealing the truth without lying is an old art, now spreading in the US human genome project.About 30% of the Earth is covered by continents, but only about 10 small kernels of these continentsae—known as Archaean cratonsae—are continental fragments formed before 2.5 Gyr ago. The Kaapvaal craton of South Africa, which formed and stabilized between 3.7 and 2.7 Gyr ago, is one of the oldest reasonably sized examples of these continental fragments. It consists of a mosaic of subdomains that have been welded together by processes similar to those of modern-day plate tectonics. The earliest subdomains may have owed their origin to the onset of efficient recycling from the Earth's hydrosphere into the mantle.Solar Interior and Atmosphere. Edited by A. N. Cox W. C. Livingston and M. S. Matthews. University of Arizona Press: 1991. Pp. 1,416. $65, £57.95. Distributed by Eurospan in Europe.The Ecology of Fishes on Coral Reefs. Edited by Peter F. Sale. Academic: 1991. Pp. 754. $75.00, £46.50.Science as Salvation: A Modern Myth and its Meaning. By Mary Midgley. Routledge: 1992. Pp. 239. £25, $25.Artificial Believers: The Ascription of Belief. By Afzal Ballim and Yorick Wilks. Lawrence Erlbaum:1991. Pp. 285. £25, $42.50.A surprising new measurement confirms that the Sun shines but, confusingly, supports all plausible solutions of the long-standing solar neutrino problem.Scientific fraud, much in the news recently, is not a new phenomenon. What follows is a personal account of a particular case.The prime minister of Norway, having popularized sustainable development, now wants world government.That Denmark should have thrown dust in the eyes of those working for a politically united Europe only illustrates the force of last week's argument that Europe needs ways of making decisions that command general respect.What's new, what's hot? DNA sequencing tools for the Macintosh, a vector system for the selective cloning of exons and a handy hand-held scanner.THE early stages of primate visual processing appear to be divided up into several component parts so that, for example, colour, form and motion are analysed by anatomically distinct streams^1–3. We have found that further subspecialization occurs within the motion processing stream. Neurons representing two different kinds of information about visual motion are segregated in columnar fashion within the middle temporal area of the owl monkey. These columns can be distinguished by labelling with 2-deoxyglucose in response to large-field random-dot patterns. Neurons in lightly labelled interbands have receptive fields with antagonistic surrounds: the response to a centrally placed moving stimulus is suppressed by motion in the surround. Neurons in more densely labelled bands have surrounds that reinforce the centre response so that they integrate motion cues over large areas of the visual field. Interband cells carry information about local motion contrast that may be used to detect motion boundaries or to indicate retinal slip during visual tracking. Band cells encode information about global motion that might be useful for orienting the animal in its environment.EXTRA-PAIR copulations (EPCs) seem to be one of the most widespread alternative reproductive behaviours by which male birds can increase their fitness^1,2. In many species females actively solicit or freely engage in EPCs^3–5, which suggests that they benefit from them. Of the eight hypothetical benefits proposed^2,6, the most likely are genetic^2. Often females engage in EPCs with more dominant males^3,7 or with males with more elaborate ornaments^8,9. In species in which paternity was assigned, extra-pair young were divided asymmetrically between males^10–12. Here, combining detailed behavioural work with DNA-fingerprinting of an entire population, we present evidence that such an asymmetry is indeed caused by female behaviour, and that 'attractive' males do not suffer lost paternity, survive better and recruit more young. Our results support the genetic quality hypothesis.SEVERAL stages of a parasitic fungus were found in the cells of the alga Palaeonitella in thin sections of macroplants in the Lower Devonian Rhynie chert. Some of the algal cells are greatly enlarged indicating a host response. The fungi include encysted zoospores on the algal cell wall, penetration of the host cell wall, and transfer of the fungal protoplast and the mature zoosporangium with discharge tube. Here we document evidence of plasmodiophoromycetes in the fossil record and demonstrate that this type of parasitic interaction with a modern host response was well established in freshwater palaeoecosystems at least 400 million years ago.ARCHAEAN granite–greenstone terranes^1–3 in which narrow belts of 'greenstone' (ultramafic and mafic volcanics) and overlying sedimentary rocks occur in association with broad provinces of 'granite' (granitic igneous rocks, gneiss and migmatite), have long puzzled geologists because of the lack of any clear modern analogues. Not only is there uncertainty about how the greenstone formed in the first place^4–6 but there is continuing debate about how and when the terranes developed their distinctive structural and metamorphic architecture. Many granite–greenstone terranes display a dome-and-keel geometry, in which belts of supracrustal (volcanic and sedimentary) rocks occur as structural troughs wedged between dome-shaped bodies of the granite–gneiss–migmatite complex. A metamorphic aureole typically occurs in the supracrustals adjacent to their contact with the domes, and the contact itself is a shear zone. Here we report the results of field studies of a granite–greenstone terrane in Brazil, showing that this architecture originated during the Proterozoic, more than 500 million years after extrusion of the greenstone. We suggest that the thermal regime and deformation kinematics necessary to create this architecture could be generated during an episode of crustal extension, when hot basement rocks were transported upwards along a transcrustal normal fault system to the base of the supracrustals.Oligonucleotide-immobilized plastic plates provide a rapid and easy-to-use tool for use in mRNA research, including the long-term storage, amplification and detection of the specific message, in vitro synthesis of both strands of sense and antisense mRNA, and ligation of cDNA to other DNA molecules.REGULATION of cytoskeletal structure and motility by extracellular signals is essential for all directed forms of cell movement and underlies the developmental process of axonal guidance in neuronal growth cones. Interaction with polycationic microbeads can trigger morphogenic changes in neurons and muscle cells normally associated with formation of pre- and postsynaptic specializations^1,2. Furthermore, when various types of microscopic particles are applied to the lamellar surface of a neuronal growth cone or motile cell they often exhibit retrograde movement at rates of 1–6 µ min^−1 (refs 3–6). There is strong evidence that this form of particle movement results from translocation of membrane proteins associated with cortical F-actin networks, not from bulk retrograde lipid flow^4,5,7 and may be a mechanism behind processes such as cell locomotion, growth cone migration and capping of cell-surface antigens^6,8,9. Here we report a new form of motility stimulated by polycationic bead interactions with the growth-cone membrane surface. Bead binding rapidly induces intracellular actin filament assembly, coincident with a production of force sufficient to drive bead movements. These extracellular bead movements resemble intracellular movements of bacterial parasites known to redirect host cell F-actin assembly for propulsion. Our results suggest that site-directed actin filament assembly may be a widespread cellular mechanism for generating force at membrane–cytoskeletal interfaces.THE functional analysis of determinants on RNA has been largely limited to molecules that contain naturally occurring ribonucleotides, so little is known about the role of 2′-hydroxyl groups in protein–RNA recognition. A single base pair (G3·U70) in the acceptor stem of tRNA^Ala is the principal element for specific recognition by Escherichia coli alanine-tRNA synthetase^1,2. This tRNA synthetase aminoacylates small RNA helices that contain the G3·U70 base pair. Furthermore, removal of the G3 exocyclic 2-amino group that projects into the minor groove eliminates aminoacylation^3. This 2-amino group is flanked on either side by ribose 2′-hydroxyl groups that line the minor groove. Here we use chemical synthesis to construct 32 helices that make deoxy and O -methyl substitutions of individual and multiple 2′-hydroxyl groups near and beyond the G3·U70 base pair and find that functional 2′-hydroxyl contacts are clustered within a few angstroms of the critical 2-amino group. These contacts are highly specific and make a thermodynamically significant contribution to RNA recognition.Icons and Symmetries. By Simon L. Altmann. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 104. £14.95, $29.95.BUBBLES of ancient air in polar ice cores have revealed that the atmospheric concentration of CO_2 during the Last Glacial Maximum was 180–200 p.p.m.v., substantially lower than the pre-industrial value of about 280 p.p.m.v. (refs 1, 2). It is generally thought that this reduction in atmospheric CO_2 during glacial time was driven by oceanic processes. The most likely explanations invoke either a decrease in dissolved CO_2 in surface waters because of a more efficient 'biological pump' transporting carbon to deep waters, or a higher alkalinity in the glacial ocean as a consequence of changes in carbonate dissolution or sedimentation^3. Because isotope fractionation during photosynthesis depletes ^13C in the organic matter produced, changes in the biological pump would alter the carbon isotope composition of atmospheric CO_2, whereas changes in alkalinity would in themselves have no such effect. Here we report measurements of the carbon isotope content of CO_2 in ice cores from Byrd Station, Antarctica, in an attempt to distinguish between these mechanisms. We find that during the ice age the reduced isotope ratio δ^13C was more negative than pre-industrial values by 0.3 ±0.2%,. Although this result does not allow us to discriminate definitely between the two possible causes of lower glacial atmospheric CO_2. it does indicate that changes in the strength of the biological pump cannot alone have been responsible.THE El Niño Southern Oscillation (ENSO), a climate fluctuation that recurs on a 2–7-yr timescale, is associated with persistent large-scale fluctuations in the dynamical behaviour of the global atmosphere–ocean system^1. Here we present a study of the latitudinal redistribution of angular momentum within the atmosphere from 1976 to 1991. We observe slow, global-scale coherent poleward propagation of atmospheric angular-momentum fluctuations on interannual timescales. These originate in equatorial regions, where they lead the main atmospheric anomalies of the ENSO cycle by nearly two years; they penetrate to latitudes higher than 60° in both hemispheres, where they lag behind the ENSO cycle by about four years. We can also distinguish the bimodality of the ENSO phenomenon, with a low-frequency component centred at a period close to 4.2 years and a high-frequency component centred near 2.4 years. Each of the two components has a distinct latitudinal propagation pattern. In the period studied, strong El Niño and related La Niña climatic events occur when these components add constructively.A LARGE amount of momentum is transferred to the Southern Ocean by strong westerly winds. Analytical and numerical models have suggested that transient eddies may be important in transporting this momentum away from the region of wind forcing, either horizontally^1or vertically downwards where it is balanced by bottom topographic drag^2–5. There are, however, few long-term in situ observations of horizontal eddy momentum flux^6–8, and no large-scale measurements of vertical eddy fluxes, to test these models. As a result, the momentum balance of the Antarctic circumpolar current (ACC) remains uncertain, and the role of eddies controversial. Here we use Geosat satellite altimeter data to resolve directional eddy kinetic energy and horizontal eddy momentum flux in the ACC on fine spatial and temporal scales. The complex spatial distribution of surface eddy momentum flux is strongly influenced by bottom topography. The horizontal eddy momentum flux tends generally to concentrate the mean flow, although some regions of divergence are observed. Our results show that the zonally averaged horizontal eddy momentum flux from transient eddies is an order of magnitude too small, and in the wrong direction to directly balance the eastward momentum input from wind^1.MOST genes involved in DNA replication in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae are transcribed transiently during late Gl as cells become committed to a new cell cycle at Start^1. Their promoters all contain one or more versions of an 8-base-pair motif (ACGCGTNA) containing an Mlu I restriction enzyme site and called the Mlu I cell-cycle box (MCB)^2. MCBs are both necessary and sufficient for the late Gl-specific transcription of the TMP1 thymidylate synthase and POL1 DNA polymerase genes^3,4. A different late Gl-specific 8-base-pair transcription element called the SCB (CACGAAAA; ref. S) is bound by a factor containing the Swi4 and Swi6 proteins 6,7 . We describe here the formation in vitro of complexes on TMP1 MCBs that contain the Swi6 protein and, we suggest, a protein of relative molecular mass 120,000 (p!20) that is distinct from Swi4. Transcription due to SCBs and MCBs occurs in the absence of Swi6 but it is no longer correctly regulated in the cell cycle. We suggest that Swi6 is an essential regulatory subunit of two different Start-dependent transcription factors. One factor (SBF) contains Swi4 and binds to SCBs, whereas the other (MBF) contains the protein p120 and binds MCBs.IN budding yeast many genes are expressed under cell-cycle control in late Gl. These include a large group of DNA synthesis genes^1, the HO gene^2 involved in mating-type switching, CTS1 (chitinase)^3 and also CLN1 and CLN2 (ref. 4) encoding Gl cyclins. Two factors, encoded by the SWI4 and SWI6 genes, are required for HO (ref. 5), CLN (refs 6, 7) and CTS1 (ref. 3) gene expression and, at least in the HO promoter, bind to CACGA_4 upstream sequences^5,7–9(CCBs). This motif is not found upstream of the DNA synthesis genes, which instead have a hexamer element, ACGCGT1 (MCB), an Mlu I restriction site, that is recognized by a cell-cycle regulated transcription complex DSC1 (ref. 1). This Mlu I-activation system consisting of the MCBs and DSC1 is conserved in fission yeast where a DSCl-like complex controls the cdc22 ^+ribonucleotide reductase gene 10 . The Schizosae-charomyces pombe cdc10 ^+ gene encodes a component of DSC1 (ref. 10) and, significantly, this has homology with both the Swi4and Swi6 proteins ^8,11. Here we show that Swi6 is an essential component of DSC1 and that deletion of SWI6 impairs the cell-cycle regulation of the DNA synthesis genes, as well as CLN1 and CLN2. Thus Swi6 is the common factor in regulation of all the above genes and may therefore be responsible for the timing of their expression in late Gl.IN addition to its diverse functions inside cells, ATP can act at several types of cell-surface receptor^1–3. One of these (P_2x-purinoceptor) is believed to be a ligand-gated cation channel^1–6. The presence of P_2x receptors on autonomic, sensory and central neurons suggests that ATP might be released to act as a fast excitatory synaptic transmitter. Here we record excitatory synaptic potentials and currents from cultured coeliac ganglion neurons which are mimicked by ATP, blocked by the P_2-purinoceptor antagonist suramin, desensitized by α,β-methylene-ATP and unaffected by antagonists acting at nicotine, 5-hydroxytryptamine, N -methyl- D -aspartate (NMDA), non-NMDA glutamate, γ-aminobutyric acid (GABA), noradrenaline or adenosine receptors. We conclude that ATP is the neurotransmitter at this neuro–neuronal synapse.PROGRESSIVE cerebral deposition of the amyloid β-peptide is an early and invariant feature of Alzheimer's disease. The β-peptide is released by proteolytic cleavages from the β-amyloid precursor protein (βAPP)^1, a membrane-spanning glycoprotein expressed in most mammalian cells. Normal secretion of βAPP involves a cleavage in the β-peptide region2-3, releasing the soluble extramembranous portion^4,5 and retaining a 10K C-terminal fragment in the membrane^6. Because this secretory pathway precludes β-amyloid formation, we searched for an alternative proteolytic processing pathway that can generate β-peptide-bearing fragments from full-length β APP. Incubation of living human endothelial cells with a βAPP antibody revealed reinternalization of mature βAPP from the cell surface and its targeting to endosomes/lysosomes. After cell-surface biotinylation, full-length biotinylated βAPP was recovered inside the cells. Purification of lysosomes directly demonstrated the presence of mature βAPP and an extensive array of β-peptide-containing proteolytic products. Our results define a second processing pathway for βAPP and suggest that it may be responsible for generating amyloid-bearing fragments in Alzheimer's disease.BUCKMINSTERFULLERENE (C_60) is much more reactive than was originally anticipated, because resonance structures that place double bonds in the pentagonal rings are energetically unfavourable^1 and lead to restricted electron delocalization. C_60 therefore behaves as an electron-deficient 'super-alkene' rather than as a 'super-aromatic', as demonstrated by the addition of osmium tetroxide^2, platinum^3, dipolar molecules^4, alkyl radicals^5and amines^6. Reaction of anions derived from C_60 with iodomethane results in up to 24 methyl groups becoming attached to the cage, although compounds containing either eight or six methyl groups are dominant in the mass spectrum^7. Here we report the synthesis of crystalline C_60Br_6 (which forms magenta plates) and C_60Br_8 (dark brown prisms) by mixing solutions of C_60 with bromine. The structures of these compounds, which contain occluded bromine when precipitated from the brominating medium, have been determined by single-crystal X-ray diffraction. Reaction of C_60 with bromine in the absence of solvent gives C_60Br_24 (which also contains occluded bromine). We propose a configuration for C_60Br_24 (and sterically hindered C_60X_24 compounds) based on that for C_60Br_8. On being warmed in solution, C_60Br_6 rearranges and disproportionates to C_60Br_8, and all three bromo derivatives revert to C_60 on strong heating. These results provide an insight into the pattern of addition of bulky reagents to C_60.THE recent fabrication of light-emitting diodes (LEDs) from conjugated polymers^1,2demonstrates the technological potential of this class of electronic materials. A variety of colours are possible, because the wavelength of luminescence emission can be chemically tuned during synthesis^1–4. In addition, the mechanical properties of polymers suggest that light-emitting structures can be made that are more flexible than their inorganic counterparts, provided appropriate materials can be found for the substrate and electrodes. Here we report the fabrication of a fully flexible LED using poly(ethylene terephthalate) as the substrate, soluble poly-aniline as the hole-injecting electrode, a substituted poly(1,4-phenylene-vinylene) as the electroluminescent layer and calcium as the electron-injecting top contract. The structure is mechanically robust and may be sharply bent without failure. The LED is easily visible under room lighting and has an external quantum efficiency of about 1%. With a turn-on voltage for light emission of 2–3 V, the 'plastic' LED demonstrates that this unique combination of optical, electrical and mechanical properties can be used to make novel structures that are compatible with conventional devices.THE magnetic response of the high-transition-temperature oxide superconductors to an applied field is related to two technologically important issues in these materials: their finite resistivities well below the superconducting transition and their critical currents. In addition, the scientifically interesting issues of pinning, melting, vortex glass behaviour and vortex liquids^1 can be probed by studying the time dependence of the magnetization. Most techniques used to probe the magnetization of superconductors represent averages over the entire volume of the sample. This precludes the study of defects, and also raises the question of whether the observed behaviour is intrinsic or is dominated by defects. On the other hand, spatially resolved techniques such as magnetic decoration or scanned probe microscopy are usually too slow to allow studies of the dynamics of these systems. Here we demonstrate a technique for real-time, spatially resolved imaging of flux dynamics in superconductors with a wide variety of sample morphologies. Following earlier work^2–6, we place a wafer of a magneto-optical material—in this case, a doped garnet film—in contact with a superconducting sample in a polarizing light microscope. The spatial and temporal resolution afforded by the high-quality garnet film allows us to investigate the effect of defects (specifically, twin planes) on the magnetic response of the superconductor.THE spatial and luminosity distribution of γ-ray bursts as observed by the BATSE instrument on the Compton Gamma Ray Observatory^1,2 provides support for the revival of the idea^3,4 that the burst sources are at cosmological distances^5. I present here a new model for γ-ray bursts at cosmological distances, based on the formation of rapidly rotating neutron stars with surface magnetic fields of the order of 10^15. Such objects could form by the gravitational collapse of accreting white dwarfs with anomalously high magnetic fields in binaries, as in magnetic cataclysmic binaries. Once formed, such rapidly rotating and strongly magnetized neutron stars would lose their rotational kinetic energy catastrophically, on a timescale of seconds or less: rotation of the magnetic field creates a strong electric field, and hence an electron–positron plasma, which I show to be optically thick and in quasi-thermodynamic equilibrium. This plasma flows away from the neutron star at relativistic speeds, and X-ray and γ-ray emission at the photosphere of this relativistic wind may then reproduce the observational characteristics of a γ-ray burst.X-ray analyses have defined the three-dimensional structures of crystals of mouse and human renins complexed with peptide inhibitors at resolutions of 1.9 and 2.8 Å, respectively. The exquisite specificity of renin arises partly from ordered loop regions at the periphery of the binding cleft. Although the pattern of main-chain hydrogen bonding in other aspartic proteinase inhibitor complexes is conserved in renins, differences in the positions of secondary structure elements (particularly helices) also lead to improved specificity in renins for angiotensinogen substrates.Samples of the C4 shrub Atriplex confertifolia recovered from packrat middens in the western United States provide a record of changes in the ^13C/^12C ratio (δ^13C) of atmospheric carbon dioxide. During the last ice age, atmospheric CO_2 was isotopically light relative to interglacial periods, a result attributed to a combination of factors including reduced terrestrial biomass and decreased productivity of the polar ocean.A Tennessee court accepts that an eight-cell blastomere is not advanced enough to be considered a person.Advances in the understanding of molecular biology of human disease and the development of efficient gene transfer techniques have resulted in practical approaches to human gene therapy, with new techniques being developed at an increasing rate. The first trials have now begun in humans and initial results are positive.Macromolecular Crystallography with Synchrotron Radiation. By John R. Helliwell. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 595. £95, $165.Taphonomy: Releasing the Data Locked in the Fossil Record. Edited by Peter A. Allison and Derek E. G. Briggs. Plenum: 1991. Pp. 560. $95, £67.06.Origins of Human Cancer: A Comprehensive Review. Edited by Joan Brugge Tom Curran Ed Harlow and Frank McCormick. Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory Press: 1991. Pp. 204. $80.Ecocide in the USSR: Health and Nature Under Siege. By Murray Feshbach and Alfred Friendly Jr. Basic Books: 1992. Pp. 376. $24. (To be published in the United Kingdom by Aurum Press later this year.)MITOSIS comprises a complex set of overlapping motile events, many of which involve microtubule-dependent motor enzymes^1,2. Here we describe a new member of the kinesin superfamily. The protein was originally identified as a spindle antigen by the CHO1 monoclonal antibody^3 and shown to be required for mitotic progression^4,5. We have cloned the gene that encodes this antigen and found that its sequence contains a domain with strong sequence similarity to the motor domain of kinesin-like proteins. The product of this gene, expressed in bacteria, can cross-bridge antiparallel microtubules in vitro , and in the presence of Mg–ATP, microtubules slide over one another in a fashion reminiscent of microtubule movements during spindle elongation.THE mechanics of chromosome movement, mitotic spindle assembly and spindle elongation have long been central questions of cell biology^1. After attachment in prometaphase of a micro-tubule from one pole, duplicated chromosome pairs travel towards the pole in a rapid but discontinuous motion^2,3. This is followed by a slower congression towards the midplate as the chromosome pair orients with each kinetochore attached to the microtubules from the nearest pole. The pairs disjoin at anaphase and translocate to opposite poles and the interpolar distance increases. Here we identify CENP-E as a kinesin-like motor protein (M_r 312,000) that accumulates in the G2 phase of the cell cycle. CENP-E associates with kinetochores during congression, relocates to the spindle midzone at anaphase, and is quantitatively discarded at the end of the cell division. CENP-E is likely to be one of the motors responsible for mammalian chromosome movement and/or spindle elongation.DURING cell division, sister chromosomes segregate from each other on a microtubule-based structure called the mitotic spindle. Proteins bind to the centromere, a region of chromosomal DNA, to form the kinetochore, which mediates chromosome attachment to the mitotic spindle microtubules^1,2. In the budding yeast Sac-charomyces cerevisiae , genetic analysis has shown that the 28-base-pair (bp) CDEIII region of the 125-bp centromere DNA sequence (CEN sequence) is the main region controlling chromosome segregation in vivo ^3,4. Therefore it is likely that proteins binding to the CDEIII region link the centromeres to the microtubules during mitosis. A complex of proteins (CBF3) that binds specifically to the CDEIII DNA sequence has been isolated by affinity chromatography^5. Here we describe kinetochore function in vitro . The CBF3 complex can link DNA to microtubules, and the complex contains a minus-end-directed microtubule-based motor. We suggest that microtubule-based motors form the fundamental link between microtubules and chromosomes at mitosis.IN mammals, testis determination is under the control of the testis-determining factor borne by the Y chromosome^1,2. SRY , a gene cloned from the sex-determining region of the human Y chromosome, has been equated with the testis-determining factor in man^3–5 and mouse^6,7. We have used a human SRY probe to identify and clone related genes from the Y chromosome of two marsupial species. Comparisons of eutherian and metatherian Y-located SRY sequences suggest rapid evolution of these genes, especially outside the region encoding the DNA-binding HMG box. The SRY homologues, together with the mouse Ubely homologues^8, are the first genes to be identified on the marsupial Y chromosome.THE mammalian subclass Theria consists of infraclasses Meta-theria (marsupials) and Eutheria ('placentals') which diverged from each other 120–150 million years before present^1 (Myr BP). Both infraclasses have Y chromosome-dependent testis determination but direct molecular evidence linking the Metatherian and Eutherian Y chromosomes is lacking. Comparative analyses indicate that three mammalian genes have remained Y-linked for at least 80 Myr, since the divergence of the Eutherian orders from a common ancestor. These are Zfy , a gene encoding a transcription factor of the zinc-finger type^2; Sry , the putative primary testis-determining gene^3; and Ubely (formerly Sby or Als9Y-l) , a candidate for the mouse spermatogenesis gene Spy , encoding a ubiquitin-activating enzyme El homologue^4,5. Although in mar-spials Zfy homologues are autosomal^6, a Y homologue of Sry has recently been isolated^7. We report here the identification of a functional marsupial Y-linked homologue of the murine Ube1y gene establishing that Metatherian and Eutherian Y chromosomes diverged from a common ancestor. This extreme conservation indicates that Ube1y plays a critical role in male development.THE flattening of sea-floor depths from the √age dependence predicted by considering the cooling plate as a growing thermal boundary layer is a fundamental constraint on the evolution of oceanic lithosphere^1. Previous explanations for the flattening have included reheating from convective instabilities that form beneath lithosphere older than ∼80 Myr (ref. 2), thermal rejuvenation of lithosphere that passes over stationary hotspots^3–5, or a whole-mantle flow forced by two converging plates^6. We suggest here that the flattening of old ocean floors can perhaps best be explained as a dynamic phenomenon reflecting flow in asthenosphere underlying the oceanic lithosphere. Applying the model to the Pacific plate, we show that a solution for flow in an asthenosphere low-viscosity channel which is 'consumed' by plate accretion and the subduction of lithosphere at trenches, and replenished by near-ridge upwelling and near-ridge hotspots, generates the observed ∼ 1 km of sea-floor flattening for asthenospheric viscosities of 2 × 10^18 Pa s and an absolute Pacific plate motion of 100 mm yr^−1. Our model can also explain the asymmetric subsidence of the South American and African plates away from the Mid-Atlantic Ridge.NEAR-TOTAL depletion of the ozone in surface air is often observed in the Arctic spring, coincident with high atmospheric concentrations of inorganic bromine^1–5. Barrie et al .^1 suggested that the ozone depletion was due to a catalytic cycle involving the radicals Br and BrO (ref. 6); however, these species are rapidly converted to the nonradical species HBr, HOBr and BrNO_3, quenching ozone loss. McConnell et al .^7 proposed that cycling of inorganic bromine between aerosols and the gas phase could maintain sufficiently high levels of Br and BrO to destroy ozone, but they did not specify a mechanism for aerosol-phase production of active bromine species. Here we propose such a mechanism, based on known aqueous-phase chemistry, which rapidly converts HBr, HOBr and BrNO_3 back to Br and BrO radicals. This mechanism should be particularly efficient in the presence of the high concentrations of sulphuric acid aerosols observed during ozone depletion events^3.Closely spaced sampling of basalts around the East Pacific Rise, made possible by a new sampling technique, reveals spatial patterns of change in the composition of the sea floor. The patterns demonstrate the scale and magnitude of temporal variability in the basalt chemistry, and suggest that the characteristic length scale of petrological segmentation can vary over time from 15 to >40 km along a single section of ridge. Patterns of basalt composition on the sea floor reveal the history of the ocean ridge with much finer resolution than do sea-floor spreading magnetic anomalies.Chemical Communication: The Language of Pheromones. By William G. Agosta. W. H. Freeman: 1992. Pp. 179. á£17.95, $32.95.My Universe: Selected Reviews. By Ya. B. Zel'dovich. Harwood Academic: 1992. Pp. 252. á£19, $30 (pbk).THE feasibility of determining crystal structures from powder diffraction data has improved substantially during the past decade. Early work using laboratory X-ray data^1,2 has been followed by studies that take advantage of the higher resolution provided by synchrotron X-ray^3 and neutron^4 diffraction instrumentation. Other advances have been made in the computational aspects of the problem^5,6. Nevertheless, there has remained a disparity between the complexity of structures that can be solved, ab initio , from powder data, and those that can in principle be refined by the Rietveld profile method^7. For example, refinements with up to 34 atoms^8 and 132 positional parameters^9 have been reported, but the most complex unknown structure to be solved from powder data contains only 17 atoms in the asymmetric unit cell^10. Here we describe the solution and refinement of Ga_2(HPO_3)_3.4H_2O, a novel framework structure with 29 atoms in the asymmetric unit cell and 117 structural parameters, by the combined use of synchrotron X-ray and neutron powder diffraction. Exploiting the complementary nature of these techniques further extends the power of powder diffraction for structure determination.THE venusian atmosphere exhibits two global-scale circulation patterns: an east–west super-rotation at altitudes above 100km and below 70 km, and a solar-locked circulation between these heights, in which material rises on the dayside of the planet, flows around to the nightside and descends near the antisolar point (local midnight). The region at which these two flows interact (∼95 km) is difficult to study, and existing data^1 are either in conflict or indicate long-term dynamical changes. Here we present high-resolution images of an oxygen airglow that arises during down-welling at ∼95 km altitude on the nightside of Venus. Oxygen atoms are formed by photolysis of CO_2 on the sunlit hemisphere, and are then transported to the nightside, where they recombine during descent. The newly formed molecular oxygen emits radiation to produce the airglow. We observe localized, short-lived regions of emission and neighbouring dark areas, demonstrating the potential of such observations to constrain atmospheric dynamics at this little-studied and important altitude in the venusian mesosphere.RECENT observations with the BATSE instrument on the Compton Gamma Ray Observatory show that the distribution of γ-ray bursts is isotropic but radially non-uniform^1. Spectral features, time histories and the presence of X-ray tails suggest that the bursts arise from galactic neutron stars^2, but low-velocity neutron stars born in the galactic disk would be concentrated towards the galactic plane^3,4, which would not fit the BATSE results. Neutron stars born with velocities greater than ∼800 km s^−1 will, however, escape from the Galaxy's gravitational field. We show here that a population of such objects can fit the γ-ray burst distributions found by BATSE and also the Pioneer Venus Orbiter^5, although two important conditions must be met: the high-velocity neutron stars should turn on as burst sources only after some time (perhaps after they have ceased to be radiopulsars), and the low-velocity neutron stars must rarely generate γ-ray bursts. The observed correlation^6–8 in pulsars between magnetic moment and velocity may provide a physical cause for the difference in bursting properties between the two populations. Our model implies that the brightest bursts, with fluxes ≳3 × 10^−5 erg cm^−2s^−1, will be anisotropically distributed.USON et al .^1 have detected the 21-cm hydrogen line at a redshift of z = 3.4, both in absorption against a radio galaxy, 0902 + 343, which is also at z = 3.4, and more interestingly in emission from a nearby region at the same redshift. They interpret the H I emission as arising from a Zeldovich 'pancake'^2, a primordial supergalactic condensation of gas which has yet to fragment into protogalactic units. Pancake (or 'top-down') theories of galaxy formation have several well-known difficulties^3,4, however, and 'bottom-up' theories, in which protogalactic units form first and only later aggregate into clusters, are currently more popular. We propose that the H I emission seen by Uson et al . may be emission from neutral hydrogen in a collection of protogalaxies, which are of the type needed to explain the damped Lyman-α absorption systems in quasar spectra^5. For this explanation to work, more galaxies per unit mass must form in protocluster environments than in the field. The narrowness of the observed emission line implies that the protocluster is near gravitational turn-around, the moment at which it detaches itself from the general cosmic expansion and begins to collapse. The absorption line can arise from a gaseous halo rich in H I around the radio galaxy, or from other galaxies in the vicinity.History of Animals (3 volumes)*; Parts of Animals, Movement of Animals, Progression of Animals (1 volume)†; Generation of Animals (1 volume)‡. By Aristotle. Loeb Classical Library/Harvard University Press: 1937-1991. Each volume $15.50, á£10.50. Enquiry into Plants, On Odours, On Weather-Signs (2 volumes)§; De Causis Plantarum (3 volumes)∥. By Theophrastus. Loeb Classical Library/Harvard University Press: 1916–1990. Each volume $á±5.50, á£10.50. Theophrastus of Eresus: Sources for his Life, Writings, Thought and Influence (2 volumes) ¶. Edited by William Fortenbaugh et al. Brill: 1992. Pp. 465, 705. á£50, $100, Dfl. 175 (both volumes). Theophrastus: His Psychological, Doxographical and Scientific Writings **. Edited by William Fortenbaugh and Dimitri Gutas. Transaction: 1992. Pp. 410. $44.95.A continuous array of overlapping clones covering the entire human chromosome 21q was constructed from human yeast artificial chromosome libraries using sequence-tagged sites as landmarks specifically detected by polymerase chain reaction. The yeast artificial chromosome contiguous unit starts with pericentromeric and ends with subtelomeric loci of 21q. The resulting order of sequence-tagged sites is consistent with other physical and genetic mapping data. This set of overlapping clones will promote our knowledge of the structure of this chromosome and the function of its genes.JUVENILE dispersal is sex-biased in many mammals and birds: one sex often disperses more often or farther than the other. Two hypotheses are generally presented for sex-biased dispersal. The first holds that juvenile dispersal reduces reproductive and/or resource competition between parents and same-sexed offspring^1–5. If so, presence of a parent on the natal home range should both promote dispersal of same-sex offspring and suppress reproduction of those that remain. The second is that juvenile dispersal reduces matings between parents and offspring^6–10, thus decreasing the likelihood of inbreeding depression^11–13. If so, presence of a parent should favour dispersal and reproductive suppression of offspring of the opposite sex. Here I present evidence that juvenile dispersal in white-footed mice, Peromyscus leucopus , is due to inbreeding avoidance. When population density was high, experimental removal of one parent delayed dispersal of opposite-sexed offspring and only the presence of the parents of opposite sex suppressed juvenile reproduction.COMPOSITIONAL convection occurs when a liquid containing more than one chemical component undergoes fractional crystallization. Above a critical solidification rate, a solid–liquid mixed phase (or 'mush') develops which can exhibit spatial gradients of permeability and flow due to preferential dissolution and precipitation in the upwellings and downwellings respectively. A striking, but poorly understood, example is when upflow occurs in narrow, crystal-free, cylindrical channels or 'chimneys'. Such dynamic effects may occur in the Earth's core^1, crustal magma reservoirs^2, hydrothermal systems at mid-ocean ridges^3 and during the diagenesis of sedimentary rocks^4. Using experiments designed to maximize the effects of dissolution and precipitation, we show that chimney formation can be related to a known planform of convection. Just above marginal stability, upwelling (and dissolution) occurs along the perimeters of hexagonal cells, with downwelling (and precipitation) at the centres, giving rise to a tessellated network of vertical, crystal-free channels. Subsequent focusing of the upflow at the nodes of the hexagons and recrystallization in the linear channels results in isolated chimneys at the nodal positions.HALONS H-1301 (CBrF_3) and H-1211 (CBrClF_2) have been introduced into the atmosphere, mainly through use in fire extinguishers, for almost three decades. Although each is now present in the troposphere at a concentration of only 2 parts per 10^12, these gases have long atmospheric lifetimes (65–77 yr for H-1301 and 11–16 yr for H-1211)^1,2 and carry significant amounts of bromine to the stratosphere^2,3, where it can destroy ozone catalytically^4,5. For this reason, the halons have high ozone depletion potentials^6. The manufacture of both gases is to be discontinued globally by the year 2000, according to the Montreal Protocol, and perhaps sooner, as a result of unilateral action by users, manufacturers and producing countries^7,8. Here we present a six-year record of tropospheric halon mixing ratios which shows that the growth rates of H-1301 and H-1211 have already begun to decrease substantially. This recent decrease in growth rates is consistent with industry emission estimates (although these have greater uncertainties), and supports current appraisals of atmospheric lifetimes. Our results suggest that, even though these halons are relatively long-lived species, their atmospheric mixing ratios may stabilize or begin to decrease within the next few years.AS high-power electronic devices are packed to progressively higher densities, synthetic diamond films are being considered as heat spreaders for the prevention of thermal damage (see ref. 1 for example). Although diamond single crystals are known to have the highest thermal conductivity for any material at room tem-perature (22 W cm^−1 K^−1 for diamond with natural isotopic abundance, compared with 4 W cm^-1 K^-1 for copper), the dependence of conductivity on the microstructure of polycrystalline diamond films is not understood. Using a newly developed laser technique^2, we have measured thermal conductivity in the experimentally difficult direction perpendicular to the plane of the diamond film. Taken together with earlier in-plane measurements^3, this gives a complete description of the local thermal conductivity, showing a significant gradient and anisotropy correlated with the inhomogeneous grain structure. Despite phonon scattering at lattice defects and grain boundaries, we find that the local conductivity near the top growth surface of a synthetic diamond film is, surprisingly, at least as high as that of gem-quality diamond single crystals.The uncertainties in assessing the effects of global-scale perturbations to the climate system are due primarily to an inadequate understanding of the hydrological cycle—the cycling of water in the oceans, atmosphere and biosphere. Overcoming this problem necessitates new ways of regarding a field traditionally divided amongst several disciplines, as well as new instrumentation and methods of data collection.An elegant argument about the behaviour of a simple model of a forest fire has now been extended to make connections with other systems that keep their original organization in spite of external disturbances.The abundant Vicia sativa cultivar 'blanche fleur' from Australia is perceived by markets to be a cheap, protein-rich pulse, but is it suitable for human consumption?The decision of the US Patent Office not to protect gene fragments is welcome, but questions remain.The chauvinistic response of many Britons to the events of the past two weeks would be better directed towards an understanding of the weakness of British industry — the real reason why £1 is no longer worth DM2.95.ANATOMICAL and physiological investigations in monkeys indicate that olfaction is subserved by several cortical regions^1,2. But the areas implicated in the human olfactory system have not been definitively identified by functional criteria. Behavioural evidence^3,4 has suggested that laterally specialized mechanisms for odour processing may exist, but the neuroanatomical substrate remains unknown. We used positron emission tomography to study the cortical representation of human olfactory processing by comparing cerebral blood flow changes evoked during olfactory stimulation with those of a control task. We report here significant cerebral blood flow increases at the junction of the inferior frontal and temporal lobes bilaterally, corresponding to the piriform cortex, and unilaterally, in the right orbitofrontal cortex. The results complement and extend previous data implicating these regions in olfactory processing, and indicate that a functional asymmetry exists in the human brain favouring the right orbitofrontal area in olfaction.THE emperor penguin ( Aptenodytes forsteri ), which feeds only at sea, is restricted to the higher latitudes of the antarctic sea-ice habitat^1–3. It breeds on the winter fast ice when temperatures are−30 °C and high winds are frequent^3. Assuming entirely the task of incubating the single egg, the male fasts for about 120 days in the most severe conditions. When it is relieved by the female around hatching time, the distance between the colony and the open sea may be 100km or more^4,5, but where emperors go to forage at that time or during the summer is unknown. The polynias are areas of open water in sea-ice and during winter, with the under-ice habitats at any time of the year, they are among the most difficult of all Antarctic areas to sample. Here we monitor by satellite the routes taken by emperor penguins for foraging and compare them with satellite images of sea-ice. Winter birds walking over fast ice travelled up to 296 km to feed in polynias, whereas those swimming in light pack-ice travelled as far as 895km from the breeding colony. One record of diving showed that although most dives are to mid-water depths, some are near the bottom. Obtaining such detailed information on foraging in emperor penguins means that this bird now offers a unique opportunity to investigate the Antarctic sea-ice habitat.MANTLE xenoliths entrained in alkali basalt provide direct samples from a cross-section of the lithosphere. In most cases, the chemistry and isotope systematics of these objects have suggested a complex history of chemical change by processes such as metasomatism and partial melting (see, for example, ref. 1). Here, however, we present evidence from a suite of xenoliths from alkali basalts in the Chinese province of Inner Mongolia, suggesting that the lithosphere in this region has remained stable and closed to chemical modification since experiencing partial melting in the Proterozoic. Clinopyroxene separates from these xenoliths yield an approximate isochron in the ^143Nd/^144Nd versus ^147Sm/^144Nd diagram, suggesting an episode of depletion ∼1.6 Gyr ago. Although other explanations for this correlation, such as mixing, cannot be ruled out definitively, further evidence for the long-term undisturbed nature of the lithosphere in this region comes from neodymium model ages of the clinopyroxenes. In particular, one highly depleted sample with very high ^147Sm/^144Nd provides a model age of 1.6 Gyr, consistent with the isochron result.FOLLOWING earlier studies^1–6, attention has recently been directed again to the possibility that long-term solar irradiance variations, rather than increased greenhouse gas concentrations, have been the dominant cause of the observed rise in global-mean surface temperature from the mid-nineteenth century to the present. Friis-Christensen and Lassen^7 report a high correlation (0.95; ref. 8) between the variable period of the '11-year' sunspot cycle and the mean Northern Hemisphere land surface temperature from 1865 to 1985. The Marshall Institute report^9 concludes that '…the sun has been the controlling influence on climate in the last 100 years, with the greenhouse effect playing a smaller role." Here we explore the implication that such putative solar irradiance variations would have for global warming. Our results provide strong circumstantial evidence that there have been intercycle variations in solar irradiance which have contributed to the observed temperature changes since 1856. However, we find that since the nineteenth century, greenhouse gases, not solar irradiance variations, have been the dominant contributor to the observed temperature changes.THE recent rise in global-mean surface air temperature is widely thought to be the result of increasing atmospheric concentrations of greenhouse gases^1–3, but there are discrepancies between the predicted response of the atmosphere to this radiative forcing and the observed temperature changes^1–5. Solar irradiance fluctuations have been proposed as a possible explanation for these discrepancies, and various solar properties (for example, radius^6, smoothed sunspot number^7 or cycle length^8) have been suggested as proxies for solar irradiance variations in the absence of direct data. Here we model the effects of a combination of greenhouse and solar-cycle-length forcing and compare the results with observed temperatures. We find that this forcing combination can explain many features of the temperature record, although the results must be interpreted cautiously; even with optimized solar forcing, most of the recent warming trend is explained by greenhouse forcing.THE metastable extension of the phase diagram of liquid water exhibits rich features that manifest themselves in the equilibrium properties of water. For example, the density maximum at 4 °C and the minimum in the isothermal compressibility at 46 °C are thought to reflect the presence of singularities in the behaviour of thermodynamic quantities occurring in the supercooled region^1 ^2. The 'stability–limit conjecture'^3–5 suggests that these thermodynamic anomalies arise from a single limit of mechanical stability (spinodal line), originating at the liquid–gas critical point, which determines the limit of both superheating at high temperatures and supercooling at low temperatures. Here we present a comprehensive series of molecular dynamics simulations which suggest that, instead, the supercooling anomalies are caused by a newly identified critical point, above which the two metastable amorphous phases of ice (previously shown to be separated by a line of first-order transitions^6,7) become indistinguishable. The two amorphous ice phases are thus incorporated into our understanding of the liquid state, providing a more complete picture of the metastable and stable behaviour of water.CORONAL holes are large-scale structures of lower density and temperature in the solar corona. They appear as large dark features in X-ray and radio images, and as bright areas in infrared He I images of the Sun. The longest series of data is the He I (10,830 Å) observations published within Hα synoptic charts^1. Here we analyse outlines of coronal holes from these charts to show the variation of coronal hole area over the period 1977–89. We find that the total area of coronal holes enclosed within a latitude band of 10–50° S shows a 592-day periodic variation throughout the 13-year interval, which includes all of solar cycle 21 and the first three years of cycle 22. The corresponding northern latitude region does not show this periodic behaviour. There is some indication of an association between the coronal hole variation and other solar phenomena such as the occurrence of super-active regions and the reported 153-day periodicity.IN 1930 Eddington suggested^1 that pulsations in stars, particularly in Cepheid variables, might be due to a feedback between core temperature and nuclear energy generation rate, which he called the ɛ -mechanism. However, Cepheid pulsation, with a typical period of a few days, is now known to be due to a feedback between temperature and opacity, the κ-mechanism^2. It has been suggested that Wolf–Rayet stars, the stripped cores of highly evolved stars, might be susceptible to instability by the ɛ -mechanism on a characteristic timescale of tens of minutes^3–7, and that this instability might drive powerful stellar winds which could be responsible for huge mass-loss; Wolf–Rayet stars with initial masses of >30 M ⊙ nearly evaporate in their entirety^8. Here we report the detection of a 627-second periodicity in the WN8 star HD96548 (also known as WR40; ref. 9). Over an observing period of 150 minutes a peak-to-peak variation of 0.005 magnitude was established, and there is some evidence of a first overtone. Theoretical models of WR structure indicate that this periodicity is consistent with the fundamental radial mode, and that it could be partly driven by the ɛ-mechanism.Participants at Nature 's conference on "The brain in well-being and disease" (12–13 November) were excited that hitherto intractable problems are now beginning to crack under the impact of powerful new techniques.It is nearly 10 years since the first attempts were made to grow better protein crystals in the low gravity environment of space. Can the enormous cost of these experiments be justified by the results?Spontaneous Human Combustion. By Jenny Randles and Peter Hough. Robert Hale: 1992. Pp. 224. £14.95.The Turing Option. By Harry Harrison and Marvin Minsky. Warner/Viking: 1992. Pp. 422. $21.95, £14.99 (hbk); £8.99 (pbk).The Rediscovery of the Mind. By John R. Searle. MIT Press: 1992. Pp. 270. $22.50, £19.95 (hbk); £9.95 (pbk). (Pbk not yet available in the US.)Origins Reconsidered: In Search of What Makes Us Human. By Richard Leakey and Roger Lewin. Doubleday/Little, Brown: 1992. Pp. 375. $25, £18.99.James Hutton and the History of Geology. By Dennis R. Dean. Cornell University Press: 1992. Pp. 303. $38.50.The inhibins are α:β heterodimeric growth factors that are members of the transforming growth factor-β family. To understand the physiological roles of the inhibins in mammalian development and reproduction, a targeted deletion of the α-inhibin gene was generated by homologous recombination in mouse embryonic stem cells. Mice homozygous for the null allele (inhibin-deficient) initially develop normally but every mouse ultimately develops mixed or incompletely differentiated gonadal stromal tumours either unilaterally or bilaterally. Inhibin is thus a critical negative regulator of gonadal stromal cell proliferation and the first secreted protein identified to have tumour-suppressor activity.The Age of the Earth. By G. Brent Dalrymple. Stanford University Press: 1991. Pp. 474. $49.50. The Facts of Life: Shattering the Myth of Darwinism. By Richard Milton. Fourth Estate: 1992. Pp. 288. £16.99.The heads of the NSF and NIH in the United States have followed ways of plotting the future.The Maastricht Treaty (if ratified) would give the European Communities coordinating powers in education: what hope is there that the outcome will be a better system of universities?From Eros to Gaia. By Freeman Dyson. Pantheon: 1992. Pp. 371. $25.Pietà. By George Klein. MIT Press: 1992. Pp. 297. $24.95, £22.50.Green Delusions: An Environmentalist Critique of Radical Environmentalism. By Martin W. Lewis. Duke University Press: 1992. Pp. 288. $24.95, £21.Closing Pandora's Box: Arms Races, Arms Control and the History of the Cold War. By Patrick Glynn. Basic Books: 1992. Pp. 445. $30.C. P. Snow and the Struggle of Modernity. By John de la Mothe. University of Texas Press: 1992. Pp. 288. $35.When a quantum system evolves so that it returns to its initial physical state, it acquires a 'memory' of this motion in the form of a geometric phase in the wavefunction. This phase has observable consequences in a wide range of physical systems, and its presence has now been convincingly demonstrated, for example, in optical and nuclear magnetic resonance experiments.Irrationality: The Enemy Within. By Stuart Sutherland. Constable: 1992. Pp. 357. £14.95.Education Without Impact: How Our Universities Fail the Young. By George H. Douglas. Birch Lane: 1992. Pp. 223. $19.95.The Diary of William Harvey: The Imaginary Journal of the Physician Who Revolutionized Medicine. By Jean Hamburger. Rutgers University Press: 1992. Pp. 255. $35 (hbk), $14.95 (pbk).Marie Stopes and the Sexual Revolution. By June Rose. Faber and Faber: 1992. Pp. 272. £14.99, $22.95.Gene Mapping: Using Law and Ethics as Guides. Edited by George J. Annas and Sherman Elias. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 291. $39.95.The Facts of Life: Science and the Abortion Controversy. By Harold J. Morowitz and James S. Trefil. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 179. $19.95.The Unnatural Nature of Science: Why Science Does Not Make (Common) Sense. By Lewis Wolpert. Faber and Faber: 1992. Pp. 191. £14.99, $22.95.Albert Einstein and Mileva Marić: The Love Letters. Edited and with an introduction by Jürgen Renn and Robert Schulmann. Translated by Shawn Smith. Princeton University Press: 1992. Pp. 107. $14.95, £12.50.Pi in the Sky: Counting, Thinking, and Being. By John D. Barrow. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 317. £14.95, $25.Genius: Richard Feynman and Modern Physics. By James Gleick. Pantheon/ Little, Brown: 1992. Pp. 532. $27.50, £18.99.The Recollections of Eugene Wigner as Told to Andrew Szanton. By Andrew Szanton. Plenum: 1992. Pp. 335. $24.50.Odyssey: The Authorised Biography of Arthur C. Clarke. By Neil McAleer. Contemporary Books/Gollancz: 1992. Pp. 430. $25, £16.99. How the World Was One: Beyond the Global Village. By Arthur C. Clarke. Bantam/Gollancz: 1992. Pp. 289. $22.50, £15.99.Nature 345, 495-502 (1990) OUR further characterization of the Mr 72,000 (72K) protein has shown that the data in Fig. 2 of our paper are erroneous and not repeatable. We retract the statement that the 72K protein is an integral membrane protein. The present evidence is consistent with this protein being associated with the intermediate compartment.CRYSTAL structures of Fab antibody fragments determined by X-ray diffraction characteristically feature four-domain, β-barrel arrangements^1–3. A human antibody Fc fragment has also been found to have four β-barrel domains^4. The structures of a few intact antibodies have been solved^5–8: in two myeloma proteins, the flexible hinge regions that connect the Fc to the Fab segments were deleted^5,6 so the molecules were non-functional, structurally restrained, T-shaped antibodies; a third antibody, Kol, had no hinge residues missing but the Fc region was sufficiently disordered that it was not possible to relate its disposition accurately with respect to the Fab components^7,8. Here we report the structure at 3.5 Å resolution of an IgG2a antitumour monoclonal antibody which contains an intact hinge region and was solved in a triclinic crystal by molecular replacement using known Fc and Fab fragments. The antibody is asymmetric, reflecting its dynamic character. There are two local, apparently independent, dyads in the molecule. One relates the heavy chains in the Fc, the other relates the constant domains of the Fabs. The variable domains are not related by this 2-fold axis because of the different Fab elbow angles of 159° and 143°. The Fc has assumed an asymmetric, oblique orientation with respect to loosely tethered yet almost collinear Fabs. Our study enables the two antigen-binding segments as well as the Fc portion of a functional molecule to be visualized and illustrates the flexibility of these immune response proteins.INFECTION by influenza virus results in the stimulation of cytotoxic T lymphocytes specific for killing virally infected cells^1. Specificity is provided by clonally distributed, hypervariable T-cell receptors on cytotoxic T lymphocytes which react with peptide fragments that are derived from viral proteins expressed in the cytoplasm and 'presented' on the surface of infected cells, bound to class I histocompatibility glycoproteins^2. Here we describe the structure of the complex between the human class I histocompatibility glycoprotein HLA-Aw68 and the influenza virus nucleoprotein peptide Np 91–99 as determined by X-ray cryo-crystallography. Residues at both ends of the peptide are substantially buried in the peptide binding-site, whereas those in the middle of the peptide, P4 to P8, are predominantly exposed and could be recognized directly by T-cell receptors. The extended conformation of the bound viral peptide is remarkably similar to that of a collection of endogenous peptides with a different sequence motif bound to another human allele, HLA-B27^3–5. The structure defines in atomic detail the antigenic surface constructed of major histocompatibility complex and viral peptide atoms that is recognized by T-cell receptors.WE report here the determination and refinement to 1.9 Å resolution by X-ray cryo-crystallography the structure of HLA-Aw68. The averaged image from the collection of bound, endogenous peptides clearly shows the atomic structure at the first three and last two amino acids in the peptides but no connected electron density in between. This suggests that bound peptides, held at both ends, take alternative pathways and could be of different lengths by bulging out in the middle. Peptides eluted from HLA-Aw68 include peptides of 9, 10 and 11 amino acids, a direct indication of the length heterogeneity of tightly bound peptides. Peptide sequencing shows relatively conserved 'anchor' residues at position 2 and the carboxy-terminal residue. Conserved binding sites for the peptide N and C termini at the ends of the class I major histocompatibility complex binding groove are apparently dominant in producing the long half-lives of peptide binding and the peptide-dependent stabilization of the class I molecule's structure.THE central pathological feature of human kidney disease that leads to kidney failure is the accumulation of extracellular matrix in glomeruli. Overexpression of transforming growth factor-β (TGF-β) underlies the accumulation of pathological matrix in experimental glomerulonephritis^1. Administration of an antibody raised against TGF-β to glomerulonephritic rats suppresses glomerular matrix production and prevents matrix accumulation in the injured glomeruli^2. One of the matrix components induced by TGF-β, the proteoglycan decorin, can bind TGF-β and neutralize its biological activity^3, so decorin may be a natural regulator of TGF-β (refs 3,4). We tested whether decorin could antagonize the action of TGF-β in vivo using the experimental glomerulonephritis model^1. We report here that administration of decorin inhibits the increased production of extracellular matrix and attenuates manifestations of disease, confirming our hypothesis. On the basis of our results, decorin may eventually prove to be clinically useful in diseases associated with overproduction of TGF-β.HUMAN protein C is a vitamin K-dependent plasma glycoprotein that circulates as an inactive zymogen. At the endothelial ceil surface, thrombin in complex with the integral membrane protein thrombomodulRi converts protein C to its active form by specific cleavage of an activation peptide^1–3. The activated form of protein C has potent anticoagulant activity as a feedback regulator of thrombin generation (reviewed in refs 4–6), and also has profibrinolytic^7–10, anti-ischaemic^11 and anti-inflammatory properties^12. Protein C is effective in the treatment of model and human thrombotic diseases^4,13–16 but, except when it has been used to treat genetic or acquired deficiencies and microvascular thrombosis, it is administered as the activated enzyme, which has a short biological half-life. We have altered two putative inhibitory acidic residues near the thrombin cleavage site, which results in a 30-fold increase in substrate utilization by α-thrombin. We combined these changes with a genetically altered glycoform to generate a zymogen protein C with a 60-fold increased cleavage rate by free α-thrombin, independent of its cofactor thrombomodulin. We show that this 'preform' of protein C, unlike the natural circulating zymogen, can be activated by thrombin generated in clotting human plasma, resulting in an inhibition of further clot formation. Our data therefore show that we have engineered a site-activated agent, which only has anticoagulant activity when significant amounts of thrombin are being generated.DENDRITIC cells comprise a system of highly efficient antigen-presenting cells which initiate immune responses such as the sensitization of T cells restricted by major histocompatibility complex molecules, the rejection of organ transplants and the formation of T-cell-dependent antibodies. Dendritic cells are found in many non-lymphoid tissues, such as skin (Langerhans cells) and mucosa, and they migrate after antigen capture through the afferent lymph or the bloodstream to lymphoid organs, where they efficiently present antigen to T cells^1. Dendritic cells are difficult to isolate and, although they originate from bone marrow^2,3 their site of maturation and the conditions that direct their growth and differentiation are still poorly characterized. Granulocyte macrophage-colony stimulating factor (GM-CSF) favours the outgrowth of dendritic cells from mouse peripheral blood^4. Here we extend this finding to man and demonstrate that cooperation between GM-CSF and tumour necrosis factor-α (TNF-α) is crucial for the generation of human dendritic/Langerhans cells from CD34^+ haematopoietic progenitors. The availability of large numbers of these cells should now facilitate the understanding of their role in immunological regulation and disorder.EXTREME environmental pollution such as that found in the highly industrialized Silesian region of Poland has been associated with increased risk of cancer and adverse reproductive outcomes^1,2. Among the most prevalent carcinogenic and mutagenic air pollutants in Silesia are the polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAH) which are largely produced by industrial and residential combustion of coal^1. Molecular epidemiology aims to prevent disease by using biological markers to identify risks well before clinical onset to allow effective intervention^3–7. Here, we use a battery of biological markers to measure molecular and genetic damage in peripheral blood samples from residents of Silesia and from persons living in a rural, less polluted area of Poland. The results show that their exposure to environmental pollution is associated with significant increases in carcinogen–DNA adducts (PAH–DNA and aromatic adducts), in sister chromatid exchange including high-frequency cells, and in chromosomal aberrations as well as a doubling in the frequency of ras oncogene overexpression. We found that aromatic adducts on DNA were significantly correlated with chromosomal mutation, providing us with a molecular link between environmental exposure and a genetic alteration relevant to cancer and reproductive risk.FEMALE-BIASED sex ratios are predicted under local mate competition where offspring of one or a few females mate in isolated subpopulations^1. Haplodiploid sex determination allows parasitic wasps to bias their sex ratios by controlling fertilization^2, but parental control is not solely responsible for the broods of polyembryonic wasps. The eggs of these parasites divide to form many offspring and often two larval morphs^3,4. Precocious larvae die without pupating while reproductive larvae become adults. Copidosoma floridanum (Hymenoptera: Encyrtidae) produces 1,000–1,400 offspring per host and most broods contain both sexes (mixed)^5. Mixed broods are female-biased and wasps mate before dispersing, but these broods develop from the mother laying one male and one female egg and adult males probably obtain additional matings away from the host^5,6. Thus, intersexual conflict may exist over the number of offspring to produce per host. Here we show that precocious larvae in mixed broods are predominantly female and that they bias the sex ratio by killing males.THE magnitude 7.5 Landers earthquake of 28 June 1992 was the largest earthquake to strike California in 40 years. The slip that occurs in such an earthquake would be expected to induce large changes in the static stress on neighbouring faults; these changes in stress should in turn affect the likelihood of future earthquakes. Stress changes that load faults towards failure have been cited as the cause of small^1–5, moderate^6 and large^7 earthquakes; conversely, those that relax neighbouring faults have been related to a decrease in seismicity^5. Here we use an elastic half-space model^8 to estimate the stress changes produced by the Landers earthquake on selected southern California faults, including the San Andreas. We find that the estimated stress changes are consistent with the triggering of four out of the five aftershocks with magnitude greater than 4.5, and that the largest changes (1–10 bar), occurring on part of the San Bernardino segment of the San Andreas fault, may have decreased the time to the next magnitude 8 earthquake by about 14 years.THE conditions controlling primary production are very different in the modern North Atlantic and North Pacific oceans^1, a difference that is reflected in the composition of diatom fossils in surface sediments. By contrast, I report here evidence that during the last glacial interval the diatom assemblage, and by extrapolation the primary production, was very similar in the two regions. The modern analogues of these assemblages occur in sediments of Baffin Bay and the Sea of Okhotsk, both highly productive seas where ice is present. I infer that during the last glacial interval plankton biomass was at least as high as it is today in the North Atlantic, and was as much as an order of magnitude higher in the North Pacific. The glacial assemblage occurs in lithologies dominated by ice-rafted detritus, which is generally believed to indicate the presence of icebergs^2–6. I hypothesize that the presence of numerous icebergs, possibly associated with sea ice, supported high production by physical mechanisms (such as turbulent mixing and enhanced density stratification) and/or biogeochemical ones (such as supply of major or trace nutrients).SEDIMENTS in the North Atlantic ocean contain a series of layers that are rich in ice-rafted debris and unusually poor in foraminifera^1. Here we present evidence that the most recent six of these 'Heinrich layers', deposited between 14,000 and 70,000 years ago, record marked decreases in sea surface temperature and salinity, decreases in the flux of planktonic foraminifera to the sediments, and short-lived, massive discharges of icebergs originating in eastern Canada. The path of the icebergs, clearly marked by the presence of ice-rafted detrital carbonate, can be traced for more than 3,000 km—a remarkable distance, attesting to extreme cooling of surface waters and enormous amounts of drifting ice. The cause of these extreme events is puzzling. They may reflect repeated rapid advances of the Laurentide ice sheet, perhaps associated with reductions in air temperatures, yet temperature records from Greenland ice cores appear to exhibit only a weak corresponding signal. Moreover, the 5–10,000-yr intervals between the events are inconsistent with Milankovitch orbital periodicities, raising the question of what the ultimate cause of the postulated cooling may have been.THE action of alkali metals and their oxides as promoters for many catalytic reactions has been known for nearly a century^1. Alkali promotion of carbon monoxide reactivity, for example, forms part of the industrially important synthesis of hydrocarbons, and is thought to follow from a weakening of the internal C–O bond resulting from an enhanced binding interaction between the CO molecule and the catalyst^2. Several spectroscopic techniques have been used to examine this effect for CO adsorption on single-crystal metal surfaces^2–6, but bond energy changes can only be inferred indirectly from these techniques. Here we report direct measurements, using a recently designed single-crystal adsorption microcalorimeter^7,8, of the change in CO adsorption heat on a Ni{100} surface for a range of potassium precoverages. We find that the effect of promotion is unexpectedly large, with the adsorption heat increasing from a clean-surface value of 124 kJ mol^−1 to ∼310 kJ mol^−1 at high potassium precoverages. We attribute this effect to a combination of stronger CO binding to the surface and increased ionization of the potassium adatoms.THE solar chromosphere, which separates the photosphere (temperature T ≈ 6,400 K) from the hotter solar corona ( T ≈ 10^6 K), has a very inhomogeneous structure which is strongly influenced by the magnetic field. In the lowest 2,000 km of chromospheric altitude, the density falls by six orders of magnitude, and the temperature stays below 8,000 K. Above this altitude the transition to the corona is extremely irregular. It is dominated by spicules: thin (< 1,000 km) protrusions of cool chromospheric material which extend, with speeds of 25 km s^−1 and for durations of 5–10 min, up to 10,000 km into the corona with little change in density. Their origin is not yet understood, and I suggest here that the force that propels them against gravity may be the transfer of momentum from upward-moving Alfvén waves. In the upper chromosphere the ionized plasma component is collisionally coupled to the neutral gas, but the coupling is not perfect, so that the neutral material can acquire a net velocity with respect to the ionized component. This process is known to damp the Alfvén waves^12, but I show that it can also, as the chromosphere peters out, transfer enough momentum to local volumes to create and drive the spicules.THE Einstein Observatory survey of cosmic X-ray sources a decade ago showed that coronae were common among diverse types of star, and were in many cases more energetic than the Sun's corona. Such coronae seemed, however, to disappear abruptly across a 'dividing line' in the Hertzsprung–Russell (H–R) diagram describing the evolution of intermediate-mass stars towards the red giant phase^1–5. Here we use results from the Rosat all-sky survey, which increases by an order of magnitude the number of X-ray stars, to show that the dividing line is not an artefact of poor sampling. Optical and ultraviolet observations show that the dividing line in the H–R diagram coincides approximately with the onset of cool, massive stellar winds^6–15, but we show that these winds are not sufficiently dense for simple X-ray absorption to be the cause of the disappearance of coronal emission. We conclude, therefore, that the dividing line represents a true evolutionary transition in these stars, at which the hot coronae are replaced by cool winds.The crystal structure of a soluble form of the T lymphocyte antigen CD2 provides the first complete view of the extracellular region of a cell adhesion molecule. The topology of the molecule, which comprises two immunoglobulin-like domains, is the same as that of the first two domains of CD4 but the relative domain orientation is altered by a fairly flexible linker region. The putative ligand-binding β-sheet forms a flat surface towards the top of the molecule. Crystal contacts between these surfaces suggest a plausible model for the adhesive interaction.Analysis of mice carrying mutant T-cell antigen receptor (TCP) genes indicates that TCP-β gene rearrangement or expression is critical for the differentiation of CD4^− CD8^− thymocytes to CD4^+CD8^+ thymocytes, as well as for the expansion of the pool of CD4^+CD8^+ cells. TCR-α is irrelevant in these developmental processes. The development of γδ T cells does not depend on either TCR-α or TCP-β.Increased atmospheric carbon dioxide concentrations are expected to cause cooling of the lower stratosphere. This could enhance the formation of polar stratospheric clouds, which convert potential ozone-depleting species to their active forms. In an idealized three-dimensional numerical simulation of the Northern Hemisphere winter stratosphere, doubling the CO_2 concentration leads to the formation of an Arctic ozone hole comparable to that observed over Antarctica, with nearly 100% local depletion of lower-stratospheric ozone.Physics of Climate. By José P. Peixoto and Abraham H. Oort. IOP/AIP: 1992. Pp. 520. £66, $95 (hbk); £31.25, $45 (pbk).Oxygenated gasoline for US cars is meant to improve air quality in 38 cities.The Russian part of the ex-Soviet scientific enterprise is facing its economic crisis with fortitude. But these are only early days, and there is worse to come.The Southern Ocean is perhaps the only region where fluctuations in the global influence of North Atlantic Deep Water (NADW) can be monitored unambiguously in single deep-sea cores. A carbon isotope record from benthic foraminifera in a Southern Ocean core reveals large and rapid changes in the flux of NADW during the last deglaciation, and an abrupt increase in the NADW production rate which immediately preceded large-scale melting of the Northern Hemisphere ice sheets. This sudden strengthening of the NADW thermoha-line cell provides strong evidence for the importance of NADW in glacial-interglacial climate change.A combination of biochemistry in animal cell-free systems and genetics in yeast is revealing the molecular machinery of the secretory pathway of eukaryotes. Transporting vesicles have a simple coat structure and employ a general mechanism for fusion that is conserved in evolution.The Philosophy of Science. ByRichard Boyd and Philip Gasper and J. D. Trout. MIT Press: 1991. Pp. 800. £44.95, $50 (hbk); £22.50, $25 (pbk).The Natural History of the Universe. ByColin A. Ronan Doubleday/Macmillan Inc: 1991. Pp. 212. £20, $39.95.. Ancient Light: Our Changing View of the Universe. ByAlan Lightman. Harvard University Press: 1991. Pp. 170. $18.95, £15.25.Journey Through the Universe. ByJay M. Pasachoff. W. B. Saunders: 1991. Pp. 391. £25.95, $38.75. Isaac Asimov's Guide to Earth and Space. ByIsaac Asimov. Random House: 1991. Pp. 285. $20.An Agenda for Antiquity: Henry Fairfield Osborn and Vertebrate Paleontology at the American Museum of Natural History, 1890-1935. ByRonald Rainger. University of Alabama Press: 1991. Pp. 360. $37.95.A new chemiluminescent substrate for alkaline phosphatase, a custom monoclonal anti-peptide antibody service and a host of monoclonal antibodies - research tools for the immunologist.A new process, antigenization of antibodies, consisting of the expression of oligopeptides in the hypervariable loops of an antibody molecule is described. The potential applications of antigenized antibodies are discussed.THE determination of macromolecular structure by crystallography involves fitting atomic models to the observed diffraction data^1. The traditional measure of the quality of this fit, and presumably the accuracy of the model, is the R value. Despite stereochemical restraints^2, it is possible to overfit or 'misfit' the diffraction data: an incorrect model can be refined to fairly good R values as several recent examples have shown^3. Here I propose a reliable and unbiased indicator of the accuracy of such models. By analogy with the cross-validation method^4,5 of testing statistical models I define a statistical quantity ( R ^free_ T ) that measures the agreement between observed and computed structure factor amplitudes for a 'test' set of reflections that is omitted in the modelling and refinement process. As examples show, there is a high correlation between R ^free_ T and the accuracy of the atomic model phases. This is useful because experimental phase information is usually inaccurate, incomplete or unavailable. I expect that R ^free_ T will provide a measure of the information content of recently proposed models of thermal motion and disorder^6–8, time-averaging^9 and bulk solvent^10.ALDOSE reductase is the first enzyme in the polyol pathway and catalyses the NADPH-dependent reduction of D-glucose to D-sorbitol. Under normal physiological conditions aldose reductase participates in osmoregulation^1, but under hyperglycaemic conditions it contributes to the onset and development of severe complications in diabetes^2. Here we present the crystal structure of pig lens aldose reductase refined to an R -factor of 0.232 at 2.5-Å resolution. It exhibits a single domain folded in an eight-stranded parallel α/β barrel, similar to that in triose phosphate isomerase^3 and a score of other enzymes. Hence, aldose reductase does not possess the expected canonical dinucleotide-binding domain^4. Crystallographic analysis of the binding of 2′-monophospho-adenosine-5′-diphosphoribose, which competitively inhibits NADPH binding reveals that it binds into a cleft located at the C-terminal end of the strands of the α/β barrel. This represents a new type of binding for nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide coenzymes.TYPE III restriction/modification enzymes recognize short, non-palindromic sequences that can be methylated on only one strand, with the paradoxical consequence that during replication of what is in effect hemimethylated DNA totally unmodified sites arise^1. Why the unmodified sites are not subject to suicidal restriction was not clear. Here we show that restriction requires two unmodified recognition sites that can be separated by different distances but which must be in inverse orientation. All of the unmodified sites in newly replicated DNA are of course in the same orientation, which explains why they are not restricted. This result may be of relevance to other manifestations of anisotropy in double-stranded DNA, such as genetic imprinting^2.RAP30/74 (also known as TFIIF (refs 1, 2), βΓ (ref. 3) and FC (ref. 4)) is one of several general factors required for initiation by RNA polymerase II (reviewed in refs 5–7). The small RAP30 subunit of RAP30/74 binds directly to polymerase and appears structurally and functionally homologous to bacterial sigma factors in their RNA polymerase-binding region^8–10. RAP30/74 or recombinant RAP30 suppresses nonspecific binding of RNA polymerase II to DNA (refs 10,11) and is required for RNA polymerase II to assemble stably into a preinitiation complex containing promoter DNA and the general factors TFIID, TFIIA and TFIIB (refs 2,12, 13); both RAP30 and RAP74 are physical components of the preinitiation complex^2. A complementary DNA encoding human RAP30 has been isolated^8, and here we report the isolation of a cDNA encoding human RAP74. RAP30 and RAP74 produced in Escherichia coli can be used in place of natural human RAP30/74 to direct accurate transcription initiation by RNA polymerase II In vitro .AT least six chromatographically resolvable general transcription factors may participate in accurate initiation by RNA polymerase II in HeLa cell-derived systems^1–3. TFIIF (also termed FC, RAP30/74 and β/γ) can bind directly to RNA polymerase II in solution^4–6 and decrease the affinity of RNA polymerase II for nonspecific DNA^7. From studies on the kinetics of transcription initiation^1, on the composition of transcription initiation complexes fractionated by acrylamide gel electrophoresis^8, and on template competition experiments^9, TFIIF is known to act at an intermediate stage in initiation complex formation. It acts after TFIID firmly associates with DNA, but coincidentally with or immediately after RNA polymerase II binding to DNA, and before the recruitment of factor TFIIE. TFIIF may^6 or may not^4,5 have DNA helicase activity. The small subunit (RAP30) of TFIIF has been cloned^6 and shows some amino-acid sequence homology to bacterial cr factors. We have partially sequenced the RAP74 protein from purified HeLa cells, cloned its complementary DNA and shown that its translation product can interact with RAP30 in vitro as well as in vivo . The cDNA predicts an amino-acid sequence that lacks obvious DNA or RNA helicase motifs. It has regions rich in charged amino acids, including segments containing a higher content of acidic amino acids than are found in strong transcriptional activators such as VP16 (ref. 10).ALTHOUGH transcriptional hierachies have been extensively studied in invertebrates, their involvement in mammalian cell-type specification is poorly understood^1,2. Here we report a hepatocyte transcriptional cascade suggested by the expression patterns of hepatic transcription factors in dedifferentiated hepatomas and hepatocyte: fibroblast hybrids in which the liver phenotype was extinguished^3–6. These results indicated that the homeoprotein hepatocyte nuclear factor-lα (HNF-lα)^7–8, and HNF-4, a member of the steroid hormone receptor superfamily^9, were regulated coordinately or in a hierarchy by a higher-order locus, independently of other hepatic transactivators. HNF-4 was implicated as an essential positive regulator of HNF-lα, as deletion of an HNF-4 binding site in the HNF-lα promoter abolished promoter activity, and HNF-4→ potently transactivated the HNF-lα promoter in cotransfection assays. Moreover, genetic complementation of dedifferentiated hepatomas with HNF-4 complementary DNA rescued expression of endogenous HNF-lα messenger RNA and DNA-binding activity. Our studies therefore define an HNF-4→ HNF-1 α (4 -→ 1α) transcriptional hierarchy operative in differentiated hepatocytes but selectively inhibited by an extinguishing locus and somatic mutations which antagonize the liver phenotype.THE proteins DnaK (hspTO) and GroEL (cpn60) from Escherichia coli are prototypes of two classes of molecular chaperones conser-ved throughout evolution^1. The analysis of transferred nuclear Overhauser effects in two-dimensional NMR spectra is ideally suited to determine chaperone-bound conformations of peptides^2. The peptide vsv-C (amino-acid sequence KLIGVLSSLFRPK) stimulates the ATPase of BiP and Hsc70 (ref. 3) and the intrinsic ATPase of DnaK. The affinity of the vsv-C peptide for DnaK is greatly reduced in the presence of ATP. Here we analyse transferred nuclear Overhauser effects and show that the peptide is in an extended conformation while bound to DnaK but is helical when bound to GroEL. NMR also indicates that the mobility of the peptide backbone is reduced more by binding to DnaK than by binding to GroEL, whereas the side chains are less mobile when bound to GroEL.A SERIES of genomic and complementary DNA clones encoding new putative members of G protein-coupled receptors were isolated using homology cloning and low-stringency polymerase chain reaction^1,2. Among the unidentified receptors ('orphan receptors'), a human genomic clone (HGMP07) was characterized by the presence of its transcripts in the testis and by its belonging to a large subfamily of genes sharing extensive sequence similarities. Sequence comparison demonstrated that this gene subfamily is the human counterpart of the putative rat olfactory receptors cloned recently^3. Another 48 members of the family were cloned. Northern blotting further demonstrated the presence of olfactory receptor transcripts in germ cells. Our finding suggests that a common receptor gene family encodes olfactory receptors and sperm cell receptors that could be involved in chemotaxis during fertilization.IN the budding yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae , cell-cycle control over DNA synthesis occurs partly through the coordinate expression in late Gl phase of many, if not all, of the genes required for DNA synthesis^1–3. A cis -acting hexamer element ACGCGT (an Mlu l restiction site) is responsible for coordinating transcriptional regulation of these genes at the Gl/S phase boundary^1,4 and we have identified a binding activity, DSC1, that recognizes these sequences in a cell-cycle-dependent manner^1. In the distantly related fission yeast^5 Schizosaccharomyces pombe only one of the known DNA synthesis genes, cdc22 ^+, which encodes a subunit of ribonucleotide reductase, is periodically expressed in late Gl (ref. 6). The promoter region of cdc22 ^+ has two Mlu l sites and five related sequences, suggesting that similar controls over DNA synthesis genes could occur in fission yeast. We report here a binding activity in fission yeast that is very similar to DSC1 in budding yeast. We also show that the fission yeast cdc10 ^+ gene product, which is required for Start and entry into S phase^7,8, is a component of this binding activity.CELLULAR responsiveness to retinoic acid and its metabolites is conferred through two structurally and pharmacologically distinct^1 families of receptors: the retinoic acid receptors (RAR)^2,3 and the retinoid X receptors (RXR)^1. Here we report that the transcriptional activity of RAR and RXR can be reciprocally modulated by direct interactions between the two proteins. RAR and RXR have a high degree of cooperativity in binding to target DNA, consistent with previous reports indicating that the binding of either RAR or RXR to their cognate response elements is enhanced by factors present in nuclear extracts^4,5. RXR also interacts directly with and enhances the binding of nuclear receptors conferring responsiveness to vitamin D_3 and thyroid hormone T_3; the DNA-binding activities of these receptors are also stimulated by the presence of nuclear extracts^6–9. Together these data indicate that RXR has a central role in multiple hormonal signalling pathways.THYROID hormones and retinoic acid function through nuclear receptors that belong to the steroid/thyroid-hormone receptor superfamily (reviewed in refs 1–4). Thyroid hormone receptors (TRs) and retinoic acid receptors (RARs) require auxiliary nuclear proteins for efficient DNA binding^5–10. Here we report that retinoid X receptors RXRα (ref. 11) is one of these nuclear proteins. RXRα interacts both with TRs and with RARs, forming heterodimers in solution that strongly interact with a variety of T3/retinoic acid response elements. Transfection experiments show that RXRα can greatly enhance the transcriptional activity of TR and RAR at low retinoic acid concentrations that do not significantly activate RXRα itself. Thus, RXRα enhances the transcriptional activity of other receptors and its own ligand sensitivity by heterodimer formation. Our studies reveal a new subclass of receptors and a regulatory pathway controlling nuclear receptor activities by heterodimer formation.MALES of most animal species will enhance their reproductive success if they mate often and with many different partners, whereas promiscuous mating is unlikely to increase a female's reproductive success. Why then is multiple copulation by females so common^1–6? Many theoreticians have suggested that multiple copulations might enhance the viability of a female's offspring, either because of inadequate quantities of sperm from the first mating^1,7, additional nutrients derived from the seminal fluid^7,8 or some genetic advantage^9–14. Our field studies on Swedish adders provide the first empirical evidence that multiple copulations, with different partners each time, increase offspring viability. This advantage apparently results from more intense sperm competition in the female's reproductive tract, resulting in a higher proportion of her ova being fertilized by genetically superior males.DNA Replication, Second Edition. By Arthur Kornberg and Tania Baker. W. H. Freeman: 1991. Pp. 931. £49.95, $69.95.A LARGE-SCALE pattern of mantle convention is evident in the shape of the Earth's gravity field^1, lateral variations in seismic velocity^2,3, the distribution of hotspots^4, and long-wavelength bathv metric anomalies^5. Paradoxically, these signals of mantle convection bear little resemblance to present-day plate motions^1,4, although they seem to be related to past subduction-zone configurations^6. Here we quantify this relationship by correlating a time-integrated history of subduction, calculated in the hotspot reference frame for the past 180 Myr, with regions of the deep mantle inferred from other geophysical observations to be colder than average. Our results support suggestions^6–9 that a direct relationship exists between large-scale thermal heterogeneity in the lower mantle and subduction during the Cenozoic and Mesozoic.ANTHROPOGENIC processes, such as coal burning, waste incineration and ore refining, are believed to contribute to the emission of mercury into the atmosphere^1–5. The atmospheric concentration of mercury should therefore have increased as a consequence of increases in anthropogenic emissions^3. Indeed, analyses of dated soil^6, peat bog^7,8 and lake-sediment records^8–13 indicate that the deposition of atmospheric mercury may have doubled since the beginning of the nineteenth century. But such an increase in atmospheric mercury concentrations has so far not been detected in ice-core records^14,15 (perhaps because of problems with contamination), and is not consistent with most mercury budgets^2,4,5,16,17, in which natural sources are thought to dominate. Here we present measurements of total gaseous mercury over the Atlantic Ocean for 1977–90, which show that atmospheric concentrations of mercury have in fact increased by 1.46 ±0.17% per year in the Northern Hemisphere, and by 1.17 ±0.16% per year in the Southern Hemisphere. These rates of increase are consistent with the results of the soil, peat bog and lake-sediment analyses, and lead us to suggest that anthropogenic, rather than natural, sources are at present more important in the mercury cycle.BECAUSE of the unusual geometry, bonding and reactivity of some lithiated molecules, they (poly lithiated hydrocarbons in particular) have attracted interest from organic, organometallic and theoretical chemists^1–7. Calculations by Schleyer et al .^3 have predicted that the hypervalent carbon-lithium molecules CLi_5 and CLi_6 should be stable with respect to dissociation to CLi_4 and Li_2. Here I report the observation of CLi_6, which forms in the gas phase over solid Li_2C_2 and is identified by Knudsen-effusion mass spectrometry^8. I confirm that the dissociation reaction above is significantly endothermic, indicating that carbon can expand its octet of electrons to form this relatively stable molecule.SYNTHETIC polymer gels are known to exist in two phases, swollen and collapsed^1,2. Volume transitions may occur between the phases either continuously or discontinuously. We report here that more than two phases can be found in gels consisting of copolymers of randomly distributed positively and negatively charged groups. In these gels, polymer segments interact with each other through attractive or repulsive electrostatic interactions and through hydrogen bonding. It is the combination of these forces that seems to result in the existence of several phases. Each phase is characterized by a distinct degree of swelling, with abrupt jumps between them. The number of phases depends on the proportions of positively and negatively charged monomers, and decreases from a maximum of seven to just one for pure cationic or anionic gel compositions. The existence of these phases presumably reflects the ability of macromolecular systems to adopt different stable conformations in response to changes in environmental conditions.MACROSCOPIC amounts of the two fullerenes C_60 and C_70 have been available for a year^1, and have already had an enormous impact on research in chemistry and physics. Experimentalists are now turning their attention to the higher fullerenes^2,3. Qualitative molecular-orbital theory predicts^4–6 stability for C n with n = 60, 70, (72), 76, 78,84,..., of which all but C_72 have now been produced by evaporation of graphite^1,3, and in general for infinite series of closed-shell neutral fullerenes for n =60 + 6 k (k -£ 1), 70 + 30 k , 84 + 36 k (all k)^7–9. Recent experimental observations of endohedral LaC n metallofullerenes^10 have been rationalized in terms of 'magic numbers' for fulleride anions C^2_ n , for which special stability is predicted^11 at n =74, 82, 88,... ; but the exact extent of charge transfer in these complexes has yet to be determined. Here we present calculations of magic numbers in the fullerenium sequence C^2+_n ( n =74,80, (88), 92) and show that the electron count determines stability and the atom count determines structure in all three (neutral, anionic and cationic) series. Stable cations have two carbons more, and stable anions two carbons less, than the corresponding stable neutral cluster. We predict likely structures of the 'magic' cations.MEMBRANES composed of bilayers of amphiphiles such as phospholipids generally exhibit two-dimensional liquid-like structure within the layers. When the constituent molecules of such a membrane are permanently cross-linked to each other, the membrane becomes less flexible, forming a two-dimensional solid. Solid membranes are expected to exhibit very different behaviour from their liquid counterparts^1–3, including transitions between a two-dimensional flat phase, a crumpled phase of fractal dimension 2.5 and a compact, three-dimensional phase. Experimental evidence for the crumpled phase has, however, been lacking. As this phase was not observed in computer simulations^4–6, it has been suggested that it may always be absent for self-avoiding (and therefore all real) membranes^4–6. To the contrary, we report here the experimental observation of the crumpled conformation in an aqueous suspension of graphite oxide membranes. Static light scattering measurements indicate the presence of membrane conformations with a fractal dimension of 2.54 ±0.05. As the intra-membrane affinity is enhanced by changing the composition of the solvent, the membranes collapse to a compact configuration.THE number of distinct sites visited by a random walker after t steps is of great interest^1–21, as it provides a direct measure of the territory covered by a diffusing particle. Thus, this quantity appears in the description of many phenomena of interest in ecology^13–16, metallurgy^5–7, chemistry^17,18 and physics^19–22. Previous analyses have been limited to the number of distinct sites visited by a single random walker^19–22, but the (nontrivial) generalization to the number of distinct sites visited by TV walkers is particularly relevant to a range of problems-for example, the classic problem in mathematical ecology of defining the territory covered by N members of a given species^13–16. Here we present an analytical solution to the problem of calculating S _ N (t) , the mean number of distinct sites visited by N random walkers on a d -dimensional lattice, for d = 1, 2, 3 in the limit of large N . We confirm the analytical arguments by Monte Carlo and exact enumeration methods. We find that there are three distinct time regimes, and we determine S _ N (t) in each regime. Moreover, we also find a remarkable transition, for dimensions ≳2, in the geometry of the set of visited sites. This set initially grows as a disk with a relatively smooth surface until it reaches a certain size, after which the surface becomes increasingly rough.WITH the exception of supernova outbursts, or changes in the pulsational periods of Cepheid variables arising from their changing internal structure, the evolution of stars is generally much too slow to have been detected during the era of modern astronomy. A few stars, such as the red supergiants ρ Cas and RW Cep, have shown spectral changes on a timescale of decades which have been attributed to evolutionary effects^1, but these changes are mostly erratic and the evolutionary interpretation is uncertain. Here we report an analysis of modern and historical (back to about ad 1700) photometric measurements of the star P Cygni. We find a steady change of apparent brightness, and argue that it is due to evolution of the star. The change is about twice as fast as standard models predict, but the difference may be due to mis–estimation of the star's mass or inadequate treatment of atmospheric expansion in the stellar models.THE molecular ion H_3^+ occupies a central position in theoretical models of interstellar chemistry^1,2. It forms readily in hydrogen-rich interstellar gas clouds when ionized H_2 reacts with neutral H_2. The H_3^+ ion can then donate a proton to oxygen, carbon and other heavy atoms. From this beginning nearly 100 different inter-stellar molecules are formed, such as the reactive hydroxyl radical OH, neutral CO, ethanol, the linear polyacetylenes HC_xN and cyclic species such as cyclopropenylidene, C_3H_3. But in spite of a decade of searching^3,4, H_3^+ has eluded detection except in the hydrogen-rich atmosphere of Jupiter^5. Here we present evidence for the presence of H_3^+ in the envelope of supernova 1987A, where it is produced by an unusual chemistry in which excited hydrogen atoms are the main source of molecule formation. Infrared spectra of SN1987A (ref. 6) in the first few hundred days after the explosion contain two previously unidentified peaks which we attribute to H_3^+. Chemical modelling produces quantities of H_3^+ consistent with the observed peak intensities, and also predicts significant amounts of HeH^+, which may be responsible for some weaker features in the spectra.The US House of Representatives has recognised the value of studies of the transplantation of human fetal tissue. Research physicians and patients' advocates hope the US Senate will also see the light.Will Siberian forests be spared the wholesale destruction suffered by the world's tropical rainforests? The enormous changes now occurring in the former Soviet Union offer opportunities as well as challenges.The crystal structure of the recA protein from Escherichia coli at 2.3-Å resolution reveals a major domain that binds ADP and probably single- and double-stranded DNA. Two smaller subdomains at the N and C termini protrude from the protein and respectively stabilize a 6_1 helical polymer of protein subunits and interpolymer bundles. This polymer structure closely resembles that of recA/DNA filaments determined by electron microscopy. Mutations in recA protein that enhance coprotease, DNA-binding and/or strand-exchange activity can be explained if the interpolymer interactions in the crystal reflect a regulatory mechanism in vivo .What are the special properties of strongly perturbed quantum systems when the corresponding classical mechanical systems exhibit chaotic behaviour? This is the central question of quantum chaos. Theoretical and experimental studies of highly excited atoms in strong magnetic fields and intense microwave fields have revealed surprising new physical phenomena with far-reaching applications.Some parts of the Russian research establishment seem bent on firing those who spend too much time elsewhere.By coincidence, last week showed France to be more flexible (and intelligent) than Britain on nuclear weapons, but neither government seems to appreciate the need urgently to put their nuclear forces on a different footing.Dung Beetle Ecology.. By Ilkka Hanski and Yves Cambefort Princeton University Press: 1991. Pp. 481. $60. £43.WHEN the dynamic properties of many different proteins are plotted as a function of temperature, biphasic behaviour is observed, with a broad transition centred around 220 K. Atomic mean-square displacements from X-ray crystallography1 and Mbssbauer scattering^2–3 show this behaviour, as do electron transfer rates^4 and dynamic information from inelastic neutron scattering^5. Molecular dynamics simulations over a range of temperatures also exhibit a transition at about 220 K: high-temperature atomic fluctuations are dominated by anharmonic collective motions of bonded and nonbonded groups of atoms, but below 220 K the predominant dynamic behaviour is harmonic vibration of individual atoms^6. Here we show by high-resolution X-ray diffraction that crystalline ribonuclease A does not bind substrate or inhibitor at 212 K but will bind either rapidly at 228 K. Once bound at the higher temperature, inhibitor cannot be washed off after the enzyme is cooled to below the transition temperature. These results suggest that enzyme flexibility is required for catalytic function.HUMAN coronaviruses (HCV) in two serogroups represented by HCV-229E and HCV-OC43 are an important cause of upper respiratory tract infections^1. Here we report that human aminopeptidase N, a cell-surface metalloprotease on intestinal, lung and kidney epithelial cells^2–5, is a receptor for human coronavirus strain HCV-229E, but not for HCV-OC43. A monoclonal antibody, RBS, blocked HCV-229E virus infection of human lung fibroblasts, immunoprecipitated aminopeptidase N and inhibited its enzymatic activity. HCV-229E-resistant murine fibroblasts became susceptible after transfection with complementary DNA encoding human aminopeptidase N. By contrast, infection of human cells with HCV-OC43 was not inhibited by antibody RBS and expression of aminopeptidase N did not enhance HCV-OC43 replication in mouse cells. A mutant aminopeptidase lacking the catalytic site of the enzyme did not bind HCV-229E or RBS and did not render murine cells susceptible to HCV-229E infection, suggesting that the virus-binding site may lie at or near the active site of the human aminopeptidase molecule.DATING of deposits and materials less than 350 years old is hindered by the very poor time resolution of the radiocarbon method over this period^1,2. Fluctuations in atmospheric ^14C levels result in the existence of several possible calendric ages for any given radiocarbon age for terrestrial samples. In the marine record, these fluctuations are dampened. However, only a small change in marine radiocarbon ages occurs over this period (from AD 1700 to 1950, radiocarbon ages become only 100 yr younger^2). Consequently, age resolution is poor. Furthermore, there is an uncertainty in the amount of the correction for the reservoir effect, the apparent radiocarbon age of modern marine carbon (typically ~400yr), which reflects the average residence time of carbon in the oceans. Amino-acid racemization/epimerization analysis has been used primarily for dating samples older than the limit of radiocarbon dating (40,000–50,000 yr BP)^3,4. Here I show that aspartic acid (Asp) in mollusc shells has racemized particularly rapidly over the past few centuries. Analyses done on land snails from deposits in the Negev Desert, eolianites in Madeira, cave deposits in Jamaica and from museum collections indicate racemization rates of 2–5% per century. Asp racemization thus provides a means of dating recent faunal assemblages of molluscs and other biogenic carbonates, as well as recent terrestrial, fluvial and marine sedimentary sequences that contain molluscs.PHYTOPLANKTON production is generally thought to be limited by nitrogen availability over large regions of the ocean, particularly oligotrophic areas. The largest source of nitrogen to these regions is transport from deep waters. Atmospheric deposition is also a source of nitrogen to the oceans^1 ,2 but previous assessments of these inputs, based on calculations of annual deposition^3,4suggest that they are of minor importance for oceanic production. Using a nine-year record of nitrogen deposition, we re-evaluate here the contribution of atmospheric nitrogen inputs to the ocean and show that these can contribute to an important proportion of 'new production' during episodic events. Furthermore, as human activities such as fossil-fuel burning contribute significant quantities of inorganic nitrogen to the atmosphere^5,6we suggest that the atmospheric input of nitrogen to the oceans is a route whereby these activities might directly influence (by increasing) oceanic productivity.A SIMPLE technique for producing complex ceramic structures would be valuable for technological applications involving these materials. We have developed a method for fabricating 'preshaped' ceramic bodies using an electrochemical cell to deposit a ceramic precursor material onto the cathode. The deposit may be readily detached from the electrode, while retaining its shape, before the final calcination process. Alternatively, it may be preferable to retain the material on the cathode throughout the subsequent processing steps. Whereas previous attempts to generate ceramics electrochemically resulted in the formation of powders^1,2 or thin adherent films^3–6, our technique offers a high degree of morphological control, can produce porous or compact structures, and can be readily extended to multilayer and composite materials. Definition of more complex structures becomes possible through shaping and masking of the electrodes. The application of this inherently simple technique to functional ceramics (for example, piezoelectrics, semiconductors and superconductors) should prove a promising area for future investigation.THE phenomenon of second-harmonic generation (SHG), whereby a material under illumination generates light at twice the incident frequency, is finding increasing use in optical signal processing. The principal requirement for SHG is a non-centrosymmetric structure; in organic materials, this can be achieved through the use of Langmuir–Blodgett films, which offer control of structure at the molecular level . SHG has been demonstrated in films composed of hemicyanine dyes of the general formula D—C_6H_4— CH=CH—C_5H_4N^+— RX^-, where D is an electron donor, R is usually a hydrophobic alkyl chain and X^- is a counterion such as Br^- or I^-. The frequency-doubling properties of these films are sensitive to the choice of donor group^1,2 the extent of molecular aggregation^3,4and the type of packing^5–7 Mixed films, in which the dye molecules are interspersed with an inert phase, have been used to reduce aggregation and consequently enhance SHG^3,8, but these films have the potential disadvantage of phase separation. Here we show that the use of an amphiphilic anion as both counterion and spacer molecule gives rise to an ordered segregation of the hemicyanine chromophores, and greatly enhanced SHG.A METHOD for focusing X-rays by means of internal reflection inside hollow glass capillaries^1–3has also been shown to be capable of guiding a neutron beam^4 and now a neutron lens using this principle has been demonstrated^5,6Here we study the properties of multiple capillary fibre bundles by measuring the transmission efficiency as a function of bending radius. The fibres used are shown to bend a neutron beam through 20° in a distance of 130 mm, with a transmission of 50%. A simple device made of a few fibres is used to demonstrate the focusing of cold neutrons (wavelength 0.2–0.9 mm) down to a 1-mm^2spot size. These investigations will form the basis for the design of a neutron lens for use in materials research, or a beam bender capable of dividing and directing a neutron beam towards several experimental stations.SMOOTH hollow glass capillaries can be used to guide neutrons by multiple reflection at grazing angles along the inner walls. Here we show that a concentric arrangement of bent capillaries makes it possible to focus and increase the flux density of a neutron beam—a phenomenon that will have applications in areas such as prompt-gamma activation analysis and neutron depth profiling.CORONAVIRUSES, like many animal viruses, are characterized by a restricted host range and tissue tropism^1. Transmissible gastroenteritis virus (TGEV), a major pathogen causing a fatal diarrhoea in newborn pig, replicates selectively in the differentiated enterocytes covering the villi of the small intestine^2. To investigate the molecular determinants of the infection, we characterized the surface molecule used by the virus for binding and entry into host cells. Here we report that aminopeptidase N, an ectoenzyme abundantly expressed at the apical membrane of the enterocytes, serves as a receptor for TGEV. Monoclonal antibodies were selected for their ability to block infection by TGEV of porcine cell lines. They recognized a brush-border membrane protein of M _ r , 150K, which was identified as aminopeptidase N by ammo-terminal sequencing. Two lines of evidence supported the view that the peptidase itself acts as a receptor. First, virions bound specifically to aminopep-tidase N that was purified to homogeneity. Second, recombinant expression of aminopeptidase N conferred infectivity by TGEV to an otherwise non-permissive cell line.THE photoreceptor G protein, transducin, is one of the class of heterotrimeric G proteins that mediates between membrane receptors and intracellular enzymes or ion channels. Light-activated rhodopsin catalyses the exchange of GDP for GTP on multiple transducin molecules. Activated transducin then stimulates cyclic GMP phosphodiesterase by releasing an inhibitory action of the phosphodiesterase γ-subunits. This leads to a decrease in cGMP levels in the rod, and closure of plasma membrane cationic channels gated by cGMP^1–4. In this and other systems, turn-off of the response requires the GTP bound to G protein to be hydrolysed by an intrinsic GTPase activity^5–7. Here we report that the interaction of transducin with cGMP phosphodiesterase, specifically with its γ-subunits, accelerates GTPase activity by several fold. Thus the γ-subunits of the phosphodiesterase serve a function analogous to the GTPase-activating proteins that regulate the class of small GTP-binding proteins. The acceleration can be partially suppressed by cGMP, most probably through the non-catalytic cGMP-binding sites of phosphodiesterase α and β-subunits. This cGMP regulation may function in light-adaptation of the photo-response as a negative feedback that decreases the lifetime of activated cGMP phosphodiesterase as light causes decreases in cytoplasmic cGMP.INTERMEDIATE filaments are ubiquitous in eukaryotic cells, but their functions are poorly understood. The Xenopus oocyte contains both messenger RNA and protein products of cytokeratin and vimentin genes'^1–5 in non-overlapping arrays. The cytokeratin filaments contain dimers of the type I (acidic) subunit XLK3a(19), and the type II (basic) subunit XCK1(8), polymerized to form a cortical network. These are homologues of the human simple epithelial keratins 19 and 8, respectively. After the first few cell cycles following fertilization these filaments become restricted to the superficial cells of the blastula. We have depleted the oocyte's store of the type II cytokeratin mRNA by injecting antisense oligodeoxynucleotides (oligos) and studied the effect on embryonic development. As zygotic transcription does not commence until the late blastula stage^6, there are at least 9 hours in which to see the effect of loss of function of this mRNA. We report here that the cytokeratin filaments become depleted in the cortical cells of the embryo. As a result, there is a loss of the 'compacted' epithelial surface of the blastula, an inability to close a wounded surface and defective gastrulation.MECHANICAL performance of skeletal muscle has long been the subject of intense interest^1, but the details of in vivo performance of individual skeletal muscles during normal locomotion remain largely unknown. Performance in vitro has been described with considerable precision under simplified loading conditions^2. The force production and shortening velocity of most muscles, however, probably change continuously during natural movements. Therefore, modelling in vivo performance on the basis of in vitro contractile properties^3 is subject to large degrees of uncertainty. Designing in vitro experiments that effectively examine the limits of mechanical performance requires increasing knowledge of precisely how muscles are used during normal movements. We report here measurements of the mechanical performance of the adductor muscle in scallops during jet-propulsion swimming. Swimming in scallops is powered solely by the striated portion of the single adductor muscle. Exploiting this simple locomotor morphology with simultaneous high-resolution measurements of pressure and flow rate, we have recorded nearly instantaneous measurements of the performance of a single skeletal muscle during normal locomotion.THE isotropy and flat count spectrum of γ-ray bursts revealed by the BATSE detector on the Compton Gamma-Ray Observatory^1 have led to suggestions that the burst sources are an extended galactic halo of high-velocity neutron stars^2,3We show here that if slow accretion onto these neutron stars from the interstellar medium is to be the origin of γ-ray bursts, the accretion physics is very different from what applies for local, low-velocity neutron stars^4,5. For halo neutron stars with high magnetic fields and velocities ( v > 190 km s^–1), electromagnetic dipole radiation pressure prevents accretion unless the period is longer than tens of seconds; the centrifugal barrier will then prevent accretion until the period reaches several thousand seconds. For periods as long as this, accretion may proceed through Kelvin–Helmholtz instability at the magnetopause boundary. At interstellar densities and neutron-star magnetic fields of ∼10^12 G, the accretion rate by this process can be much larger than the Bondi–Hoyle (hydrodynamic) accretion rate, but is still well below what is needed for slow-accretion burst models. We conclude that slow accretion onto high-velocity neutron stars in the halo cannot be the origin ofγ-ray bursts.Male fertility was restored to genetically engineered male sterile oilseed rape plants. Male sterile plants that express a chimaeric ribonuclease gene in the anther tapetal cell layer were crossed with male fertile plants that were transformed with a chimaeric tapetal-cell-specific ribonuclease-inhibitor gene. F_1 progeny expressing both genes are restored to male fertility by the suppression of cytotoxic ribonuclease activity in the anther by the formation of cell-specific RNase/RNase inhibitor complexes. Genetically engineered male sterility and fertility restorer genes should facilitate hybrid seed production in crop plants.GAUCHER'S disease is the most prevalent lysosomal storage disorder in humans and results from an autosomally inherited deficiency of the enzyme glucocerebrosidase (β-D-glucosyl-N-acylsphingosine glucohydrolase)^1–6, which is responsible for degrading the sphingolipid glucocerebroside. An animal model for Gaucher's disease would be important for investigating its phenorypic diversity and pathogenesis and for evaluating therapeutic approaches. A naturally occurring canine model has been reported but not propagated^7. Attempts to mimic the disease in animals by inhibiting glucocerebrosidase have been inadequate^8. Here we generate an animal model for Gaucher's disease by creating a null allele in embryonic stem cells through gene targeting and using these genetically modified cells to establish a mouse strain carrying the mutation^9,10. Mice homozygous for this mutation have <4% of normal glucocerebrosidase activity, die within twenty-four hours of birth and store glucocerebroside in lysosomes of cells of the reticuloendothelial system.TWO fossil human crania have been found in Middle Pleistocene terrace deposits of the Han River in Yun county (Yunxian), Hubei province, China (Figs 1 and 2)^1. These damaged but relatively complete adult specimens show a mixture of features associated both with Homo erectus and with 'archaic H. sapiens '. The Yunxian crania (Figs 3 and 4), although crushed and distorted to varying degrees, are unusual in having major elements of the basicranium, palate, face and cranial vault preserved together. The specimens reveal many details of facial and basicranial anatomy rarely seen in hominid crania of comparable antiquity. Moreover, they are the most complete crania of such great age discovered on the Asian mainland. They consequently throw new light on Middle Pleistocene hominid diversity and the relationships among regionally disparate Middle Pleistocene hominids.ONE of the great successes of plate tectonics has been to provide a link between deformations of the lithosphere observed over widely varying timescales. For example, the slip between two plates as measured from young magnetic anomalies (and hence averaged over the past 1–2 Myr) has been found^1–3to be compatible with estimates obtained from slip during recent earthquakes, despite the small time interval covered by the earthquake observations. Here we start from the idea^4,5 that geological deformations are the long-term cumulative trace of short-term processes such as earthquakes, so that the latter can be described as a high-frequency 'noise' for the former. We return to a theoretical framework^6 introduced to model large-scale and long-term tectonics, based on a nonlinear diffusion equation, but here explicitly associate the 'noise' term with earthquakes. The observed power-law relationship between earthquake frequency and magnitude, together with an assumption that strain is on average scale-independent, leads to the prediction that the largest earthquakes will have a Gutenberg-Richter ' b -value' of 1.5, as has recently been reported for large (M_w>7) earthquakes worldwide^7.Standard Big Bang nucleosynthesis predicts a very small primordial abundance of beryllium. Observations of nine very metal-poor stars indicate a beryllium abundance roughly proportional to the oxygen abundance, a trend that can be explained in terms of galactic chemical evolution. Combining this rate of beryllium production with recent observations of boron and lithium in similar stars yields an upper limit to the primordial beryllium abundance several orders of magnitude greater than the cosmological prediction, a result that can be explained by cosmicray activity in the early Galaxy.Proteins presented to the immune system must first be cleaved to small peptides by intracellular proteinases. Proteasomes are proteolytic complexes that degrade cytosolic and nuclear proteins. These particles have been implicated in ATP-ubiquitin-dependent proteolysis and in the processing of intracellular antigens for cytolytic immune responses.Impure Science: Fraud, Compromise and Political Influence in Scientific Research. ByRobert Bell. Wiley: 1992. Pp. 301. $22.95 (US and Canada only).Out of the Earth: Civilization and the Life of the Soil. ByDaniel Hille. Aurum/Free Press: 1992. Pp. 321. £19.95, $22.50.This week's "Earth Summit" in Rio has precipitated the publication of many books exploring the link between the environment and the economy. Here is an economist's assessment of their use to scientists.Russian science seems to have survived the winter and the first phase of price liberalization, but there is a long way to go before it can compete on equal terms.The Human Frontier Science Program is a bold attempt to support the next century's biology research. Its horizons should not be limited.Arguments that research support for neuroscience should quadruple miss the point and are not convincing.The Maastricht Treaty on the constitution of Europe from now on will probably be ratified in the coming months, but will not give Europe the better government it needs.The Materials Science of Thin Films. By Milton Ohring. Academic: 1991. Pp. 704. $69.95, £46.50.New products in the spectroscopic arena include an advanced spectral library system for infrared spectroscopy and a fast-scanning UV/visible spectrophotometer that features reverse optics.IMMUNE recognition of intracellular proteins is mediated by major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class I molecules that present short peptides to cytotoxic T cells^1–4. Evidence suggests that peptides arise by cleavage of proteins in the cytoplasm and are transported by a signal-independent mechanism into a pre-Golgi region of the cell, where they take part in the assembly of class I heavy chains with β_2-microglobulin (reviewed in refs 5–7). Analysis of cells that have defects in class I molecule assembly and antigen presentation^8–14 has shown that this phenotype can result from mutations in either of the two ABC transporter genes located in the class II region of the MHC^15–22. This suggested that the protein complex encoded by these two genes^20,22 transports peptides from the cytosol into the endoplasmic reticulum. Here we report additional evidence by showing that the transporter complex is located in the endoplasmic reticulum membrane and is probably oriented with its ATP-binding domains in the cytosol.THE development of Drosophila is typical of the so-called long germband mode of insect development, in which the pattern of segments is established by the end of the blastoderm stage^1,2. Short germband insects, such as the grasshopper Schistocerca americana , by contrast, generate all or most of their metameric pattern after the blastoderm stage by the sequential addition of segments during caudal elongation^3. This difference is discernible at the molecular level in the pattern of initiation of the segment polarity gene engrailed ^4, and the homeotic gene abdominal-A (ref. 5). For example, in both types of insects, engrailed is expressed by the highly conserved germband stage^4,6 in a pattern of regularly spaced stripes, one stripe per segment^7–9. In Drosophila , the complete pattern is visible by the end of the blastoderm stage, although engrailed appears initially in alternate segments in a pair-rule pattern^9–10 that reflects its known control by pair-rule genes such as even-skipped ^11*15. In contrast, in the grasshopper, the engrailed stripes appear one at a time after the blastoderm stage as the embryo elongates^4. To address the molecular basis for this difference, we have cloned the grasshopper homologue of the Drosophila pair-rule gene even-skipped and show that it does not serve a pair-rule function in early development, although it does have a similar function in both insects during neurogenesis later in development.THE antidiuretic effect of arginine vasopressin (AVP) is mediated by renal-type (V2) receptors linked to adenylyl cyclase^1. We report here the cloning of the rat kidney V2 AVP receptor complementary DNA that encodes a 370-amino-acid protein with a transmembrane topography characteristic of G protein-coupled receptors, and with similarity to the Via (hepatic) AVP receptor^2 in its seven membrane-spanning domains. Expression of the cloned cDNA in mammalian cells showed specific ligand binding and activity characteristic of the native V2 AVP receptor. The receptor messenger RNA is detected only in the kidney. The human V2 receptor gene has been localized to the long arm of the X chromosome close to the locus for nephrogenic diabetes insipidus, an X-linked recessive disorder characterized by renal resistance to the antidiuretic action of AVP^3–6ANTIDIURESIS, the recovery of water from the lumen of the renal collecting tubule, is regulated by the hypothalamic release of antidiuretic hormone (ADH), which binds to specific receptors on renal collecting tubule cells, stimulates adenylyl cyclase and promotes the cyclic AMP-mediated incorporation of water pores into the luminal surface of these cells'^1–3. We report here the isolation of the human ADH receptor gene using a genomic expression cloning approach^4. The gene was used to clone the complementary DNA from a human renal library. The deduced amino-acid sequence of the receptor yields a hydropathy profile characteristic of receptors with seven putative transmembrane regions. This and the comparison with other cloned receptors indicates that the ADH receptor is a member of the superfamily of G-protein-coupled receptors.EVIDENCE suggests that the New World was colonized only 11,000–40,000 years ago by Palaeo-Indians^1. The descendants of these Palaeo-Indians therefore provide a unique opportunity to study the effects of selection on major histocompatibility complex class I genes over a short period. Here we analyse the class I alleles of the Waorani of South America and the Zuni of North America. Four of the Waorani HLA-B alleles were new functional variants which could be accounted for by intralocus recombination. In contrast, all of the Zuni HLA-A and - B molecules were present in Caucasians and orientals. This suggests that the new Waorani HLA-B variants arose in South America. The description of four new HLA-B alleles in the Waorani and another five new HLA-B alleles from two other tribes of South American Amerindians^2 indicates that the HLA-B locus can evolve rapidly in isolated populations. These studies underline the importance of gathering genetic data on endangered native human populations^3.THE Kaingang and Guarani are culturally and linguistically distinct tribes of southern Brazil^1,2. Like all Amerindian groups^3,4 they show limited HLA polymorphism, which probably reflects the small founder populations that colonized America by overland migration from Asia 11,000–40,000 years ago,^5,6 We find the nucleotide sequences of HLA-B alleles from the Kaingang and Guarani to be distinct from those characterized in Caucasian, oriental and other populations^7. By comparison, the HLA-A and C alleles are familiar. These results and those reported in the accompanying paper^8 on the Waorani of Ecuador reveal that a marked evolution of HLA-B has occurred since humans first entered South America. New alleles have been formed through recombination between pre-existing alleles, not by point mutation, giving rise to distinctive diversification of HLA-B in different South American Indian tribes.THE record of early fossil Simiiformes (Anthropoidea^1) from the Late Eocene and Early Oligocene of Africa and the Arabian Peninsula has increased dramatically in recent years^2–6. We report here the discovery of a new, diminutive and much older (Early or Middle Eocene) simian from an Algerian locality, Glib Zegdou. This species is smaller than any other living or fossil African simiiform. Derived similarities shared with Aegyptoplthecus suggest that the new genus is more closely related to propliopithecines than to oligopithecines, implying that these two subfamilies differentiated during the Early Eocene. The new discovery confirms predictions about the great antiquity of Simiiformes^7–9 and emphasizes a long and endemic African history for higher primates.INCREASED forest growth in response to globally rising CO_2 concentrations could provide an additional sink for the excess carbon added to the atmosphere from fossil fuels^1,2. The response of trees to increased CO_2, however, can be expected to be modified by the interactions of other environmental resources and stresses, higher-order ecological interactions and internal feedbacks inherent in the growth of large, perennial organisms^3,4. To test whether short-term stimulation of tree growth by elevated CO_2 can be sustained without inputs from other environmental resources, we grew yellow-poplar ( Liriodendron tulipifera L.) saplings for most of three growing seasons with continuous exposure to ambient or elevated concentrations of atmospheric CO_2. Despite a sustained increase in leaf-level photosynthesis and lower rates of foliar respiration in CO_2-enriched trees, whole-plant carbon storage did not increase. The absence of a significant growth response is explained by changes in carbon allocation patterns, specifically a relative decrease in leaf production and an increase in fine root production. Although these compensatory responses reduced the potential increase in carbon storage in increased CO_2 concentrations, they also favour the efficient use of resources over the longer term.RECONSTRUCTIONSof early Eocene climate depict a world in which the polar environments support mammals and reptiles, deciduous forests, warm oceans and rare frost conditions ^1–5. At the same time, tropical sea surface temperatures are interpreted to have been the same as or slightly cooler than present values^6. The question of how to warm polar regions of Earth without noticeably warming the tropics remains unresolved; increased amounts of greenhouse gases would be expected to warm all latitudes equally^7. Oceanic heat transport has been postulated as a mechanism for heating high latitudes^8–10, but it is difficult to explain the dynamics that would achieve this^7,11. Here we consider estimates of Eocene wetland areas and suggest that the flux of methane, an important greenhouse gas, may have been substantially greater during the Eocene than at present. Elevated methane concentrations would have enhanced early Eocene global warming, and also might specifically have prevented severe winter cooling of polar regions because of the potential of atmospheric methane to promote the formation of optically thick, polar stratospheric ice clouds^12–14.A new set of greenhouse gas emissions scenarios has been produced by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC). Incorporating these into models that also include the effects of C0_2 fertilization, feedback from stratospheric ozone depletion and the radiative effects of sulphate aerosols yields new projections for radiative forcing of climate and for changes in global-mean temperature and sea level. Changes in temperature and sea level are predicted to be less severe than those estimated previously, but are still far beyond the limits of natural variability.Comprehensive Organic Synthesis: Selectivity, Strategy and Efficiency in Modern Organic ChemistryThe Maxwellians. By Bruce J. Hunt. Cornell University Press: 1991. Pp. 266. $34.95.British Scientists and the Manhattan Project: The Los Alamos Years By Ferenc Morton Szasz. Macmillan/St Martin's Press: 1992. Pp. 167. £40. The Los Alamos Primer: The First Lectures on How to Build an Atom Bomb By Robert Serber. University of California Press: 1992. Pp. 98. $23.To alleviate the increasing atmospheric concentrations of carbon dioxide, the principal greenhouse gas, Marchetti^1 proposed that CO_2, might be separated from flue gases and injected into the oceans. This, and subsequent studies^2–5, emphasized the need to inject the gas at great depths or in sinking currents to avoid rapid outgassing to the atmosphere. Here we show that, to the contrary, the increase in water density that results from CO_2, dissolution may be sufficient to transport the dissolved gas to lower depths even for shallow injection (in the upper 200–400 m of the ocean). If the CO_2 is injected near the shore, gravity currents will carry the dense, CO_2-rich waters along the bottom slope towards deep water. Shallow injection near the shore will be less expensive in terms of energy and capital than deep-ocean injection. We suggest that the coast of Norway, in the vicinity of existing oil and gas fields and of planned gas power plants, provides an example of a region where the negative buoyancy of CO_2-enriched sea water would transport the gas from emission sites to the deep ocean. The effect of such measures on marine life downstream of the injection point remains to be evaluated.CURRENT debate on policies for limiting climate change due to greenhouse-gas emissions focuses on whether to take action now or later, and on how stringent any emissions reductions should be in the near and long term. Any reductions policies implemented now will need to be revised later as scientific understanding of climate change improves. Here we consider the effects of a sequential-decision strategy (Fig. 1) consisting of a near-term period (1992–2002) during which either moderate emissions reductions (achieved by energy conservation only) or aggressive reductions (energy conservation coupled with switching to other fuel sources) are begun, and a subsequent long-term period during which a least-cost abatement policy is followed to limit global mean temperature change to an optimal target Δ T ^*. For each policy we calculate the global mean surface temperature change Δ T ( t ) using a simple climate/ocean model for climate sensitivities Δ T _2 x . (the response to doubled CO_2, concentrations) of 4.5,2.5,1.5 and 0.5 °C. The policy beginning with moderate reductions is less expensive than that with aggressive reductions if Δ T ^*>2.9, 2.1, 1.5 and 0.9 °C respectively; otherwise, the aggressive-reductions policy is cheaper. We suggest that this approach should assist in choosing realistic targets and in determining how best to implement emissions reductions in the short and long term.SUPERCONDUCTIVITY in the high-transition-temperature (high- T _ c ) copper oxide superconductors seems to arise from layers of copper–oxygen squares, pyramids or octahedra. Recently the compound Sr_2CuO_2CO_3 was found to contain layers of CuO_6 octahedra^1 (Fig. 1), suggesting that it might be made superconducting by appropriate doping. But the presence of carbonate as an impurity is known to degrade the superconducting properties of materials such as YBa 2 Cu 3 O 7 - δ ′ and YBa 2 Cu 4 O 8 (refs 2, 3), much effort having been made to minimize residual carbon in these compounds by optimizing processing methods^4. It is thus of some interest to see whether Sr_2CuO_2CO_3 can be made superconducting despite the carbonate ions incorporated in the structure. Here we report the synthesis, at 50 atm oxygen partial pressure, of superconducting ( Ba x Sr 1- x ) 2 Cu 1 + y O 2 + 2 y + δ ( CO 3 ) 1 - y (0.4≤ x ≤0.65, y≈O.1), with T _ c (onset) up to ∼40 K and zero resistance at up to ∼26K. The crystal structure contains CuO_2 sheets alternating with ( Ba x Sr 1- x ) 2 Cu y O 2 y + δ ( CO 3 ) 1 - y , slabs, which serve as charge reservoir layers: substitution of ∼10% copper for carbon in the slabs introduces holes into the CuO_2 sheets, making the compound superconducting.THE possibility of creating ordered ion beams in high-energy storage rings^1,2 by means of electron and laser cooling has opened up a new era in accelerator physics. The enhanced luminosity and suppressed momentum spread in such systems create the highest possible phase-space density. The first experimental results were obtained by cooling ^7Li^+ beams to temperatures of a few kelvin or even to sub-kelvin temperatures^3,4, and the ordered structures have been studied theoretically^5–7 by methods of molecular dynamics. Predicted configurations for the lowest ion densities have been observed in low-energy quadrupole storage rings^8 and linear traps^9. Recently we showed that at slightly higher ion densities helical structures are obtained^10. Here we present a series of new experimental results on ordered ion structures in a quadrupole storage ring. In order of increasing ion number, a linear chain of ions, a zig-zag structure, helical structures and finally multiple concentric shells could be observed. The experimental results agree with molecular dynamics calculations.The Units of Selection: Essays on the Nature of Species. Edited by Mark Ereshefsky. MIT Press: 1992. Pp. 405. $60, £44.95 (hbk); $33, £24.75 (pbk).Many of the membrane-associated oxidases that catalyse respiratory reduction of 0_2 to water simultaneously couple this exergonic reaction to the translocation of protons across the inner mitochondrial membrane, or the cell membrane in prokaryotes, a process by which metabolic energy is conserved for subsequent synthesis of ATP. The molecular mechanism of 0_2 reduction and its linkage to H^+ translocation are now emerging. The bimetallic haem iron–copper reaction centre in this family of enzymes is the critical structure for catalysis of both these processes.The Malaria Capers: More Tales of Parasites and People, Research and Reality. ByRobert S. Desowitz. Norton: 1991. Pp. 288. $21.95, £14.95. Malaria: Waiting for the Vaccine. Edited by Geoffrey Targett. Wiley: 1991. Pp. 224. £39.50, $84.05.The two major British political parties seem to have turned their backs on basic research.General excitement about the argument by Francis Fukuyama that recent setbacks for totalitarian states mark the end of history should be moderated by awareness of the weaknesses of his interesting case.Once-secure employment in the public service is now threatened by the brooding of most governments about its cost, but the rewards (intellectual and otherwise) may still be substantial.IN mitochondria, electrons derived from the oxidation of succinate by the tricarboxylic acid cycle enzyme succinate-ubiquinone oxido-reductase are transferred directly to the quinone pool. Here we provide evidence that the soluble form of this enzyme (succinate dehydrogenase) behaves as a diode that essentially allows electron flow in one direction only. The gating effect is observed when electrons are exchanged rapidly and directly between fully active succinate dehydrogenase and a graphite electrode. Turnover is therefore measured under conditions of continuously variable electrochemical potential. The otherwise rapid and efficient reduction of fumarate (the reverse reaction) is severely retarded as the driving force (overpotential) is increased. Such behaviour can arise if a rate-limiting chemical step like substrate binding or product release depends on the oxidation state of a redox group on the enzyme. The observation provides, for a biological electron-transport system, a simple demonstration of directionality that is enforced by kinetics as opposed to that which is assumed from thermodynamics.MOTOR proteins in cells include myosin^1, which is actin-based, and kinesin, dynein and dynamin^2, which are microtubule-based. Several proteins have recently been identified that have amino-acid sequences with similarity to the motor domains of either myosin^3 or kinesin^4–9, but are otherwise dissimilar. This has led to the suggestion that these may all be motor proteins, but that they are specialized for moving different cargos. Genetic analysis can address the question of the different functions of these new proteins. Studies of a temperature-sensitive mutation (myo2-66) in a gene of the myosin superfamily (MYO2) have implicated the Myo2 protein (Myo2p) in the process of polarized secretion in yeast (Saccharomyces cerevisiae) ^10. To understand more about the role of Myo2p, we have looked for 'multicopy suppressors' (heterologous genes that, when overexpressed, can correct the temperature sensitivity of the myo2-66 mutant). Here we report the identification of such a suppressor (SMY1) that (surprisingly) encodes a predicted polypeptide sharing sequence similarity with the motor portion of proteins in the kinesin superfamily.THE abundant nuclear enzyme poly(ADP-ribose) polymerase catalyses the synthesis of poly(ADP-ribose) from nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide (NAD^+)^1–5. This protein has an N-terminal DNA-binding domain containing two zinc-fingers, which is linked to the C-terminal NAD^+-binding domain by a short region containing several glutamic acid residues that are sites of auto-poly(ADP-ribosyl)ation^6–8. The intracellular production of poly(ADP-ribose) is induced by agents that generate strand interruptions in DNA^7. The branched homopolymer chains may attain a size of 200–300 residues^9 but are rapidly degraded after synthesis. The function of poly(ADP-ribose) synthesis is not clear, although it seems to be required for DNA repair^10,11. Here we describe a human cell-free system that enables the role of poly(ADP-ribose) synthesis in DNA repair to be characterized. The results indicate that unmodified polymerase molecules bind tightly to DNA strand breaks; auto-poly(ADP-ribosyl)ation of the protein then effects its release and allows access to lesions for DNA repair enzymes.CELLULAR feedback or 'checkpoint' mechanisms maintain the order of completion of essential, cell-cycle related functions^1–3. In the budding yeast, for example, the RAD9 gene product is required to delay progression into mitosis in response to DNA damage^2,4–6. Similarly, in fission yeast, the cdc25 and cdc2 gene products influence the ability of cells to delay mitosis in response to the inhibition of DNA synthesis^7. Because these two checkpoint controls regulate the same event, mitosis, we observed the effect of γ -irradiation on cell cycle progression in fission yeast, to test whether the two controls require the same cell-cycle regulatory elements. We show that γ -radiation-induced mitotic delay requires functional wee1 protein kinase but does not seem to involve the cdc25 pathway. Mitotic delay in response to DNA damage is thus distinct from the delay induced by inhibition of DNA synthesis, which involves cdc25 but is not dependent on wee1 .Oxygen Chemistry. ByDonald T. Sawyer. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 223. £30, $35.RELEASE of intracellular Ca^2+ by inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate (InsP3) occurs through specific receptor proteins1 which are ligand-activated Ca^2+ channels . Changes in intracellular Ca^2+ regulate many cellular functions3. This Ca^2+ release is a discontinuous quantal process in which successive increments of InsP3 transiently release precise amounts of Ca^2+ (refs 4–6). Possible explanations of quantal Ca^2+ release have included rapid degradation of InsP3, reciprocity of Ca^2+ release and sequestration, desensitization of InsP3 receptors7, or actions of InsP3 on discrete compartments of Ca^2+ with variable sensitivity to InsP3 (ref. 4). We successfully reconstituted InsP3-induced Ca^2+ flux in vesicles containing only purified InsP3 receptor protein^2. The reconstituted vesicles retain the regulatory features of the InsP3 receptor, including phosphory-lation sites^8 and modulation of Ca^2+ release by adenine nucleo-tides^9. Using these reconstituted vesicles, we show here that quantal flux of Ca^2+ elicited by InsP3 is a fundamental property of its receptor.EPSTEIN–BARR virus, a human herpesvirus with oncogenic potential, infects two target tissues in vivo : B lymphocytes, where the infection is largely non-productive^1, and stratified squamous epithelium in which virus replication occurs^2,3. The interaction with B cells, initiated through virus binding to the B-cell surface molecule CR2 (ref. 4), has been studied in vitro and the virus 'latent' genes associated with B-cell growth transformation defined^5. By comparison, viral infection of epithelium remains poorly understood, reflecting the lack of an appropriate cell-culture model. Here we describe the development of such a model using as targets CR2-expressing transfected cells of two independent human epithelial lines. A high proportion of these cells bind virus and become actively infected, expressing the small EBER RNAs (small non-polyadenylated virus-coded RNAs) and the Epstein–Barr nuclear antigen 1 but not other latent proteins; thereafter, under conditions favouring epithelial differentiation, up to 30% of the cells can be induced to enter virus productive cycle with some progressing to full virus replication. We find significant differences between laboratory virus strains in their ability to infect epithelium that do not correlate with their B-cell growth-transforming activity.IN many mammalian cells brefeldin A interferes with mechanisms that keep the Golgi apparatus separate from the endoplasmic reticulum^1–8. The earliest effect of brefeldin A is release of the coat protein β -COP from the Golgi^9–11. This release is blocked by pretreatment with GTP- γ S or AIF^−_4 (ref. 12). The AIF^−_4 ion activates heterotrimeric G proteins^13 but not proteins of the ras superfamily^14, suggesting that a heterotrimeric G protein might control membrane transfer from the endoplasmic reticulum to the Golgi. We report here that mastoparan, a peptide that activates heterotrimeric G proteins^15,16, promotes binding of β -COP to Golgi membranes in vitro and antagonizes the effect of brefeldin A on β -COP in perforated cells and on isolated Golgi membranes. This inhibition is greatly diminished if cells are pretreated with pertussis toxin before perforation., Thus, a heterotrimeric G protein of the G_i/G_O subfamily regulates association of coat components with Golgi membranes.THE induction of the hermaphrodite vulva^1 and the migration of the sex myoblasts^2,3 in the nematode Caenorhabdltis elegans are both controlled by intercellular signalling. The gonadal anchor cell induces formation of the vulva from nearby hypodermal cells^4, and a set of somatic gonadal cells attract the migrating sex myoblasts to their final positions^2. Many genes required for vulval induction have been identified1, including the let-23 receptor tyrosine kinase gene^5–7 and the let-60 ras gene^8–10. We report here the identification and characterization of a new gene, sem-5 ( sem , sex muscle abnormal), that acts both in vulval induction and in sex myoblast migration. On the basis of its DNA sequence, sem-5 encodes a novel 228-amino-acid protein which consists almost entirely of one SH2 (SH, src homology region) and two SH3 domains. SH2 and SH3 domains are present in many signalling proteins regulated by receptor and non-receptor tyrosine kinases^11. Mutations that impair sem-5 activity alter residues that are highly conserved among different SH2 and SH3 domains. Our results indicate that the sem-5 gene encodes a novel protein that functions in at least two distinct cell-signalling processes.Unusual Telescopes. By Peter L Manly. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 221. £19.95, $39.95.ION channels selectively permeable to chloride ions regulate cell functions as diverse as excitability and control of cell volume^1–5. Using expression cloning techniques, a complementary DNA from an epithelial cell line has been isolated, sequenced and its putative structure examined by site-directed mutagenesis. This cDNA, encoding a 235-amino-acid protein, gave rise to a chloride-selective outward current when expressed in Xenopus oocytes. The expressed, outwardly rectifying chloride current was calcium-insensitive and was blocked by nucleotides applied to the cell surface. Mutation of a putative nucleotide-binding site resulted in loss of nucleotide block but incurred dependence on extracellular calcium concentration. The unusual sequence of this putative channel protein suggests a new class of ion channels not related to other previously cloned chloride channels^6–11.THROUGHOUT the animal kingdom, the sight of a rapidly approaching object usually signals danger and elicits an escape response^1–6. Gibson^7suggested that the symmetrical expansion of an object's image (looming) is the critical variable determining that the object is on a collision course with the observer. Similarly, large expanding flow-fields like those produced by locomotion may precipitate manoeuvres such as turning or landing^8,9. From such observations it has been shown that the optic flow parameter, T which specifies time to contact with the approaching object best fits the behavioural data^10,11. We describe a subpopulation of neurons in the nucleus rotundus of the pigeon brain that respond selectively to objects moving on a collision course towards the bird. These neurons give their maximum response at a constant time before contact occurs, even when the size of the stimulus or its velocity is varied widely. We propose that these neurons are signalling the time to collision of approaching objects.ALL significant properties of the herbivore trophic level, including biomass, consumption and productivity, are significantly correlated with primary productivity across a broad range of terrestrial ecosystems^1,2. Here we show that livestock biomass in South American agricultural ecosystems across a 25-fold gradient of primary productivity exhibited a relationship with a slope essentially identical to unmanaged ecosystems, but with a substantially greater y -intercept. Therefore the biomass of herbivores supported per unit of primary productivity is about an order of magnitude greater in agricultural than in natural ecosystems, for a given level of primary production. We also present evidence of an increase in livestock body size with primary productivity, a pattern previously characterized in natural ecosystems^3. To our knowledge this is the first quantitative documentation at a regional scale of the impact of animal husbandry practices, such as herding, stock selection and veterinary care, on the biomass and size-structure of livestock herds compared with native herbivores.QUANTITATIVE chemical modelling of geochemical, environmental and industrial processes is often severely limited because of large gaps in experimentally derived thermodynamic databases for Gibbs free energies of crystalline solids and aqueous ions. Methods proposed previously for estimation of the free energies or enthalpies of formation of crystalline solids^1–9 are subject to large uncertainties, typically greater than ±5–10 kcal mol^−1. Here we present an empirically based linear free energy equation^10 applicable to cations of any charge, radius or chemical type, which allows estimates of the free energies of solids with uncertainties of less than ±1 kcal mol^−1. Our equation is analogous to the linear free energy relations of Hammett and others^11,12 for aqueous organic reactions, but applies instead to crystalline solids. We apply our equation to experimentally derived standard Gibbs free energies of formation of isostructural families of divalent oxides, hydroxides, carbonates, fluorides, chlorides and sulphates. This new level of accuracy for predicting free energies of crystalline solids opens up opportunities for chemical modelling of many processes not previously amenable to thermodynamic analysis.LIMITED understanding of the influence of the environment on the relation between photosynthesis and light in the ocean impairs our capacity to estimate primary production from remotely sensed data on ocean colour^1 and to model the role of the marine biota in the ocean carbon cycle^2. Here we report results from several years of oceanographic cruises, showing that the parameters of the photosynthesis–light curve for the flora of the North Sargasso Sea are remarkably constant in magnitude, except during the spring phytoplankton bloom when their magnitudes are noticeably higher. We interpret these results as providing direct evidence for nutrient control of photosynthesis in the open ocean. Our findings also reinforce the plausibility of using biogeochemical provinces to partition the ocean into manageable units for basin-or global-scale analysis^1,3,4, show that seasonal changes in critical parameters should not be overlooked if robust carbon budgets are to be constructed, and illustrate the value of attacking the parameters that control the key fluxes, rather than the fluxes themselves, when investigating the ocean carbon cycle.LANGMUIR monolayers—films of amphiphilic molecules at the surface of water—exhibit many phases^1,2. Some of these behave like two-dimensional solids on experimental timescales, but previous measurements of the shear modulus of these 'solid' monolayers^3–5 have yielded a value too small to be compatible with a two-dimensional crystal. The interpretation of these is complicated, however, by the likelihood of inhomogeneities in the films, which are probably assemblies of microscopic crystalline domains. Here we describe measurements of the Young's modulus of an isolated "solid' domain of NBD-stearic acid monolayers. We obtain a value large enough to be compatible with the modulus of a two-dimensional crystal^6–8. This suggests that Langmuir monolayers should provide model systems for studies of melting in two dimensions^6–8.OPTICAL sensors used in connection with bright sources such as lasers and arc welders must commonly be protected from damaging light levels by the use of optical limiters^1. One approach to optical limiting makes use of materials whose optical transmittance decreases at high light levels^2–5. For most protective applications, the response must be rapid and the saturation threshold low; a lower threshold provides a greater safety margin. Studies of the optical properties of C_60have shown that the absorption cross-section of the photoexcited triplet state is greater than that of the ground state^6, suggesting that it may have a nonlinear optical response of the sort useful for optical limiting. Here we report measurements of the optical response of solutions of C_60 and C_70 in methylene chloride and toluene, using 8-ns pulses of 532-nm-wavelength laser light. We observed optical limiting behaviour in all cases, with saturation thresholds equal to or lower than those reported for other optical-limiting materials currently in use.USING data from the Ginga satellite, Done et al .^1 have confirmed an Exosat observation^2 of high-amplitude periodic modulation in the X-ray emission from the Seyfert galaxy NGC6814. To within observational errors of ∼1%, the period seems to have remained constant at ∼12,100 seconds between 1985 and 1989. An obvious candidate for the phenomenon underlying the periodicity is the orbital motion of a star or low-mass compact object around the central black hole^3. As we show here, the presence of an orbiting star could be verified easily by looking for the effects of Lense–Thirring precession of the orbital plane, caused by the dragging of inertia! frames around a rotating black hole. Precession-induced variations in the waveform and in the phase of the observed periodicity should have a period of between a month and a year. Such variations could account for the different waveforms present in the Ginga and Exosat data sets^4, and may be detectable in existing Ginga and future Rosat, OSSE/GRO, and Astro-D data.CLASSICAL nova outbursts are thought to occur in binary systems in which a white dwarf accretes material from a main-sequence dwarf. The outburst is due to thermonuclear runaway in the accreted material, and results in the ejection of about 10^−5–10^−4 solar masses of material at velocities of up to several thousand kilometres per second (ref. 1). Previous X-ray observations of classical novae in the early stages of outburst have resulted only in upper limits to the X-ray flux^2–4. Here we report a positive detection by the Rosat satellite of X-ray emission from Nova Herculis 1991 five days after its optical discovery. Standard nova models predict X-ray emission to arise directly from nuclear burning on the surface of the white dwarf, and suggest that X-rays should not be seen until later in the outburst^5. We argue that the emission from Nova Her 1991 comes from hot, shocked circuin-stellar material, which may be the ejected material itself or preexisting circumstellar matter. In either case, however, the required density of material is higher than models of nova binary systems would suggest.A strict definition of fraud and a plan to move the NIH Office of Scientific Integrity out of NIH are a step in the right direction of reforming a system that has not worked well.The alarming termination rate of long-term monitoring programmes in Europe is hindering the detection of ecosystem change in the ocean. Existing programmes must be linked and data shared.Mutations in the p53 tumour-suppressor gene are the most frequently observed genetic lesions in human cancers. To investigate the role of the p53 gene in mammalian development and tumori-genesis, a null mutation was introduced into the gene by homologous recombination in murine embryonic stem cells. Mice homozygous for the null allele appear normal but are prone to the spontaneous development of a variety of neoplasms by 6 months of age. These observations indicate that a normal p53 gene is dispensable for embryonic development, that its absence predisposes the animal to neoplastic disease, and that an oncogenic mutant form of p53 is not obligatory for the genesis of many types of tumours.Governments everywhere are selling nationalized industries to private persons, but problems of monopoly persist.The enunciation of the 'fifth force' hypothesis in 1986 spawned a generation of experiments searching for deviations from newtonian gravity. Although no compelling evidence for any new weak forces has emerged in the past six years, the searches for anomalous gravitational effects have produced a large number of important experimental and theoretical results.Cancer Selection: The New Theory of Evolution. By James Graham. Aculeus, PO Box 142, Lexington, Virginia 24450, USA: 1992. Pp. 213. $20.War in the Age of Intelligent Machines. By Manuel De Landa. Zone Books: 1992. Pp. 271. £14.95, $22.95 (pbk); £29.75, $44.50 (hbk). Distributed by MIT Press.The French Paracelsians: The Chemical Challenge to Medical and Scientific Tradition in Early Modern France. By Alien G. Debus. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 247. £40, $59.95.The Genetic Revolution: Scientific Prospects and Public Perceptions. Edited by Bernard D. Davis. Johns Hopkins University Press: 1991. Pp. 294. £32.50, $45 (hbk); £11.50, $15.95 (pbk).Biotechnics and Society: The Rise of Industrial Genetics. By Sheldon Krimsky. Praeger: 1991. Pp. 280. $17.95 (pbk), $47.95 (hbk).Wonderwoman and Superman: The Ethics of Human Biotechnology. By John Harris. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 271. £17.95, $22.95.At last there is some inclination in the West to help ex-Soviet science over the hurdles ahead, but plans now afoot are probably insufficient, and could yet be too late.New products for image analysis include a scanning-force microscope with a non-contact mode of operation and an image processing package that helps users extract high-quality images from transmission electron microscopes.The interfacial-force microscope can measure the mechanical and adhesive properties of a single monolayer of organic molecules.THE paper published under this title1 has been retracted: see Scientific Correspondence 2.SYNTHESIS of α-lytic protease is as a precursor containing a 166 amino-acid pro region_1 transiently required for the correct folding of the protease domain^2–4. By omitting the pro region in an in vitro refolding reaction we trapped an inactive, but folding competent state (I) having an expanded radius yet native-like secondary structure. The I state is stable for weeks at physiological pH in the absence of denaturant, but rapidly folds to the active, native state on addition of the pro region as a separate polypeptide chain. The mechanism of action of the pro region is distinct from that of the chaperonins^5,6: rather than reducing the rate of off-pathway reactions, the pro region accelerates the rate-limiting step on the folding pathway by more than 10^7. Because both the I and native states are stable under identical conditions with no detectable interconversion, the folding of α-lytic protease must be under kinetic and not thermodynamic control.BEING topologically equivalent to the extracellular space, the lumen of the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) provides a unique folding environment for newly synthesized proteins. Unlike other compartments in the cell where folding occurs, the ER is oxidizing and therefore can promote the formation of disulphide bonds^1. The reducing agent dithiothreitol, when added to living cells, inhibits disulphide formation with profound effects on folding^2. Taking advantage of this effect, we demonstrate here that folding of influenza haemagglutinin is energy dependent. Metabolic energy is required to support the correct folding and disulphide bond formation in this well characterized viral glycoprotein, to rescue misfolded proteins from disulphide-linked aggregates, and to maintain the oxidized protein in its folded and oligomerization-competent state.THE need to develop a blood substitute is now urgent because of the increasing concern over blood-transmitted viral and bacterial pathogens^1. Cell-free haemoglobin solutions^2,3 and human haemoglobin synthesized in Escherichia coli ^4 and Saccharomyces cerevisiae ^5 have been investigated as potential oxygen-carrying substitutes for red blood cells. But these haemoglobins cannot be used as a blood substitute because (1) the oxygen affinity in the absence of 2,3-bisphosphoglycerate is too high to allow unloading of enough oxygen in the tissues^6, and (2) they dissociate into αβ dimers^7 that are cleared rapidly by renal filtration^8–10, which can result in long-term kidney damage^7–9. We have produced a human haemoglobin using an expression vector containing one gene encoding a mutant β-globin with decreased oxygen affinity and one duplicated, tandemly fused α-globin gene. Fusion of the two α-globin subunits increases the half-life of this haemoglobin molecule in vivo by preventing its dissociation into αβ dimers and therefore also eliminates renal toxicity.HIGH mutation rates have driven RNA viruses to shorten their genomes to the minimum possible size^1. Mammalian (+)-strand RNA viruses and retroviruses have responded by reducing the number of cis -acting regulatory elements, a constraint that has led to the emergence of the polyprotein^2. Poliovirus is a (+)-stranded picornavirus whose polyprotein, encoded by an open reading frame spanning most of the viral RNA^3, is processed by virus-encoded proteinases^4,5. Despite their genetic austerity, picor-naviruses have retained long 5' untranslated regions^6–8, which harbour cis -acting elements that promote initiation of translation independently of the uncapped 5' end of the viral messenger RNA^9–12. These elements are termed 'internal ribosomal entry sites'^10 and are formed from highly structured RNA segments^13–15 of at least 400 nucleotides^16. How these elements function is not known, but special RNA-binding proteins may be involved^17. The ribosome or its 40S subunit probably binds at or near a Y_nX_m AUG motif (where Y is a pyrimidine and X is a purine) at the 3' border of the internal ribosomal entry site^17, which either provides the initiating codon^16,18 or enables the ribosome to translocate to one downstream (E.W. et al ., submitted). Initiation from most eukary-otic messenger RNAs usually occurs by ribosomal recognition of the 5' and subsequent scanning to the AUG codon^19. Here we describe a genetic strategy for the dissection of polyproteins which proves that an internal ribosomal entry site element can initiate translation independently of the 5' end.ESCHERICHIA coli is a frequent cause of several common bacterial infections in humans and animals, including urinary tract infections, bacteraemia and bacteria-related diarrhoea and is also the main cause of neonatal meningitis^1. Microbial attachment to surfaces is a key event in colonization and infection and results mainly from a stereochemical fit between microbial adhesins and complementary receptors on host cells. Bacterial adhesins required for extracellular colonization by Gram-negative bacteria are often minor components of heteropolymeric fibres called pili which must be oriented in an accessible manner in these structures to be able to bind to specific receptor architectures. P pili mediate the binding of uropathogenic E. coli to a digalactoside receptor determinant present in the urinary tract epithelium. We report here that the adhesin is a component of distinct fibrillar structures present at the tips of the pili. These virulence-associated tip fibrillae are thin, flexible polymers composed mostly of repeating subunits of PapE that frequently terminate with theα-D-galactopyranosyl-(l-4)-β-D-galactopyranose or Galα(l-4)Gal binding PapG adhesin.THE union of sperm and egg is a special membrane fusion event that gives a signal^1 to begin development. We have hypothesized^2 that proteins mediating cell–cell fusion events resemble viral fusion proteins^3,4and have shown that PH-30, a sperm surface protein involved in sperm–egg fusion^5, shares biochemical characteristics with viral fusion proteins 6 . We report here the complementary DNA and deduced amino-acid sequences of the mature αand β subunits of PH-30. Both are type-I integral membrane glyco-proteins. The α subunit contains a putative fusion peptide typical of viral fusion proteins and the β subunit contains a domain related to a family of soluble integrin ligands found in snake venoms. Thus, the PH-30α/ βcomplex resembles many viral fusion proteins in both its membrane topology and its predicted binding and fusion functions.THE B-cell antigen receptor of the IgM and IgD class is a multimeric complex consisting of the membrane-bound form of the immunoglobulin molecule and two other proteins, Ig- α and Ig- β ^1–8. The Ig-α and Ig-β proteins form a disulphide-linked α/β heterodimer and are encoded by the mb -l (refs 9, 10) and B29 genes^11,12, respectively^13,14. Surface expression of the membrane-bound IgM molecule requires assembly with the α/β heterodimer^1,3,4,8. The IgD molecule, however, can be expressed on the cell surface in an α/β -dependent and -independent form^8,15. We show here that in the α/β -independent form the IgD molecule is anchored in the plasma membrane through a glycosyl-phos-phatidylinositol linker. In the presence of the α/β heterodimer, most of the otherwise glycosyl-phosphatidylinositol-linked IgD molecule is expressed on the cell surface as transmembrane proteins.IN the hereditary blistering condition epidermolysis bullosa simplex, the skin blisters on trauma following rupture of epidermal basal cells. Clinical variations range from severely incapacitating, especially in early childhood, to mild forms that may not even present clinically. Dowling–Meara epidermolysis bullosa simplex is characterized by clusters of epidermal blisters and keratin clumping in the cytoplasm^1; recent reports describe potentially causal mutations in keratin 14 (refs 2, 3). Here we describe a "complementary' mutation at the other end of the other keratin expressed by these cells (K5, coexpressed with K14), a change from a Glu to a Gly in the helix termination peptide, detected by altered antibody binding and confirmed by sequencing using the polymerase chain reaction. The two conserved helix boundary peptides are predicted to be essential for filament assembly, and the requirement for two complementary (type I and type II) keratins is absolute. Epidermolysis bullosa simplex diseases demonstrate the function of the keratin cytoskeleton in resisting compaction stresses which otherwise lead to cell lysis.THE autosomal dominant trembler mutation^1 ( Tr ), maps to mouse chromosome 11 (ref. 2) and manifests as a Schwann-cell defect^3characterized by severe hypomyelination^4 and continuing Schwann-cell proliferation throughout life^5,6. Affected animals move clumsily and develop tremor and transient seizures at a young age. We have recently described a potentially growth-regulating myelin protein, peripheral myelin protein-22 (PMP-22; refs 7,8), which is expressed by Schwann cells and found in peripheral myelin. We now report the assignment of the gene for PMP-22 to mouse chromosome 11. Cloning and sequencing of PMP-22 complementary DNAs from inbred Tr mice reveals a point mutation that substitutes an aspartic acid residue for a glycine in a putative membrane-associated domain of the PMP-22 protein. Our results identify the PMP-22 gene as a likely candidate for the mouse trembler locus and will encourage the search for mutations in the corresponding human gene in pedigrees with hypertrophic neuropathies such as Charcot–Marie–Tooth^9 and Dejerine–Sottas^10 diseases (hereditary motor and sensory neuropathies I and III).RELIABLE data on persistent organic contaminants in the environment are needed to evaluate strategies to limit their dispersal. Long-term data are often not available, however, because the chemicals in question were not routinely analysed in the past. Although attempts have been made to assess temporal trends by analysis of environmental samples deposited in discrete or identifiable layers (in sediment or peat cores)^1–3, these media may be disturbed in situ or give poor temporal resolution, or the contaminants may be subject to post-depositional changes. Polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) and polyaromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs) are persistent and toxic^4–9 contaminants for which no long-term global ambient monitoring data exist. Plant foliage is a reliable monitor of ambient levels of vapour-phase compounds in air^10–16 and here we present an analysis of archived herbage samples (1965–89) which shows that air concentrations of lower chlorinated PCBs in rural England have decreased by up to a factor of 50 between 1965–69 and 1985–89. High-molecular-weight PCBs and PAHs have also decreased in concentration, but not to such a great extent.CHEMICAL indicators that change colour in response to the presence of neutral organic molecules are valuable for qualitative chemical analysis. Although some ionophores are known to exhibit colour changes on binding metal or ammonium cations^1–3, however, the detection of neutral organic species in solution by this means remains problematic. We have shown recently^4–7 that some fluorophore-modified cyclodextrins exhibit variations in fluorescence intensity on binding organic guests. Here we report guest-selective binding to a cyclodextrin that has been modified in such a way as to undergo a colour change on host-guest complexation. We attach the pH indicator methyl red to the wall of a β-cyclodextrin: in acidic solution, the modified cyclodextrin remains yellow owing to binding of the methyl red group inside the cavity, protecting it from protonation. When an organic guest displaces the methyl red group from the cavity, a colour change to red is observed. It should be possible to exploit the molecular recognition capability of cyclodextrins to develop a range of such 'molecular indicators'.THE human immunodeficiency virus-1 (HIV-1) protein Tat is a potent activator of virus gene expression^1,2. Tat functions through a sequence known as TAR, located immediately downstream of the transcription start site in the long terminal repeat^3–5. Several observations suggest that cellular factors cooperate with Tat in the overall transactivating process. We have isolated a human complementary DNA from the new gene MSS1 , which may encode such a cellular factor, by transcomplementation of a yeast sgvl mutant. The MSS1 protein shares 42% sequence identity with the human TBP-1 protein, which binds Tat in vitro and suppresses Tat-mediated transactivation in vivo (ref. 6). We report here that the levels of HIV activation by Tat correlate with endogenous levels of MSS1 messenger RNA. Furthermore, we provide evidence that expression of MSS1 enhances the Tat-mediated transactivation. Our results suggest that MSS1 has a key role in activation of HIV genes regulated by Tat.ONE of the main problems in understanding the origin of the Witwatersrand Basin mineralization concerns the source of the prodigious concentrations of gold and uranium in the basin; another problem is the age and nature of the rocks in the source area. Recent data^1,2 indicate that the source area was largely 3,200–2,900 Myr old, becoming progressively younger as the basin evolved. Granites adjoining the basin are commonly overprinted by pervasive and vein-related hydrothermal alteration, which resulted in an enrichment of both gold and uranium^3,4. Here we report uranium-lead data demonstrating that these hydrothermally altered granites were intruded sporadically, both before and during the 360-Myr period^5 constraining Witwatersrand sediment deposition, and that hydrothermal alteration was associated with granitoid intrusion and subsequent cooling. Thus, 'fertilization' of the crust occurred during basin evolution, a feature that supports the idea^19 that gold and uranium mineralization occurred simultaneously with sediment deposition.SURFACE electromagnetic measurements commonly reveal that the intermediate and lower continental crust has an appreciable electrical conductivity, much higher than that found for laboratory analogues of deep-crustal rocks or for upper-crustal rocks either formed at shallow depths or uplifted from deeper levels. Conducting films at grain boundaries are thought to play an important part in enhancing deep-crustal conductivity, with brines and graphite being the main candidates^1. At present, however, there is a lack of direct evidence for such films. Frost et al. ^2 have reported an enhancement in conductivity of igneous lower-crustal rocks from the La ramie complex apparently owing to the presence of graphite films, but the possible role of brines was not clear from this work. Here we present a study of the grain surface composition of metamorphic (and one igneous) rocks exhumed from 20 km depth by the Kapuskasing uplift of the Canadian shield^3. We expect these samples to be representative of metamorphic and igneous rocks of the deep Archaean crust. Auger spectroscopy provides evidence for graphite films at grain boundaries, which can account for the present electrical signature of the Kapuskasing crust^4–6. We also detect traces of chlorine, sulphur and iron, which suggest that brines and solid conductors other than graphite may have helped to enhance the conductivity, but their abundance suggests at best a minor role relative to graphite.WATER plays an important role in geodynamic processes in the Earth's upper mantle: for example, hydrogen (as water) affects the amount and composition of magma generated by partial melting^1 and a trace amount of hydrogen ( ∼0.001 wt% water) can markedly weaken the dominant upper-mantle mineral, olivine^2,3. Migration of hydrogen ions may be responsible for the anomalously high electrical conductivity of the asthenosphere^4. The quantitative importance of hydrogen in mantle processes must depend on how much water or hydrogen can be stored in nominally anhydrous olivine, and on where hydrogen resides in the olivine lattice. Here we report the results of hydrothermal experiments on olivine single crystals, which show that at 1,573 K and 50–300 MPa, olivine can accommodate as much as 0.0034 wt % water. Hydrogen solubility depends on hydrogen fugacity and oxygen fugacity to the first and the one-half powers, respectively, indicating that hydrogen ions are associated with either oxygen interstitials or magnesium vacancies. Extrapolation of our data to a depth of ∼ 100 km under oceanic areas yields a substantial hydrogen solubility (0.03 wt % water), demonstrating that olivine may indeed be a primary sink for hydrogen in the upper mantle.SETTLING particles are thought to be responsible for much of the transport of mass and energy from the upper ocean to the sea floor. Photosynthetic production by phytoplankton is a major source of these particles, either as phytoplankton biomass sinks directly^1or as it is transformed into rapidly sinking forms such as aggregates^2,3 and zooplankton faeces^4. Because a variety of processes may act on sinking matter, however, it is not known to what extent fluxes of organic matter to the deep sea are coupled to processes at the ocean surface. Some studies have provided evidence for direct coupling^2,5–7, but transformation processes and advection exist which have the potential to modify the transmission of surface signals to the deep sea^8–11. If these mechanisms overwhelm surface production signals, seasonal and annual variations in deep-sea geochemistry and biology would be controlled largely by lateral processes associated with ocean circulation rather than by surface processes. Here we report direct measurements of seasonal variations in upper-ocean primary production concurrent with particle fluxes measured at several depths ranging from the upper to the deep ocean in the Atlantic. We find that the productivity signal can be transferred rapidly to the deep sea by settling particles, yielding close temporal coupling between the surface and deep oceans.RADIOCARBON measurements of dissolved organic carbon (DOC) oxidizable by ultraviolet irradiation (DOC_uv) yielded apparent ages of ∼6,000 yr in the deep waters of the oligotrophic north-central Pacific gyre^1. Recent reports of a potentially larger pool of DOC as measured by high-temperature catalytic combustion (DOC_htc) using discrete injections of sea water^2,3 have led to speculation that 'younger', more recently produced DOC could contribute significantly to overall oceanic organic carbon fluxes, owing to its suspected greater biological lability^4–6. Here we present a comparison ofΔ^14C (the deviation in parts per thousand from the ^14C activity of nineteenth-century wood)^7 of the DOC_htc, DOC_uv and humic substances in profiles from the oligotrophic north-central Pacific and Sargasso Sea. For each ocean, the Δ^14C values of all three fractions are remarkably similar, yielding no evidence for a component of DOC that is cycled through the system on timescales shorter than several thousands of years. We observe an age difference between the two oceans of ∼ 2,000 yr for the deepest DOC, which can largely be accounted for by differences in the Δ^14C of the DOC sources to the deep basins, and by the different deep-water circulation patterns and transit times in the two oceans.MOLECULAR gas in the innermost regions of the Galactic Centre must be in a very different state from the interstellar medium in the solar neighbourhood. Diffuse CS emission is seen only at the Galactic Centre^1,2, the emissivity of CO is sixty times higher there than near the Sun^3, and linewidths of individual molecular features are typically five to ten times broader than elsewhere in the Galaxy. We propose that all these characteristics, for which there has so far been no coherent explanation, reflect the existence of high gas pressure—about 5 x 10^6 K cm^−3, or two and a half orders of magnitude higher than that in the solar neighbourhood—in the inner 500 parsecs of the Galaxy. This high pressure can be inferred from the presence of hot X-ray-emitting gas, which is also known to be present in the bulges of many other galaxies^4,5. The molecular gas in these bulges should thus resemble that in the centre of our own Galaxy.Galaxy formation by gravitational instability implies the presence of temperature fluctuations in the cosmic microwave background. New observations at 10.45 and 14.9 GHz from the Observatorio del Teide in Tenerife on angular scales of several degrees reveal structure of galactic origin at the lower frequency, while at the upper frequency the magnitude of fluctuations of cosmological origin must be less than 1.8 x 10^−5 on a scale of 5°. This strongly constrains models of galaxy formation, and is compatible with the recently announced discovery by the COBE satellite of fluctuations on larger angular scales.Initial stages in the Rhizobium –legume symbiosis can be thought of as a reciprocal molecular conversation: transmission of a gene inducer from legume host to bacterium, with ensuing bacterial synthesis of a morphogen that is transmitted to the plant, switching the developmental fate of the legume root. These signal molecules have a key role in determining bacterium–host specificity and the purified Nod factor compounds provide useful new tools to probe plant cell function.Sensory Receptors and Signal Transduction. Edited byJohn L. Spudich Birgit H. Satir. Wiley: 1992. Pp. 269. £79, $118.Fate of Pesticides and Chemicals In the Environment. Edited byJ. L. Schnoor Wiley: 1992. Pp. 436. £109, $164 Handbook of Pesticide Toxicology: Vol. 1, General Principles; Vol. 2, Classes of Pesticides; Vol. 3, Classes of Pesticides. Edited byWayland J. Hayes Jr. Edward R Laws Jr.. Academic: 1991. Pp. 1,576. £250, $425. The British Medical Association Guide to Pesticides, Chemicals and Health. Edward Arnold: 1992. Pp. 215. £16.95.Science under Control: The French Academy of Sciences 1795–1914. By Maurice Crosland. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 454. £60, $120.The Aspirin Wars: Money, Medicine and 100 Years of Rampant Competition By Charles C. Mann Mark L. Plummer Knopf: 1992. pp. 420. $25 Merck v. Glaxo: The Billion-Dollar Battle By Matthew Lynn.Heinemann/Mandarin: 1991/1992. Pp. 244. £17.99 (Hbk)/ £5.99 (pbk).The SSC is not dead (yet), but the US Congress may yet force a truly international effort in high-energy physics.Not before time, people are beginning to wrestle with the concept of biodiversity not simply from academic inclination, but so as to forge a practical yardstick for conservation.London Zoo is the only major national zoo run without the benefit of substantial support from public funds. No wonder it is having to close.THE acidic transcriptional activation motif functions in all eukary-otes^1–4, which suggests that it makes contact with some universal component of the transcriptional apparatus. Transcriptional activation by the yeast regulatory protein GAL4 requires an acidic region at its carboxyl terminus. Here we implement a selection scheme to determine whether GAL4 can still function when this C-terminal domain has been deleted. It can, when accompanied by a mutation in the SUG1 gene which is an essential gene in yeast. Analysis of mutant SUG1 in combination with various alleles of GAL4 indicates that SUG1 acts through a transcriptional pathway that depends on GAL4, but requires a region of GAL4 other than the C-terminal acidic activation domain. The predicted amino-acid sequence of SUG1 closely resembles that of two human proteins, TBP1 and MSS1, which modulate expression mediated by the human immunodeficiency virus tat gene.THE immunosuppressive drugs cyclosporin A (CsA) and FKS06 both interfere with a Ca^2+-sensitive T-cell signal transduction pathway^1–4thereby preventing the activation of specific transcription factors (such as NF-AT and NF-IL2A)^1,5–7involved in lymphokine gene expression. CsA and FK506 seem to act by interaction with their cognate intracellular receptors^8–10, cyclophilin and FKBP, respectively (see ref. 11 for review). The Ca^2+/calmodulin-regulated phosphatase calcineurin is a major target of drug-isomerase complexes in vitro ^12We have therefore tested the hypothesis that this interaction is responsible for the in vivo effects of CsA/FK506. We report here that overexpression of calcineurin in Jurkat cells renders them more resistant to the effects of CsA and FK506 and augments both NFAT- and NFIL2A-dependent transcription. These results identify calcineurin as a key enzyme in the T-cell signal transduction cascade and provide biological evidence to support the notion that the interaction of drug-isomerase complexes with calcineurin underlies the molecular basis of CsA/FK506-mediated immunosuppression.ANTIGEN recognition by the T-cell receptor (TCR) initiates events including lymphokine gene transcription^1, particularly interleukin-2, that lead to T-cell activation. The immunosuppressive drugs, cyclosporin A (CsA) and FK-506, prevent T-cell proliferation by inhibiting a Ca^2+-dependent event required for induction of interleukin-2 transcription^2. Complexes of FK-506 or CsA and their respective intracellular binding proteins inhibit the calmodulin-dependent protein phosphatase, calcineurin, in vitro ^3. The pharmacological relevance of this observation to immunosuppression or drug toxicity is undetermined. Calcineurin, although present in lymphocytes^4, has not been implicated in TCR-mediated activation of lymphokine genes or in transcriptional regulation in general. Here we report that transfection of a calcineurin catalytic subunit increases the 50% inhibitory concentration (IC_50) of the immunosuppressants FK-506 and CsA, and that a mutant subunit acts in synergy with phorbol ester alone to activate the interleukin-2 promoter in a drug-sensitive manner. These results implicate calcineurin as a component of the TCR signal transduction pathway by demonstrating its role in the drug-sensitive activation of the interleukin-2 promoter.There Is no substitute for openness in the handling of allegations of scientific misconduct.London will lose its city-centre zoo in September if last week's flaccid announcement from the London Zoological Society is to be believed. This is a sad ending to a mostly honourable tale.Canute, the eleventh-century king of England, is best known for his demonstration that even he could not hold back the tides. Can the US Congress learn this lesson?After years of research, the scientific committee of the International Whaling Commission is about to put forward a sound method for setting catch limits for whaling. But will other considerations undermine the science?Nature 355, 339-342 (1992) IN preparing this paper, a typographical error in equation (4) has escaped our attention. The correct formulation is d f T 2(<) = --KCH4(0 fco,Rc dt J , t' ~ t) dt' (4)The impending Washington summit has a daunting list of nuclear issues that must be tackled.Rumours that the UN conference that finished last Sunday in Rio was a failure are false. The urgent matters were dealt with adequately, while the global character of other problems has been more widely acknowledged.LOW concentrations of inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate (InsP_3) evoke a very rapid mobilization of intracellular Ca^2+ stores in many cell types, which can be followed by a further, much slower efflux^1–8. Two explanations have been suggested for this biphasic release. The first proposes that the Ca^2+ stores vary in their sensitivity to InsP_3, and each store releases either its entire contents or nothing^2,5,7 (all-or-none release); the second proposes instead that the stores are uniformly sensitive to the effects of InsP_3, but that they can release only a fraction of their Ca^2+ before their sensitivity is somehow attenuated^6,8–11(steady-state release). Experiments using purified InsP_3 receptor molecules reconstituted into lipid vesicles have shown heterogeneity of the receptors in their response to InsP_3 under conditions in which the total Ca^2+ level at both sides of the receptor is held constant^7. We now report that in permeabilized A7r5 smooth-muscle cells incubated in Ca^2+-free medium, the amount of ^45Ca^2+ remaining in the stores after the rapid transient phase of release is independent of their initial Ca^2+ levels, indicating that partially depleted stores are less sensitive to InsP_3. Moreover, if the stores are reloaded with ^40Ca^2+ after the first stimulus, reapplication of the same low concentration of InsP_3 will release further ^45Ca^2+. This recovery of InsP_3 sensitivity is almost complete. Under these conditions, Ca^2+ release must thus occur by a steady-state mechanism, in which the decreasing Ca^2+ content of the stores slows down further release.DURING biosynthesis, class II molecules of the major histo-compatibility complex are associated with a nonpolymorphic protein called invariant chain, li, which facilitates folding of class II molecules and their exit from the endoplasmic reticulum^1–4, interferes with their association with peptide^5,6 and directs their post-Golgi transport (refs 7–9). If li blocks class II loading with endogenous antigens in the endoplasmic reticulum and/or directs class II molecules to the exogenous antigen-loading compartment, then the co-expression of li should enhance the ability of class II molecules to present exogenous antigens to T cells. But data supporting a role for li in class II-restricted antigen presentation are controversial^1,10–13. Here we show that Ii can facilitate exogenous antigen presentation for a subset of antigens. Although all known functions of Ii have been ascribed to the principal form of Ii, p31, we find that in most cases antigen presentation is facilitated only by the alternatively spliced, minor form of Ii, p41.ISOLATED polypeptide chains of the T-cell antigen receptor complex are degraded or retained in the endoplasmic reticulum (ER)^1–4. Assembly of the multisubunit complex allows the individual chains to escape retention in the ER and to be expressed on the cell surface. We engineered a series of deletions in the CD3ɛ subunit of the human T-cell receptor in order to find the sequences responsible for its retention in the ER. Deletion of amino acids 171 to 180 in the cytosolic tail resulted in the cell-surface expression of the isolated chain. This sequence also promotes retention when it is appended to CD4, a plasma membrane protein. Mutagenesis of the 10-amino-acid CD3ɛ sequence established that the tyrosine and serine residues are important for ER retention. This and other ER retention signals must be hidden when a complete T-cell receptor complex is assembled in order to allow its expression on the cell surface.Nature 356, 710-713 (1992) THIS Letter in the 23 April issue contains errors in the figure legends, involving the definition of parts b, c and d. Figure 1 legend should begin "Chilling-induced damage to the photosyn-thetic activity of leaves of transgenic plants, a, Transformant with pBI-121 (control; Clontech).DESPITE its importance, the molecular basis of mammalian gamete recognition has remained unclear. The enzyme β -1,4-galactosyltransferase (Gal-transferase) has been viewed traditionally as a biosynthetic component of the Golgi complex, but is also found on the surface of many cells where it can bind its specific glycoside substrate on adjacent cell surfaces or in the extracellular matrix^1–3. In mouse it has been suggested that Gal-transferase on the sperm head mediates fertilization by binding oligosaccharide residues in the egg coat, or zona pellucida^4–9, and that the ability of the zona pellucida to bind sperm is conferred by oligosaccharides of the ZP3 glycoprotein^10,13. However, it has not been confirmed that Gal-transferase and ZP3 are in fact complementary gamete receptors whose interaction mediates sperm–egg binding. Here we show that mouse sperm Gal-transferase specifically recognizes those oligosaccharides on ZP3 that have sperm-binding activity, but does not interact with other zona pellucida glycoproteins. In contrast, all zona pellucida glyco-proteins are recognized by non-sperm Gal-transferase, demonstrating a more stringent substrate specificity for the sperm enzyme. This interaction is required for sperm–egg binding because blocking or removing the binding site for Gal-transferase on ZP3 inhibits its ability to bind sperm. After the release of the sperm acrosome, the transferase relocalizes to a new membrane domain where it can no longer bind to ZP3, which is consistent with the inability of acrosome-reacted sperm to bind ZP3 or to initiate binding to the zona pellucida. Following fertilization, ZP3 is modified by egg cortical granule secretions so that it loses sperm receptor activity, which can be accounted for by a selective loss of its binding site for sperm Gal-transferase. These results show that sperm surface β -1,4-galactosyltransferase and the egg-coat glycoprotein ZP3 are complementary adhesion molecules that mediate primary gamete binding in the mouse.High-Temperature Superconductivity: An Introduction. By Gerald Burns. Academic: 1992. Pp. 199. $19.95, £13.SALMONELLA infection continues to be a major world-wide health problem^1. One essential pathogenic feature common to all Salmonella is their ability to penetrate the cells of the intestinal epithelium which are normally non-phagocytic^2. The internalization of Salmonella into mammalian cells is thought to be a receptor-mediated phenomenon and the invasion of cultured epithelial cells depends on several Salmonella genes, but nothing is known about the host determinants participating in this interaction^3–6. Protein tyrosine phosphorylation follows stimulation of many cell-surface receptors to initiate signal transduction path-ways that stimulate cellular responses^7. We report here that invasion of cultured Henle-407 cells by Salmonella typhimurium induces the tyrosine phosphorylation of the epidermal growth factor (EGF) receptor. In contrast, an isogenic strain of S. typhimurium that is defective in invasion owing to a mutation in the invA gene is unable to induce such phosphorylation. Addition of EGF to cultured Henle-407 cells allowed the internalization of the invasion-defective S. typhimurium invA mutant although it did not cause the internalization of an adherent, but non-invasive, strain of Escherichia coli . This result indicates that stimulation of the EGF receptor is involved in the invasion of cultured Henle-407 cells by S. typhimurium .MANY animals restrict their foraging activities to certain times of the day or night, but the Saharan silver ant Cataglyphis bombycina is exceptional in that all foragers leave their underground nest in an explosive outburst confined to a few minutes per day during the hottest midday period. The foraging activity of this 'thermophilic' ant is compressed into a small thermal window by predatory pressure on the one hand and heat stress on the other.LARGE-AMPLITUDE variations in topography and inferred crustal thickness along the axes of mid-ocean ridges, often referred to as segmentation^1, are mainly observed at slow-spreading ridges^2–4. This observation has led to the suggestion that mantle processes give rise to segmentation only when spreading rates are low^5,6. Here we make the alternative proposal that the development of segmentation is controlled by the temperature of the crust: segmentation cannot develop when the lower crust is hot enough to undergo rapid ductile flow. Thermal models predict that thick crust at a slow-spreading ridge may be as hot as normal-thickness crust along fast-spreading ridges; we accordingly test our hypothesis at a slow-spreading ridge characterized by thick crust—the Reykjanes Ridge. Topography and gravity data along the Reykjanes Ridge axis indeed show an absence of segmentation, suggesting that the thermal state of the crust, rather than any mantle process, controls the development of this structure.CORRELATIONS between excess ^3He concentration and temperature in the ocean above hydrothermal vents have been used^1,2 to relate the fluxes of heat and noble gases from the upper mantle. Because heat and ^4He are both produced by the decay of uranium and thorium, the observed helium/heat ratios carry information on thermal and mass transport processes within the mantle and at spreading centres. Sulphide and other deposits precipitated on the sea floor trap the hydrothermal solutions as fluid inclusions: we demonstrate here that helium and argon isotopes released by in vacuo crushing of sulphides from 21° N on the East Pacific Rise are similar to those in contemporary vent fluids. This observation suggests that it should be possible to extend the study of vent fluid ^3He/^4He and helium/heat ratios back in time by measuring samples collected from ancient sea-floor deposits.Featured this week—tritium-labelled taxol, probes, conjugated monoclonal antibodies, and a system for the direct detection of beta-particles.Proteins separated on sodium dodecyl sulphate-polyacrylamide gels can be detected in subpicogram quantities by radioactivation of silver-treated protein molecules.Nature 354, 460-461 (1991) IN this Letter the K correction was applied with the wrong sign. This in no way affects the conclusions or discussion, but the values of the variable MK which appear in the table and figure must be corrected accordingly. We are grateful to W. Sutherland and R. Kron for pointing out this mistake.MOST northern Europeans have only the normal M form of the plasma protease inhibitor α _1,-antitrypsin, but some 4% are heterozygotes for the Z deficiency variant^1. For reasons that have not been well-understood, the Z mutation results in a blockage in the final stage of processing of antitrypsin in the liver^2such that in the Z homozygote only 15% of the protein is secreted into the plasma. The 85% of the α _1, -antitrypsin that is not secreted accumulates in the endoplasmic reticulum of the hepatocyte; much of it is degraded but the remainder aggregates to form insoluble intracellular inclusions. These inclusions are associated with hepatocellular damage, and 10% of newborn Z homozygotes develop liver disease which often leads to a fatal childhood cirrhosis. Here we demonstrate the molecular pathology underlying this accumulation and describe how the Z mutation in antitrypsin results in a unique molecular interaction between the reactive centre loop of one molecule and the gap in the A-sheet of another. This loop–sheet polymerization of Z antitrypsin occurs spontaneously at 37 °C and is completely blocked by the insertion of a specific peptide into the A-sheet of the antitrypsin molecule. Z antitrypsin polymerized in vitro has identical properties and ultra-structure to the inclusions isolated from hepatocytes of a Z homozygote. The concentration and temperature dependence of this loop–sheet polymerization has implications for the management of the liver disease of the newborn Z homozygote.DESPITE the strong interest in melting over the past 100 years, a general theory for the crystal–liquid transition has not been established^1. Lattice-instability models, which are either vibrational^2, elastic^3, isochoric^4, defective^5 or entropic^6 in nature, all predict a melting point somewhat above the experimentally observed thermodynamic melting temperature, with the ultimate stability limit of a superheated crystal being determined by the equality of crystal and liquid entropies^4,6; this forces regular melting to be a first-order transition. Here I present a model of melting that is driven by the incorporation into the lattice of randomly frozenin defects. An isentropic condition limits the stability of the crystal as a function of defect concentration; above the glass transition temperature the crystal melts to a liquid, whereas below it 'melting' produces an amorphous solid. This model yields a generic melting diagram with a tunable parameter (defect concentration) that can characterize the static disorder present in solid-state amorphization^7–9, the thermodynamic stability of small clusters^10 and nanocrystalline materials^11, and the frustration present in spin glasses^12. The model is also relevant to glacial^13, geological^14 and stellar-atmospheric^15 melting processes.RECENT measurements by the Burst and Transient Source Experiment (BATSE) on the Compton Gamma Ray Observatory Satellite suggest that the distribution of γ-ray burst sources is isotropic about the Earth's position but also radially non-uniform^1. Studies of their spectral and temporal properties^2, however, suggest that many bursts originate on or near neutron stars, presumed to be part of the local galactic population. We show here that no single class of bursts, either galactic or cosmological in origin, can explain all of these observations, but argue instead that the constraints can be reconciled if there are at least two distinct classes of bursts. As a specific example we consider two kinds of burst which both originate on galactic neutron stars, but which differ in intrinsic luminosity by a factor of 10^5.The sequence d(GGGGTTTTGGGG) from the 3' overhang of the Oxytricha telomere has been crystallized and its three-dimensional structure solved to 2.5 Å resolution. The oligonucleotide forms hairpins, two of which join to make a four-stranded helical structure with the loops containing four thymine residues at either end. The guanine residues are held together by cyclic hydrogen bonding and an ion is located in the centre. The four guanine residues in each segment have a glycosyl conformation that alternates between anti and syn . There are two four-stranded molecules in the asymmetric unit showing that the structure has some intrinsic flexibility.Recent palaeontological discoveries and the correspondence between molecular and morphological results provide fresh insight on the deep structure of mammalian phylogeny. This new wave of research, however, has yet to resolve some important issues.Defeating Pain: The War Against a Silent Epidemic. By P. D. Wall M. Jones. Plenum: 1991. Pp. 300. $24.95. The Culture of Pain. By David B. Morris. University of California Press: 1991. Pp. 375. $29.95The North American Free Trade Agreement deserves better than the back-burner until the US election.Britain's forthcoming election will not solve the problems that matter most, notably the incorrigible waywardness of British governments between their occasional encounters with their electorate.Metchnikoff and the Origins of Immunology: From Metaphor to Theory. By Alfred I. Tauber Leon Chernyak. Oxford University Press: 1991. Pp. 236. £35, $45.Le Dernier Langage de la Médecine: Histoire de rimmunologie de Pasteur au Sida. By Anne Marie Moulin. Presses Universitaires de France: 1991. Pp. 447. FF220.Perceptual and Associative Learning. By Geoffrey Hall. Oxford University Press: 1991. Pp. 300. £30, $45.The Cybernetics Group. By Steve J. Heims. MIT Press: 1991. Pp 334 £22.50 $33.75.Scientists have for too long been faced with a polarized debate concerning the ethics of animal experiments. An ethical ideal and a practical scoring system would be valuable for the moderate majorityNew products for molecular biologists include software for microsatellite analysis, a kit for the direct labelling of Fab', IgG or other proteins and molecules, and chromosome paints for the identification of individual human chromosomes.ELUCIDATION of the genetic and molecular basis of plant disease resistance is a major objective in the investigation of plant-micro-bial interactions. Xanthomonas campestris pathovar vesicatoria ( Xcv ), the causal agent of bacterial spot disease of pepper and tomato, has been developed as a model host–pathogen system to study the genetic interactions that specify the expression of plant disease resistance^1–6. Several plant resistance genes ( Bsl, Bs2, Bs3 ) have been genetically characterized from pepper ( Capsicum annuum ) that determine resistance to particular races of the pathogen carrying specific avirulence genes^7–9. For example, pepper plants carrying the resistance locus Bs3 are resistant to Xcv strains expressing the avirulence gene avrBs3 . Nucleotide sequence analysis of the avrBs3 gene revealed that the internal portion of the predicted protein product consists of a nearly identical 34 amino acid repeat unit, present in 17.5 copies^4. We report here that the repetitive region of the avrBs3 gene determines race-specificity and that deletions of repeat units generate new avirulence specificities and unmask undiscovered resistance genes in pepper and tomato.IN heterochronic mutants the relative timing of developmental events is altered compared with the wild type. This generally results in a disordered embryo^1,2, though heterochronic mutations may also be an important source of evolutionary variation^3. In the rapidly developing ( rde ) mutants of Dictyostelium , stalk and spore cells differentiate before morphogenesis is complete. We have traced the lesion in one class of these mutants to the regulatory subunit of cyclic AMP-dependent protein kinase (pk-A). Inactivation of this protein results in the unrestrained activity of the catalytic subunit, so prematurely triggering terminal cell differentiation.DNA SEQUENCES have been analysed using models, such as an it-step Markov chain, that incorporate the possibility of short-range nucleotide correlations^1. We propose here a method for studying the stochastic properties of nucleotide sequences by constructing a 1:1 map of the nucleotide sequence onto a walk, which we term a 'DNA walk'. We then use the mapping to provide a quantitative measure of the correlation between nucleotides over long distances along the DNA chain. Thus we uncover in the nucleotide sequence a remarkably long-range power law correlation that implies a new scale-invariant property of DNA. We find such long-range correlations in intron-containing genes and in nontranscribed regulatory DNA sequences, but not in complementary DNA sequences or intron-less genes.THE telomeres of most eukaryotes contain a repeating G-rich sequence with the consensus d(T/A)^1–4G^1–8, of which 12–16 bases form a 3' single-strand overhang beyond the telomeric duplex^1. It has been proposed that these G-rich oligonucleotides associate to form four-stranded structures from one^2–4, two^2,5 or four^6,7 individual strands and that these structures may be relevant in vivo . The proposed structures contain Hoogsteen base-paired G-quartets, precedent for which has been in the literature for many years^8. Here we use ^1H NMR spectroscopy to study the conformations of the DNA oligonucleotides d(G_4T_4G_4) (Oxy-1.5) and d(G_4T_4G_4T_4G_4T_4G_4) (Oxy-3.5) which contain the Oxytricha telomere repeat (T_4G_4). We find that these molecules fold to form a symmetrical bimolecular and an intramolecular quadruplex, respectively. Both structures have four G-quartets formed from nucleotides that are alternately syn and anti along each strand. This arrangement differs from earlier models in which the strands are alternately all syn or all anti ^2,3,5. The T_4 loops in Oxy-1.5 are on opposite ends of the quadruplex and loop diagonally across the G-quartet, resulting in adjacent strands being alternately parallel and antiparallel.NON-INSULIN-DEPENDENT diabetes mellitus (NIDDM) is a major health problem, affecting 5% of the world population. Genetic factors are important in NIDDM, but the mechanisms leading to glucose intolerance are unknown^1,2. Genetic linkage has been investigated in multigeneration families to localize, and ultimately identify, the gene(s) predisposing to NIDDM. Here we report linkage between the glucokinase locus on chromosome 7p and diabetes in 16 French families with maturity-onset diabetes of the young, a form of NIDDM characterized by monogenic autosomal dominant transmission and early age of onset^3. Statistical evidence of genetic heterogeneity was significant, with an estimated 45-95% of the 16 families showing linkage to glucokinase. Because glucokinase is a key enzyme of blood glucose homeostasis4, these results are evidence that a gene involved in glucose metabolism could be implicated in the pathogenesis of NIDDM.AGONIST-BOUND receptors activate heterotrimeric (αβγ) G proteins by catalysing replacement by GTP of GDP bound to the a subunit, resulting in dissociation of α-GTP from the βγ subunits. In most cases, α-GTP carries the signal to effectors, as in hormonal stimulation^1–4 and inhibition^5,6of adenylyl cyclase by α_s and α_i, respectively. By contrast, genetic evidence in yeast^7 and studies in mammalian cells^8–10 suggest that βγ subunits of G proteins may also regulate effector pathways. Indeed, of the four recombinant mammalian adenylyl cyclases available for study^11–14, two, adenylyl cyclases II and IV, are stimulated by βγ. This effect of βγ requires costimulation by α_s-GTP^14,15. This conditional pattern of effector responsiveness led to the prediction^15 that receptors coupled to many G proteins will mediate elevation of cellular cyclic AMP, provided that G_s is also active. We now confirm this prediction. Coexpression of mutationally active α_s with adenylyl cyclase II converted agonists that act through 'inhibitory' receptors (coupled to G_i) into stimulators of cAMP synthesis. Experiments using pertussis toxin and a putative scavenger ofβγ , the α subunit of transducin, suggest that βγ subunits of the G_i proteins mediated this stimulation. These findings assign a new signalling function to βγ subunits of G_i proteins, the conditional stimulation of cAMP synthesis by adenylyl cyclase II.INVOLVEMENT of the Hox genes in regional specifications of the vertebrate body axis is suggested by sequence similarity with the homeotic selector genes of Drosophila , the conservation of a collinear relationship between genomic organization and site of expression, and mutational analysis^1–5. Subdivision of vertebrate embryo hindbrain neuroepithelium into lineage compartments6 (rhombomeres^7,8) underlies segmental patterning of neuronal differentiation^9. The rhombomere boundaries delimit domains of expression of Hox genes^10–12, presumed to be determinants of rhombomere phenotype, suggesting that Hox genes confer positional value^13; the formation of rhombomere 4 (r4) is followed by strong expression of Hox-2.9 within its confines^14. If the Hox genes are determinants, their expression should be autonomous from the developmental stage at which regional commitment becomes fixed and irreversible. We have transplanted the future r4 region (from state-9 – chick embryos) into the more anterior position of r2 and probed for Hox-2.9 transcripts. We report here that Hox-2.9 was expressed in the ectopic r4 as strongly as in the normal r4, whereas reciprocal grafts of future r2 to r4 position did not express Hox-2.9 . The phenotype of ectopic rhombomeres developed according to their original position, as demonstrated by retrograde tracing of efferent cranial nerve nuclei. As early as stage-9 – (six somites), both Hox-2.9 expression and segment identity are autonomous in the chick embryo hindbrain, independent both of position in the neuroepithelium and of signals from the underlying mesoderm^15.BURNET'S clonal selection theory^1 suggests that each B lymphocyte is committed to a single antibody specificity. This is achieved by a programme of somatic rearrangements of the gene segments encoding antibody variable (V) regions, in the course of B-cell development^2,3. Evidence from immunoglobulin-transgenic mice and immunoglobulin-gene-transfected transformed pre-B cells suggests that the membrane form of the immunoglobulin heavy (H) chain of class µ ( µ m), expressed from a rearranged H-chain (IgH) locus, may signal allelic exclusion of the homologous IgH locus in the cell^4–6 and initiation of light (L)-chain gene rearrangement in the Ig/c loci6. We report here that targeted disruption of the membrane exon of the µ chain indeed results in the loss of H-chain allelic exclusion. But, some K chain gene rearrangement is still observed in the absence of µ m expression.To produce an immune reaction against a foreign protein usually requires purification of that protein, which is then injected into an animal. The isolation of enough pure protein is time-consuming and sometimes difficult. Here we report that such a response can also be elicited by introducing the gene encoding a protein directly into the skin of mice. This is achieved using a hand-held form of the biolistic system^1–4 which can propel DNA-coated gold micro-projectiles directly into cells in the living animal^3,5,6. Genetic immunization may be time- and labour-saving in producing antibodies and may offer a unique method for vaccination.THE adult brain has a remarkable ability to adjust to changes in sensory input. Removal of afferent input to the somatosensory, auditory, motor or visual cortex results in a marked change of cortical topography^1–10. Changes in sensory activity can, over a period of months, alter receptive field size and cortical topography^11. Here we remove visual input by focal binocular retinal lesions and record from the same cortical sites before and within minutes after making the lesion and find immediate striking increases in receptive field size for cortical cells with receptive fields near the edge of the retinal scotoma. After a few months even the cortical areas that were initially silenced by the lesion recover visual activity, representing retinotopic loci surrounding the lesion. At the level of the lateral geniculate nucleus, which provides the visual input to the striate cortex, a large silent region remains. Furthermore, anatomical studies show that the spread of geniculocortical afferents is insufficient to account for the cortical recovery. The results indicate that the topographic reorganization within the cortex was largely due to synaptic changes intrinsic to the cortex, perhaps through the plexus of long-range horizontal connections.What will epidemiologists make of the scare that the world's hard discs would be wiped clean last Friday?Natural Hazards. By E. A. Bryant. Cambridge University Press: 1991. Pp. 294. £40, $79.50 (hbk); £14.95, $29.95 (pbk).MARINE bacteria often dominate the plankton biomass^1,2 and are responsible for much of the cycling of organic matter^3, but bacterial diversity is poorly understood because conventional identification methods (requiring culturing) miss about 99% of the organisms^4,5. Recent advances permit characterization of microbial communities by analysis of 16S ribosomal RNA gene sequences directly from biomass without the need to culture the organisms^6; such studies from surface ocean samples have found only eubacteria^7–10, not archaebacteria (or Archae^11), which are profoundly different^12. Here we report 16S rRNA sequences obtained from Pacific Ocean bacterioplankton samples collected from depths of 100 m and 500 m. Among these we found sequences only distantly related to those of any organisms previously characterized by 16S rRNA sequences, with similarities to the nearest such relatives (extreme thermophiles) approximately the same as those between animals and plants. We suggest that these sequences are from a previously undescribed archaebacterial group that may have diverged from the ancestors of characterized organisms very early in evolution.WE report here the discovery of a Miocene hominoid from Berg Aukas, Namibia, the first known from the African continent south of equatorial East Africa. This represents a major range extension of Miocene Hominoidea in Africa to latitude 20° S. The holotype, a right mandibular corpus preserving the crowns of the P_4–M_3, partial crown and root of the P_3, partial root of the canine, alveoli for all four incisors, and partial alveolus for the left canine, was found during paleontological explorations of karst-fill breccias in the Otavi region of northern Namibia. The mandible has unique characteristics that differentiate it from other middle Miocene hominoids of Africa and Eurasia and represents the only fossil evidence documenting a pre-australopithecine stage of hominoid evolution in southern Africa. Faunal analyses indicate that the breccia block containing the specimen accumulated during the latter part of the middle Miocene, about 13 ± 1 Myr. Fauna from other breccia blocks at Berg Aukas are of diverse ages, including the earlier part of the middle Miocene, the upper Miocene, Plio-Pleistocene and Holocene.BOREHOLE tensor strain instruments deployed along the San Andreas fault for the past ten years have provided sufficient resolution and stability to sample regional tectonic processes, potentially enhancing earthquake prediction capability. Data obtained from the instrument at San Juan Bautista, in the near-field region of the 17 October 1989 Loma Prieta earthquake (M_s = 7.1) provide the first opportunity to observe shear strain processes associated with a large earthquake. We previously reported1 a prominent shear-strain anomaly in those data for more than a year before the earthquake. This anomaly ceased immediately after the earthquake, but, as we report here, a new and higher rate of fault-parallel shear accumulation (2 microstrain per year) was established about four months later and has continued to the present. Associated changes in creep rate are apparent at a number of sites on the surface trace of the fault within 30 km of the strain meter. We propose that the observed strain accumulation results from increased slip around a nearby locked section of the fault, this slip arising from loading by the failed Loma Prieta source region to the north. This model is consistent with suggestions of an increased probability of a moderate earthquake near San Juan Bautista^9–10, and with evidence^12 that interactions between fault regions are important in earthquake processes.THE presence of synthetic and naturally occurring chelating agents in nuclear and toxic-metal wastes is a major concern because of their potential to enhance mobilization of metal ions away from the disposal sites^1–3. Of particular interest is citric acid, which is present in low-level and transuranic radioactive wastes^4,5 and in domestic and industrial wastes (as washing fluids, for instance), as well as being found naturally. Citrate ions form multidentate, stable complexes with a variety of toxic metals and radionuclides; but biodegradation of these complexes, precipitating the metal ions as insoluble hydroxides, oxides or other salts, may retard migration. Here we report a study of the biodegradation of citrate complexes of Ca, Fe(n), Fe(m), Cd, Cu, Ni, Pb and U. Several of these complexes were not readily degraded by bacteria, and the biodegradability depended on the chemical nature of the complex, not on the toxicity of the metal to the bacteria. This resistance to biodegradation implies that citrate complexation may play an important part in migration of these hazardous wastes.THE formation of spatiotemporal patterns by coupling between diffusion processes and local, nonlinear reaction kinetics has been observed in diverse systems. In one of the most familiar, the autocatalytic oxidative bromination of malonic acid (the Belousov–Zhabotinsky (BZ) reaction^1), dynamical structures such as expanding target patterns and rotating spirals are observed. Most previous work on this system has been concerned with the autonomous dynamics of the travelling chemical waves, but more recently there has been increasing interest in the possibility of influencing the behaviour externally^2,3. Several studies have considered the effect of electric fields on spatial patterns in the BZ system^4–8. We have investigated previously^6 the influence of a homogeneous electric field on spiral waves. The spiral cores are of particular interest because they represent 'silent' centres in regions of pronounced dynamical activity^9. Here we show that interactions between spiral cores can be induced and controlled by moving spirals towards each other using an applied field. Under carefully controlled conditions we have been able to induce mutual annihilation and transient coupling of spiral cores. Calculations using a simple model are able to reproduce the qualitative features of the experimental results.THE existence of subsurface water ice on Mars has been predicted in several theoretical studies^1–5, but there are no definitive observations of its present distribution. Geomorphic features on the surface of Mars have been widely interpreted as evidence for the presence of ground ice^6–12, but many of these features are found at near-equatorial latitudes, where thermal models have predicted that near-surface water ice should not be stable under present climate conditions^3,13,14. Here I present the results of thermal calculations which show that observed geographic variations in the thermal and reflectance properties of martian soils significantly affect subsurface temperatures. My results indicate that in certain regions, ground-ice deposits could exist much closer to the surface, and much closer to the equator, than previously thought. In the future, these deposits could be a valuable resource for human exploration^15.EVERY rotating cosmic fluid that can be observed sufficiently closely displays either vortices or magnetic flux tubes on its surface; examples are tornadoes in the Earth's atmosphere1, the Great Red Spot and other vortices in Jupiter's atmosphere, and sunspots. We suggest here that hot accretion disks also produce coherent objects, and that these vortices and magnetic flux tubes will cause significant dissipation and other observable physical effects. They will facilitate the escape of collimated radiation from deep within hot disks, producing spectral changes and time variability in the radiation from the disk. In the case of active galactic nuclei, modification of X-ray spectra due to the presence of vortices on accretion disks permits us to explain several observational puzzles, including short-term variability and the low degree of linear polarization.Products pose no special risks just because of the processes used to make themThe long-term goal of this project is the elucidation of the complete sequence of the Caenorhabditis elegans genome. During the first year methods have been developed and a strategy implemented that is amenable to large-scale sequencing. The three cosmids sequenced in this initial phase are surprisingly rich in genes, many of which have mammalian homologues.Rigid, hollow organic host compounds have been designed and synthesized with interior cavities large enough to incarcerate organic guest compounds. Some of these hosts are closed-surface spheres whose guest molecules are permanently incarcerated during synthesis. Other hosts contain portals in their shells, shaped to allow the passage only of complementary guest molecules between the inner and bulk phases. The inner phases uniquely constrain guest movements, provide a medium for reactions, and shelter molecules that self-destruct in bulk phases.Thermodynamics: Foundations and Applications. By Elias P. Gyftopoulos and Gian Paolo Beretta. Macmillan, Inc., New York: 1991. Pp. 658. $66.The Ambiguous Frog: The Galvani–Volta Controversy on Animal Electricity. By Marcello Pera, J. Mandelbaum. Princeton University Press: 1991. Pp. 203. $29.95, £18.Stephen Hawking: A Life in Science. By Michael White and John Gribbin. Viking: 1992. Pp. 304. £16.99. To be published in June in the United States by New American Library at $23.After more than a century, what can there be to say about the Periodic Table that is new? Merely to ask a question of such disarming simplicity, of course, signals that somebody, indeed, has something new to say.Recent estimates of a global sea-level fall as a result of greenhouse warming have been uncritically accepted. A closer examination of the available data could lead to the opposite conclusion.The London Zoological Society should either run its zoo with enthusiasm or hand over to others who would.The failure of the US Congress to override the administration's veto of a bill to allow research with fetal tissue is a bad business, both for research and the civility of the coming election campaign.Climate change caused by increasing atmospheric concentrations of greenhouse gases may have important effects on water circulation and availability and thus on agriculture, forestry and river flow, with significant economic consequences. A variety of models are being used to evaluate hydrological effects, but their hydrological responses to global warming are often inconsistent. Improved understanding of basic hydrological processes is needed if we are to assess the impact of future climate change.The Fullness of Space: Nebulae, Stardust, and the Interstellar Medium. By Gareth Wynn-Williams. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 202. £35, $65 (hbk); £15.95, $29.95 (pbk). Dust in the Galactic Environment. By D. C. B. Whittet. IOP/Hilger: 1992. Pp. 295. $95, £47.50 (hbk); $39, £22.50 (pbk).Hydrogenated Amorphous Silicon. By R. A. Street. Cambridge University Press: 1991. Pp. 417. £65, $110.The Fragile Species. By Lewis Thomas. Scribners: 1992. Pp. 192. $20.The idea that nucleotide bases in strands of DNA may be correlated over several thousands of base-positions has been established, but has not yet been explained.The science museum in Florence has two telescopes and a single lens attributed to Galileo. Tests conducted with modern interferometric equipment show that Galileo was able to obtain nearly perfect optical quality.DESPITE extensive data linking mutations in the p53 gene to human tumorigenesis^1, little is known about the cellular regulators and mediators of p53 function. MDM2 is a strong candidate for one such cellular protein; the MDM2 gene was originally iden-tified by virtue of its amplification in a spontaneously transformed derivative of mouse BALB/c cells^2 and the MDM2 protein subsequently shown to bind to p53 in rat cells transfected with pS3 genes^3,4. To determine whether MDM2 plays a role in human cancer, we have cloned the human MDM2 gene. Here we show that recombinant-derived human MDM2 protein binds human p53 in vitro , and we use MDM2 clones to localize the human MDM2 gene to chromosome 12q^l3–14. Because this chromosomal position appears to be altered in many sarcomas^5–7, we looked for changes in human MDM2 in such cancers. The gene was amplified in over a third of 47 sarcomas, including common bone and soft tissue forms. These results are consistent with the hypothesis that MDM2 binds to p53, and that amplification of MDM2 in sarcomas leads to escape from p53-regulated growth control. This mechanism of tumorigenesis parallels that for virally-induced tumours^8,9, in which viral oncogene products bind to and functionally inactivate p53.A lawsuit against the US over the AIDS patent would finally bring all of the hard facts into open court.The failed summit meeting of the European Communities at Lisbon last weekend is another sign that Europe's most urgent need is better government.IT has been proposed that antibodies can mimic the binding of a receptor to its ligand and that anti-idiotype antibodies raised against such antibodies can be used to identify the receptor^1–3. A large number of antibodies have been raised against CD4, the receptor on T cells for the envelope glycoprotein gp120 of the human immunodeficiency virus, and the site at which gp120 binds to CD4 has been delineated^4. It has therefore become possible to contrast the fine specificities of a natural ligand (gp120) and antibodies that interact with the receptor at the same site. Here we report that out of a panel of 225 anti-CD4 antibodies, only one showed fine binding specificity that was broadly like that of gp120, but the evidence was against this being an exact mimic. Thus the data indicate that the production of antibody mimics will occur very rarely or not at all and that the anti-idiotype approach is unlikely to be useful. This contention is supported by a review of the results of attempts to use this approach. Taking strict criteria for success, there is no example for which the anti-idiotype approach has led to the discovery of a previously undescribed receptor or other protein of interest.SIGNAL transduction by G-protein-coupled receptors is regulated by various mechanisms acting at the receptor level; those studied most thoroughly are from the β-adrenergic receptor/G_s/adenylyl cyclase system^1–3. We report here a regulatory mechanism occurring at the level of the G proteins themselves. A protein with M_r 33,000 that inhibits G_s-GTPase activity was purified from bovine brain. This protein is very similar or identical to phosducin, a protein previously thought to be specific for retina and pineal gland^4–8. Recombinant phosducin inhibited the GTPase activity of several G proteins, and also inhibited G_s-mediated adenylyl cyclase activation. Blockade of its inhibitory effects by protein kinase A suggests that phosducin may be part of a complex regulatory network controlling G-protein-mediated signalling.THE macrolide rapamycin induces cell cycle Gl arrest in yeast and in mammalian cells^1–3, which suggests that an evolutionarily conserved, rapamycin-sensitive pathway may regulate entry into S phase. In mammals, rapamycin inhibits interleukin-2 receptor-induced S phase entry and subsequent T-cell proliferation^4–6, resulting in immunosuppression. Here we show that interleukin-2 selectively stimulates the phosphor) lation and activation of p70 S6 kinase but not the erk -encoded MAP kinases and rsk -encoded S6 kinases^7,8. Rapamycin completely and rapidly inhibits interleukin-2-induced phosphorylation and activation of p70 S6 kinase at concentrations comparable to those blocking S phase entry of T cells (0.05–0.2 nM). The structurally related macrolide FK506 competitively antagonizes the actions of rapamycin, indicating that these effects are mediated by FKBP, which binds the transition-state mimic structure common to both rapamycin and FK506 (refs 4, 6, 9–11). The selective blockade of the p70 S6 kinase activation cascade by the rapamycin–FKBP complex implicates this signalling pathway in the regulation of T cell entry into S phase.THE molecular basis of target cell recognition by CD3^− natural killer (NK) cells is poorly understood, despite the ability of NK cells to lyse specific tumour cells^1,2. In general, target cell major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class I antigen expression correlates with resistance to NK cell-mediated lysis^3–9, possibly because NK cell-surface molecules engage MHC class I antigens and consequently deliver inhibitory signals^3,4. Natural killer cell allospecificity involves the MHC class I peptide-binding cleft^10, and further understanding of this allospecificity should provide insight into the molecular mechanisms of NK cell recognition. The Ly-49 cell surface molecule is expressed by 20% of CD3^− NK cells^11 in C57BL/6 mice (H–2^b). Here we show that C57BL/6-derived, interleukin-2-activated NK cells expressing Ly-49 do not lyse target cells displaying H–2^d or H–2^k despite efficient spontaneous lysis by Ly-49^− effector cells. This preferential resistance correlates with expression of target cell MHC class I antigens. Transfection and expression of H–2D^d, but not H–2K^d or H–2L^d, renders a susceptible target (H–2^b) resistant to Ly-49^+ effector cells. The transfected resistance is abrogated by monoclonal anti-bodies directed against Ly-49 or the α1/α2 domains of H–2D^d, suggesting that Ly-49 specifically interacts with the peptide-binding domains of the MHC class I alloantigen, H–2D^d. Inas-much as Ly-49^+ effector cells cannot be stimulated to lyse H–2D^d targets, our results indicate that NK cells may possess inhibitory receptors that specifically recognize MHC class I antigens.BOVINE chromaffin cells have two components of whole-cell Ca^2+ current: 'standard' Ca^2+ currents that are activated by brief depolarizations, and 'facilitation' Ca^2+ currents, which are normally quiescent but can be activated by large pre-depolarizations or by repetitive depolarizations to physiological potentials^1–5. The activation of protein kinase A can also stimulate Ca^2+ current facilitation, indicating that phosphorylation can play a part in facilitation^6. Here we investigate the role of protein phosphorylation in the recruitment of facilitation Ca^2+ currents by prepulses or repetitive depolarizations. We find that recruitment of facilitation by depolarization is a rapid first-order process which is suppressed by inhibitors of protein phosphorylation or by injection of phosphatase 2A into cells. Recruitment of facilitation Ca^2+ current by voltage is normally reversible but phosphatase inhibitors render it irreversible. Our results indicate that recruitment of these Ca^2+ currents by prepulses or repetitive depolarizations involves voltage-dependent phosphorylation of the facilitation Ca^2+ channel or a closely associated regulatory protein. Voltage-dependent phosphorylation may therefore be a mechanism by which membrane potential can modulate ion channel activity.SEXUAL differences in courtship roles are thought to depend on the ratio of sexually available females to males^1–3. This 'operational sex ratio'^3 should be biased towards the sex investing least in reproduction because they will have the higher potential reproductive rate^4. Thus relative parental investment^1,2 is thought to underlie observed courtship roles. Typically, males have the lower investment and compete for choosy females^2,3,5. But role reversal can occur when males invest parentally^2,3. Recent evidence supports the contentions that role reversal reflects shifts in the potential reproductive rates of males and females^4and shifts in the operational sex ratio^6. Cases of male investment exceeding female investment in role-reversed species have not been found. In some insects, males invest in reproduction by providing the female with nutrients used for zygote production^7,8. Here I report the measurement of male and female investment in reproduction for a nutrient-provisioning bush cricket (Orthoptera: Tettigoniidae) and demonstrate that reversals in relative parental investment underlie courtship role reversals seen in this species^6,9.FLUCTUATIONS (transgressions and regressions) of intercon-tinental sea-ways during the Mesozoic Era affected the habitat area of coastal plains by alternately restricting the space during transgressive phases and expanding the space during regressive phases. In western North America a coastal plain stretched along the eastern front of the young Rocky Mountains during most of the Late Cretaceous. Here we report results of a six-year field study of the sediments and dinosaur remains from this coastal plain in Montana that provide evidence that anagenesis characterized dinosaur evolution at this time, and that the evolutionary pulse coincided with a marine transgression.CONTINENTAL flood basalt provinces represent important magmatic events, which may contribute significantly to the generation of new crust. In a typical flood basalt province, large volumes of magma are erupted in a short time: for example, at least 10^6 km^3 in 2–3 Myr in the Paraná–Etendeka province of southeast Brazil and northern Namibia. In many areas flood basalts are associated with mantle plumes, but details of their origin, such as the site of major-element melting, remain unresolved. Recent authors^1–3 have assumed that partial melting took place at the anhydrous peridotite solidus, and thus concluded that during continental extension, more than 95% of the erupted magmas are generated in the sublithospheric upper mantle. In this situation, the distinctive isotope and trace element geochemistry of the basalts is attributed not to this process, but to the addition of low-degree partial melts scavenged from the overlying lithosphere^4. Here we present an alternative model in which, in the presence of small amounts of water (∼0.4%), the observed quantities of melt may be generated entirely within the mantle lithosphere. As rifting proceeds, however, the basalts acquire an increasingly 'asthenospheric' chemistry, as melts from the asthenosphere come to dominate those from the lithosphere.UPWELLING of nutrient-rich Pacific deep water along the North American west coast is ultimately driven by the temperature difference between air masses over land and over the ocean. The intensity of upwelling, and biological production in the region, could therefore be affected by anthropogenic climate change. Examination of the geological record is one way to study the link between climate and upwelling. Because Pacific deep water is enriched in cadmium, dissolved cadmium concentrations in coastal water off central California reflect the intensity of upwelling. By demonstrating that the Cd/Ca ratio in the shell of a benthic foraminifer, Elphidiella hannai , is proportional to the Cd concentration in coastal water, we show here that foraminiferal Cd/Ca ratios can be used to detect past changes in mean upwelling intensity. Examination of a sediment core from the mouth of San Francisco Bay reveals that foraminiferal Cd/Ca decreased by about 30% from 4,000 years ago to the present, probably because of a reduction in coastal upwelling. This observation is consistent with predictions of atmospheric general circulation models that northwesterly winds, which drive upwelling, became weaker over this period as summer insolation of the Northern Hemisphere decreased.RECORDS of ^14C in tree rings provide a proxy for changes in solar activity on timescales of decades to centuries^1,2. Here I report an association between Maunder-type solar cycles recorded in tree rings and fluctuations in surface wind intensity on a roughly 200-year timescale over a period of about 2,000 years in the mid-Holocene. The wind record is preserved as changes in the thickness of varved sediments in Elk Lake, Minnesota, which contain a large aeolian component. Changes in cyclonic activity and tropospheric winds have been reported^1–5 to occur in this region a few days after strong coronal mass ejections (CMEs); increases of up to 7% in zonal flow have been reported^5 at an altitude of ~ 300 m after strong CMEs in winter. The implication of this association is that century-scale changes in surface winds over Minnesota were the long-term (Maunder-scale) counterpart of short-term (daily) changes in winds after CMEs. The weak magnetic field strength of the Earth at this time^6,7 might be relevant to a possible mechanism for the association.NANOPHASE materials, characterized by an ultrafine grain size, have stimulated much interest in recent years^1–11 by virtue of their unusual mechanical, electrical, optical and magnetic properties. Nanophase ceramics are of particular interest because they are more ductile at elevated temperatures than are coarse-grained ceramics^11—an important property for the fabrication of ceramic components. Preparing materials that are both dense and fine-grained, however, has proved difficult: the high sintering temperatures generally required to obtain high densities can also lead to exaggerated grain growth, resulting in coarse-grained, nonuni-form materials. Sintering at lower temperatures gives a much finer grain size, but does not in general result in high-density materials. We show here that dense nanostructured titania, with density >99% of the theoretical maximum and an average grain size of less than 60 nm, can be prepared by sintering a titanium oxide sol gel near the anatase–rutile phase transformation temperature (about 600 °C). The increased mobility of the atoms during the phase transformation enhances the sintering rate at lower temperatures, suggesting that this method could be used more generally to produce nanophase materials with near theoretical densities.WEAKLY bound van der Waals molecules, consisting of atoms or molecules (such as rare gases, H_2 and N_2) interacting through van der Waals forces, can be formed in the gas phase^1. The existence of similar weakly bound stoichiometric compounds in condensed phases has remained an open question as the components usually form separate pure phases or solid solutions^2. Here we report on a detailed study of the helium–nitrogen system in a diamond-anvil cell using synchrotron X-ray diffraction, Raman scattering and optical microscopy. We find that high pressure stabilizes the formation of a stoichiometric, solid van der Waals compound of composition He(N_2)_11. Because of the relatively simple interactions involved, this solid may exemplify a novel class of van der Waals compounds that are formed only at high pressures. Van der Waals chemistry in simple molecular systems may be important for understanding the structure and properties of the interiors of the outer planets and their satellites, where pressures are high and such components may be abundant^3–5.MODELS that trace the origin of noble gases in the atmospheres of the terrestrial planets (Venus, Earth and Mars) to the 'planetary component' in chondritic meteorites confront several problems. The 'missing' xenon in the atmospheres of Mars and Earth (Fig. 1) is one of the most obvious; this gas is not hidden or trapped in surface materials^1. On Venus, the absolute abundances of neon and argon per gram of rock are higher even than those in carbonaceous chondrites, whereas the relative abundances of argon and krypton are closer to solar than to chondritic values (there is only an upper limit on xenon)^2 (Fig. 1). Pepin^3 has developed a model that emphasizes hydrodynamic escape of early, massive hydrogen atmospheres to explain the abundances and isotope ratios of noble gases on all three planets. We have previously suggested that the unusual abundances of heavy noble gases on Venus might be explained by the impact of a low-temperature comet^4–6. Further consideration of the probable history of the martian atmosphere^7, the noble-gas data from the (Mars-derived) SNC meteorites^8–10 and laboratory experiments on the trapping of noble gases in ice^6,11,12 lead us to propose here that the noble gases in the atmospheres of all of the terrestrial planets are dominated by a mixture of an internal component and a contribution from impacting icy planetesimals (comets). If true, this hypothesis illustrates the importance of impacts in determining the volatile inventories of these planets.THE diffuse interstellar bands (DIBs), ubiquitous absorption features in astronomical spectra, have been known since early this century^1 and now number more than a hundred. Ranging from 4,400 Å to the near infrared^2, they differ markedly in depth, width and shape, making the concept of a single carrier unlikely. Whether they are due to gas or grains is not settled, but recent results^3 suggest that the DIB carriers are quite separate from the grains that cause visual extinction. Among molecular candidates the polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs) have been proposed as the possible carriers of some of the DIBs^4–7, and we present here laboratory measurements of the optical spectrum of the pyrene cation C_16H_10^+ in neon and argon matrices. The strongest absorption feature falls at4,435 ± 5 Å in the argon matrix and 4,395 ± 5 Å in the neon matrix, both close to the strong 4,430-Å DIB. If this or a related pyrene-like species is responsible for this particular band, it must account for 0.2% of all cosmic carbon. The ion also shows an intense but puzzling broad continuum, extending from the ultraviolet to the visible, similar to what is seen in the naphthalene cation^8 and perhaps therefore a common feature of all PAH cations. This may provide an explanation of how PAHs convert a large fraction of interstellar radiation from ultraviolet and visible wavelengths down to the infrared.Nature intends that a billion should henceforth mean what others intend.Two novel subunits of the mouse NMDA receptor channel, the ɛ 2 and ɛ 3 subunits, have been identified by cloning and expression of complementary DMAs. The heteromeric ɛ 1/ζ1, ɛ 2/ζ1 and ɛ 3/ζ1 NMDA receptor channels exhibit distinct functional properties in affinities for agonists and sensitivities to competitive antagonists and Mg^2+ block. In contrast to the wide distribution of the ɛ1 and ζ1 subunit messenger RNAs in the brain, the ɛ 2 subunit mRNA is expressed only in the forebrain and the ɛ 3 subunit mRNA is found predominantly in the cerebellum. The ɛ l/ζ1 and ɛ 2/ζ1 channels expressed in Xenopus oocytes, but not the ɛ 3/ζ1 channel, are activated by treatment with 12- O -tetradecanoylphorbol 13-acetate. These findings suggest that the molecular diversity of the ɛ subunit family underlies the functional heterogeneity of the NMDA receptor channel.Local order in silicate glasses has been observed by many experimental techniques to be similar to that in crystalline materials. Details of the intermediate-range order are more elusive, but essential for understanding the lack of long-range symmetry in glasses and the effect of composition on glass structure. Two-dimensional ^170 dynamic-angle-spinning nuclear magnetic resonance experiments reveal intermediate-range order in the distribution of inter-tetrahedral (Si–O–Si) bond angles and a high degree of order in the disposition of oxygen atoms around the network-modifying cations.Dynamics of Marine Ecosystems: Biological-Physical Interactions in the Oceans. By K. H. Mann and J. R. N. Lazier. Blackwell Scientific: 1991. Pp. 466. á£24.95, $46.95 (pbk).Infectious Diseases of Humans: Dyna-mics and Control. By Roy M. Anderson and Robert M. May. Oxford University Press: 1991. Pp. 757. á£50, $95 (hbk); á£22.50, $45 (pbk).The Art of Mathematics. By Jerry P. King. Plenum: 1992. Pp. 313. $24.50.The Code of Codes: Scientific and Social Issues in the Human Genome Project. Edited by Daniel J. Kevles and Leroy Hood. Harvard University Press: 1992. Pp. 397. $29.95, á£23.95.A fuss last week about a crop of HIV infections in Birmingham (England) shows British newspapers, but notably the Sunday Times, at their most fickle.Featured this week - a hand-held laboratory computer that makes light work of calculating solutions, an extracellular matrix preparation for anchorage-dependent cells and software that simulates objects in real motion.How should the increasing numbers of deer throughout the world be controlled? The situation in Scotland shows that an understanding of the biology of deer can provide practical guidelines.THE prediction of protein tertiary structure from sequence using molecular energy calculations has not yet been successful; an alternative strategy of recognizing known motifs^1 or folds^2–4 in sequences looks more promising. We present here a new approach to fold recognition, whereby sequences are fitted directly onto the backbone coordinates of known protein structures. Our method for protein fold recognition involves automatic modelling of protein structures using a given sequence, and is based on the frameworks of known protein folds. The plausibility of each model, and hence the degree of compatibility between the sequence and the proposed structure, is evaluated by means of a set of empirical potentials derived from proteins of known structure. The novel aspect of our approach is that the matching of sequences to backbone coordinates is performed in full three-dimensional space, incorporating specific pair interactions explicitly.THE p53 protein is an important determinant in human cancer and regulates the growth of cells in culture^1–3. It is known to be a sequence-specific DNA-binding protein^4,5 with a powerful activation domain^6–8, but it has not been established whether it regulates transcription directly. Here we show that intact purified wild-type human and murine p53 proteins strongly activate transcription in vitro . This activation depends on the ability of p53 to bind to a template bearing a p53-binding sequence. By contrast, tumour-derived mutant p53 proteins cannot activate transcription from the template at all, and when complexed to wild-type p53, these mutants block transcriptional activation by the wild-type protein. Moreover, the simian virus 40 large T antigen inhibits wild-type p53 from activating transcription. Our results support a model in which p53 directly activates transcription but this activity can be inhibited by mutant p53 and SV40 large T antigen through interaction with wild-type p53.ADHESION of parasitized erythrocytes to post-capillary venular endothelium^1or uninfected red cells'^2–4 is strongly implicated in the pathogenesis of severe Plasmodlum faldparum malaria. Neo-antigens at the infected red-cell surface adhere to a variety of host receptors^5–9, demonstrate serological diversity in field isolates^10,11 and may also be a target of the host-protective immune response^12. Here we use sequential cloning of P. faldparum by micromanipula-tion to investigate the ability of a parasite to switch antigenic and cytoadherence phenotypes. Our data show that antigens at the parasitized cell surface undergo clonal variation in vitro in the absence of immune pressure at the rate of 2% per generation with concomitant modulations of the adhesive phenotype. A clone has the potential to switch at high frequency to a variety of antigenic and adhesive phenotypes, including a new type of cytoadherence behaviour, 'auto-agglutination' of infected erythrocytes. This rapid appearance of antigenic and functional heterogeneity has important implications for pathogenesis and acquired immunity.THE central nervous system has extraordinary plasticity in early life. This is thought to involve N -methyl-D-aspartate (NMDA) receptors^1 which, along with the non-NMDA receptors, mediate fast excitatory synaptic transmission^2. Although NMDA receptors may be transiently enhanced early in life^3–6, it has not been possible to demonstrate directly a functional change in the NMDA receptor-mediated synaptic response because of the voltage-dependence of the NMDA conductance and the overlapping inhibitory synaptic conductances. Here I report that the duration of evoked NMDA-receptor-mediated excitatory postsynaptic currents (e.p.s.cs) in the superior colliculus is several times longer at early developmental stages compared to that measured in older animals. In contrast, the amplitude of NMDA-receptor-mediated miniature e.p.s.cs does not change during development. The kinetic response of excised membrane patches to a brief activation of NMDA receptors is similar to that of the NMDA e.p.s.c, which suggests that the time course of the NMDA e.p.s.c. in the superior colliculus reflects slow NMDA channel properties as in the hippocampus^7–9. Therefore, these data indicate that the molecular properties of NMDA receptors are developmentally regulated and thus may be controlling the ability of synapses to change in early life.How do honey-bees integrate cues in nestmate recognition? Honey-bees are able to discriminate nestmates from non-nestmates using olfactory cues or contact chemoreception. Nestmates may differ from non-nestmates in either cues produced by the individuals, which have a genetic basis, or in cues that are acquired from the hive environment. Recognitive cues are learned by worker bees early in adult life; the learned cue profile serves as a template for comparison and determination of the colonial membership of bees that are encountered. We report here the response of bees to two cues: hexadecane and methyl docosonoate.THE late Silurian–early Devonian genus Cooksonia , characterized by smooth isotomously branching axes and solitary, terminal sporangia^1, has long been regarded as the archetypal vascular plant because of its age and simplicity of organization. The discovery of stomata, sterome^2 and thick-walled spores^1,3 in Cooksonia pertoni and C. hemisphaerica confirmed its land-plant status, but tracheids have never been demonstrated in attached axes^4. Here we report on tubes with differentially thickened walls typical of tracheary elements found in the central region of axes of Lower Devonian unequivocal C. pertoni , vindicating Lang's belief that Cooksonia was a vascular plant^1.THE hypothesis^1 that late Cenozoic uplift of many of the world's mountain ranges was a response to climate change rather than to tectonic processes is based on the premise that enhanced erosion in an altered climate led to a reduction in both the total mass of a mountain range and its mean elevation. This reduction was coeval with increased regional relief and with passive isostatic uplift of the remaining summits. The hypothesis is difficult to evaluate because both climate and tectonic forces affect uplift in many active ranges. In the absence of sufficient denudational and uplift data from the mountains themselves, depositional patterns in adjacent basins may sometimes be used to distinguish between uplift arising from erosional or from tectonic processes. In foreland basins, uplift of the proximal basin and a reduction or absence of asymmetric subsidence are predicted responses to erosionally driven uplift^2. Here I show that patterns of sediment accumulation and the position of major rivers in the Neogene Gangetic foreland basin seem to have changed markedly in Plio-Pleistocene times. These changes lend support to the hypothesis that the importance of erosional unloading has increased in the Himalayas during the past 4 Myr.Many companies are looking beyond the academic records of applicants these days, and are searching for potential managers. A few of those taken on can look forward to truly international careers.THE seventh sentence in the description of Fig. lb on page 156 in this Letter should begin "The intensity before the step was 92 ±4% of that in a tetanus without imposed steps", not 9 ±4% as printed. Nature 357,156-158 (1992).ANTIGENSpresented to CD4^+T cells derive primarily from exogenous proteins that are processed into peptides capable of binding to class II major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecules in an endocytic compartment^1–4. In contrast, antigens presented to CD8^+T cells derive mostly from proteins processed in the cytosol, and peptide loading onto class I MHC molecules in an early exocytic compartment is dependent on a transporter for antigen presentation encoded in the class II MHC region^5–11. Endogenous cytosolic antigen can also be presented by class II molecules^12,13. Here we show that, unlike class I-restricted recognition of antigen, HLA-DR 1-restricted recognition of cytosolic antigen occurs in mutant cells without a transporter for antigen presentation. In contrast, DR1-restricted recognition of a short cytosolic peptide is dependent on such a transporter. Thus helper T-cell epitopes can be generated from cytosolic antigens by several mechanisms, one of which is distinct from the classical class I pathway.METHANE is a greenhouse gas whose concentration in the atmosphere is increasing^1–3. Much of this methane is derived from the metabolism of methane-generating (methanogenic) bacteria^4,5 and over the past two decades much has been learned about the ecology of methanogens; specific inhibitors of methanogenesis, such as 2-bromoethanesulphonic acid, have proved useful in this regard^6. In contrast, although much is known about the biochemistry of methane-oxidizing (methanotrophic) bacteria^7, ecological investigations have been hampered by the lack of an analogous specific inhibitor^6. Methanotrophs limit the flux of methane to the atmosphere from sediments^8,9 and consume atmospheric methane^10, but the quantitative importance of methanotrophy in the global methane budget is not well known^5. Methylfluoride (CH_3F) is known to inhibit oxygen consumption by Methylococcus capsu-latus ^11, and to inhibit the oxidation of ^14CH_4 to ^14CO_2 by endosymbionts in mussel gill tissues^12. Here we report that methylfluoride (MF) inhibits the oxidation of methane by methane monooxy-genase, and by using methylfluoride in field investigations, we find that methanotrophic bacteria can consume more than 90% of the methane potentially available.Programmed cell death occurs in most animal tissues at some stage of their development, but the molecular mechanism by which it is executed is unknown. For some mammalian cells, programmed death seems to occur by default unless suppressed by signals from other cells. Such dependence on specific survival signals provides a simple way to eliminate misplaced cells, for regulating cell numbers and, perhaps, for selecting the fittest cells. But how general is this dependence on survival signals?Deep Interior of the Earth. By J. A. Jacobs J. A. Chapman and Hall 1991. Pp. 167. £24.95, $39.95.Biomagnetism. Romuald S. Wadas Ellis Horwood: 1991. Pp. 170. £40.00, $68.Chemical Chaos. By Stephen K. Scott Oxford University Press: 1991. Pp. 454. £60, $135.AIDS in Africa. Edited by Peter Piot Bila Kapita and JBO Were. Current Science: 1991. Pp. 209. £35, $59 and (pbk). Aids in Africa: Its Present and Future Impact. By Tony Barnett Piers Blaikie. Belhaven: 1992. Pp. 193. £35 (hbk), £9.99 (pbk).THE discovery^1 of superconductivity, with a transition temperature T _c of 18 K, in potassium-doped C_60 was followed by the synthesis of other superconducting M_3C_60 phases: Rb_3C_60 ( T _c = 28K and 30 K; refs 2, 3), CsRb_2C_60 ( T _c = 31K; ref. 4) and Cs_2RbC_60 ( T c = 33 K; ref. 4). A monotonic relationship is observed^5 between T c and lattice constant a _0 for these face-centred cubic M_3C_0 compounds, all of which have a _0 values larger than that of pure C_60. Here we study this relationship over a wider range using mixed alkali compounds incorporating sodium (Na_2MC_60, where M is K, Rb or Cs) and lithium (Li_2CsC_60). The Na_2MC_60 compounds have face-centred cubic structures and are superconducting, with T _c = 12 K (M = Cs), 2.5 K (M = Rb) and 2.5 K (M = K); these T c_s are lower than those predicted on the basis of high-pressure studies^6–8. This departure from the previous relationship between T _c and a _0 for lattice parameters smaller than that of pristine C_60 may provide new insights into what controls superconductivity in these materials.ALKALI metal fuller ides exhibit superconductivity^1–4 at temperatures surpassed only by the copper-oxide-based ceramics. Three types of stoichiometry and structure have been identified: A_3C_60 (ref. 5) (where A is K or Rb) with A^+ cations intercalated in the face-centred cubic (f.c.c.) C_60 structure, and A_6C_60 (ref. 6) or A_4C_60 (ref. 7) (where A is K, Rb or Cs) with body-centred arrays of C_60 molecules. All A_3C_60 compounds reported so far are superconductors with transition temperatures that increase with unit cell size^8,9. No successful preparation of bulk Na_ x C_60 has been reported, although measurements of electrical conductivity^10 and Raman^11, ESR^11 and photoemission^12 spectra of thin films have given clear indications of Na_ x C_60 formation. Here we report the synthesis and initial characterization of bulk Na_ x C_60 (2≤ x ≤6) and mixed alkali phases Na_2AC_60 (where A is K, Rb, or Cs). All of these phases have intercalated f.c.c. structures. The Na_6C_60 structure has a Na_4 cluster centred on the octahedral site. The Na_2AC_60 compounds superconduct for the larger A cations, but a crossover to nonsuperconducting behaviour occurs with decreasing cation size and correlates with a minimum in the unit cell volume.THE atmospheric sodium nightglow and luminescence of meteor trails, both of which occur at mesospheric altitudes of 85–95 km, are emitted by sodium atoms in the excited ^2P state. The Chapman mechanism^1–8 attributes these to the reaction between NaO and oxygen atoms, requiring an unusually high rate of formation of excited Na^*(^2P) relative to ground-state Na(^2S) atoms from the NaO + O reaction. But laboratory studies of the kinetics9 show a very low Na^*(^2P) formation rate (branching ratio f < 0.01). NaO is itself formed by the reaction of sodium atoms with ozone. Molecular-beam experiments^10 and photoelectron spectroscopy^11 have shown recently that this reaction yields largely excited-state (^2Σ^+) NaO rather than the ground-state (^2Π) species studied in the NaO + O kinetics experiments^9, thereby suggesting a resolution of the apparent discrepancy with the Chapman mechanism. By extending the symmetry correlation between reactant and product electronic states considered by Bates and Ohja^6, we show here that reaction of excited-state NaO with oxygen atoms does indeed yield branching ratios consistent with the Chapman mechanism. We infer that the NaO + O potential-energy surfaces leading to excited Na^*(^2P) atoms involve doublet rather than quartet spin configurations, and the branching ratio f is close to zero for ground-state NaO but ∼2/3 for excited-state NaO. If confirmed experimentally, this finding may enable the sodium nightglow to be used as a quantitative measure of mesospheric ozone concentrations^5,7,8.A specific DNA complex of the 65-residue, N-terminal fragment of the yeast transcriptional activator, GAL4, has been analysed at 2.7 Å resolution by X-ray crystallography. The protein binds as a dimer to a symmetrical 17-base-pair sequence. A small, Zn^2+-containing domain recognizes a conserved CCG triplet at each end of the site through direct contacts with the major groove. A short coiled-coil dimerization element imposes 2-fold symmetry. A segment of extended polypep-tide chain links the metal-binding module to the dimerization element and specifies the length of the site. The relatively open structure of the complex would allow another protein to bind coordinately with GAL4.Palaeomagnetic records of the path of the pole during reversals of the Earth's magnetic field provide a test of the hypothesis that dipolar or low-order axisymmetric components of the field dominate during reversals. Multiple records of reversals during the past 12 Myr show no simple or consistent geographical pattern. Although a more robust analysis of the transitional field awaits a greater number of well-distributed sampling sites, the present data are not inconsistent with the simplest models, in which a field reminiscent of the non-dipole component of the present-day field becomes dominant.Masses of circumstantial data link diet and disease, including a new report about a chemical in broccoli that detoxifies carcinogens in vitro , but it remains the case that very little is really known about food as medicineThe introduction of human insulin to treat diabetics seemed straightforward. What can account for the problems that have followed?British science may benefit from next week's election by the impatience engendered by its studious neglect.The seemingly endless studies of the ethical connotations of genetics serve a valuable role in general understanding even if the ethical problems involved are often insubstantial.Over 400 companies will be exhibiting at next week's meeting of the Federation of American Societies for Experimental Biology to be held in Anaheim, California. A new p53-deficient transgenic mouse strain and a laser-induced fluorescence detector for capillary electrophoresis will be featured.The large surfaces of protein antigens that interact with antibody-combining sites can be determined using deuterium-exchange labelling and two-dimensional ^1H nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR). This technique may also be applied to other protein-protein interactions to identify key residues that contribute to the affinity.THE rational design of proteins requires knowledge of the helix-forming propensities ( s -values) of the different amino acids. There is, however, considerable controversy about the relative values for alanine and glycine^1–12We find from experiments on mutants of barnase that the relative effect of Ala versus Gly on helix stability depends crucially on the position in the helix (whether they are at the ends (caps) or are internal) and the context (the influence of their neighbours). Glycine is greatly preferred at the N and C caps. At internal positions, Ala stabilizes the helix relative to Gly by 0.4 to 2 kcal mol^−1. The variation results from a combination of burial of hydrophobic surface on folding and interference with hydrogen bonding of the protein with solvent. There is a good empirical correlation between the relative stabilizing effects of Ala and Gly with the total change in solvent-accessible hydrophobic surface area of the folded protein on mutation of Gly to Ala. It is not valid to assign to each amino acid a unique s -value that is generally applicable to all positions in all helices in all proteins.THE GAL4 protein activates transcription of the genes required for galactose utilization in Saccharomyces cerevisiae ^1. The protein, consisting of 881 amino acids, is dimeric when bound to one of the approximately twofold symmetrical DNA sites present in the galactose upstream activating sequence (UAS_G)^2–5. Here we use two-dimensional NMR spectroscopy to determine the structure of an amino-terminal fragment of GAL4 (residues 1-65). This fragment, a monomer in solution, binds as a dimer specifically to UAS_G-containing DNA. Residues 9-40 form a well defined, compact globular cluster, whereas residues 1-8 and 41-66 show considerable conformational mobility in the absence of DNA. The compact domain contains a motif in which six cysteines, located on two symmetrically related helix/extended strand units connected by a long loop, coordinate two central zinc ions, forming a bimetal-thiolate cluster^6–11. The zincs were replaced by NMR-active^113Cd in most of our work and structural parameters are therefore derived from the Cd_2-protein. The structure obtained for the GAL4 DNA-binding domain represents a novel DNA-binding motif. Essentially the same conformation is observed for the compact domain in solution using NMR techniques as was seen for the central core of the N-terminal fragment bound to DNA using crystallographic techniques^12. Thus, the core of the DNA-binding domain changes little upon binding DNA.The Astronomy and Astrophysics Encyclopedia. Edited by Stephen P. Maran. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 1002. £60. A Concise Dictionary of Astronomy. By Jacqueline Mitton. Oxford University Press: 1991. Pp. 423. £±2.95, $19.95.THE yeast transcriptional activator GAL4 binds co-operatively to four related 17-base-pair sequences within an upstream activating sequence (UAS_G) to activate transcription of the GAL1 and GAL10 genes^1. It belongs to a class of gene regulatory proteins which all contain a highly conserved cysteine-rich region within their DNA-binding domains^2,3. This region binds zinc^4–7 and it has been proposed that the cysteine residues coordinate the zinc, creating a structure analogous to one of the 'zinc fingers' of the transcription factor TFHIA (ref. 8). Using ^1H–^113Cd two-dimensional nuclear magnetic resonance spectra of the cadmium form of the domain, we previously showed that the protein contains a Cd_2Cys_6cluster where cysteines 11 and 28 act as bridging ligands^9. A similar study of a fragment of GAL4 has recently been published10. We report here the solution structure of the DNA binding domain of GAL4; two helix-turn-strand motifs pack around a Zn_2Cys_6 cluster in a novel pseudo-symmetrical arrangement. The results show that the GAL4 zinc-binding domain differs significantly from both the TFIIIA-type zinc finger^11 and the steroid hormone receptor DNA-binding domains^12.THE directed mutation hypothesis^1–6 suggests that some mutations occur more often when selectively advantageous than when neutral or disadvantageous, challenging the principle that the selective value of a mutation does not affect the rate of its occurrence^7–11. Mutations in the bgl operon of Escherichia coli have been reported to be a case of directed mutation^2. E. coli K12 strain _Ξ342LD cannot grow on salicin but derivatives with two mutations in the bgl operon, an excision of IS 150 (formally called 1S103; ref. 12) 500 T from bglF and a point mutation or insertion in bglR ^13–15 ,grow rapidly on this sugar. When _x342LD is grown on a medium containing salicin, bglF excision mutants accumulate to a frequency of >1%, even though these mutants are reportedly^2 unable to grow on salicin, and Sal^+ double mutants subsequently attain a high frequency. Comparable accumulations of excision mutants and Sal^+ double mutants are not observed in the absence of salicin. As salicin is not mutagenic, it has been suggested that excision mutations in bglF might serve only to create the potential for a secondary selectively advantageous mutation^2. We show here, however, that these double mutants can be accounted for by spontaneous mutation to intermediate genotypes in non-growing populations, coupled with slow growth of some of these intermediates on salicin, which enables their populations to reach a size where secondary mutations allowing rapid growth on salicin become common.THE mutant human cell line T2 is defective in antigen presentation in the context of class I major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecules^1,2 and also in that transfected T2 cells show poor surface expression of exogenous human class I (HLA) alleles^3. Both defects are thought to lie in the transport of antigenic peptides derived from cytosolic proteins into the endoplasmic reticulum (ER)^1,2 as peptide-deficient class I molecules might be expected to be either unstable or retained in the ER^4. The products of several mouse class I ( H –2) genes, and the endogenous gene HLA-A2 do, however, reach the surface of T2 cells at reasonable levels although they are non-functional^3,5,6. We report here that, as expected, poorly surface-expressed HLA molecules do not significantly bind endogenous peptides. Surprisingly, H–2 omolecules expressed in T2 also lack associated peptides, arguing that 'empty' complexes of mouse class I glycoproteins with human β2-microglobulin are neither retained in the ER nor unstable. HLA-A2 molecules, however, do bind high levels of a limited set of endogenous peptides. We have sequenced three of these peptides and find that two, a 9-mer and an 11-mer, are derived from a putative signal sequence (of IP-30, an interferon-γ-inducible protein^7), whereas a third, a 13-mer, is of unknown origin. The unusual length of two of the peptides argues that the 9-mers normally associated with HLA-A2 molecules may be generated before their transport from the cytosol rather than in a pre-Golgi compartment. To our knowledge, this is the first report of the isolation of a fragment of a eukaryotic signal peptide generated in vivo .THE sodium channel, one of the family of structurally homologous voltage-gated ion channels^1, differs from other members, such as the calcium and the potassium channels, in its high selectivity for Na^+. This selectivity presumably reflects a distinct structure of its ion-conducting pore. We have recently identified two clusters of predominantly negatively charged amino-acid residues, located at equivalent positions in the four internal repeats of the sodium channel as the main determinants of sensitivity to the blockers tetrodotoxin and saxitoxin^2. All site-directed mutations reducing net negative charge at these positions also caused a marked decrease in single-channel conductance^2. Thus these two amino-acid clusters probably form part of the extracellular mouth and/or the pore wall of the sodium channel. We report here the effects on ion selectivity of replacing lysine at position 1,422 in repeat III and/or alanine at position 1,714 in repeat IV of rat sodium channel II (ref. 3), each located in one of the two clusters, by glutamic acid, which ccurs at the equivalent positions in calcium channels. These amino-acid substitutions, unlike other substitutions in the adjacent regions, alter ion-selection properties of the sodium channel to resemble those of calcium channels. This result indicates that lysine 1,422 and alanine 1,714 are critical in deter mining the ion selectivity of the sodium channel, suggesting that these residues constitute part of the selectivity filter of the channel.THE β _2microglobulin ( β _2m) protein associates with the products of the class I major histocompatibility (MHC) loci; this combination functions in the thymic development of and antigen presentation to CD8^+ T cells. Mice in which the β _2m gene has been disrupted by homologous recombination fail to express class I MHC gene products, and therefore lack CD8^+ T cells and measurable cytotoxic T-cell responses^1,2. However, β _2m− mice appear to have normal development of both CD4^+ α / β T-cell receptor (TCR^+) and γ /δ TCR^+ T cells and are not overtly more susceptible than β _2m^+ mice to potential environmental agents of infection^1,2 or to experimental viral infection^3. Here we show that β _2m^− mice suffer high parasitaemias and early death when infected with the obligate cytoplasmic protozoan parasite Trypanosoma cruzi . Despite this increased susceptibility, the β _2m^− mice are more responsive than their β _2m^+ littermates in terms of lymphokine production, making higher levels of both interleukin-2 and interferon-γ in response to mitogen stimulation. In addition, the β _2m− mice show essentially no inflammatory response in parasite-infected tissues. These results confirm previous experiments on mice depleted of CD8^+cells using antibody treatment4 in demonstrating the importance of CD8^+ T cells in immune protection in T. cruzi infection. They also implicate CD8^+ T cells and/or class I MHC molecules in regulation of lymphokine production and recruitment of inflammatory cells.MANY G-protein-coupled receptors are only transiently active because an inactivation process stops the receptor from activating G protein molecules^1–3. Although this inactivation has been investigated in vitro , the real kinetics of the process can only be obtained from intact cells. Here we describe a method for measuring the inactivation of rhodopsin in intact photoreceptors and the application of this method to the ultraviolet rhodopsin of Limulus median eye^4. The results show that the inactivation process is very rapid (<150 ms) and occurs well before the peak of the receptor potential. We have also investigated whether the inactivation process can itself be modulated. Our results show that light-adaptation accelerates inactivation by about 10-fold, providing evidence that G-protein-mediated transduction can be modulated at this first stage.IN myelinated nerves, segregation of voltage-dependent sodium channels to nodes of Ranvier is crucial for saltatory conduction along axons^1–4. As sodium channels associate^5 and colocalize with ankyrin at nodes of Ranvier^6, one possibility is that sodium channels are recruited and immobilized at axonal sites which are specified by the subaxolemmal cytoskeleton, independent of glial cell contact^7–10. Alternatively, segregation of channels at distinct sites along the axon may depend on glial cell contact^11–14. To resolve this question, we have examined the distribution of sodium channels, ankyrin and spectrin in myelination-competent co-cultures of sensory neurons and Schwann cells by immunofluores-cence, using sodium channel-, ankyrin- and spectrin-specific antibodies. In the absence of Schwann cells, sodium channels, ankyrin and spectrin are homogeneously distributed on sensory axons. When Schwann cells are introduced into these cultures, the distribution of sodium channels dramatically changes so that channel clusters on axons are abundant, but ankyrin and spectrin remain homogeneously distributed. Addition of latex beads or Schwann cell membranes does not induce channel clustering. Our results suggest that segregation of sodium channels on axons is highly dependent on interactions with active Schwann cells and that continuing axon-glial interactions are necessary to organize and maintain channel distribution during differentiation of myelinated axons.GENETIC conflicts of interest are to be expected between individuals in any non-clonal society^1–5. One well studied form of conflict is that between parents and their offspring over the amount of parental care provided to the offspring^3. A very different manifestation of parent–offspring conflict may occur in certain cooperatively breeding species in which parents (breeders) are assisted in the rearing of young by their grown offspring (helpers)^6–8. If helpers have a sufficiently large effect on reproductive success, breeders will enhance their own inclusive fitness more by retaining their offspring as helpers than by allowing them to reproduce on their own^4,5,9. We report here that older male white-fronted bee-eaters (typically fathers) actively disrupt the breeding attempts of their sons, and that such harassment frequently leads to the sons joining as helpers at the nest of the harassing father. Calculation of fitness costs and benefits to the various participants helps to clarify both why parents engage in such 'recruitment' behaviour and why sons frequently do not resist.The Human Frontier Science Programme, inspired by Japan, deserves more general attention and support.THE Earth's solid inner core is generally thought to have formed by gradual solidification of the liquid core as the Earth cooled^1–3. To elucidate the relative importance of the various physical effects on the thermal evolution of the core, we have developed an analytical model based on global heat conservation, which describes the cooling of the vigorously convecting, fluid outer core and the concomitant growth of the inner core. We obtain a simple form for the evolution of the inner-core radius which allows the consequences of changes to the model's input parameters to be readily assessed. For most of this evolution, inner-core growth is controlled primarily by the heat capacity of the outer core and the history of the heat flux into the base of the mantle. Heat sources associated with solidification of the inner core, including the release of latent heat and gravitational energy, have a secondary role but become more important towards the end of solidification. Using current seismic estimates of compositional changes at the surface of the inner core, we conclude that the compositional and thermal buoyancy fluxes in the outer core are comparable.FOR many years, the principal means of probing the ocean using sound has been through the use of 'active' or 'passive' techniques. With an active system, an object is illuminated by a pulse of sound and its presence inferred from the echo it produces, whereas the passive approach involves simply listening for the sound that the object itself emits. Here we report a new method of using sound in the ocean, which is neither passive nor active. It relies on the naturally occurring, incoherent ambient noise field in the ocean— which can be thought of as 'acoustic daylight'—as the sole source of acoustic illumination. By focusing the sound scattered by an object immersed in the noise field, it should be possible to produce a visual image of the object on a television monitor. We have tested this concept by conducting a simple experiment in the ocean, with a parabolic reflector acting as an acoustic lens, and our results confirm that objects illuminated only by ambient noise can indeed be 'seen' at frequencies between 5 and 50 kHzTHE importance of non-covalent interactions in biological systems motivates much of the current interest in supramolecular assemblies^1. A classic example of a supermolecule is provided by the rotaxanes^2–5, in which a molecular 'rotor' is threaded by a linear 'axle'. Previous examples have included cyclic crown ethers threaded by polymers^6, paraquat–hydroquinone complexes^7 and cyclodextrin complexes^8,9. We found recently that α-cyclodextrin will form high yields of a crystalline complex with polyethylene glycol (PEG), and suggested that the PEG penetrates the 'beaker-like' tunnel of the cyclodextrin^10,11. We report here the preparation of a compound in which several cyclodextrins are threaded on a single PEG chain and are trapped by capping the chain with bulky end groups. This brings a step closer the 'molecular abacus' proposed by Stoddart and coworkers^7. We call this supramolecular assembly a 'molecular necklace'.GRANULAR structure on the Sun's surface, with a typical scale of 1–2 Mm, has been known since 1800, and one hundred years ago, with the first observations by spectroheliograph^1,2, a mesh-like bright network was found with a characteristic scale of 30 Mm (40″). This pattern was found, thirty years ago, to be coincident with close-packed convective cells ('supergranulation') revealed by Doppler observations^3–5 to be nestling inside the bright network. More recently^6,7 an intermediate 'mesogranular' structure was found, with a characteristic scale of 3–10 Mm. We have obtained a three-hour sequence of observations at the Pic du Midi observatory which shows the evolution of mesogranules from appearance to disappearance with unprecedented clarity. We see that the supergranules, which are known to carry along (advect) the granules with their convective motion, also advect the mesogranules to their boundaries. This process controls the evolution and disappearance of mesogranules.AT least two Earth-sized planets have been discovered around the 6-ms pulsar PSR1257 +12 (ref. 1), which, like millisecond pulsars in general, has probably been spun up by accretion of material from a companion star. In addition, two 'star-vaporizing' millisecond pulsars (SVPs), 1957 + 20 (ref. 2) and 1744–24A (refs 3, 4), show evidence of mass outflows from their low-mass companions, which are thought to be vaporized by pulsar radiation. Building on this, we suggest a model for the formation of planets around millisecond pulsars such as 1257 + 12, which no longer have stellar companions. We present detailed hydrodynamical models which suggest that planet formation can occur either in a low-mass X-ray binary progenitor to a progenitor of an SVP when the neutron star is accreting material driven off its companion by X-ray irradiation (refs 5, 6), or after a pulsar has formed and is vaporizing its companion^5,7–9. In both cases a circum-binary disk is created in which planets can form on a timescale of 10^5–10^6 years^10 (which is short compared with the binary evolution time-scales of the parent systems) and the planets can survive a second phase in which the companion star moves towards the pulsar and is completely vaporized^5.Boffin: A Personal Story of the Early Days of Radar, Radio-astronomy and Quantum Optics. ByR. Hanbury Brown. Adam Hilger/AlP: 1991. Pp. 184. $35, £17.50.The Hidden Universe. ByRoger J. Tayler. ElliS Norwood: 1991. Pp. 213. £30 (hbk), £15.99 (pbk).Windscale 1957: Anatomy of a Nuclear Accident. By Lorna Arnold. Macmillan/St Martin's Press: 1992. Pp. 235. £40, $55.THE faint IRAS source 10214 + 4724, identified^1 with a distant galaxy at redshift z = 2.286, is one of the most intrinsically luminous objects in the Universe, with L ≈10^14 L _⊙ (where L _⊙ is the solar luminosity). The remarkable detection of emission from neutral CO (ref. 2) leads, by comparison with similar detections in nearby galaxies, to an estimate of 2–6 x 10^11 M _⊙ for the mass of neutral molecular hydrogen in this galaxy. This is 30–90 times less than the estimate given in ref. 2, but still comparable to the total mass (gas, dust and stars) of a large spiral galaxy. This gas mass is consistent with the dynamical mass of the galaxy inferred from the CO emission line-width. The CO line luminosity is twenty times larger than is seen in nearby ( z < 0.3) ultra-luminous ( L >3xl0^11 M _⊙) galaxies^3–5. Although it is extremely gas-rich, with a higher CO luminosity than any other galaxy, the infrared to CO luminosity ratio of 10214 + 4724 is twice that of most infrared-luminous galaxies, and ∼30 times higher than that of normal spirals. Its infrared colours and high infrared/CO luminosity ratio indicate that 10214 + 4724 is similar to nearby ultra-luminous galaxies^5 that are known to be merging. This galaxy is a primaeval molecular galaxy with the mass of a large spiral, but with most of the mass in molecular gas rather than stars.Fas antigen is a cell-surface protein that mediates apoptosis. It is expressed in various tissues including the thymus and has structural homology with a number of cell-surface receptors, including tumour necrosis factor receptor and nerve growth factor receptor. Mice carrying the lymphoprolifer-ation ( Ipr ) mutation have defects in the Fas antigen gene. The Ipr mice develop lymphadenopathy and suffer from a systemic lupus erythematosus-like autoimmune disease, indicating an important role for Fas antigen in the negative selection of autoreactive T cells in the thymus.Is there more to the continuing search for prime numbers than the curiosity that sustains the enthusiasm of stamp-collectors? The discovery of the largest so far (at Harwell in Britain and by Cray Research) refers.A crude estimate of the number of taxonomists shows a striking mismatch between the geographical location of practitioners and biological diversity. At a time when resources are limited, what needs to be done?The difference between the travel times of com-pressional waves that turn in the Earth's liquid outer core (PKP-BC) and those that run in the solid inner core (PKIKP-DF) is primarily sensitive to structure near the inner-core boundary. Such differential travel times measured from short-period waveforms are consistent with small-amplitude deviations from radial symmetry except when ray paths are nearly parallel to the Earth's spin axis. These near-axial paths consistently produce large travel-time anomalies, providing compelling evidence for large-amplitude, axisymmetric aniso-tropy in the outermost portions of the inner core.Electronic publishing and its twin, electronic networking, would seem to have arrived. But have they been pushed too hard, too soon?Mcllraith would be pleased — one hundred years after his documentation of nephrogenic diabetes insipidus, the pursuit of the molecular pathology behind this condition has finally succeeded.THE three-dimensional crystal structure of the Escherichia coli methionine represser, MetJ, complexed with a DNA operator fragment is described in an accompanying article^1. The complex exhibits several novel features of DNA–protein interaction. DNA sequence recognition is achieved largely by hydrogen-bond contacts between the bases and amino-acid side chains located on a β -ribbon, a mode of recognition previously hypothesized on the basis of modelling of idealized β -strands and DNA^2, and mutagenesis of the Salmonella phage P22 repressers Arc and Mnt^3. The complex comprises a pair of MetJ represser dimers which bind to adjacent met -box sites on the DNA, and contact each other by means of a pair of antiparallel α-helices. Here we assess the importance of these contacts, and also of contacts that would be made between the C-helices of the protein, and DNA in a previous model of the complex^4, by studying mutations aimed at disrupting them. The role of the carboxy-terminal helix face in operator binding was unclear, but we demonstrate that recognition of operator sequences occurs through side chains in the β -strand motif and that dimer–dimer interactions are required for effective repression.T CELLS recognize foreign protein antigens in the form of peptide fragments bound tightly to the outer aspect of molecules encoded by the major histocompatibility complex (MHC). Most of the amino-acid differences that distinguish MHC allelic variants line the peptide-binding cleft, and different allelic forms of MHC molecules bind distinct peptides^1,2. It has been demonstrated that peptide-binding to MHC class I involves anchor residues in certain positions and that antigenic peptides associated with MHC class I exhibit allele-specific structural motifs^3. We have previously reported an analysis of MHC class II-associated peptide sequences^4. Here we extend this analysis and show that certain amino-acid residues occur at particular positions in the sequence of peptides binding to a given MHC class II molecule. These sequence motifs require the amino terminus to be shifted one or two positions to obtain alignment; such shifts occur naturally for a single peptide sequence without qualitatively altering CD4 T-cell recognition.THE Myc family proteins are thought to be involved in transcription^1,2 because they have both a carboxy-terminal basic–helix–loop–helix–zipper (bHLH-Z) domain, common to a large class of transcription factors^3, and an amino-terminal fragment which, for c-Myc, has transactivating function when assayed in chimaeric constructs^4. In addition, c-, N- and L-Myc proteins heterodimerize, in vitro and in vivo , with the bHLH-Z protein Max^5–8. In vitro , Max homodimerizes but preferentially associates with Myc, which homodimerizes poorly^5,6. Furthermore Myc-Max heterodimers specifically bind the nucleotide sequence CACGTG^9 with higher affinity than either homodimer alone^5. The identification of Max and the specific DNA-binding activities of Myc and Max provides an opportunity for directly testing the transcriptional activities of these proteins in mammalian cells. We report here that Myc overexpression activates, whereas Max overexpression represses, transcription of a reporter gene. Max-induced repression is relieved by overexpression of c-Myc. Repression requires the DNA-binding domain of Max, whereas relief of repression requires the dimerization and transcriptional activation activities of Myc. Both effects require Myc–Max-binding sites in the reporter gene.THE c- myc protein (Myc) contains an amino-terminal transcriptional activation domain^1 and a carboxy-terminal basic helix–loop–helix–leucine zipper (bHLH-Z) domain^2–5 that directs dimerization of Myc with its partner, the max protein (Max), and promotes DNA binding to sites containing a CACGTG core consensus sequence^6–9. Despite these characteristics and the observation that Myc can modulate gene expression^4,5,10, a direct role for Myc or Max as transcription factors has never been demonstrated. Here we use Saccharomyces cerevisiae as an in vivo model system to show that the Myc protein is a sequence-specific transcriptional activator whose DNA binding is strictly dependent on dimerization with Max. Transactivation is mediated by the amino-terminal domain of Myc. We find that Max homodimers bind to the same DNA sequence as Myc + Max but that they fail to transactivate and thus can antagonize Myc + Max function. We also show that the Max HLH-Z domain has a higher affinity for the Myc HLH-Z domain than for itself, and suggest that the heterodimeric Myc + Max activator forms preferentially at equilibrium.CLONING and expression of voltage-activated potassium ion-channel complementary DNAs^1–4 has confirmed that these channels are composed of four identical subunits^5, each containing a voltage sensor. It has been generally accepted that the voltage sensors must reach a permissive state through one or more confor-mational ('gating') transitions before the channel can open^6,7. To test whether each subunit gates independently, we have constructed cDNAs encoding four subunits on a single polypeptide chain, enabling us to specify the subunit stoichiometry. The gating of heterotetramers made up from combinations of subunits with different gating phenotypes strongly suggests that individual sub-units gate cooperatively, rather than independently^8. Nonindependent subunit gating is consistent with measurements of the kinetics of K^+-channel gating currents^9–13 and in line with the widespread subunit cooperativity observed in other multisubunit proteins^14.HERBIG Ae/Be objects are young stars of intermediate mass (3–5 solar masses) surrounded by reflection nebulae composed of dust and gas remaining from the star-forming cloud^1–3. Scattering by dust particles strongly polarizes light from the circumstellar nebula. Using imaging polarimetry in excellent conditions of atmospheric seeing (0.4 arcsec) from the La Palma observatory, we have resolved an optically thick disk around the Herbig Ae/Be object V376 Cassiopeiae. Its effective radius increases from 0.8 arc-sec in the near infrared (∼1 μm wavelength) to 1.2 arcsec at optical wavelengths (∼550 nm) because of the higher opacity of the disk material at shorter wavelengths. The corresponding linear disk radius is 500–750 AU, about an order of magnitude larger than our Solar System. The polarization behaviour within a 0.5-arcsec diameter circle around the companion star V633 Cas suggests the presence of a more compact (<0.2 arcsec) unresolved disk, possibly a protoplanetary disk, around this star. The presence of circumstellar disks around these two pre-main-sequence stars in the same star-forming cloud suggests that such disks may be common features of early stellar evolution.COSMIC structure is thought to have arisen by the gravitational amplification of small density fluctuations in the early Universe. The evolution of fluctuations with specified magnitude and spectrum is controlled by a few fundamental parameters: the cosmic density Ω, the cosmological constant Λ, and the relative contributions of radiation and of dark and visible matter to the density of the Universe. Maps and statistical descriptions of the large-scale distribution of galaxies, from the QDOT IRAS redshift survey^1–7, along with the COBE measurements of the microwave background fluctuations^8,9 have recently transformed our understanding of large-scale structure, for which the growth of fluctuations is linear and well understood. These two sets of data effectively determine the density fluctuation spectrum in the present Universe on scales from 10 to 1,000 Mpc. Here we examine an array of structure formation models, and show that most are ruled out by the COBE and QDOT observations. We find only one completely satisfactory model, in which the Universe has density Ω = 1, with 69% in the form of cold dark matter, 30% provided by hot dark matter in the form of a stable neutrino with mass 7.5 eV, and 1% baryonic. Certain 'grand unified theories'^10,11 may provide a physical basis for such, hybrid models. A Hubble constant of 50 km s^−1 Mpc^−1 is preferred to one of 100.A UNIVERSE whose density is dominated by cold dark matter (CDM) has been considered the standard model for large-scale structure formation^1, but it has had difficulty in matching the relatively quiet velocity field of galaxies^2 and the observed structure on very large scales^3. By contrast, models with a mixture of COM and hot dark matter (HDM) have more power on large scales^4–9, and seem more able to fit the excess large-scale power seen in galaxy surveys^3 and the microwave background fluctuations recently measured by COBE^10,11. Using high-resolution numerical simulations, we examine the formation of structure in a mixed dark matter model containing 70% COM and 30% HDM, the latter in the form of massive neutrinos. This model behaves like a CDM model in which the biasing factor (the relative magnitude of structure in the dark and visible components) varies from 2.5 on small scales to <1 on large scales, and can provide a consistent explanation of both the shape of the observed fluctuation spectrum and the difference in estimates of the cosmic density, Ω, on small and large scales.SYNAPSIN I is a synaptic vesicle-associated phosphoprotein that is involved in the modulation of neurotransmitter release^1. Ca^2+/calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II, which phosphory-lates two sites in the carboxy-terminal region of synapsin I, causes synapsin I to dissociate from synaptic vesicles^2 and increases nerotransmitter release^3,4. Conversely, the dephosphorylated form of synapsin I, but not the form phosphorylated by Ca^2+/cal-modulin-dependent protein kinase II, inhibits neurotransmitter release^4–6. The amino-terminal region of synapsin I interacts with membrane phospholipids, whereas the C-terminal region binds to a protein component of synaptic vesicles^7,8. Here we demonstrate that the binding of the C-terminal region of synapsin I involves the regulatory domain of a synaptic vesicle-associated form of Ca^2+/calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II. Our results indicate that this form of the kinase functions both as a binding protein for synapsin I, and as an enzyme that phosphorylates synapsin I and promotes its dissociation from the vesicles.FUNCTIONALLY equivalent genetic material can be labelled by an epigenetic marking process and used differentially depending on whether its origin is maternal or paternal^1. This phenomenon is known as genomic imprinting and is manifested at either the chromosomal or gene level. Genomic imprinting seems to play an important role in cancer predisposition syndromes^2–5, and phenotypic consequences are evident in constitutional deletion syndromes and uniparental disomies^1. Moreover, there seems to be a preferential retention of paternal alleles in sporadic tumours such as Wilms' tumour^6, rhabdomyosarcoma^7, osteosarcoma^8 and retinoblastoma^9. To investigate whether chromosomes involved in acquired abnormalities of haematologic neoplasms show a similar 'parent of origin' bias, we studied the inheritance of the translocated chromosomes 9 and 22 in cases of Philadelphia-chromosome-positive leukaemia, using unique specific chromosome band polymorphisms. Here we show that the translocated chromosome 9 was of paternal origin, whereas the translocated chromosomes 22 were derived exclusively from the maternal copy, in 11 cases with reliable polymorphisms. Our data therefore provide evidence that imprinting phenomena may play an important role in acquired tumour-specific chromosome rearrangements.INHERITANCE of mitochondrial DNA in animals was thought to be strictly maternal^1,2. Recently, evidence for incidental paternal mtDNA leakage was obtained in hybrid crosses of Drosophila ^3,4 and mice^5. In mice, the frequency of paternal mtDNA contributions was estimated at 10^−4, compared with maternal contributions. The common occurrence in the marine mussel Mytilus of heteroplasmic individuals with two or more types of highly diverged mtDNA molecules was interpreted as strong evidence for biparental mtDNA inheritance by some^6, but not by others^7. We report here results from pair-matings involving two species of mussels, Mytilus edulis and Mytilus trossulus . Extensive contribution of paternal mtDNA, amounting to several orders of magnitude higher than that inferred for Drosophila or mice, was observed in both intra-and interspecific crosses.BROOD parasites and their hosts are thought to engage in a revolutionary arms race in which parasitism selects for adaptive defences by the host (such as egg rejection), which in turn select for counter-adaptations by the parasite (such as egg mimicry)^1,2. Soler and Mø11er have tested whether the duration of coevolution (measured by the duration of sympatry at three different geo-graphic areas) in a host–cuckoo system affected egg-rejection behaviour by hosts^3. They found that the extent of both rejection and recognition of parasitic eggs covaried positively with the duration of sympatry. Here we show that, in the absence of strong historical evidence, field data do not support the existence of variations in the duration of sympatry at the two areas where the distributional ranges of the cuckoo and its hosts overlap. The reported differences in egg rejection by hosts might alternatively reflect flexible behavioural responses to the presence of the adult parasite near the nest.The crystal structure of the met represser–operator complex shows two dimeric repressor molecules bound to adjacent sites 8 base pairs apart on an 18-base-pair DNA fragment. Sequence specificity is achieved by insertion of double-stranded antiparallel protein β -ribbons into the major groove of B-form DNA, with direct hydrogen-bonding between amino-acid side chains and the base pairs. The repressor also recognizes sequence-dependent distortion or flexibility of the operator phosphate backbone, conferring specificity even for inaccessible base pairs.The retinoblastoma gene, a prototypic tumour-suppressor gene, encodes a nuclear phosphoprotein (Rb). To understand better the role of Rb in development and in tumorigenesis, mice with an insertional mutation in exon 20 of the Rb-1 locus were generated. Homozygous mutants die before the 16th embryonic day with multiple defects. The haematopoietic system is abnormal; there is a significant increase in the number of immature nucleated erythrocytes. In the nervous system, ectopic mitoses and massive cell death are found, particularly in the hindbrain. All spinal ganglion cells die, but the neural retina is unaffected. Transfer of the human retinoblastoma (RB) mini-transgene into the mutant mice corrects the developmental defects. Thus, Rb is essential for normal mouse development.Local ozone reductions approaching 50% in magnitude were observed during the Antarctic spring in the 11–13 and 25–30 km altitude regions over South Pole and McMurdo Stations in 1991. These reductions, at altitudes where depletion has not been observed previously, resulted in a late September total ozone column 10–15% lower than previous years. The added depletion in the lower stratosphere was observed to coincide with penetration into the polar vortex of highly enhanced concentrations of aerosol particles from volcanic activity in 1991.Low Temperature Physics: An Introduction for Scientists and Engineers. By P. V. E. McClintock, D. Meredith and J. K. Wigmore. Blackie: 1992. Pp. 296. á£65.Superconductivity: Its Historical Roots and Development from Mercury to the Ceramic Oxides. By Per Fridtjof Dahl. American Institute of Physics: 1992. Pp. 406. $55.The New Anthropomorphism. By J. S. Kennedy. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 194. á£27.95, $54.95 (hbk); á£10.95, $17.95 (pbk).NONLINEAR optical phenomena form the basis for all-optical devices such as optically bistable switches and nonlinear directional couplers^1. The suitability of a material for these device applications requires a large magnitude of the relevant nonlinear effect (in this case, the third-order optical susceptibility & psi;^(3), which is related to the intensity-dependent refractive index) and a small signal attenu-ation arising from the linear optical absorption. Conjugated organic molecules and polymers are of particular interest in this context: the delocalized π-electron systems of these materials give rise to relatively large values of & psi;^(3) with extremely fast response times, in wavelength regimes where there is minimal background absorption. Previous theoretical studies^2 suggested a new enhance-ment mechanism for the nonlinear optical processes in these materials through population of the electronic excited states. Here we show that by optically exciting a linear conjugated molecule at one wavelength into an electronic excited state for a sufficient length of time to perform the nonlinear optical measurement, the value of & psi;^(3) can be enhanced by more than two orders of magnitude without increasing optical absorption at the probe wavelength.MAGNETIC flux at the surface of the Sun is predominantly concentrated in discrete areas with kilogauss field strengths^1. Except for sunspots, these areas are too small to have been resolved by conventional observations. These magnetic flux tubes are an essential part of the physics of the activity and heating of the outer atmosphere of the Sun and other late-type stars^2, but although their average properties have been studied in considerable detail^3,4, direct observations of them have been lacking because of turbulence in the Earth's atmosphere, which limits resolution to ∼400 km. Using a newly developed technique of speckle inter-ferometry^5, we have obtained simultaneous direct observations of the white-light and magnetic field signature of flux tubes. Individual flux tubes are seen, with resolved diameters of ∼200 km and continuum brightness contrast of at least +30%. Magnetic features larger than 300 km in size tend, however, to be darker than their surroundings.SIGNIFICANT progress has been made in recent years in the imaging of star-forming regions and in the theoretical modelling of the process of star formation^1, but the physical process that determines the mass spectrum of stars remains unclear. Here we propose a model in which the protostar phase ends when the protostar embedded in a condensing core of molecular gas interacts with another protostar or star, and is ejected from its core. Such interactions must be important if stars preferentially form in dense but ultimately unbound protoclusters. In a simple model in which protostars accrete at a constant rate, the final distribution of stellar masses asymptotically approaches a simple universal distribution which is very similar to the observed mass function of stars. The general form of the mass function in this model is determined by a competition between accretion and collision rates, which provides a qualitative explanation for the differences in star formation in different environments (such as the galactic disk, globular clusters and the galactic halo).Two examples of eclipsing pulsars, PSRs 1957 + 20 and 1744 − 25, have been discovered and studied^1–7. In these systems, radiation from a pulsar drives a particle wind from a low-mass degenerate companion, creating an outflow which eclipses the radio pulsar once each orbital period. Ultimately the secondaries in both of these systems may be eroded away entirely, but the process by which the radiative wind ablates the smaller star remains controver-sial. Here we report the detection of soft X-rays, of ∼1 keV energy, from PSR1957 +20. This high-energy radiation, also observed by Kulkarni et al .^8, should be a valuable diagnostic of the wind in this recycled pulsar system. Possible sources of the X-ray emission are the interstellar nebula driven by the pulsar wind, the interaction between the pulsar and its evaporating companion, and the pulsar itself. The small apparent size of the X-ray object argues against the first of these possibilities, and suggests that the X-rays are produced within the binary.IN the binary millisecond pulsar system PSR1957 + 20 (ref. 1), a wind from the pulsar is ablating a low-mass (0.02 solar mass) companion and also inflating a local nebula^2 confined by the ram pressure of the interstellar medium. We have detected X-ray emission from this system, using the Rosat satellite. X-ray emission is expected from the pulsar magnetosphere and the two shocks of the pulsar wind, one at the companion and the other inside the nebula. Our observations show that less than 20% of the pulsar's spin-down luminosity can be carried away by electrons and positrons with Lorentz factor γ ≈ 10^5, and less than 5% by elec-trons and positrons with γ ≈ 10^8. Neither of these fluxes can provide the penetrating flux required to heat the companion's photosphere. These observations and those in the accompanying paper by Fruchter et al .^3 represent the first direct diagnostics of the relativistic wind from a weakly magnetized pulsar, and suggest that the wind differs substantially from that of the more highly magnetized Crab pulsar.Horse Power: A History of the Horse and the Donkey in Human Societies. By Juliet Glutton-Brock. Harvard University Press/Natural History Museum: 1992. Pp. 192. $29.95, á£19.95.An article with an arresting title puts forward a novel way of resolving the question whether the matter that holds the Universe together is ‘cold’ or ‘hot’ by showing that one kind of particle might fill both roles.The temptation to cut back on research in the current financial crisis should be resisted.The uncertainty caused by the French referendum on Europe last Sunday could threaten many institutions of European collaboration. Responsibility for avoiding that outcome rests with the British.Featured this week — a pocket-sized PC, workstations and a host of software programs for protein research, and graphics and data analysis.THE candidate oncogene bcl-3 was discovered as a translocation into the immunoglobulin alphalocus in some cases of B-cell chronic lymphocytic leukaemias^1. The protein Bcl-3 contains seven so-called ankyrin repeats. Similar repeat motifs are found in a number of diverse regulatory proteins but the motifs of Bcl-3 are most closely related to those found in 1κB proteins in which the ankyrin repeat domain is thought to be directly involved in inhibition of NF-κB activity. No biological function has yet been described for Bcl-3, but it was noted recently^2 that Bcl-3 interferes with DNA-binding of the p50 subunit of NF-κB in vitro. Here we demonstrate that Bcl-3 can aid κB site-dependent transcription in vivo by counteracting the inhibitory effects of p50/NF-κB homodimers. Bcl-3 may therefore aid activation of select NF-κB-regulated genes, including those of the human immunodeficiency virus.THE kinase activity of pp60^ c-src is specifically and transiently increased during mitosis and repressed during interphase^1. Loss of cell-cycle control of pp60^ c-src occurs on mutation of Tyr 527 to Phe or when pp60^ c-src is associated with polyoma middle-T-antigen, and these conditions result in cell transformation or tumorigenesis^2,3. In both cases, pp60^ c-src has elevated kinase activity which is maintained throughout the cell cycle and accom-panied by dephosphorylation of the carboxy-terminal negative regulatory^4–7 Tyr 527 site, or mimicry of Tyr 527 dephosphoryla-tion in the case of the mutant. Here we report that overexpression of the receptor-like protein tyrosine phosphatase PTPα^8–10 results in persistent activation of pp60^ c-src kinase, with concomitant cell transformation and tumorigenesis. In PTPα-overexpressing cells, the pp60^ c-src kinase activation is accompanied by dephosphorylation at Tyr 527, and direct dephosphorylation of this site by purified PTPα occurs in vitro. Our results suggest that PTPα is involved in the regulation of cell proliferation, exerting at least some of its effects through pp60^ c-src kinase, and has oncogenic capability when overexpressed.ELONGATION factor-lα (EF-lα), an essential component of the eukaryotic translational apparatus, is a GTP-binding protein that catalyses the binding of aminoacyl-transfer RNAs to the ribosome^1–3. Expression of the EF-lα gene decreases towards the end of the lifespans of mouse and human fibroblasts^4,5, but forced expression of EF-lα prolongs the lifespan of Drosophila melanogaster ^6. Eukaryotic initiation factor-4E, another component of the translational machinery, is mitogenic or oncogenic when constitutively expressed in some mammalian cells^7–9. Thus, components of the protein synthesis apparatus seem to be involved in the control of cell proliferation. Using expression cloning, we have isolated a complementary DNA clone from a BALB/c 3T3 mouse fibroblast variant, A31-I-13 (ref. 10), which specifies a factor determining the susceptibility of BALB/c 3T3 to chemically and physically induced transformation. Here we report that the factor is EF-lα and that its constitutive expression causes BALB/c 3T3 A31-I-1 (ref. 10), C3H10T1/2 (ref. 11) and Syrian hamster SHOK^12 fibroblasts to become highly susceptible to transforma-tion induced by 3-methylcholanthrene and ultraviolet light. EF-lα messenger RNA is also constitutively expressed in a quiescent culture of the highly susceptible variant A31-1-13. We conclude that the removal of regulation of the expression of these com-ponents of the translational machinery may predispose cells to become more susceptible to malignant transformation.SUCCESSFUL intrathymic differentiation of αβTCR^+ T cells depends on positive selection of CD4^+CD8^+ thymocytes by thymic major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecules^1–9. Positive selection allows the maturation of only those T cells capable of restricted antigen recognition in the context of the hosts' MHC alleles. Studies of normal or T-cell receptor-transgenic mice engrafted with MHC-different bone marrow or thymuses support the conclusion that positive selection is directed by MHC molecules expressed on non-haematopoietic cells, presumably thymic epi-thelial cells^1–3,8–10. Here we. present contrary evidence that class I MHC molecules expressed by haematopoietic cell types direct positive selection of CD8^+ T cells, though at a reduced rate compared with positive selection directed by thymic epithelial cells. The identity of cell types that direct positive selection bears directly on mechanistic models of the process, including the idea that thymic epithelial cell MHC molecules uniquely present specialized peptides that mediate positive selection, and the notion that thymic epithelial cells express unique differentiation-inducing cell surface molecules.HUMAN retinoblastomas can occur both as hereditary and as sporadic cases. Knudson's proposal^1 that they result from two mutational events, of which one is present in the germ line in hereditary cases, has been confirmed by more recent molecular analysis, which has shown both events to involve loss or mutational inactivation of the same gene, RB-1 (ref. 2). RB-1 heterozygosity also predisposes to osteosarcoma, and RB-1 allele losses are seen in sporadic lung, breast, prostate and bladder carcinomas^3–7. RB-1 is expressed in most, if not all, tissues and codes for a nuclear phosphoprotein which becomes hypophosphorylated in the GO growth arrest state and in the Gl phase of the cell cycle^2. To gain a further insight ino the role of RB-1 we and other groups^8,9 have generated mice carrying an inactivated allele of the homologous gene, Rb-1 (ref. 10), by gene targeting^11. We report here that young heterozygous mice do not appear abnormal and do not develop retinoblastoma at a detectable frequency. However, homozygous mutant embryos fail to reach term and show a number of abnormalities in neural and haematopoietic development. Broadly similar results are reported by the other groups^8,9.CEREBRAL deposition of the β-amyloid peptide (Aβ) is an invariant feature of Alzheimer's disease. Since the original isola-tion and characterization of αβ (ref. 1) and the subsequent cloning of its precursor protein^2–5, no direct evidence for the actual production of discrete Aβ has been reported^6–11. Here we investigate whether Aβ is present in human biological fluids using antibodies specific for an epitope within Aβ that spans the site of normal constitutive cleavage^12,13. These antibodies were used to construct a sandwich type enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay that detects Aβ in cerebrospinal fluid, plasma and conditioned medium of human mixed-brain cells grown in vitro (see also ref. 14). By affinity chromatography, we have purified and sequenced Aβ and a novel Aβ fragment from human cerebrospinal fluid and conditioned medium of human mixed-brain cell cultures. These findings demonstrate that Aβ is produced and released both in vivo and in vitro . These observations offer new opportunities for developing diagnostic tests for Alzheimer's disease and therapeutic strategies aimed at reducing the cerebral deposition of Aβ.ALZHEIMER'S disease is characterized by the extracellular deposition in the brain and its blood vessels of insoluble aggregates of the amyloid β-peptide (Aβ), a fragment, of about 40 amino acids in length, of the integral membrane protein β-amyloid precursor protein (β-APP)^1. The mechanism of extracellular accumulation of αβ in brain is unknown and no simple in vitro or in vivo model systems that produce extracellular Aβ have been described. We report here the unexpected identification of the 4K ( M _r 4,000) Aβ and a truncated form of Aβ (∼3K) in media from cultures of primary cells and untransfected and β-APP-transfected cell lines grown under normal conditions. These peptides were immunoprecipitated readily from culture medium by Aβ-specific antibodies and their identities confirmed by sequencing. The con-cept that pathological processes are responsible for the production of Aβ must now be reassessed in light of the observation that Aβ is produced in soluble form in vitro and in vivo ^2 during normal cellular metabolism. Further, these findings provide the basis for using simple cell culture systems to identify drugs that block the formation or release of Aβ, the primary protein constituent of the senile plaques of Alzheimer's disease.X-LINKED recessive Duchenne muscular dystrophy (DMD) is caused by the absence of dystrophin, a membrane cytoskeletal protein^1,2. Dystrophin is associated with a large oligomeric com-plex of sarcolemmal glycoproteins^3–10. The dystrophin–glycoprotein complex has been proposed to span the sarcolemma to provide a link fyetween the subsarcolemmal cytoskeleton and the extracellular matrix component, laminin^7,9. In DMD, the absence of dystrophin leads to a large reduction in all of the dystrophin-associated proteins^4,9,10. We have investigated the possibility that a deficiency of a dystrophin-associated protein could be the cause of severe childhood autosomal recessive mus-cular dystrophy (SCARMD) with a DMD-like phenotype^11–14. Here we report the specific deficiency of the 50K dystrophin-associated glycoprotein (M_r 50,000) in sarcolemma of SCARMD patients. Therefore, the loss of this glycoprotein is a common denominator of the pathological process leading to muscle cell necrosis in two forms of muscular dystrophy, DMD and SCARMD.THE cellular phosphoprotein p53 inhibits progression through the mammalian cell cycle^1,2. Both p53 alleles are frequently mutated in human tumours^3,4, indicating that p53 is a tumour suppressor. Recent studies have suggested that p53 functions as a transcrip-tional activator5–8, but the significance of this activity in cell-cycle control has not been established. The adenovirus 2 (Ad2) early IB (E1B) 55K protein binds to p53 in transformed cells^9 and contributes to oncogenic transformation by Ad2 (refs 10-12). Here we report that mutants of E1B 55K and wild-type Adl2 E1B 54K proteins show a strong correlation between their ability to inhibit p53-mediated transcriptional activation and their ability to cooperate with adenovirus El A protein in the transformation of primary cells. These results indicate that p53 probably inhibits cell cycling by functioning as a transcription factor.THE CD40 surface molecule is a 277-amino-acid glycoprotein expressed on B lymphocytes, epithelial cells and some carcinoma cell lines. Monoclonal antibodies against CD40 mediate a variety of effects on B lymphocytes, including induction of intercellular adhesion^1,2, short- and long-term proliferation^3–5, differentiation^6,7 and enhanced tyrosine phosphorylation of proteins^8. In addition, germinal centre centrocytes are prevented from undergoing apop-tosis by activation through CD40 and receptor for antigen^9. These data indicate that CD40 could be a receptor for an unknown ligand with important functions in B-cell development and activation. This hypothesis is strengthened by the homology of the extracellular region of the CD40 molecule^10with a family of cell-surface glycoproteins^11,12that includes the receptors for nerve growth factor^13,14 and tumour necrosis factor^11,15,16. Here we report the cloning of a ligand for CD40 that is expressed on the cell surface of activated T cells and mediates B-cell proliferation in the absence of co-stimulus, as well as IgE production in the presence of interIeukin-4.Up to a point, the US Congress may be able to enlist the help of journals in cleaning up the record of research.Last week's meeting of the grandest finance ministers sought with rhetoric to conjure recovery from recession from thin air, in the face of all the evidence that recovery will be long postponed.STUDIES on transgenic mice expressing immunoglobulins against self-antigens^1–6 have shown that self-tolerance is maintained by active elimination (clonal deletion)^1–3,7, functional inactivation (clonal anergy)^4,5,8 of self-reactive B cells, or a combination of both^6. We have established and characterized a transgenic mouse line expressing an anti-erythrocyte autoantibody6. In contrast to other autoantibody transgenic lines, about 50% of the animals of this transgenic line suffer from autoimmune disease, indicating a loss of self-tolerance. Here we show that peritoneal Ly-1 B cells (also known as B-l cells^9) are responsible for this autoimmune disease in our transgenic mice. A few self-reactive Ly-1 B cells that have somehow escaped the deletion mechanism expand in the peritoneum because of the absence of self-antigen. These Ly-1 B cells are eliminated in vivo by apoptosis once exposed to self-antigen. On the basis of these results we propose a novel autoantibody production mechanism whereby self-reactive B cellssequestered in compartments free of self-antigens may survive, proliferate and be activated for generation of pathogenic auto-antibodies in autoimmune diseases.CALCIUM entry through voltage-activated Ca^2+ channels is important in regulating many cellular functions. Activation of these channels in many cell types results in feedback regulation of channel activity^1. Mechanisms linking Ca^2+ channel activity with its downregulation have been described^2,3, but little is known of the events responsible for the enhancement of Ca^2+ current that in many cells follows Ca^2+ channel activation and an increase in cytoplasmic Ca^2+ concentration^4,5. Here we investigate how this positive feedback is achieved in single smooth muscle cells. We find that in these cells voltage-activated calcium current is persistently but reversibly enhanced after periods of activation. This persistent enhancement of the Ca^2+ current is mediated by activation of calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II because it is blocked when either the rise in cytoplasmic Ca^2+ is inhibited or activation of calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II is prevented by specific peptide inhibitors of calcium-calmodulin or calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II itself. This mechanism may be important in different forms of Ca^2+ current potentiation, such as those that depend on prior Ca^2+ channel activation or are a result of agonist-induced release of Ca^2+ from internal stores.THE glutamate receptor (GluR) channel plays a key part in brain function^1,2. Among GluR channel subtypes, the NMDA (JV-methyl-D-aspartate) receptor channel which is highly permeable to Ca^2+ is essential for the synaptic plasticity underlying memory, learning and development^3,4. Furthermore, abnormal activation of the NMDA receptor channel may trigger the neuronal cell death observed in various brain disorders^5,6. A complementary DNA encoding a subunit of the rodent NMDA receptor channel (NMDAR1 or ζ1) has been cloned and its functional properties investigated^7,8. Here we report the identification and primary structure of a novel mouse NMDA receptor channel subunit, designated as ɛl, after cloning and sequencing the cDNA. The ɛ l subunit shows 11-18% amino-acid sequence identity with rodent GluR channel subunits that have been characterized so far and has structural features common to neurotransmitter-gated ion channels. Expression from cloned cDNAs of the ɛ I subunit together with the ζ1 subunit in Xenopus oocytes yields functional GluR channels with high activity and characteristics of the NMDA receptor channel. Furthermore, the heteromeric NMDA receptor channel can be activated by glycine alone.AMONG things that most strikingly distinguish modern humans from other hominids and the rest of the animal kingdom is the ability to represent things and events pictorially. Complex paintings of the type discovered in the Altamira, El Castillo, Niaux and Lascaux caves represent an important stepping stone in the cultural evolution of humankind. Until now dates were derived from style or dated remains left by prehistoric visitors and could be biased by prolonged occupation or visits unrelated to painting activity. Here we report the first radiocarbon dates for the charcoal used to draw stylistically similar bisons in these caves: 14,000 ± 400 yr BP in the Spanish caves of Altamira, 12,990 ± 200 yr BP in El Castillo, and 12,890 ± 160 yr BP for a bison of different style in the French Pyrenean cave of Niaux. Our results demonstrate the imprecise nature of stylistic dating and show that painting dates derived from remains of human activities should be used with caution.EXPERIMENTAL studies have so far suggested that an insignificant amount of neutral nickel (Ni^o) is soluble in silicate melts^1–4. This has led to difficulties in explaining the high concentrations of nickel in the modern Earth's mantle, because virtually all nickel (along with other siderophile elements such as cobalt and the noble metals) would have been removed from the mantle when the Earth's metallic core separated from it at low oxygen fugacity^1,2,5. Several models have been proposed to explain the Earth's siderophile element budget^1,6–8, each based on the belief that the solubility of neutral metal species in silicate melts is negligible. Here, however, I present experimental evidence indicating that the solubility of at least one neutral siderophile element, nickel, is not negligible. Because the presence of Ni° will affect the partitioning of nickel between silicate melt and metal, and between silicate melt and crystalline silicate phases, these results have implications for our understanding of petrogenetic processes that take place in conditions of low oxygen fugacity, where Ni^o is an important part of total nickel. In particular, the Ni^o solubilities found in the present study are large enough to explain the anomalously high concentrations of nickel in the Earth's mantle if the temperature of the early mantle was sufficiently high (≳ 1,800°C).ORGANIC molecules preserved in sediments, especially long-chain alkenones, can preserve and record evidence of past climate variations^1–5. A dependence of alkenone distributions on temperature has been recognized in cultures of the unicellular coccolithophorid alga Emiliania huxleyi _1,6, which survives in sediments and water-column participates^6. Through this dependence, stratigraphic profiles of the degree of alkenone unsaturation (expressed as U ^k_37, values^1) have been shown in several oceanic settings to reflect long-term changes in sea surface temperatures associated with glacial–interglacial cycles^1–5. Here we show that annual variations in alkenone unsaturation in laminated sediments from the Santa Barbara basin, off the shore of California, reveal increases in water temperatures which can be linked directly to the observed sequence of El Niño events in the twentieth century^7. The range and variations in water temperatures, calculated from U ^k_37 values (12.8–15.2 °C) using the relationship established from culture experiments6'8, broadly correspond to the annually averaged temperatures (11.3–15.2 °C) measured intermittently by the CalCOFI programme at 20 m depth between 1953 and 1984. These results show that, in favourable settings, alkenone unsaturation profiles can provide an annually resolved record of oceanic temperaturechanges, and may constitute a valuable tool for describing and evaluating the history of global climate variability and change.THE standard carbon-arc synthesis for fullerenes also produces graphitic microtubules with helical structures^1. In most cases the cylindrical tubes are closed by polyhedral caps, some being first transformed into a conical shape before closure^2. Here we present images from transmission electron microscopy of a further kind of growth morphology, in which cone-like growth is transformed into cylindrical growth by the incorporation of a defect that induces negative curvature. We suggest that the defect in the hexagonal network responsible for negative curvature may be a single heptagonal ring. Three-dimensional, open negatively curved graphitic structures have been proposed recently by Terrones and Mackay^3. We discuss more generally the effect of pentagons and heptagons on the growth morphologies of these tubules, and the constraints on the number of pentagonal defects imposed by tube closure.THE 'infinite-layer' parent structure^1 of the copper oxide superconductors (Fig. 1) is the simplest structure containing the CuO_2 sheets that are apparently essential to high-transition-temperature (high- T _ c ) superconductivity. At ambient pressure only Ca_1-x Sr_xCuO_2 with x≈O.l can be stabilized in this structure^1,2but at high pressures and temperatures compounds ranging from Ba^1/_3Sr^2/_3CuO_2 to Ca^2/_3Sr^1/_3CuO_2 through SrCuO_2 can be synthesized^3. We have previously reported superconductivity with T _c = 40–100 K in the Ba–Sr–Cu–O system^4,5 but have not until now been able to isolate a superconducting phase. Here we report the isolation of an alkaline-earth-deficient infinite-layer phase, (Ca_1-xSr_x)_1-yCuO_2 (y~O.l), with T _ c up to 110 K. In contrast to Sr_1-xR_xCuO_2 (with R a rare-earth element and T _c⩽43 K), which from the composition dependence of the lattice constants is thought to be an n-type superconductor^6,7 our data suggest that the present superconductor is of p-type, with the carriers arising from calcium and strontium vacancies. High-resolution electron micrographs reveal defect layers, which we suggest are where the calcium and strontium vacancies are concentrated.Interleukin-1β (IL-1β)-converting enzyme cleaves the IL-1β precursor to mature IL-1β, an important mediator of inflammation. The identification of the enzyme as a unique cysteine protease and the design of potent peptide aldehyde inhibitors are described. Purification and cloning of the complementary DNA indicates that IL-lβ-converting enzyme is composed of two nonidentical subunits that are derived from a single proenzyme, possibly by autoproteolysis. Selective inhibition of the enzyme in human blood monocytes blocks production of mature IL-1β, indicating that it is a potential therapeutic target.Fanconi's anaemia is a rare autosomal recessive disorder characterized by progressive pan-cytopaenia and a cellular hypersensitivity to DNA crosslinking agents. Four genetic complementation groups have been identified so far, and here we use a functional complementation method to clone complementary DNAs that correct the defect of group C cells. The cDNAs encode alternatively processed transcripts of a new gene, designated FACC , which is mutated in group C patients. The predicted FACC polypeptide does not contain any motifs common to other proteins and so represents a new gene involved in the cellular response to DNA damage.Sudden changes in the flow of warm Atlantic surface waters into the Norwegian Sea occurred frequently during the last deglaciation, typically involving shifts in sea surface temperature of ⩾5 °C in fewer than 40 years. These led to equally large and rapid changes in atmospheric temperatures, and to shifts in Atlantic deep thermo-haline circulation and ice-sheet melting rates.The Meson Factories. Edited by Torleif Ericson Vernon Hughes and Darragh Nagle.. University of California Press: 1992. Pp. 870. $75.Health in the Headlines: The Stories Behind the Stories. By Stephen Klaid-man.. Oxford University Press: 1991. £19.50, $24.95.Innovation in Maxwell's Electromagnetic Theory: Molecular Vortices, Displacement Current, and Light. By Daniel Siegel. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 225. £30, $49.95.Faint ripples in the cosmological microwave background, revealed by NASA's COBE satellite, were the seeds in the Big Bang that eventually became large-scale structures in the Universe.That science has become more difficult for nonspecialists to understand is a truth universally acknowledged. Here is a measure of the extent of the process.Caution in celebrating last week's announcement of anisotropies in the microwave background would be wise.US Academy offers strict definitions but ducks other urgent issues.A new version of the old assertion that science affronts human dignity, published in Britain as a book, may herald an assault on basic science and its sources of support.THE CD4 and CDS molecules are transmembrane glycoproteins expressed by functionally distinct subsets of mature T cells. CD4^+ and CD8^+ T cells recognize antigens on major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class II-bearing and class I-bearing target cells respectively^1–3. The ability of monoclonal antibodies against CD4 and CDS to block antigen recognition by T cells, as well as cell–cell adhesion assays^4–7, indicate that CD4 and CDS bind to non-polymorphic determinants of class II or class I MHC. Here we demonstrate that soluble recombinant HLA-DR4 molecules from insect cells and HLA-DR-derived peptides bind to immobilized recombinant soluble CD4. CD4 binds recombinant soluble DR4 heterodimers, as well as the soluble DR4-β chain alone. Furthermore, two out of twelve DR4β peptides could interact specifically with CD4. These findings show that CD4 interacts with a region of MHC class II molecules analogous to a previously identified loop in class I MHC proteins that binds CDS (refs S, 9).INTERACTIONS between major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecules and the CD4 or CDS coreceptors have a major role in intrathymic T-cell selection^1. On mature T cells, each of these two glycoproteins is associated with a class-specific bias in MHC molecule recognition by the T-cell receptor. CD4^+ T cells respond to antigen in association with MHC class II molecules and CD8^+ T cells respond to antigen in association with MHC class I molecules. Physical interaction between the CD4/MHC class II molecules and CD8/MHC class I molecules has been demonstrated by cell adhesion assay^2–5, and a binding site for CDS on class I has been identified^6,7. Here we demonstrate that a region of the MHC class IIβ-chain β_2 domain, structurally analogous to the CDS-binding loop in the MHC class I α_3 domain, is critical for function with both mouse and human CD4.THE T-cell receptor is necessary and sufficient for recognition of peptides presented by major histocompatibility complex molecules^1,2. Other adhesion molecules, like CD4 or CDS, play an auxiliary role in antigen recognition by T cells^3,4. Here we analyse T-cell receptor (TCR) binding using a soluble rather than a cell-bound receptor molecule. A TCR-immunoglobulin chimaera is constructed with the variable and the first constant regions of both the TCR α- andβ-chains linked to the immunoglobulin light-chain constant regions. This soluble TCR is expressed, assembled and secreted as an αβ heterodimer by a myeloma cell line transfected with the recombinant genes. Furthermore, the soluble TCR is biologically active: it specifically inhibits antigen-dependent activation of the relevant T-cell clones and thus discriminates between proper and irrelevant peptides presented by major histocompatibility complex molecules.AXONAL growth, guidance and synapse formation are controlled by receptors on neuronal growth cones that can recognize positive and inhibitory cues in the local microenvironment^1–3. Four well characterized receptor systems are known that recognize the growth-promoting activities associated with the extracellular matrix and the membranes of cells such as astrocytes, muscle cells and Schwann cells; these are the integrins^4and the homophilically binding cell adhesion molecules neural-cell adhesion molecule (NCAM), N-cadherin and LI (refs 5-12). Alternative splicing generates 20-30 isoforms of NCAM and these can also be differentially glycosylated^13. There are two sites where alternative splicing changes the extracellular structure of membrane-bound NCAM and one of these (the MSD1 region) does not obviously affect function^6. Here we report that the variable alternatively spliced exon (VASE) in immunoglobulin domain ^4 downregulates the neurite outgrowth-promoting activity of NCAM. The high level of VASE expression in the adult central as compared with peripheral nervous system^21 could contribute to the poor regenerative capacity of the former.In spite of "the recession, there is still room in computing for recruits with practical minds and an interesting background. Working in the vacation will pay off.Over 900 exhibitors will be represented at Analytica '92, the 13th International Trade Fair for Biochemical and Instrumental Analysis to be held next week in Munich, Germany.The need for new types of beds (continuous beds), their unique preparation and attractive properties are discussed.The Lopsided Ape: Evolution of the Generative Mind. By Michael Cor-ballis.. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 336. £18.95, $24.95.AT the beginning of this century, the Danish oceanographer Johannes Schmidt outlined the spawning area of Atlantic eels Anguilla spp. in the Sargasso Sea^1,2But the spawning location of the Japanese eel A. japonica in the Pacific Ocean has eluded researchers for over 60 years. I report here the discovery of their spawning location. By measuring oceanographic conditions and collecting the transparent leaf-like eel larvae, termed leptocephali (see Fig. 1), we determined the Japanese eel spawning area to be in the North Equatorial Current west of the Mariana Islands, at a salinity front near 15° N, 140° E. This discovery shows that the key similarity between the spawning sites of Atlantic and Pacific eels is the placement of leptocephali into the major ocean currents that will return them to their juvenile rearing habitats.THE past 300,000 years have been characterized by glacial/inter-glacial fluctuations accompanied by glacio-eustatic changes in sea level and changes in continental erosion arising from varying low-latitude rainfall and river drainage. Here we use measurements of strontium isotopes in foraminifera and corals to place limits on variations in the Sr isotope composition of sea water in response to these changing inputs. We find small variations of about 20 p.p.m. in the ^87Sr/^86Sr ratio, which for the foraminiferal record seem to follow a cycle close to the 100-kyr periodicity seen for a number of other climate-related phenomena. These are superimposed on a general increase in^87Sr/^86Sr through the Cenozoic to the present. On short timescales these changes are likely to be controlled by variations in the global riverine Sr flux, and thus by weathering rates, rather than in the hydrothermal Sr flux at mid-ocean ridges. We show that transient variations over a 50-kyr timescale can be explained on the basis of the present-day global drainage system in conjunction with the perturbations expected to accompany climate changes over the past 300 kyr.THE Greenland, Iceland and Norwegian (GIN) seas are important regulators of heat transport in the Northern Hemisphere and of ocean-atmosphere CO_2exchange^1–5. Rapid changes in the circulation of surface and deep waters in this region may induce nonlinear climatic effects and climate instabilities^2,3. Here we present carbon and oxygen isotope data that provide a record of circulation changes in the GIN seas during and at the termination of the Last Glacial Maximum (LGM). Inflow of nutrient-depleted waters from the GIN seas to form intermediate waters of the North Atlantic resulted in nutrient enrichment of North Atlantic deep water and consequent enhanced drawdown of atmospheric CO_2, contributing to the lower atmospheric P C O 2 during the LGM. The onset of deglaciation occurred at a time of low salinity in the GIN seas and thus of reduced thermohaline circulation. Although strong thermohaline circulation was later reinitiated in the North Atlantic as deglaciation proceeded, it cannot therefore have caused the onset of warming. Similarly, we find that rapid changes in thermohaline circulation cannot account for the transient return to a cooler climate during the Younger Dryas episode.DESPITE the attention given in recent years to the issue of lake acidification by anthropogenic emissions, the question of how climate change might influence the acid-base equilibria of lakes has been little explored. Here we use palaeolimnological data to show that the acidity of two soft-water, high-altitude lakes in the central Alps was correlated with regional temperature during the entire nineteenth century, colder years being associated with lower pH. Our findings of high concentrations of organic matter and elevated Fe/Mn ratios in the corresponding sediment layers support the view that this relationship is dictated primarily by the temperature dependence of in-lake processes of alkalinity generation. The onset of anthropogenically derived acid precipitation at the beginning of the present century led to a breakdown of the pH-temperature relationship, with pH dropping steadily to values of 5.6-5.8. Nevertheless, temperature maxima around 1950 still coincide with peaks in pH, and some pH minima before 1900 fell as low as as the levels around 1970. It is an open question whether the very recent levelling off that we observe in the decline of pH is due to rising temperatures or to decreasing precipitation acidity.THE post-transcriptional processing of various mitochondrial transcripts in kinetoplastids, kRNA editing, adds and removes uridines, producing mature messenger RNAs^1,2. This editing seems to be directed by 'guide' RNAs (gRNAs) which are complementary to portions of the mature message^3. The editing mechanism has been proposed to entail transesterification^4,5. Detection of chimaeric gRNA-mRNA molecules, intermediates predicted by transesterification, support this model^4. We report here the in vitro formation of such chimaeras where endogenous gRNAs are covalently linked to added synthetic mRNA. Addition of gel-purified gRNAs to the standard reaction mix increases chimaera formation. This increase is not observed when the gRNA 3′-hydroxyl group is chemically modified, identifying this terminal hydroxyl as the reactive group. These results provide the first experimental evidence for an in vitro RNA editing event and support the involvement of transesterification as a chemical mechanism.A MAJOR problem in the elucidation of the molecular mechanisms governing development is the distinction between direct and indirect regulatory interactions among developmental control genes^1–5. In vivo studies have indicated that the Drosophila segmentation gene fushi tarazu (ftz) directly or indirectly autoregulates its expression^6. Here we describe a generally applicable experimental approach which establishes a direct in vivo interaction of the homeodomain protein ftz with the ftz cis -autoregulatory control region. In vitro studies have shown that the DNA-binding specificity of the ftz homeodomain can be changed by a single amino-acid substitution in the recognition helix (Gin 50 →"Lys)^7. Whereas wild-type ftz homeodomain binds preferentially to a CCATTA motif, the mutant homeodomain (ftzQSOK) recognizes a GG ATT A motif. We now find that the in vivo activity of an ftz autoregulatory enhancer element is reduced by mutations of putative ftz-binding sites to GGATTA. This down-regulatory effect is specifically suppressed in vivo by the DNA-binding specificity mutant ftzQ5OK . These results establish a direct positive autoregulatory feedback mechanism in the regulation of this homeobox gene.THE nuclear factor NF-AT (ref. 1) is induced in T cells stimulated through the T-cell receptor/CD3 complex, and is required for interleukin-2 (IL-2) gene induction. Although NF-AT has not been cloned or purified, there is evidence that it is a major target for immunosuppression by cyclosporin A (CsA) and FK506 (refs 2-7). NF-AT induction may require two activation-dependent events: the CsA-sensitive translocation of a pre-existing component and the CsA-resistant synthesis of a nuclear component^8. Here we report that the newly synthesized nuclear component of NF-AT is the transcription factor AP-1. We show that the inducible nuclear form of NF-AT contains Fos and Jun proteins. Furthermore, we identify a pre-existing NF-AT-binding factor that is present in hypotonic extracts of unstimulated T cells. On the basis of binding, reconstitution and cotransfection experiments, we propose that activation of NF-AT occurs in at least two stages: a CsA-sensitive stage involving modification and/or translocation of the preexisting NF-AT complex, and a CsA-insensitive stage involving the addition of newly synthesized Fos or Fos/Jun proteins to the pre-existing complex.ABOVE a characteristic temperature, the free energy required to form a step on the surface of a growing crystal may fall to zero; the surface then undergoes a transition from smooth (faceted) to irregular (rough) growth. Here we describe studies of the growth of n -C_21H_44crystals from n -hexane solutions close to the roughening transition. Beginning with equilibrium crystal growth at a temperature slightly above the roughening transition, we introduce progressively greater supersaturations by lowering the temperature. Observations of the growth morphology reveal a transition from rough to smooth growth, followed at greater supersaturations by a transition back to rough growth. To our knowledge, such a sequence of rough–smooth–rough crystal growth has not been reported before. Our measurements of the step free energy of the {110} faces indicate that it vanishes discontinuously at the equilibrium roughening transition temperature, in contrast to the continuous (critical) behaviour predicted by theoretical models^1–11UNTIL now, the egg-laying monotremes were only known from the Australian continent, where they have lived since the early Cretaceous period to the present^1. Here we report the first monotreme from outside the Australian continent, an ornithorhyn-chid, from sediments of late early Palaeocene age in Patagonia, southern Argentina. This discovery demonstrates the Gondwanan nature of monotremes and supports the hypothesis that the Patagonian Terrane of southern South America had a biotic history distinct from that of the rest of the continent.VOLCANIC debris avalanches have been seen at many volcanoes since the 1980 eruption of Mount St Helens, but typically only one or two avalanche deposits are identified at each eruptive centre, suggesting that catastrophic slope failures are rare or even unique events in the lifetime of a volcano^1–4 Here we present a series of radiocarbon dates from volcanic deposits showing that the summit edifice of Mount St Augustine, a 1,220-m-high active volcano on Augustine Island in the Cook Inlet area of south-central Alaska, has repeatedly collapsed and regenerated, averaging 150–200 years per cycle, during the past 2,000 years. The unprecedented frequency of summit edifice failure was made possible by sustained lava effusion rates over 10 times greater than is typical of plate-margin volcanoes.The argument between researchers and the animal rights movements go back a long way.The precise depths at which seismic velocities change abruptly in the upper mantle are revealed by the analysis of data from hundreds of seismometers across the western United States. The boundary near 410km depth is locally elevated, that near 660 km depressed. The depths of these boundaries, which mark phase transitions, provide an in situ thermometer in subduction zones: the observed temperature contrasts require at least moderate thickening of the subducting slab near 660 km depth. In addition, a reflector near 210 km depth may mark the bottom of the aesthenosphere.The end of the Proterozoic Eon was a time of pronounced biological, biogeochemical, climatic and tectonic change. New bio- and chemostratigraphic data provide an improved framework for stratigraphic correlation, making possible a deeper understanding of latest Proterozoic Earth history and providing tools for a chronostratigraphic division of late Proterozoic time.Perspectives in Catalysis. Edited by John M. Thomas and Kirill I. Zamaraev. Blackwell Scientific/IUPAC: 1992. Pp. 492. £69.50.Global Biomass Burning: Atmospheric, Climatic, and Biospheric Implications. Edited by Joel S. Levine. MIT Press: 1991. Pp. 569. $75, £67.50.Stopping the Spread of Nuclear Weapons: The Past and Prospects. By David Fischer. Routledge: 1992. Pp. 336. £40.Plutonium and Security: The Military Aspects of the Plutonium Economy. Edited by Frank Barnaby. Macmillan: 1992. Pp. 296. £47.50.TRANSFORMING growth factor type β (TGF-β2)^1 is a member of an expanding family of growth factors that regulate prolifer-ation and differentiation of many different cell types^2,3. TGF-β2 binds to various receptors^4, one of which was shown to be a serine/threonine kinase^5. TGF-β2 is involved in wound healing^6, bone formation^7 and modulation of immune functions^8. We report here the crystal structure of TGF-β2 at 2.2 Å resolution, which reveals a novel monomer fold and dimer association. The monomer consists of two antiparallel pairs of β-strands forming a flat curved surface and a separate, long α-helix. The disulphide-rich core has one disulphide bond pointing through a ring formed by the sequence motifs Cys-Ala-Gly-Ala-Cys and Cys-Lys-Cys, which are themselves connected through the cysteines. Two monomers are connected through a single disulphide bridge and associate such that the helix of one subunit interacts with the concave β-sheet surface of the other. Four exposed loop regions might determine receptor specificity. The structure provides a suitable model for the TGF-βs and other members of the super-family^9–11 and is the basis for the analysis of the TGF-β2 interactions with the receptor.THE Brachyury (T) gene is required cell-autonomously for mesoderm formation in the posterior of the mouse embryo^1,2, and both its complementary DNA sequence and expression pattern^3closely resemble those of a Xenopus homologue (Xbra) ^4, suggesting that these genes have an evolutionarily conserved function in vertebrate development. Strong expression of Xbra messenger RNA is found in the ring of involuting mesoderm during Xenopus gastrulation^4, and the expression of Xbra is an immediate–early response of animal pole blastomeres to mesoderm-inducing factors^4. To assess the role of Xbra in mesoderm formation, we increased its domain of expression in the embryo by microinjection of Xbra transcripts into the animal pole of Xenopus embryos at the one-cell stage. We show that expression of Xbra by cells of the early embryo is sufficient to direct their development into differentiated mesodermal tissues. At the molecular level this response shows a sharp threshold of sensitivity to the dose of Xbra RNA delivered, and we suggest that Xbra may act as a genetic switch initiating posterior mesodermal specification during embryogenesis.REGULATORY GTP-binding proteins (G proteins) are membrane-attached heterotrimers (α, β, γ) that mediate cellular responses to a wide variety of extracellular stimuli^1,2. They undergo a cycle of guanine-nucleotide exchange and GTP hydrolysis, during which they dissociate into αsubunit and βγ complex^1. The roles of G-protein αsubunits in these processes and for the specificity of signal transduction are largely established; the α- and γ-subunits are essential for receptor-induced G-protein activation and seem to be less diverse and less specific. Although the complementary DNAs for several β-subunits have been cloned^2,5–8, isolated sub-units have only been studied as βγ complexes^3,9–12. Functional differences have been ascribed to the γ-subunit on the basis of extensive sequence similarity among β-subunits and apparent heterogeneity in γ-subunit sequences^13,14.βγ complexes can interact directly or indirectly with different effectors^10,11,15–20. They seem to be interchangeable in their interaction with pertussis toxinsensitive α-subunits^3, so we tested this by microinjecting antisense oligonucleotides into nuclei of a rat pituitary cell line to suppress the synthesis of individual β-subunits selectively. Here we show that two out of four subtypes of β-subunits tested (β_1 and β_3) are selectively involved in the signal transduction cascades from muscarinic M_4 (ref. 4) and somatostatin receptors, respectively, to voltage-dependent Ca^2+ channels.A CENTRAL event in transcription is the assembly on DNA of specific complexes near the initiation sites for RNA synthesis. Activation of transcription by one class of enhancer-binding proteins requires an RNA polymerase holoenzyme' containing the specialized transcription factor, sigma-54 (σ^54). We report here that σ^54 alone specifically binds to promoter DNA and is responsible for many of the close contacts between RNA polymerase holoenzyme and promoter DNA, a property proposed for the major σ^70 protein family. Binding of σ^54 to promoter DNA is not equivalent to that of holoenzyme suggesting that there is a constraint on σ^54 conformation when bound with core RNA polymerase. Footprints indicate σ^54 is at the leading edge of DNA-bound holoenzyme. Like the holoenzyme^1–4, σ^54-binding to promoter DNA does not result in DNA strand separation. Instead the specific DNA-binding activity of σ^54 assists assembly of a closed promoter complex. This complex can be isomerized to the open (DNA melted) complex by activator protein^5,6, but promoter-bound σ^54 alone cannot be induced to melt DNA. The pathway leading to productive transcription is similar to that proposed for eukaryotic RNA polymerase II systems.THE Filchner–Ronne ice shelf, which drains most of the marine-based portions of the West Antarctic ice sheet, is the largest ice shelf on Earth by volume. The origin and properties of the ice that constitutes this shelf are poorly understood, because a strong reflecting interface within the ice and the diffuse nature of the ice–ocean interface make seismic and radio echo sounding data difficult to interpret^1,2. Ice in the upper part of the shelf is of meteoric origin, but it has been proposed^2,5 that a basal layer of saline ice accumulates from below. Here we present the results of an analysis of the physical and chemical characteristics of an ice core drilled almost to the bottom of the Ronne ice shelf. We observe a change in ice properties at about 150 m depth, which we ascribe to a change from meteoric ice to basal marine ice. The basal ice is very different from sea ice formed at the ocean surface and we propose a formation mechanism in which ice platelets in the water column accrete to the bottom of the ice shelf.VARIATIONS in the Earth's orbital parameters modulate the seasonal distribution of solar radiation and thereby induce changes in the Earth's climate^1. Periodicities in the geological climate record with cycles of 100, 41 and 23 kyr have been linked with changes in eccentricity, obliquity and precession of the equinoxes, respectively^2,3. But although the eccentricity does vary with a 100-kyr period, the effect on the incoming solar radiation is rather weak relative to the signals from obliquity and precession variations. The 100-kyr signal in the climate record should therefore be of negligible intensity, yet it is observed instead to dominate the record. Internal, nonlinear processes within the climate system have been proposed to account for this fact^4–14. In contrast, I show here that variations in the frequency of the obliquity cycle can give rise to strong 100-kyr forcing of climate.RAMANATHAN and Collins^1 have suggested cirrus clouds associated with tropical convection might act as a 'thermostat' to limit tropical sea surface temperatures (SSTs) to less than 305 K by shielding the ocean from sunlight. Here we use satellite radiance data to test this hypothesis. We find that changes in the properties of cirrus clouds do not seem to be related to changes in SSTs. During the 1987 El Niño event, large-scale perturbations to the radiative effects of cirrus clouds were controlled by changes in large-scale atmospheric circulation rather than directly by SSTs. If they are averaged over the entire tropical Pacific, increases in surface evaporative cooling are stronger than decreases in solarTHE possible impact of pollution from North America and Europe on tropospheric ozone throughout the Northern Hemisphere is a major environmental concern^1–4. We report here continuous measurements of ozone from Bermuda (32° N, 65° W) and Barbados (13° N, 60° W), which suggest that despite their proximity to the eastern US seaboard, natural processes rather than pollution control surface ozone in these regions. Although springtime daily average ozone concentrations at Bermuda are greater than 70 parts per billion (10^9) by volume (p.p.b.v.) and hourly values in 1989 sometimes exceeded the Canadian Air Quality limit of 80 p.p.b.v., trajectory analyses indicate that these high levels of ozone are transported from the unpolluted upper troposphere >5 km above the northern United States and Canada^5. During the summer, when surface ozone concentrations over the eastern United States can exceed 70 p.p.b.v. owing to pollution^6, typical values at Ber-muda are between 15 and 25 p.p.b.v. At Barbados, both the seasonal and diurnal variations in surface ozone are nearly identical to those at Samoa in the tropical South Pacific, where the isolation from anthropogenic sources^7 and low levels of NO_X (ref. 8) ensure that natural processes control surface ozone^9–11.THE normal cellular homologue of the acutely transforming oncogene v-ra/is c- raf -l, which encodes a serine/threonine protein kinase that is activated by many extracellular stimuli^1. The physiological substrates of the protein c-Raf-1 are unknown. The mitogen-activated protein (MAP) kinases ErkI and 2 are also activated by mitogens through phosphorylation of Erk tyrosine and threonine residues catalysed by a protein kinase of relative molecular mass 50,000, MAP kinase-kinase (MAPK-K)^2–7. Here we report that MAPK-K as well as Erkl and 2 are constitutively active in v- raf -transformed cells. MAPK-K partially purified from v-raf-transformed cells or from mitogen-treated cells^3 can be deactivated by phosphatase 2A. c-Raf-1 purified after mitogen stimulation can reactivate the phosphatase 2A-inactivated MAPK-K over 30-fold in vitro. c-Raf-1 reactivation of MAPK-K coincides with the selective phosphorylation at serine/threonine residues of a polypeptide with M _r 50,000 which coelutes precisely on cation-exchange chromatography with the MAPK-K activatable by c-Raf-1. These results indicate that c-Raf-1 is an immediate upstream activator of MAPK-K in vivo. To our knowledge, MAPK-K is the first physiological substrate of the c- raf -l protooncogene product to be identified.TRANSCRIPTION of the proto-oncogene c-fos is stimulated rapidly and transiently by serum growth factors and mitogens^1. Critical for this response is the serum-response element which is bound in vivo in a ternary complex containing the transcription factors p67^SRF and p62^TCF (ref. 2). Disruption of the ternary complex correlates with impaired induction by serum and phorbol ester^3,4. Mitogen-activated protein (MAP) kinase is a serine/ threonine kinase which is activated 1-5 minutes after treatment of cells with mitogens and growth factors^5–8 that induce re-entry into the cell cycle, making MAP kinase a candidate for the transmission of proliferative signals. Here we show that p62^TCF is phosphorylated by MAP kinase in vitro and that phosphorylation results in enhanced ternary complex formation. Serum-starved Swiss 3T3 cells treated with epidermal growth factor, which induces MAP kinase in these cells^9, are induced to express c- fos and yield p62^TCF active in ternary complex formation. In contrast, treatment of Swiss 3T3 cells with insulin, which does not activate MAP kinase under these conditions^9, does not lead to enhanced ternary complex formation nor does it induce c- fos transcription. Our results link the expression of the human c-fos proto-oncogene to signal transduction pathways known to be activated before its own induction.THE motions of overlapping contours in a visual scene may arise from the physical motion(s) of either a single or multiple surfaces). A central problem facing the visual motion system is that of assigning the most likely interpretation. The rules underlying this perceptual decision can be explored using a visual stimulus formed by superimposing two moving gratings. The resultant percept is either that of a single coherently moving 'plaid pattern' (coherent motion) or of the two component gratings sliding noncoherently across one another (noncoherent motion)^1,2. When plaid patterns are configured to mimic one transparent grating overlying another, the percept of noncoherent motion dominates^3. We now report that neurons in the visual cortex of rhesus monkeys exhibit changes in direction tuning that parallel this perceptual phenomenon: sensitivity to the motions of the component gratings is enhanced under conditions that favour the perception of noncoherent motion. These results challenge models of cortical visual processing that fail to take into account the contribution of figural image segmentation cues to the analysis of visual motion.Governments, especially the British, should be more realistic about the ending of the recession.TUNA are unique among teleost fishes in being thermoconserving. Vascular counter-current heat exchangers maintain body temperatures above ambient water temperature, thereby improving locomotor muscle efficiency, especially at burst speeds and when pursuing prey below the thermocline^1–6. Because tuna also occasionally swim rapidly in warm surface waters, it has been hypothesized that tuna thermoregulate to accommodate changing activity levels or ambient temperatures^7. But previous field experiments have been unable to demonstrate definitively short-latency, mammalian-type physiological thermoregulation^8,9. Here we show using telemetered data that free-ranging bigeye tuna (Thunnus obesus) can rapidly alter whole-body thermal conductivity by two orders of magnitude. The heat exchangers are disengaged to allow rapid warming as the tuna ascend from cold water into warmer surface waters, and are reactivated to conserve heat when they return into the depths. Combining physiological and behavioural thermoregulation expands the foraging space of bigeye tuna into otherwise prohibitively cold, deep water.The oskar gene directs germ plasm assembly and controls the number of germ cell precursors formed at the posterior pole of the Drosophila embryo. Mislocalization of oskar RNA to the anterior pole leads to induction of germ cells at the anterior. Of the eight genes necessary for germ cell formation at the posterior, only three, oskar , vasa and tudor , are essential at an ectopic site.The number of stars in the spheroid of our Galaxy appears to increase steeply for smaller masses, with no evidence of a turnover in a simple power-law distribution down to 0.14⊙, the limit of detectability. The measured rotation curve of the Galaxy at the Sun suggests that the mass function cannot be extended beyond 0.05 ⊙, in which case low-mass stars fall an order of magnitude short of being able to supply the galactic dark matter.Geomorphic Responses to Climate Change By William B. Bull Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 326. £45, $59.95Space, Time and Man: A Prehistorian's View. By Grahame Clark Cambridge University Press: 1992 Pp. 165. £24.95, $15.95(pbk).On the Wild Side By Martin Gardner Prometheus: 1992. Pp. 257. $24.95.A WORLDWIDE increase in toxic phytoplankton blooms over the past 20 years^1,2 has coincided with increasing reports of fish diseases and deaths of unknown cause^3. Among estuaries that have been repeatedly associated with unexplained fish kills on the western Atlantic Coast are the Pamlico and Neuse Estuaries of the southeastern United States^4. Here we describe a new toxic dinoflagellate with 'phantom-like' behaviour that has been iden-tified as the causative agent of a significant portion of the fish kills in these estuaries, and which may also be active in other geographic regions. The alga requires live finfish or their fresh excreta for excystment and release of a potent toxin. Low cell densities cause neurotoxic signs and fish death, followed by rapid algal encystment and dormancy unless live fish are added. This dinoflagellate was abundant in the water during major fish kills in local estuaries, but only while fish were dying; within several hours of death where carcasses were still present, the flagellated vegetative algal population had encysted and settled back to the sediments. Isolates from each event were highly lethal to finfish and shellfish in laboratory bioassays. Given its broad temperature and salinity tolerance, and its stimulation by phosphate enrichment, this toxic phytoplankter may be a widespread but undetected source of fish mortality in nutrient-enriched estuaries.RECENT palaeomagnetic studies^1–4 of geomagnetic polarity reversals have presented conflicting interpretations of the behaviour of the Earth's magnetic field during reversals. Some have argued that the grouping of transitional virtual geomagnetic poles (VGPs) suggests the presence of large-scale, perhaps even dipolar, symmetries during some reversals^1–3, whereas others have claimed that the available data do not support the interpretation of simple transitional field geometries^4. An earlier comparison^5of two North Atlantic sedimentary records of reversals bounding the Cobb Mountain subchron (1.1 Myr ago) with a volcanic record from Tahiti^6 revealed striking similarities in the sequences of transitional VGPs, suggesting the presence of large-scale sym-metries in these fields. Here I augment this comparison with two new records of the Cobb Mountain subchron from the western Pacific^7, which greatly extend the geographical and temporal coverage. These records exhibit sequences of VGP positions that are very similar to those observed in the North Atlantic and Tahiti, providing evidence of dipolar transitional fields during the Cobb Mountain reversals.THE discovery of high concentrations of iridium in Cretaceous/Tertiary boundary sediments engendered the hypothesis^1 that a meteorite collided with the Earth 65 million years ago, coincident with the mass extinction that occurred at that time. Iridium spikes of various magnitudes have subsequently been reported at more than 10 other extinction horizons^2–11. It has been suggested, on the other hand, that geochemical processes might create or modify many of these spikes^5, 11–4, but a critical evaluation of these suggestions has been hindered by incomplete understanding of low-temperature iridium geochemistry. Other platinum-group elements (Ru, Rh, Pd, Re, Os, Pt, Au) are often found to be associated with Ir spikes, and inter-element ratios have been used to assess the cosmic or terrestrial nature of the enrichments^5,7,9,28,29; but the geochemical influences on these relative abundances are also poorly constrained. Here we describe analyses of recent abyssal marine sediments which allow us to characterize the behaviour of Pt, Re and Ir during early diagenesis. These elements are redistributed by changes in sedimentary redox conditions. Such changes can probably account for many of the small platinum-group-element spikes found in the geological record, and may render ambiguous attempts to interpret inter-element ratios.Paul Signac and Color in Neo-lmpressionism By Floyd Ratliff Rockefeller University Press: 1992. Pp. 317. $49.95The renewal of the BBC's charter demands the intervention of others than mere broadcasters.The possibility that the Superconducting Super Collider will be cancelled, or at least seriously delayed, and impending developments in Europe, suggest the time has come for the United States to join CERN at Geneva.THE stimulation of a variety of cell surface receptors promotes the accumulation of the active, GTP-bound form of Ras proteins in cells1—4. This is a critical step in signal transduction because inhibition of Ras activation by anti-Ras antibodies or dominant inhibitory Ras mutants blocks many of the effects of these receptors on cellular function^5—8. To reach the active GTP-bound state, Ras proteins must first release bound GDP. This rate-limiting step in GTP binding is thought to be catalysed by a guanine-nucleotide-releasing factor (GRF)^9—11. Here we report the cloning of complementary DNAs from a rat brain library that encode a ∼140 GRF for Ras p21 (p140^Ras-GRF). Its carboxy-terminal region is similar to that of CDC25, a GRF for Saccharomyces cerevisiae RAS^11. This portion of Ras-GRF accelerated the release of GDP from RasH and RasN p21 in vitro , but not from the related RalA, or CDC42Hs GTP-binding proteins. A region in the a mi no-terminal end of Ras-GRF is similar to both the human breakpoint cluster protein, Bcr^12, and the dbl oncogene product^13, a guanine-nucleotide-releasing factor for CDC42Hs^14. An understanding of Ras-GRF function will enhance our knowledge of the many signal transduction pathways mediated by Ras proteins.Chance and Chaos. By David Ruelle. Princeton University Press: 1992. Pp.195. $24.95, £19.95.Searching for Certainty: What Science Can Know About the Future. By John L. Casti. Morrow/Scribners: 1992. Pp.496. $12 (pbk), £16.99 (hbk).THE enzyme Cu, Zn superoxide dismutase (SOD) protects against oxidative damage by dismuting the superoxide radical O^.−_2 to molecular oxygen and hydrogen peroxide^1–3 at the active-site Cuion^4,5 in a reaction that is rate-limited by diffusion^3,6 and enhanced by electrostatic guidance^7–10. SOD has evolved to be one of the fastest enzymes known ( V_max ~ 2 x 10^9 M^−1 s^−1)^6,11. The new crystal structures of human SOD^12 show that amino-acid site chains that are implicated in electrostatic guidance^8 (Glu 132, Glu 133 and Lys 136) form a hydrogen-bonding network. Here we show that site-specific mutants that increase local positive charge while maintaining this orienting network (Glu→Gin) have faster reaction rates and increased ionic-strength dependence, matching brownian dynamics simulations incorporating electrostatic terms. Increased positive charge alone is insufficient: one charge reversal (Glu→Lys) mutant is slower than the equivalent charge neutralization (Glu→Gin) mutant, showing that the newly introduced positive charge disrupts the orienting network. Thus, electrostatically facilitated diffusion rates can be increased by design, provided the detailed structural integrity of the active-site electrostatic network is maintained.LIKE other homeobox genes of the Antennapedia and bithorax complexes (collectively called the HOM complex^1,2), the Drosophila Deformed ( Dfd ) gene has structural homologues in the ^ Hox / HOX complexes of mouse and humans, one of which is human HOX4B (refs 3, 4). Previous experiments indicated that HOX4B protein can specifically activate the expression of the endogenous Dfd transcription unit in Drosophila embryos and larvae5. We therefore asked whether HOX4B cis-regulatory elements could mimic the function of a Dfd autoregulatory element^6–8 in Drosophila embryos. Here we show that a HOX4B upstream element can surprisingly provide expression in a posterior head segment of Drosophila . One possible mechanism for the axial position-specificity of the human element may involve the conservation of a Dfd -specific autoregulatory circuit in both arthropod and chordate lineages. This possibility is supported by the finding that a Drosophila Dfd autoregulatory element supplies spatially localized expression in the hindbrain of mouse embryos^9.THE striking similarities in the structure, organization and anterior–posterior expression patterns between the marine Hox gene system and the Drosophila homeotic gene complexes^1,2, called HOM-C (ref. 3), may point to highly conserved mechanisms for specifying positional identities (reviewed in ref. 4). Strong support for this concept lies in the observation of conserved colinearity between the genomic order of the Hox/HOM genes and their unique successive expression domains along the anterior-posterior axes of both mouse and fly embryos^1,2. These unique and precise expression patterns appear to be facilitated by multiple cis -regulatory elements (reviewed in ref. 5). One of the few elements characterized in detail is the autoregulatory enhancer of the homeotic gene Deformed ( Dfd )^6–9, which supports expression in subregions of posterior head segments of Drosophila embryos^7. Here we present evidence that this enhancer is capable of conferring reporter gene expression to a discrete subregion of the hindbrain in transgenic mouse embryos. Remarkably, this anterior-posterior subregion lies within the common anterior expression domain of the Dfd cognate Hox genes in the postotic hindbrain^10,11. Our results indicate that the Dfd autoregulatory enhancer is part of a highly conserved mechanism for establishing region-specific gene expression along the anterior–posterior axis of the embryo.TYPE III receptors for IgG (Fc γ RII; ref. 1), high-affinity IgE receptors (FcɛRI; ref. 2), as well as the T- and B-cell antigen receptors^3,4, consist of multiple components with specialized ligand-binding and signal transduction functions^5–10. Fc γ RII α (ligand-binding) and γ (signal-transducing) subunits are expressed in macrophages^1, a cell type involved in the uptake of antigen, its processing and the presentation of the resulting peptides to major histocompatibility complex class II-restricted T lymphocytes^11,12. Here we show that murine Fc γ RIII, transfected into Fc γ R-negative antigen-presenting B-lymphoma cells, mediate rapid ligand internalization and strongly increase the efficiency of antigen presentation when antigen is complexed to IgG. Efficient internalization and antigen presentation via Fc γ RIII did not require the cytoplasmic domain of the ligand-binding α -chain, but did require the γ -subunit. Using chimaeric molecules, we show that γ -chain contains a signal for receptor internalization and that the mutation of either of the two ryrosine residues present in its cytoplasmic domain prevents efficient internalization and antigen presentation of immune complexes. Thus, associated chains and their tyrosine-containing motif are not exclusively involved in cell activation, but also determine multimeric receptor internalization.FULLY-DIFFERENTIATED mouse 3T3-L1 fibroblasts accumulate large amounts of lipid at 7–10 days after induction by insulin or by dexamethasone and a methyl xanthine^1–3. G proteins mediate transmembrane signalling from a diverse group of cell-surface receptors to effector units that include phospholipase C, adenylyl cyclase and ion channels^4–6. They are also targets of regulation themselves^7–10.3T3-L1 fibroblasts display marked changes in levels of G protein when induced to differentiate to adipocytes^11–15. Here we show that cholera toxin, which ADP-ribosylates and activates the G protein subunit G_s α , blocks the induction of differentiation, whereas increasing intracellular cyclic AMP directly with the dibutyryl analogue or indirectly with pertussis toxin or forskolin does not affect differentiation. Oligodeoxynucleotides antisense to the sequence encoding G_s α accelerate differentiation markedly. The time course of adipogenesis declined from 7–10 days in controls to roughly 3 days in cultures treated with antisense-G_s α oligodeoxynucleotides, whereas oligodeoxynucleotides, antisense to G_i α 1, G_i α 3, and sense and missense to G_s α , had no such effect. Antisense-G_s α alone induced differentiation by day 7, indicating that G_s α activity modulates differentiation in 3T3-L1 cells, acting in a new role which is independent of increased intracellular cAMP.THE retinoblastoma susceptibility gene product (pRb) plays an important role in constraining cellular proliferation and in regulating the cell cycle^1,2. The pRb inhibits transcription of genes involved in growth control (reviewed in ref. 3) and can regulate transforming growth factor β 1 ( TGF-β1 ) gene expression^4,5. TGF- β isoforms also down-regulate cellular proliferation^6,7. To determine whether pRb also regulates expression of other TGF- β isoforms, we examined the effect of pRb on the expression of the human TGF- β 2 gene. The human TGF- β 2 promoter contains multiple elements including an ATF site, which is essential for basal promoter activity^8. Here we report that pRb activates transcription of the human TGF- β 2 gene. The promoter element responsible for pRb-mediated transcriptional regulation is a binding site for ATF proteins, an extensive transcription factor family^9. We provide evidence that implicates ATF-2 in pRb-responsiveness. First, the ATF promoter element in the TGF- β 2 gene is a high-affinity ATF-2-binding site. Second, a GAL4–ATF2 fusion protein can support pRb-mediated transcriptional activation of a promoter containing GAL4-binding sites. Third, ATF-2 in nuclear extracts can interact with pRb. Our results reveal a new mechanism by which pRb constrains cellular proliferation: by activating expression of the inhibitory growth factor, TGF- β 2.THE membrane glycoprotein CD4 enhances antigen-mediated activation of T cells restricted by class II molecules of the major histocompatibility complex (MHC)^1–3. This positive function has been attributed to the protein tyrosine kinase p56^lck (ref. 4), which is noncovalently associated with the cytoplasmic portion of CD4^5,6, and is activated on CD4 aggregation^7. Antigen presentation by MHC class II molecules coaggregates CD4 and the T-cell antigen receptor (TCR αβ –CD3)^8. Thus, the mutual specificity of CD4 and TCR αβ for the MHC–antigen complex results in the juxtaposition of p56^lck and TCR αβ –CD3^9–13. In contrast, anti-CD4 antibodies can abrogate antigen-induced^14–17, as well as anti-TCR-induced^18–20 T-cell activation, indicating that CD4 might also transduce negative signals. The molecular basis for this opposing function remains unclear. Here we show that the CD4–p56^lck complex prohibits the induction of activation signals through the TCR–CD3 complex when not specifically included in the signalling process. This negative effect does not require anti-CD4 treatment, indicating that the induction of distinct negative signals is probably not involved. Rather, the results demonstrate that the CD4–p56^lck complex provides prerequisite signals for antigen-receptor-induced T-cell growth and thus characterize a molecular mechanism for functional constraints imposed on T-cell activation by the MHC.INTRODUCTION of Ca^2+ indicators (photoproteins, fluorescent dyes) that can be trapped in the cytosolic compartment of living cells has yielded major advances in our knowledge of Ca^2+ homeostasis^1,2. Ca^2+ however regulates functions not only in the cytosol but also within various organelles^3,4 where indicators have not yet been specifically targeted. Here we present a novel procedure by which the free Ca^2+ concentration of mitochondria, [Ca^2+]_m, can be monitored continuously at rest and during stimulation. The complementary DNA for the Ca^2+ sensitive photoprotein aequorin was fused in frame with that encoding a mitochondrial presequence. The hybrid cDNA was transfected into bovine endothelial cells and stable clones were obtained expressing variable amounts of mitochondrially targeted apoaequorin. The functional photopro-tein could be reconstituted in intact cells by incubation with purified coelenterazine and [Ca^2+]_m could thus be monitored in situ . This allowed the unprecedented direct demonstration that agonist-stimulated elevations of cytosolic free Ca^2+, [Ca^2+]_i, (measured in parallel with Fura-2) evoke rapid and transient increases of [Ca^2+]_m, which can be prevented by pretreatment with a mitochondrial uncoupler. The possibility of targeting aequorin to cellular organelles not only offers a new and powerful method for studying aspects of Ca^2+ homeostasis that up to now could not be directly approached, but might also be used in the future as a tool to report in situ a variety of apparently unrelated phenomena of wide biological interest.SILICATE pyroxenes are major components in mineralogies! models of the Earth's upper mantle^1,2, with the transformation of chain-silicate pyroxenes to denser garnet structures being a possible cause^3 of the seismic discontinuity at 400 km depth that divides the upper mantle from the transition zone. At shallower depths assemblages containing two pyroxenes are stable: calcium and sodium components are accommodated in a diopside–jadeite solid solution^3, while magnesium and iron form a second, calcium-poor pyroxene. In the absence of experimental data, orthoenstatite was long believed to be the stable polymorph of (Mg, Fe)-pyroxene over the entire upper mantle. More recently, however, petrological experiments^4,5 at pressures and temperatures in excess of 8 GPa and 900 °C have provided evidence for the transformation of Mg-orthopyroxene to a clinopyroxene phase. The thermodynamic and physical properties of this phase are completely unknown. Here we report the results of a high-pressure single-crystal diffraction study which confirm the stability of a high-clinopyroxene phase of MgSiO_3 at high pressures, and allow an initial estimate to be made of the density changes associated with the transformation of the orthopyroxene component in the Earth's upper mantle.British university teachers, already badly paid, have been done out of a pay-rise they deserved.Experiments on the stability of hydrous minerals likely to be present in the Earth's mantle provide constraints on the distribution of water in the mantle, and the form in which it is stored. In regions of elevated mantle temperature, water may be stored not in minerals but in melts: such hydrous melts are important metasomatizing agents, and can induce volcanism beneath thick cratonic lithosphere.Newton Rules Biology: A Physical Approach to Biological Problems. By Colin Pennycuick. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 111. £20, $49.95 (hbk), £9.95, $19.95 (pbk).Lunar Sourcebook: A User's Guide to the Moon. Edited by Grant H. Heiken, David T. Vaniman and Bevan M. French. Cambridge University Press: 1991. Pp. 736. £50.00, $59.50 (hbk).Climate Variability, Climate Change and Fisheries. Edited byMichael H. Glantz.Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 450. £45, $69.95.Cold Fusion: The Scientific Fiasco of the Century. By John R. Huizenga. University of Rochester Press: 1992. Pp. 259. $45, £29.50. Distributed by Boydell and Brewer in the United Kingdom.CHANGES in the isotope content of the large marine carbon reservoir can force shifts in that of the smaller carbon pools in the atmosphere and on land. The carbon isotope compositions of marine carbonate sediments from the late Palaeocene vary considerably, exhibiting a sudden decrease close to the Palaeocene/Eocene boundary which coincides with deep-sea benthic extinctions^1 and with changes in ocean circulation. Here we report that these fluctuations in the marine carbon isotope record are closely tracked by the terrestrial records provided by palaeosol carbonates and mammalian tooth enamel. In using palaeosol carbonates to reconstruct the CO_2 content of the ancient atmosphere^2, isotope shifts of this sort will have to be taken into account. The sharp decrease in ^13C/^12C ratios in the late Palaeocene provides a datum for precise correlation of marine and continental records, and suggests that abrupt climate warming at this time may have played an important role in the evolution of land mammals.THE contribution of the Antarctic ice sheets to global sea-level fall at the Last Glacial Maximum (LGM) depends largely on how the extent and thickness of peripheral ice changed. Model studies^1–3 suggest that there was widespread thickening (from 500 m to more than 1,000 m) of the ice-sheet margins, sufficient to induce a drop in sea level of at least 25 m. Geological evidence^4,5, on the other hand, indicates only limited ice expansion and a sea-level fall of just 8 m. Here we use recent data on the altitudes and ages of raised beaches from the Ross embayment and East Antarctica to investigate the timing and extent of Antarctic deglaciation. These indicate that the ice margin during the LGM was thinner and less extensive than has been formerly thought, and that its contribution to the drop in sea level was only 0.5–2.5 m. Deglaciation was well advanced by 10 kyr BP and was complete by 6 kyr BP. These findings imply either that sea level during the LGM fell less than present estimates suggest, or that an ice volume considerably greater than currently accepted must have been present in the Northern Hemisphere.MEASUREMENTS of methane in modern air^1–8 and in air trapped in ice cores^9–12 have shown convincingly that the abundance of atmospheric methane has been rising since the Industrial Revolution. This is a matter of concern because of the important role of methane in determining the radiative balance and chemical composition of the atmosphere^13. The causes of this increase have not been identified unambiguously because of uncertainties in our understanding of the global budget of atmospheric methane^14 and in how it is changing with time. Here we report on measurements of atmospheric methane from an extensive global network of flask sampling sites, which reveal that, although methane continues to accumulate in the atmosphere, there has been a substantial slowing of the global accumulation rate between 1983 and 1990. If this deceleration continues steadily, global methane concentrations will reach a maximum around the year 2006. Our results hint that changes in methane emissions in the latitude band 30–90° N may be of particular significance to this trend.A QUANTITATIVE understanding of the rates and mechanisms of dissolution of crystalline solids in aqueous solutions is critical to the chemical modelling of many geochemical, environmental and industrial processes. Here I show that a linear free energy equation, developed recently^1,2 for the prediction of the standard Gibbs free energies of formation of isostructural families of crystalline solids, can also be used for predicting the dissolution rates of solids. This equation bears a close analogy with the Hammett equation for aqueous organics^3. Regression of data for the surface-reaction-controlled dissolution rates of isostructural families of divalent metal oxides and orthosilicates using the new equation yields coefficients characteristic of the specific crystal structure, whichturn out to be very close to the coefficients obtained by regression of standard free energy data for the same families. These results suggest that standard free energy coefficients can be used to predict dissolution rates.THE solar chromosphere is a thin layer of gas that is several thousand degrees hotter than the underlying photosphere, and responsible for most of the Sun's ultraviolet emission. The mechanism by which it is heated to temperatures exceeding 10,000 K is not understood. Millimetre and submillimetre radiometry can be used to obtain the chromospheric temperature profile, but the diffraction-limited resolution for the largest telescopes is at best 17 arcsec, or ∼12,500 km at the Sun's distance. This is greater than the thickness of the quiet chromosphere itself. The total eclipse of July 1991, which passed over the Mauna Kea Observatory in Hawaii, provided a rare opportunity to make limb occultation observations with a large submillimetrewavelength telescope, the 15-m James Clerk Maxwell Telescope, and in this way we obtained a temperature profile in 1.3-mm radiation with ∼300 km resolution at the Sun. Our observations indicate that spicules (magnetically entrained funnels of gas) reach a temperature of 8,000 K at 3,000–4,000 km above the photosphere, a temperature lower than those of many spicule models.Analysis of the folding of hen lysozyme shows that the protein does not become organized in a single cooperative event but that different parts of the structure become stabilized with very different kinetics. In particular, in most molecules the α -helical domain folds faster than the β -sheet domain. Furthermore, different populations of molecules fold by kinetically distinct pathways. Thus, folding is not a simple sequential assembly process but involves parallel alternative pathways, some of which may involve substantial reorganization steps.ALTHOUGH there have been experimental studies of the structure of the C_60 molecule in the gas phase^1 and the solid state at low temperature^2, so far only indirect experimental details of the structure of the C_70 molecule have been available^3. The ellipsoidal structure for C_70, the subject of recent theoretical work^4,5, should provide a useful test of current understanding of carbon–carbon bonding, in that a single molecule contains several distinct types of bond in various relationships to pentagonal and hexagonal rings. Conventional crystallographic techniques are not suitable for studying C_70 at room temperature because of poor crystallinity and orientational disorder in solid samples. Here we present the results of a study in which the molecular structure of C_70 was deduced from electron diffraction using a simulated-annealing method. The 'rugby' ball structure is confirmed, with a slight pinching of the waist, and the bond lengths are found to follow a simple pattern determined by their relationship to the five and six-membered rings.THE surprisingly high transition temperatures ( T _c) for superconductivity in alkali-meta-doped C_60 has spurred wide interest in understanding its mechanism^1–6. Recently the increase in T _c with lattice constant was demonstrated for these materials^6, and was interpreted as resulting from the corresponding increase in the density of states at the Fermi level. According to the standard (BCS) theory of superconductivity, the other important factor controlling T _c is the phonon that mediates electron pairing. To test whether this factor plays a part for the C_60 superconductors, we prepared C_60 containing various amounts of ^13C, which we then doped with rubidium to give Rb_3C_60. Measurements of diamagnetic shielding and Meissner effect show that T _c decreases as the ^13C content increases, as expected within the context of BCS-like phonon-mediated pairing; but the dependence on the mass is stronger than for most electron-phonon superconductors where T _c m ^−α with α ≤0.5. Instead, the exponent a has the remarkably large value of 1.4±0.5. Regardless of the interpretation of this value, it is clear that phonons have an important role in the origin of superconductivity in doped C_60.The Geography of Science. By Harold Dorn. The Johns Hopkins University Press: 1991. Pp. 219. $41.50, £26.Long-Term Potentiation: A Debate of Current Issues. By Michel Baudry andJoel L. Davis. published by MITPress: 1991. Pp. 454. £62, $70.In the Wake of Galileo. By Michael Segre. published by Rutgers University Press. 1991. Pp. 192. $27.95.HELIUM–3 is created by cosmological nucleosynthesis with an abundance ^3He/H ≈ 2 x 10^−5 (ref. 1), but then augmented by stellar nucleosynthesis. Stars comparable in mass to the Sun should contribute a large fraction of the present ^3He abundance in interstellar material^2: winds from these stars during their main-sequence lifetime, as well as planetary nebulae created by more rapid mass loss later in the stars' lives, are expected to have ^3He/H about 100 times the cosmic value. These stars are also thought to be the principal source of new material to the interstellar medium^3, and measurement of the present ^3He abundance should therefore be an important diagnostic of chemical evolution in the Galaxy,as well as an essential prelude to determining the primordial cosmic abundance^4. Over a decade ago we began a programme^5–7 to measure the galactic ^3He abundance, but until recently it had been possible to detect it only in giant H II regions, where it is already well mixed into the interstellar medium. We report here its first detection in a ^3He source, the planetary nebula NGC3242. We measure ^3He/H ≳10^−3, consistent with stellar models.THE recently observed rise^1 in radio flux from SN1987A is earlier than predicted in models of the interaction with the observed line-emitting gas^2,3. The observed size of the radio source is roughly consistent with the expected position of the supernova shock wave, which is inside the optically emitting ring. The size is also consistent with the position of the termination shock of the blue supergiant progenitor wind, and the radio increase is attributed to the interaction of the supernova shock with this density jump. The required efficiency of electron acceleration and magnetic field amplification is larger than usually occurs in supernovae and supernova remnants. Possible reasons for the enhanced radio emission are particle acceleration by the weak reflected shock that travels through the interaction region, and the action of the Richtmyer-Meshkov instability near the initial termination-shock density jump. The action of these mechanisms is time-limited; the prediction of this model is that the radio flux should begin to decline within the next year.THE X-ray transient source GS2023 + 338 was discovered in out-burst by the Ginga satellite in 1989 (ref. 1) and has since been identified with the previously known recurrent nova V404 Cygni^2. This system is recognized to be a low-mass X-ray binary^3, with X-ray behaviour similar to black hole systems^4, but attempts to deduce an orbital period from photometry^5–9 and spectroscopy^10,11 have yielded modulations with periods from 10 minutes to 6 hours. Two years after the outburst, we have used the William Herschel Telescope to find absorption features in V404 Cyg characteristic of a late G or early K star with a radial velocity curve of amplitude 211 ± 4km s^−1 and period 6.473 ± 0.001 days. The deduced mass function of 6.26±0.31 M ⊙ is a firm lower limit to the mass of the compact object, which for reasonable assumptions of orbital inclination and companion star mass must be a black hole with probable mass in the range 8–15.5 M ⊙. We consider this the most persuasive case yet for the existence of a black hole.Reconstructions of the family tree of modern people by phylogenetic analysis based on extant mitochondrial DNA appear unexpectedly difficult. An African Eden seems not yet proven.How is it that US inhabitants can be supplied with 218 pounds of meat annually per capita? Modern farming methods are responsible, but are unfairly criticized as inhumane.A complementary DNA clone encoding the large subunit of the essential mammalian premessenger RNA splicing component U2 snRNP auxiliary factor (U2AF^65) has been isolated and expressed in vitro . It contains two functional domains: a sequence-specific RNA-binding region composed of three ribonucleo protein-consensus sequence domains, and an arginine/serine-rich motif necessary for splicing but not for binding to pre-mRNA.The resolution of electron microscopy may be extended by combining the phase information in microscope images with electron diffraction intensities. A general method for obtaining structural reconstructions at a resolution greater than that of the phase information is demonstrated for crystals of perchlorocoronene. By using entropy maximization methods combined with likelihood ranking, the resolution is extended from 0.32 nm in the microscope images to 0.1 nm in the reconstruction from phase and intensity data.Sporulation in Bacillus subtilis is a model for how cells of one type generate other differentiated cell types. During sporulation two cellular compartments arise that differ from each other and from the progenitor cell. Differential gene expression between the two is governed by the successive appearance of four transcription factors whose activities are coordinated in crisscross fashion between the two cells.On Methuselah's Trail: Living Fossils and the Great Extinctions. ByPeter Douglas Ward. W. H. Freeman: 1991. Pp.214. $18.95, £14.95.Next Sunday's referendum on animals in research could damage Swiss research, academic and industrial.Described by its leader as a $9-billion dollar corporation, the US National Institutes of Health are giving long-range corporate planning for biomedical research a try.DUE to a production error after the return of corrected proofs, Figs 3a and 6a ofthis article were printed upside down. Correct orientations are shown here with relevant parts of the figure legends. Discussions in the text relating to the polymer structure and its relative polarity apply to the orientations shown here.APTAMERS^1 are double-stranded DNA or single-stranded RNA molecules that bind specific molecular targets. Large randomly generated populations can be enriched in aptamers by in vitro selection and polymerase chain reaction^1–11. But so far single-stranded DNA has not been investigated for aptamer properties, nor has a target protein been considered that does not interact physiologically with nucleic acid. Here we describe the isolation of single-stranded DNA aptamers to the protease thrombin of the blood coagulation cascade and report binding affinities in the range 25–200 nM. Sequence data from 32 thrsombin aptamers, selected from a pool of DNA containing 60 nucleotides of random sequence, displayed a highly conserved 14–17–base region. Several of these aptamers at nanomolar concentrations inhibited thrombin-catalysed fibrin-clot formation in vitro using either purified fibrinogen or human plasma.RECOGNITION of the oligosaccharide portion of ganglioside GM1 in membranes of target cells by the heat-labile enterotoxin from Escherichia coli is the crucial first step in its pathogenesis, as it is for the closely related cholera toxin^1–3. These toxins have five B subunits, which are essential for GM1 binding, and a single A subunit, which needs to be nicked by proteolysis and reduced, yielding an Al–'enzyme' and an A2–'linker' peptide. A1 is translocated across the membrane of intestinal epithelial cells, possibly after endocytosis^4,5, upon which it ADP-ribosylates the G protein Gsa (reviewed in refs 2, 3, 6). The mechanism of binding and translocation of these toxins has been extensively investigated^1,2,7–20, but how the protein is orientated on binding is still not clear^10–12,18. Knowing the precise arrangement of the ganglioside binding sites of the toxins will be useful for designing drugs against the diarrhoeal diseases caused by organisms secreting these toxins and in the development of oral vaccines against them^21,22. We present here the three-dimensional structure of the E. coli heat-labile enterotoxin complexed with lactose. This reveals the location of the binding site of the terminal galactose of GM1, which is consistent with toxin binding to the target cell with its A1 fragment pointing away from the membrane. A small helix is identified at the carboxy terminus of A2 which emerges through the central pore of the B subunits and probably comes into contact with the membrane upon binding, whereas the A1 subunit is flexible with respect to the B pentamer.CELL-FATE specification of R7 photoreceptors in the developing Drosophila eye depends on an inductive signal from neighbouring R8 cells. Mutations in three genes, sevenless (sev), bride-of-sevenless (boss) and seven-in-absentia (sina) cause the R7 precursor to become a non-neural cone cell^1–3. The sev gene encodes a receptor protein tyrosine kinase (Sev) localized on the R7 surface, activated by a boss-encoded ligand presented by R8 (refs 4–6). The sina gene encodes a nuclear factor required in R7 (ref. 3). Reduction in the dosage of the Rasl gene impairs Sev-mediated signalling, suggesting that activation of Rasl may be an important consequence of Sev activation^7. We report here that Rasl activation may account for all of the signalling action of Sev; an activated Rasl^Val12 protein rescues the normal R7 precursor from transformation into a cone cell in sev and boss null mutants and induces the formation of supernumerary R7 cells. Similar activation of the Drosophila Ras2 protein does not produce these effects, demonstrating Ras protein specificity.XERODERMA pigmentosum (XP), a human autosomal recessive disorder, is characterized by extreme sensitivity to sunlight and high incidence of skin cancers. XP cells are defective in the incision step of excision repair of DNA damaged by ultraviolet light. Cell fusion studies have defined seven XP complementation groups, XP-A to XP-G (refs 1,2). Similar genetic complexity of excision repair is observed in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae . Mutations in any one of five yeast genes, RAD1, RAD2, RAD3, RAD4, and RAD10 , cause a total defect in incision and an extreme sensitivity to ultraviolet light^3. Here we report the characterization of the yeast RAD14 gene. The available radl4 point mutant is only moderately ultraviolet-sensitive, and it performs a substantial amount of incision of damaged DNA^4,5. Our studies with the radl4 deletion (A) mutation indicate an absolute requirement of RAD14 in incision. RAD14 encodes a highly hydrophilic protein of 247 amino acids containing zinc-finger motifs, and it is similar to the protein encoded by the human XPAC gene that complements XP group A cell lines^6.SEX in Caenorhabditis elegans is determined by a regulatory cascade of seven interacting autosomal genes controlled by three X-linked genes in response to the X chromosome-to-autosome (X/A) ratio^1,2. XX animals (high X/A) develop as self-fertile hermaphrodites, and XO animals (low X/A) develop as males. The activity of the first gene in the sex-determining cascade, her-1 , is required for male sexual development^3. XO her-l loss-of-function mutants develop as self-fertile hermaphrodites, whereas XX her-l gain-of-function mutants develop as masculinized intersexes^4. By genetic mosaic analysis using a fused free duplication linking her-l to a cell-autonomous marker gene, we show here that her-l expression in a sexually dimorphic cell is neither necessary nor sufficient for that cell to adopt a male fate. Our results suggest that her-l is expressed in many, possibly all, cells and that its gene product can function non-autonomously through cell interactions to determine male sexual development.MYOTONIC dystrophy is a common dominant disorder (global incidence of 1:8,000) with variable onset and a protean nature of symptoms mainly involving progressive muscle wasting, myotonia and cataracts^1. To define the molecular defect, we have cloned the essential region of chromosome 19ql3.3, including proximal and distal markers^2–7 in a 700–kilobase contig formed by overlapping cosmids and yeast artificial chromosomes (YACs). The central part of the contig bridges an area of about 350 kilobases between two new flanking crossover borders^4–5. This segment has been extensively characterized through the isolation of five YAC clones and the subsequent subcloning in cosmids from which a detailed Eco Rl, Hind III, Mlu l and Not l restriction map has been derived. Two genomic probes and two homologous complementary DNA probes were isolated using the cosmids. These probes are all situated within ∼10 kilobases of genomic DNA and detect an unstable genomic segment in myotonic dystrophy patients. The length variation in this segment shows similarities to the instability seen at the fragile X locus 8 . The physical map location and the genetic characteristics of the length polymorphism is compatible with a direct role in the pathogenesis of myotonic dystrophy.MYOTONIC dystrophy (DM) is the most common form of adult muscular dystrophy, with a prevalence of 2–14 per 100,000 individuals^1. The disease is characterized by progressive muscle weakness and sustained muscle contraction, often with a wide range of accompanying symptoms. The age at onset and severity of the disease show extreme variation, both within and between families. Despite its clinical variability, this dominant condition segregates as a single locus at chromosome 19ql3.3 in every population studied^1. It is flanked by the tightly linked genetic markers ERCC1 proximally 2,3 and D19S51 distally 4,5 ; these define the DM critical region. We report the isolation of an expressed sequence from this region which detects a DNA fragment that is larger in affected individuals than in normal siblings or unaffected controls. The size of this fragment varies between affected siblings, and increases in size through generations in parallel with increasing severity of the disease. We postulate that this unstable DNA sequence is the molecular feature that underlies DM.MYOTONIC Received 2 December 1991; accepted 7 January 1992. dystrophy is the commonest adult form of muscular dystrophy, with an estimated incidence of 1 per 7,500, although this is likely to be an underestimate because of the difficulty of detecting minimally affected individuals. It is a multisystem autosomal dominant disorder of unknown biochemical basis^1. No case of new mutation has been proven. We have isolated a human genomic clone that detects novel restriction fragments specific to individuals with myotonic dystrophy. A two-allele Eco Rl polymorphism is seen in normal individuals, but in most affected individuals one of the normal alleles is replaced by a larger fragment, which varies in length both between unrelated affected individuals and within families. The unstable nature of this region may explain the characteristic variation in severity and age at onset of the disease. A second polymorphism at this locus is in almost complete linkage disequilibrium with myotonic dystrophy, strongly supporting our earlier results which indicated that most cases are descended from one original mutation^2.THE primate superior colliculus contains a map of saccadic eye movements^1,2. Saccades are high-velocity eye movements to selected targets in the visual field, but little is known about the neural mechanisms responsible for target selection or the related problem of choosing a particular movement from the oculomotor repertoire. Two classes of neurons have been described in the superior colliculus which show bursts of activity before the saccade: discrete bursters display a vigorous pre-saccadic burst and prelude bursters^3 show low-frequency activity as a prelude to burst onset. We have designed experiments to test whether prelude activity is related to saccade selection. Our tasks use a cue to specify which of two physically identical visual stimuli is the goal of an impending saccade. This cue is spatially and temporally isolated from the potential targets as well as from visual cues signalling movement initiation. Our results show that prelude activity occurs shortly after information is available for correct saccade selection and, more importantly, the activity is predictive of saccade choice. The results thus suggest that the superior colliculus participates in the process of saccade selection.The Hypnotic Brain: Hypnotherapy and Social Communication. ByPeter Brown. Yale University Press: 1991. Pp. 322. £25, $40. Embryo.KING crabs (Family Lithodidae) are among the world's largest arthropods, having a crab-like morphology and a strongly calcified exoskeleton^1–6. The hermit crabs, by contrast, have depended on gastropod shells for protection for over 150 million years^5,7. Shell-living has constrained the morphological evolution of hermit crabs by requiring a decalcified asymmetrical abdomen capable of coiling into gastropod shells and by preventing crabs from growing past the size of the largest available shells^1–6. Whereas reduction in shell-living and acquisition of a crab-like morphology (carcinization) has taken place independently in several hermit crab lineages, and most dramatically in king crabs^1–6, the rate at which this process has occurred was entirely unknown^2,7. We present molecular evidence that king crabs are not only descended from hermit crabs, but are nested within the hermit crab genus Pagurus . We estimate that loss of the shell-living habit and the complete carcinization of king crabs has taken between 13 and 25 million years.IRON is essential to the growth of organisms, and iron derived from the atmosphere may be the limiting nutrient for primary productivity in some oceanic regions^1–6. Aeolian mineral dust is the chief source of marine iron in many areas^1–3,5,7, but there is little information on the chemical form of the iron in this dust. Here we report that Fe(n) contributed 56±32% of the total iron in marine aerosol samples collected over the central North Pacific and 49 + 15% at Barbados. We suggest that the key reaction that produces Fe(n), and hence increases the solubility of marine aerosol iron in sea water, is [Fe(in)(OH)(H_2O)_5]^2+ + H_2O^ [Fe(n)(H_2O)_6]^2+ + OH- (refs 8–10). The presence of Fe(n) in remote marine aerosols suggests that the OH radical has been produced in these heterogeneous reactions. From consideration of both the marine biological production of dimethylsulphide and the subsequent oxidation of reduced forms of sulphur in the atmosphere, we propose that the iron and sulphur cycles in both the atmosphere and the ocean may be closely coupled.THE direct reaction of HOC1 with HC1, known to occur in liquid water^1 and on glass surfaces^2, has now been measured on surfaces similar to polar stratospheric clouds^3,4 and is shown here to play a critical part in polar ozone loss. Two keys to understanding the chemistry of the Antarctic ozone hole^5–7 are, one, the recognition that reactions on polar stratospheric clouds transform HC1 into more reactive species denoted by ClO_x(refs 8&#150;12) and, two, the discovery of the ClO-dimer (C1_2O_2) mechanism that rapidly catalyses destruction of O_3(refs 13&#150;15). Observations of high levels of OClO and ClO in the springtime Antarctic stratosphere^16&#150;19 confirm that most of the available chlorine is in the form of ClO_x (refs 20, 21). But current photochemical models_22,23 have difficulty converting HC1 to ClO_x rapidly enough in early spring to account fully for the observations^5–7,20,21. Here I show, using a chemical model, that the direct reaction of HOC1 with HC1 provides the missing mechanism. As alternative sources of nitrogen-containing oxidants, such as N_2O_5 and ClONO_2, have been converted in the late autumn to inactive HNO_3 by known reactions on the sulphate-layer aerosols^24–27, the reaction of HOC1 with HC1 on polar stratospheric clouds becomes the most important pathway for releasing that stratospheric chlorine which goes into polar night as HC1.AN understanding of the superconductivity and other electronic properties of the alkali-metal-doped fullerenes^1 will require measurements of their solid-state physical properties. In the normal state one would like to know the electron effective mass, the Fermi energy and conduction bandwidth, and the mean free path for electron transport; the superconducting state, meanwhile, can be characterized at the most basic level by length and energy scales such as the coherence length, penetration depth and superconducting energy gap. Here we describe the use of far-infrared reflectivity measurements to probe the low-energy response of Rb_3C_60. We derive a value for the characteristic energy scale associated with reflectivity, which allows us to estimate a value for the gap energy 2δ of 3–5 kT _C, in reasonable agreement with tunnelling measurements^2. Combining this result with data obtained in previous studies, we estimate other length and energy scales, such as the bandwidth and penetration depth.IT has been demonstrated^1–6 that solid C_60 can be readily intercalated with group IA alkali metals to give metallic or insulating compounds, depending on the dopant concentration. The metal atoms diffuse into tetrahedral and octahedral interstitial sites of the C_60 lattice with little disturbance to the face-centred cubic (f.c.c.) packing^7. The A_3C_60f.c.c. phases (A is K, Rb, Cs and mixtures of these) exhibit superconductivity with a transition temperature that increases with lattice constant^8. At higher dopant concentration a body-centred tetragonal A_4C_60 phase^9 and an insulating, body-centred cubic A_4C_60 phase^10 are found. Here we report that the divalent group IIA intercalant calcium can be intercalated into the f.c.c. sites of C_60 to form a solid solution, and that, near a Ca:C_60 ratio of 5:1, a phase transformation occurs to a simple cubic phase. Measurements of microwave loss, magnetic susceptibility and Meissner effect show that the simple cubic phase becomes superconducting below 8.4 K.IT has been known for almost two decades that there is a compact, nonthermal radio source within one arcsecond of the dynamical/ gravitational centre of our Galaxy^1,2. This source, designated SgrA^*, is regarded as the most likely candidate for a central black hole^3. Evidence for an active central source has, however, so far been lacking at infrared wavelengths^4–8. Here we report near-infrared speckle and imaging spectroscopic observations which resolve the central complex (comprising SgrA^*and the infrared source IRS16) into about two dozen compact sources. An expanding bubble of hot gas is found to be centred within 3 arcsec of SgrA^*. There is also evidence of a blue object, positionally coincident with SgrA^*, emitting at 2 μm. The hot bubble is probably created by shock excitation of a fast wind. These observations are consistent with the presence of an accreting massive black hole at the Galactic Centre.MANY astrophysical objects, from young stars, Herbig–Haro objects and planetary nebulae up to active galactic nuclei, can be very simply modelled as isotropic sources of high-energy tenuous gas embedded in dense toroidal clouds. Here we describe numerical simulations showing how such an arrangement can in general circumstances give rise to a well collimated jet, as is observed in many of these systems. Our model is a two-dimensional generalization of the interacting-winds description of planetary nebulae. Where the two winds come into contact, a discontinuity is formed, which is dragged out by the fast outflowing gas into a chimney along the polar axis. High-energy gas rushes up this channel and flows out around the top, creating a hot backflow which keeps the chimney in place. The inner shock, enclosing the source of the fast wind, also aids in collimation, and ionization cones such as those observed in active galactic nuclei may also form.THE angular and luminosity distributions of the y&#150;ray bursts observed by the BATSE instrument, on the Gamma Ray Observatory satellite, cannot be explained by sources confined to the galactic plane^1. Instead the observations are consistent with a nearly isotropic source density that falls with distance. Although this permits a cosmological origin, it also permits an origin in the halo of our Galaxy, preserving some aspects of models in which galactic neutron stars are the sites of the bursts. I show here that significant isotropy can be achieved with a spherically symmetric halo model if it extends out beyond 100 kpc. Large halo core radii enhance isotropy, although consistency with observation is possible for core radii as small as 5 kpc if the halo radius is sufficiently large. The intrinsic luminosity distribution of y&#150;ray bursts must be treated as a free parameter to fit the observations. If y&#150;ray bursts are from the halo, they are likely to be old population II neutron stars, because models based on pulsars escaping from the galactic plane have strong anisotropies.RECENT observations from the BATSE experiment on the Gamma Ray Observatory^1,2 demonstrate that the number of weak γ-ray bursts is smaller than expected for a uniform distribution of source distances, and that the distribution of weak bursts is isotropic. This suggests that the sources are at cosmological, rather than intragalactic, distances^3,4. A number of possible tests for estimating the distances to γ-ray bursters have been discussed^3, but all are difficult to implement in practice. There is therefore no further evidence at present to support a cosmological distance to the bursters. Here I describe a test of distances that might be done with the BATSE data, which is equivalent to the formulation of the Hubble diagram for galactic redshifts. If the typical redshift of γ-ray bursters is of the order of unity, the weakest bursts should have softer spectra than the strongest. There is some evidence for such a correlation in the BATSE data^5. If confirmed, this would provide the first spectroscopic indication that the burst sources lie at cosmological distances. There is also evidence that the redshift effect has been detected in the duration of a subset of the BATSE bursts^6. If confirmed, this would be evidence that not only the photons but also the light curves are stretched by the cosmological redshift.Small-scale industrial research in Japan stands out for its pursuit of excellence and for its willingness to devote time to fundamental investigations—if only to show customers what they might also achieve.The United States must learn how to cooperate with others if space research is to continue. The dilemma of the hypersonic plane is a case in point.Gene targeting in mouse embryo-derived stem cells has been used to generate mice with a disruption in the homeobox gene Hox&#150;1.6. Mice heterozygous at the Hox-#150;1.6 locus appear normal, whereas Hox&#150;1.6 ^- /Hox&#150;1.6 ^- mice die at or shortly after birth. These homozygotes exhibit profound defects in the formation of the external, middle and inner ears as well as in specific hindbrain nuclei, and in cranial nerves and ganglia. The affected tissues lie within a narrow region along the anteroposterior axis of the mouse but are of diverse embryonic origin. The set of defects associated with the disruption of Hox-1.6 is distinct from and nonoverlapping with that of the closely linked Hox-1.5 gene. But both mutations cause loss, rather than homeotic transformation, of tissues and structures.Called the "mystery of mysteries" by Darwin, speciation is still a little-understood area of evolution. Genetic analysis, however, has yielded new generalizations about speciation and suggests promising avenues of research.Kin Recognition. ByPeter G. Hepper. Cambridge University Press: 1991. Pp. 457. £60, $89.50.There seem to be elections everywhere, but the British version promises little for science.President George Bush's State of the Union address last week included enough of the right things to pass muster, but it remains to be seen whether his recipes will work, now and in the more distant future.The Triumph of the Embryo. ByLewis Wolpert. Oxford University Press: 1991. Pp. 244. £14.95, $22.95.Neutrino Physics. ByKlaus Winter. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 670. £75, $125.The Heritage of Giotto's Geometry: Art and Science on the Eve of the Scientific Revolution. BySamuel Y. Edgerton Jr. Cornell University Press: 1991. Pp. 319. $39.95.CLINICAL and experimental studies suggest that angiogenesis is a prerequisite for solid tumour growth^1,2. Several growth factors with mitogenic or chemotactic activity for endothelial cells in vitro have been described, but it is not known whether these mediate tumour vascularization in vivo ^3,4. Glioblastoma, the most common and most malignant brain tumour in humans, is distinguished from astrocytoma by the presence of necroses and vascular prolifer-ations5'6. Here we show that expression of an endothelial cell-specific mitogen, vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), is induced in astrocytoma cells but is dramatically upregulated in two apparently different subsets of glioblastoma cells. The high-affinity tyrosine kinase receptor for VEGF, flt , although not expressed in normal brain endothelium, is upregulated in tumour endothelial cells in vivo . These observations strongly support the concept that tumour angiogenesis is regulated by paracrine mechanisms and identify VEGF as a potential tumour angiogenesis factor in vivo .INEFFICIENT vascular supply and the resultant reduction in tissue oxygen tension often lead to neovascularization in order to satisfy the needs of the tissue^1. Examples include the compensatory development of collateral blood vessels in ischaemic tissues that are otherwise quiescent for angiogenesis and angiogenesis associated with the healing of hypoxic wounds^2. But the presumptive hypoxia-induced angiogenic factors that mediate this feedback response have not been identified. Here we show that vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF; also known as vascular permeability factor) probably functions as a hypoxia-inducible angiogenic factor. VEGF messenger RNA levels are dramatically increased within a few hours of exposing different cell cultures to hypoxia and return to background when normal oxygen supply is resumed. In situ analysis of tumour specimens undergoing neovascularization show that the production of VEGF is specifically induced in a subset of glioblastoma cells distinguished by their immediate proximity to necrotic foci (presumably hypoxic regions) and the clustering of capillaries alongside VEGF-producing cells.SUPERANTIGENS such as the staphylococcal enterotoxins bind to major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class II molecules and activate T cells through a specific interaction between the V/β region of the T-cell antigen receptor (TCR) and the toxin^1–4. The TCR β -chain alone is sufficient to produce the interaction with the enterotoxin–class II complex^5. Identification of the regions of enterotoxins that interact with TCR has so far proved equivocal because of difficulties in distinguishing between direct effects on T-cell recognition and indirect effects resulting from alteration of binding to class II. For example, amino-terminal truncations of SEB abrogated T-cell stimulation whereas carboxy-terminal truncation of SEA stopped its mitogenic activity^10,11. The most comprehensive study to date, accounting for both enterotoxin binding to class II and enterotoxin interactions with the TCR, identified two functionally important regions for SEB binding to TCR^12. Although the amino-acid sequences of staphylococcal enterotoxins A and E are 82% identical6, they activate T cells bearing different V β elements. We have assayed the binding of cells coated with these enterotoxins to soluble secreted TCR β -chain protein and find that V β 3 binds enterotoxin A but not E, whereas V β 11 binds enterotoxin but not A. To map the amino-acid residues responsible for these different binding specificities, we prepared a series of hybrids between the two staphylococcal enterotoxins. We report that just two amino-acid residues near the carboxy terminus of the enterotoxins are responsible for the dis-crimination between these molecules by V β 3 and V β 11. The crystal structure of staphylococcal enterotoxin B (ref. 12) indicates that these form part of the outer rim of the site recognizing TCR.MURINE Hox genes have been postulated to play a role in patterning of the embryonic body plan^1–3. Gene disruption studies have suggested that for a given Hox complex, patterning of cell identity along the antero–posterior axis is directed by the more 'posterior' (having a more posterior rostral boundary of expression) Hox proteins expressed in a given cell^4–6. This supports the 'posterior prevalence' model^2, which also predicts that ectopic expression of a given Hox gene would result in altered structure only in regions anterior to its normal domain of expression. To test this model further, we have expressed the Hox-4.2 gene more rostrally than its normal mesoderm anterior boundary of expression, which is at the level of the first cervical somites. This ectopic expression results in a homeotic transformation of the occipital bones towards a more posterior phenotype into structures that resemble cervical vertebrae, whereas it has no effect in regions that normally express Hox-4.2 . These results are similar to the homeotic posteriorization phenomenon generated in Drosophila by ectopic expression of genes of the homeotic complex HOM-C (refs 7–10; reviewed in ref. 3).CLOSTRIDIAL neurotoxins, including tetanus toxin and the seven serotypes of botulinum toxin (A–G), are produced as single chains and cleaved to generate toxins with two chains joined by a single disulphide bond (Fig. 1). The heavy chain (M_r 100,000 (100K)) is responsible for specific binding to neuronal cells and cell penetration of the light chain (50K), which blocks neurotransmitter release^1–9. Several lines of evidence have recently suggested that clostridial neurotoxins could be zinc endopeptidases^2,10–14. Here we show that tetanus and botulinum toxins serotype B are zinc endopeptidases, the activation of which requires reduction of the interchain disulphide bond. The protease activity is localized on the light chain and is specific for synaptobrevin, an integral membrane protein of small synaptic vesicles. The rat synaptobrevin-2 isoform is cleaved by both neurotoxins at the same single site, the peptide bond Gln76-Phe77, but the isoform synaptobrevin-1, which has a valine at the corresponding position, is not cleaved. The blocking of neurotransmitter release of Aplysia neurons injected with tetanus toxin or botulinum toxin serotype B is substantially delayed by peptides containing the synaptobrevin-2 cleavage site. These results indicate that tetanus and botulinum B neurotoxins block neurotransmitter release by cleaving synaptobrevin-2, a protein that, on the basis of our results, seems to play a key part in neurotransmitter release.THE function of the nervous system depends on the formation of a net of appropriate connections, but little is known of the genetic program underlying this process. In Drosophila two genes that specify different types of sense organs have been identified: cut ( ct ) 1,2 , which specifies the formation of external sense organs as opposed to chordotonal organs, and pox-neuro ( poxn )^3, which specifies the formation of poly-innervated (chemosensory) organs as opposed to mono-innervated (mechanosensory) organs. Whether these genes are also involved in specifying the connectivity of the corresponding neurons is not known. The larval sense organs are unsuitable for analysis of the axonal pathway and connections and so we have investigated the effect of poxn on the adult. Here we show that overexpression of poxn induces the morphological trans-formation of mechanosensory into chemosensory bristles on the legs and that the neurons innervating the morphologically transformed bristles follow pathways and establish connections that are appropriate for chemosensory bristles.MUCH attention has been given to the Prisoners' Dilemma as a metaphor for the problems surrounding the evolution of coopera-tive behaviour^1–6. This work has dealt with the relative merits of various strategies (such as tit-for-tat) when players who recognize each other meet repeatedly, and more recently with ensembles of strategies and with the effects of occasional errors. Here we neglect all strategical niceties or memories of past encounters, considering only two simple kinds of players: those who always cooperate and those who always defect. We explore the consequences of placing these players in a two-dimensional spatial array: in each round, every individual 'plays the game' with the immediate neighbours; after this, each site is occupied either by its original owner or by one of the neighbours, depending on who scores the highest total in that round; and so to the next round of the game. This simple, and purely deterministic, spatial version of the Prisoners' Dilemma, with no memories among players and no strategical elaboration, can generate chaotically changing spatial patterns, in which cooperators and defectors both persist indefinitely (in fluctuating proportions about predictable long-term averages). If the starting configurations are sufficiently symmetrical, these ever-changing sequences of spatial patterns—dynamic fractals—can be extraordinarily beautiful, and have interesting mathematical properties. There are potential implications for the dynamics of a wide variety of spatially extended systems in physics and biology.THE stability of social groups requires that conflicts among group members somehow be resolved. Recent models predict that sub-ordinates may be allowed limited reproduction by dominant colony-mates as an inducement to stay and aid dominants^1– For such 'social contracts' to be evolutionarily stable, attempted reproductive cheating by dominants must be punishable^3. In the eusocial paper wasp, Polistes fuscatus , subordinate queens that co-found nests with dominant queens usually disappear after the first workers emerge, so subordinates lay most of their reproductive-destined eggs just before worker emergence. Thus subordinates should be very sensitive to reproductive cheating during the latter period but relatively insensitive when worker-destined eggs are laid. Here we find in a series of egg-removal experiments designed to mimic egg-eating that subordinates do not change their aggressiveness when worker-destined eggs are removed, but that they greatly increase their aggression when reproductive-destined eggs are removed, especially when the queens are of similar size.THE origin of birds from theropod dinosaurs^1 is now broadly accepted, but there is little agreement as to which group of theropods is closest to avian ancestry^2. Here we report the discovery of a fragmentary skull in a collection of Late Cretaceous verte-brates from Mongolia. The skull presents a novel combination of theropod and primitive avian characters, which suggests that it belongs to the closest of the known non-avian relatives of Archaeopteryx and other birds. The new fossil shows consistent similarities to the troodontid theropods, for whom close avian relationships have been proposed3, and to Baryonyx ^4 and Spinosaurus ^5, two unusual theropods from the Lower Cretaceous of England and the lowermost Upper Cretaceous of Africa, respec-tively.A linkage map of the human genome has been constructed based on the segregation analysis of 814 newly characterized polymorphic loci containing short tracts of (C-A)_ n repeats in a panel of DNAs from eight large families. Statistical linkage analysis placed 813 of the markers into 23 linkage groups corresponding to the 22 autosomes and the X chromosome; 605 show a heterozygosity above 0.7 and 553 could be ordered with odds ratios above 1,000:1. The distance spanned corresponds to ∼90% of the estimated length of the human genome.THE 200-km-diameter Chicxulub structure^1–3 in northern Yucatan, Mexico has emerged as the prime candidate for the Cretaceous/Tertiary (K/T) boundary impact crater^3–6. Concentric geophysical anomalies associated with enigmatic occurrences of Upper Cretaceous breccias and andesitic rocks led Penfield and Camargo^1 to suspect that this structure was a buried impact basin. More recently, the discovery of shocked quartz grains in a Chicxulub breccia^3, and chemical similarities between Chicxulub rocks and K/T tektite-like glasses^3–6 have been advanced as evidence that the Chicxulub structure is a K/T impact site. Here we present evidence from core samples that Chicxulub is indeed a K/T source crater, and can apparently account for all the evidence of impact distributed globally at the K/T boundary without the need for simultaneous multiple impacts or comet showers. Shocked breccia clasts found in the cores are similar to shocked lithic fragments found worldwide in the K/T boundary ejecta layer^7,8. The Chicxulub melt rocks that we studied contain anomalously high levels of iridium (up to 13.5 parts per 10^9), also consistent with the iridium-enriched K/T boundary layer^9. Our best estimate of the crystallization age of these melt rocks, as determined by ^40Ar/<^39Ar analyses, is 65.2 ±0.4 (1σ) Myr, in good agreement with the mean plateau age of 64.98 ± 0.05 Myr recently reported^10. Furthermore, these melt rocks acquired a remanent magnetization indicating that they cooled during an episode of reversed geomagnetic polarity. The only such episode consistent with^40Ar/<^39Ar constraints is chron 29R, which includes the K/T boundary.THE response of the Antarctic ice sheets to increased global temperatures is an important unresolved issue in the assessment of future climate change. In particular, considerable controversy exists as to whether the East Antarctic ice sheet suffered extensive deglaciation during the mid-Pliocene epoch (∼3 Myr ago), when temperatures were only slightly warmer than today. Although the ice sheet is widely assumed to have existed in something like its present form for the past 14 Myr (ref. 1), marine diatoms eroded from the Antarctic interior have been found in glacial till deposits high in the Transantarctic Mountains^2,3, and have been bio-stratigraphically dated at ∼3 Myr before present. This age has been disputed^4 because it implies marine deposition in the Antarctic interior, and hence substantial deglaciation, at a time when other evidence has been marshalled for the persistence of cold, polar conditions^4. Here we report K–Ar and ^40Ar/<^39 Ar ages for a volcanic ash bed in diatom-bearing glaciomarine strata cored in Ferrar Fiord (East Antarctica) by the CIROS-2 drill-hole^5, which confirm the age of the diatoms at ∼3 Myr, and hence also confirm the mid-Pliocene deglaciation.Eastern Germany is making needless heavy weather over the status of academics.SAVANNAS consist of a continuous layer of grass interspersed with scattered trees or shrubs, and cover ∼10 million square kilometres of tropical Africa^1,2. African savanna fires, almost all resulting from human activities, may produce as much as a third of the total global emissions from biomass burning^3. Little is known, however, about the frequency and location of these fires, and the area burned each year^4. Emissions from African savanna burning are known to be transported over the mid-Atlantic, south Pacific and Indian oceans^5,6; but to study fully the transport of savanna fire emissions, the spatial and temporal variations in regional savanna burning and the seasonality of the atmospheric circulation must be considered simultaneously. Here we describe the temporal and spatial distribution of savanna fires over the entire African continent, as determined from night-time satellite imagery. We find that, contrary to expectations, most fires are left to burn uncontrolled, so that there is no strong diurnal cycle in the fire frequency. The knowledge gained from this study regarding the distribution and variability of fires will aid monitoring of the climatically important trace gases emitted from burning biomass.AN important discovery made by the 1986 spacecraft encounters with comet Halley was that of 'CHON particles', dust that is predominantly composed of the light elements carbon, hydrogen, oxygen and nitrogen^1–3. Using three sets of particle mass spectra that were critically selected for high dynamic range and a minimum of defects, we investigate here the relationship between CHON and silicate materials. We find that there are essentially no pure CHON particles in the 0.1–1 µm size range sampled; instead, essentially all Halley particles sampled by the mass spectrometers are a mixture of both CHON and silicate components. The earlier evidence for pure CHON particles^1,4,5 came from mass spectra with low dynamic range, in which only the highest major-element peaks could be detected. Our data show that the CHON and silicate components are interdispersed at submicrometre scales, and there is evidence that sublimation of volatile organic material occurs, bringing many particles to a common proportion of CHON and silicate material.Palaeomagnetic records from lavas suggest that at least two specific inclined dipolar field configurations have dominated the reversal process for the past ten million years. These long-lived states provide a way to explain directional rebounds, aborted reversals and the recording in sediments of what appear to be preferred longitudinal paths of the virtual geomagnetic pole. The polar orientations correlate with near-radial flux concentrations recognizable when today's field is stripped of its axial dipole, and with lower-mantle seismic anomalies, suggesting a tie to deep-Earth dynamics.Fuzzy Systems Theory and Its Applications. By Toshiro Terano, Kiyoji Asai and Michio Sugeno. Academic: 1992. Pp. 268. £33, $49.95.Stealing into Print: Fraud, Plagiarism, and Misconduct in Scientific Publishing. By Marcel LaFollette. University of California Press: 1992. Pp. 298. $30.The Last Ape: Pygmy Chimpanzee Behavior and Ecology. By Takayoshi Kano. Stanford University Press: 1992. Pp. 248. $45.Ideas in Chemistry: A History of the Science. By David Knight. Athlone: 1992. Pp. 213. £38. Science as Public Culture: Chemistry and Enlightenment in Britain, 1760-1820. By Jan Golinski. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 342. £32.50, $54.95. From Caveman to Chemist. By Hugh W. Salzberg. American Chemical Society/Royal Society of Chemistry: 1991. Pp. 294. $24.95, £18 (hbk); $14.95, £11 (pbk).Be STARS are rapidly rotating, non-supergiant B stars showing hydrogen-line emission and characterized by an excess of continuum emission from near-infrared to radio wavelengths. The latter is thought to arise from thermal bremsstrahlung in hot circumstellar gas^1, for which both spherical and disk-like geometries have been proposed^2,3 to explain observations at different wavelengths. The first Be star to be detected at radio wavelengths was the B5 giant ΨPersei^4–6, which is the brightest radio-emitting Be star. Using the Very Large Array, we have resolved the circumstellar envelope of Ψ Per at 15 GHz, and find that the radio emission comes from a non-spherical distribution of thermally radiating gas. The radio-emitting region has a major axis of 111 ±16 mas (17 AU at a distance of 155 pc), and is unresolved, with a 3σ upper limit of 68 mas, along its minor axis. Our observations confirm the proposal, due to Struve in 1931 (ref. 5), of equatorially enhanced circumstellar plasma distributions as the source of Be star emission.OF the known galactic globular clusters, ∼ 140 in number, about one-fifth have undergone core collapse, and an unknown number have evaporated altogether. From observational estimates of the dynamical relaxation times of globular clusters, measured at their cores and at their half-light radii, we estimate here the present rates at which core collapse and evaporation are occurring. We find a core collapse rate of 2 ± 1 per Gyr, which for a galactic age of ∼ 12 Gyr agrees well with the fact that 27 clusters have surface brightness profiles with the morphology expected for the post-collapse phase. We find a destruction and evaporation rate of 5±3 per Gyr, suggesting that a significant fraction of the Galaxy's original complement of globular clusters have perished, through the combined effects of mechanisms such as relaxation-driven evaporation and shocking due to interaction with the galactic disk and bulge.The three-dimensional structure of staphylococcal enterotoxin B, which is both a toxin and a super-antigen, has been determined to a resolution of 2.5 Å. The unusual main-chain fold containing two domains may represent a general motif adopted by all staphylococcal enterotoxins. The T-cell receptor binding site encompasses a shallow cavity formed by both domains. The MHCII molecule binds to an adjacent site. Another cavity with possible biological activity was also identified.THE rotation of the Crab pulsar, as measured by pulsed radio and optical emission, has been monitored almost continuously since its discovery in 1968. A steady decrease in the rotation rate has been interrupted at intervals of about five years by glitches: discontinuous increases in rotation speed followed by partial recovery in the form of an exponential return to a new slowdown rate on a timescale of about 20 days. The recovery is usually interpreted as the re-establishment of stable differential rotation between the neutron star crust and part of its superfluid interior. Here we describe the largest glitch so far recorded in the Crab pulsar^1. It occurred in 1989 while observations were being made, and the recovery was followed in unprecedented detail. The spin-up itself was also partly resolved in time, and the whole event, glitch plus recovery, is now seen to include three distinct exponential components, with timescales of 1, 20 and 300 days. The physical interpretation of these distinct components is unclear. The 1989 glitch, like the 1975 one^2, caused a permanent increase in the slowdown rate, of a magnitude that is difficult to reconcile with current neutron star models.The X-ray crystal structure of the molecular complex of penicillin G with a deacylation-defective mutant of the RTEM-1 β-lactamase from Escherichia coli shows how these antibiotics are recognized and destroyed. Penicillin G is covalently bound to Ser 70 O^γ as an acyl-enzyme intermediate. The deduced catalytic mechanism uses Ser 70 O^γ as the attacking nucleophile during acylation. Lys 73 N^ζ acts as a general base in abstracting a proton from Ser 70 and transferring it to the thiazolidine ring nitrogen atom via Ser 130 O^γ. Deacylation is accomplished by nucleophilic attack on the penicilloyl carbonyl carbon by a water molecule assisted by the general base, Glu 166.The solution by Onsager, almost exactly half a century ago, of a simple-minded two-dimensional model of a ferromagnet has been a powerful stimulus in theoretical physics.The following is an account of what happened when two researchers independently tried to correct errors in articles published in the leading US chemical journa1.The British government seems to believe that a market in energy absolves it from responsibility.The US Institute of Medicine has just produced a document that is either scary or a spur that will persuade governments to pay more attention to old-fashioned public health.Research tools for the neuroscientist featured this week include a patch-clamp analysis software package, a selection of perfusion chambers, imaging systems and an assortment of antibodies.PROTEIN G is a cell-surface protein from Streptococcus ^1,2 which binds to IgG molecules from a wide range of species with an affinity comparable to that of antigen^3,4. The high affinity of protein G for the Fab portion of IgG poses a particular challenge in molecular recognition, given the variability of heavy chain subclass, light chain type and complementarity-determining regions. Here we report the crystal structure of a complex between a protein G domain and an immunoglobulin Fab fragment. An outer β-strand in the protein G domain forms an antiparallel interaction with the last β-strand in the constant heavy chain domain of the immunoglobulin, thus extending the β-sheet into the protein G. The interaction between secondary structural elements in Fab and protein G provides an ingenious solution to the problem of maintaining a high affinity for many different IgG molecules. The structure also contrasts with Fab–antigen complexes, in which all contacts with antigen are mediated by the variable regions of the antibody, and to our knowledge provides the first details of interaction of the constant regions of Fab with another protein.MYRISTATE is a fatty acid (fourteen-carbon chain with no double bonds, C14:0) linked to the amino-terminal glycine of several proteins^1–7, including α-subunits of heterotrimeric (α/βγ) G proteins^8,9. We report here a novel modification at the N terminus of the α-subunit of the photoreceptor G protein transducin, Tα, with heterogeneous fatty acids composed of laurate (C12:0), unsaturated C14:2 and C14:1 fatty acids, and a small amount (∼5%) of myristate. Both the GTPase activity of Tα/Tβγ and the T/βγ-dependent ADP-ribosylation of Tα catalysed by pertussis toxin were inhibited by the lauroylated and myristoylated N-terminal peptide of Tα. The myristoylated peptide gave 50% inhibition at a 3.5 to ∼4.5-fold lower concentration than the lauroylated peptide in each assay, indicating that the strength of the interaction between Tα and Tβγ is altered by heterogeneous fatty acids linked to Tα. This suggests that a looser subunit interaction in transducin which is due to an abundance of N -linked fatty acids other than myristate would favour the rapid turnover and catalysis essential for the visual excitation in photoreceptor cells.DOUBLE-STRANDED RNA viruses have an RNA-dependent RNA polymerase activity associated with the viral particles which is indispensable for their replication cycle. Using the yeast L-A double-stranded RNA virus we have investigated the mechanism by which the virus encapsidates its genomic RNA and RNA polymerase. The L-A gag gene encodes the principal viral coat protein and the overlapping pol gene is expressed as a gag–pol fusion protein which is formed by a −1 ribosomal frameshift^1–3. Here we show that Gag alone is sufficient for virus particle formation, but that it fails to package the viral single-stranded RNA genome. Encapsidation of the viral RNA requires only a part of the Pol region (the N-terminal quarter), which is presumably distinct from the RNA polymerase domain. Given that the Pol region has single-stranded RNA-binding activity, these results are consistent with our L-A virus encapsidation model^1: the Pol region of the fusion protein binds specifically to the viral genome (+) strand, and the N-terminal gag -encoded region primes polymerization of Gag to form the capsid, thus ensuring the packaging of both the viral genome and the RNA polymerase.HOMOLOGUES of the gene encoding the 54K ( M _r 54,000) subunit of the mammalian signal recognition particle have been identified in different organisms^1–5. The Escherichia coli homologue, termed ffh (for fifty-four homologue), specifies a protein (Ffh) that shares many properties with its eukaryotic counterpart, including association with mammalian 7S RNA^6 and the ability to bind signal sequences specifically^7,8. Ffh also associates with E. coli 4.5S RNA, showing that it can form a ribonucleoprotein complex in prokaryotes^6,9,10. These results are intriguing because extensive genetic and biochemical characterization of E. coli failed to identify a signal recognition particle-like mechanism for protein export^11. Here we address this issue directly by construction of a strain in which ffh expression is arabinose-dependent. Results of depletion experiments indicate that Ffh is important in protein translocation.HYDROPHOBIC signal-sequences direct the transfer of secretory proteins across the inner membrane of prokaryotes and the endoplasmic reticulum membranes of eukaryotes^1. In mammalian cells, signal-sequences are recognized by the 54K protein ( M _r 54,000) of the signal recognition particle (SRP)^2,3 which is believed to hold the nascent chain in a translocation-competent conformation until it contacts the endoplasmic reticulum membrane^4. The SRP consists of a 7S RNA and six different polypeptides. The 7S RNA and the 54K signal-sequence-binding protein (SRP54) of mammalian SRP exhibit strong sequence similarity to the 4.5S RNA and P48 protein (Ff h) of Escherichia coli ^5–7 which form a ribonucleoprotein particle. Depletion of 4.5S RNA or overproduction of P48 causes the accumulation of the β-lactamase precursor, although not of other secretory proteins^8,9. Whether 4.5S RNA and P48 are part of an SRP-like complex with a role in protein export is controversial. Here we show that the P48/4.5S RNA ribonucleoprotein complex interacts specifically with the signal sequence of a nascent secretory protein and therefore is a signal recognition particle.THE ryanodine receptor protein of skeletal muscle sarcoplasmic reticulum (SR) membranes is a calcium ion channel which allows movement of calcium from the SR lumen into the cytoplasm during muscle activation^1–5. Gating of this channel is modulated by a number of physiologically important substances including calcium. Interestingly, calcium has both activating and inactivating effects which are concentration- and tissue-specific. In skeletal muscle, calcium-dependent inactivation of calcium release occurs at concentrations reached physiologically, suggesting that calcium may modulate the release process by a negative feedback mechanism^6–9. To determine the cellular mechanism responsible for calcium-dependent inactivation, we have investigated the ability of protein phosphorylation to affect single channel gating behaviour using the patch clamp technique. Here we demonstrate that the ryanodine receptor protein/calcium release channel of skeletal muscle SR is inactivated under conditions permissive for protein phosphorylation. This inactivation is reversed by the application of phosphatase and prevented by a peptide inhibitor specific for calcium/cal-modulin-dependent protein kinase II. The results provide evidence for an endogenous protein kinase which is closely associated with the ryanodine receptor protein and regulates channel gating.THE temporal and spatial dynamics of intracellular signals and protein effectors are being defined as a result of imaging using fluorescent reagents within living cells^1–5. We have described a new class of fluorescent analogues^2 termed optical biosensors^6, which sense chemical or molecular events through their effects on protein transducers^7. One example of this new class of indicators is MeroCaM, an environmentally sensitive fluorophore which when it is attached to calmodulin reflects the activation of calmodulin by calcium in vitro ^2. We report here that the rise in free calcium and MeroCaM activation occur in the same period during serum stimulation of quiescent fibroblasts. MeroCaM activation also correlates with the spatial pattern of increased free calcium and the contraction of transverse fibres during wound healing^1, 8–10. Finally, migrating fibroblasts in the later stages of wound-healing exhibit an increasing gradient of free calcium and MeroCaM activation from the front to the rear.IT is well known that transmitter secretion requires specialized secretory organdies, the synaptic vesicles, for the packaging, storage and exocytotic release of the transmitter^1,2. Here we report that when acetylcholine (ACh) is loaded into an isolated Xenopus myocyte, there is spontaneous quantal release of ACh from the myocyte which results in activation of its own surface ACh channels and the appearance of membrane currents resembling miniature endplate currents. This myocyte secretion probably reflects Ca^2+-regulated exocytosis of ACh-filled cytoplasmic compartments. Furthermore, step depolarization of the myocyte membrane triggers evoked ACh release from the myocyte with a weak excitation–secretion coupling. These findings suggest that quantal transmitter secretion does not require secretory pathways unique to neurons and that the essence of presynaptic differentiation may reside in the provision of transmitter supply and modification of the preexisting secretion pathway.T LYMPHOCYTES recognize antigens as peptide fragments associated with molecules encoded by the major histocompatibility complex (MHC) and expressed on the surface of antigen-presenting cells^1. In the thymus, T cells bearing αβ receptors that react with the MHC molecules expressed by radioresistant stromal elements are positively selected for maturation^2–5. In (A × B → A) bone marrow chimaeras, T cells restricted to the MHC-A haplotype are positively selected, whereas MHC-B-reactive thymocytes are not. We investigated whether the introduction of particular thymic stromal elements bearing MHC-B molecules could alter the fate of B-reactive T cells in these (A × B → A) chimaeras. Thymic epithelial cell (TEC) lines expressing H−2^b were introduced by intrathymic injection into (H−2^b/s → H2^S) bone marrow chimaeras and we measured their ability to generate H−2^b-restricted cytotoxic T-lymphocytes (CTLs). We report here that one TEC line, 427.1, was able positively to select CTLs specific for influenza and vesicular stomatitis virus antigens in association with class I H−2^bmolecules. In addition, line 427.1 can process cytoplasmic proteins for presentation to H−2K^b- and H−2D^b-restricted CTLs. Thus, a TEC line capable of normal class I MHC antigen processing and presentation in vitro can induce positive selection after intrathymic injection.THE primary mechanical functions of limb bones are to resist deformation, and hence provide stiff levers against which muscles can act, and to be sufficiently strong to prevent breaking under static or dynamic loads which arise from normal and accidental activities^1. If bones perform these functions with a minimum amount of material, the energetic costs associated with building, maintaining and transporting the skeleton will be minimized^2. Appropriate skeletal architecture for minimizing mass while maximizing strength depends on forces imposed on structural elements. In the evolutionary acquisition of flight in the bat lineage, the forelimb skeleton must have come to experience locomotor-forces that differed from those engendered by the terrestrial locomotion of non-flying bat relatives. Here we successfully measure in vivo strain on the wing bones of flying mammals. Our data demonstrate that torsion and shear are unique and crucial features of skeletal biomechanics during flight, and suggest that the evolution of skeletal design in bats and other flying vertebrates may be driven by the need to resist these loads.STUDIES of the role of haplodiploidy in the evolution of eusociality have been limited to the Hymenoptera, the only insects known to exhibit both reproductive castes and the haplodiploid genetic system^1. Because aculeate Hymenoptera share many other traits that may affect sociality, such as provisioning at nests, powerful flight, mandibulate mouthparts, and stings, it has been difficult to separate the effects of haplodiploidy from other characteristics of this taxonomic group^2'3. Here I report the presence of eusociality in a second haplodiploid insect taxon, the order Thysanoptera. Sub-fertile 'soldier' adults of the Australian gall thrips Oncothrips tepperi Karny and O. habrus Mound defend the gall containing their mother and siblings from invasion and takeover by inquiline thrips species and other insect invaders. Australian gall thrips provide remarkable new opportunities for analysing the causes of the evolution of eusociality.SORGHUM and millets are among the world's most important food crops and, for the inhabitants of the semi-arid tropics, they are the main sources of protein and energy. Little is known about the history of these crops; their domestication is thought to have occurred in the African savannah, but the date and precise location are unknown^1,2. Excavations at an early Holocene archaeological site in southernmost Egypt, 100 km west of Abu Simbel, have yielded hundreds of carbonized seeds of sorghum and millets, with consistent radiocarbon dates of 8,000 years before present (BP), thus providing the earliest evidence for the use of these plants. They are morphologically wild, but the lipid fraction of the sorghum grains shows a closer relationship to domesticated than to wild varieties. Whatever their domestic status, the use of these plants 8,000 years ago suggests that the African plant-food complex developed independently of the Levantine wheat and barley complex.Transforming growth factor-β1 (TGF-β1) is a multifunctional growth factor that has profound regulatory effects on many developmental and physiological processes. Disruption of the TGF-β1 gene by homologous recombination in murine embryonic stem cells enables mice to be generated that carry the disrupted allele. Animals homozygous for the mutated TGF-β1 allele show no gross developmental abnormalities, but about 20 days after birth they succumb to a wasting syndrome accompanied by a multifocal, mixed inflammatory cell response and tissue necrosis, leading to organ failure and death. TGF-β1-deficient mice may be valuable models for human immune and inflammatory disorders, including autoimmune diseases, transplant rejection and graft versus host reactions.THERE is abundant evidence to link continental flood basalt provinces with mantle plume activity^1,2; however, flood basalts often have radiogenic isotope signatures that are outside the range for plume sources as recorded in ocean-island basalts. These signatures are more readily attributed to source regions within the continental lithosphere, and there are strong indications that it is often the mantle lithosphere that contributes isotopically 'enriched' (low-^143Nd/<^144Nd) material^3,4. There are objections, however, to models that propose cold, refractory mantle lithosphere as an important source of basaltic magma^5. The rhenium–osmium system may provide new constraints on the relative importance of plume and sub-continental lithospheric mantle (SCLM) in basalt genesis: samples of SCLM brought to the surface as xenoliths commonly have low ^187Os/<^188Os ratios^6,7, whereas ocean-island basalts tend to have higher than chondritic ^187Os/<^188Os, and old continental crust has even higher (more radiogenic) ratios. Here we report initial ^187Os/<^188Os ratios for 190-Myr-old picrite basalts from the Nuanetsi region of the Karoo flood basalt province, which are most readily explained as mixtures between enriched SCLM and sub-lithospheric material, most probably derived from a mantle plume.TERRESTRIAL ecosystems are thought to play an important role in determining regional and global climate^1–6; one example of this is in Amazonia, where destruction of the tropical rainforest leads to warmer and drier conditions^4–6. Boreal forest ecosystems may also affect climate. As temperatures rise, the amount of continental and oceanic snow and ice is reduced, so the land and ocean surfaces absorb greater amounts of solar radiation, reinforcing the warming in a 'snow/ice/albedo' feedback which results in large climate sensitivity to radiative forcings^7–9. This sensitivity is moderated, however, by the presence of trees in northern latitudes, which mask the high reflectance of snow^10,11, leading to warmer winter temperatures than if trees were not present^12–14. Here we present results from a global climate model which show that the boreal forest warms both winter and summer air temperatures, relative to simulations in which the forest is replaced with bare ground or tundra vegetation. Our results suggest that future redistributions of boreal forest and tundra vegetation (due, for example, to extensive logging, or the influence of global warming) could initiate important climate feedbacks, which could also extend to lower latitudes.The Nobel season has come round again, but there is no closed season on speculation about this or next year's winners, irreverent though it may seem.This week's profiled products include a biotechnology database, a host of human cDNA clones, a new DNA film scanning system, a protein chemistry station and a preparative two-dimensional electrophoresis system.The speed and throughput of DNA sequencing can be increased by performing sequencing separations on arrays of microcapillaries followed by detection with a laser-excited, confocal-fluorescence scanner.EWING'S sarcoma and related subtypes of primitive neuroectodermal tumours share a recurrent and specific t(ll;22) (q24;q12) chromosome translocation^1–8, the breakpoints of which have recently been cloned^9. Phylogenetically conserved restriction fragments in the vicinity of EWSR1 and EWSR2, the genomic regions where the breakpoints of chromosome 22 and chromosome 11 are, respectively, have allowed identification of transcribed sequences from these regions and has indicated that a hybrid transcript might be generated by the translocation^9. Here we use these fragments to screen human complementary DNA libraries to show that the translocation alters the open reading frame of an expressed gene on chromosome 22 gene by substituting a sequence encoding a putative RNA-binding domain for that of the DNA-binding domain of the human homologue of murine Fli-1 .INTERFACIAL adsorption of pancreatic lipase is strongly dependent on the physical chemical properties of the lipid surface. These properties are affected by amphiphiles such as phospholipids and bile salts. In the presence of such amphiphiles, lipase binding to the interface requires a protein cofactor, colipase^1–3. We obtained crystals of the pancreatic lipase–procolipase complex and solved the structure at 3.04 Å resolution. Here we describe the structure of procolipase, which essentially consists of three 'fingers' and is topologically comparable to snake toxins^4,5. The tips of the fingers contain most of the hydrophobic amino acids and presumably form the interfacial binding site. Lipase binding occurs at the opposite side to this site and involves polar interactions. Determination of the three-dimensional structure of pancreatic lipase has revealed the presence of two domains: an amino-terminal domain, at residues 1–336 containing the active site and a carboxy-terminal domain at residues 337–449 (ref. 6). Procolipase binds exclusively to the C-terminal domain of lipase. No conformational change in the lipase molecule is induced by the binding of procolipase.THE early developmental period in Drosophila is characterized by rapid mitotic divisions, when the body pattern becomes organized by a cascade of segmentation gene activity^1,2. During this process localized expression of the gap gene knirps ( kni ) is required to establish abdomen segmentation^3,4. The knirps-related gene ( knrl ) encodes a kni -homologous nuclear hormone receptor-like protein^5,6 and shares the spatial patterns of kni expression. The two genes differ with respect to the size of their transcription units; kni contains 1 kilobase and knrl 19 kilobases of intron sequences. The consequence of this difference in intron size is that knrl cannot substitute for kni segmentation function, although it gains this ability when expressed from an intronless transgene. Here we show that the length of mitotic cycles provides a physiological barrier to transcript size, and is therefore a significant factor in controlling developmental gene activity during short 'phenocritical' periods. The required coordination of cycle length and gene size provides severe constraints towards the evolution of rapid development.GENETIC recombination involves classical crossing-over and gene conversion (aberrant segregation). In fungi that produce an ascus containing four spores, a gene conversion event is manifested as 3:1 or 1:3 (or more rarely 4:0 or 0:4) segregations, in contrast to the normal mendelian 2:2 segregation^1,2. Polarity is one of the properties of gene conversion; in almost all cases the frequency of conversion exhibits a gradient across the gene monitored1. The frequency of conversion is usually independent of the specific allele used as a marker, but dependent on its location. An interpretation of conversion polarity is that it is caused by the existence of specific initiation sites for meiotic recombination, located at the high end of the polarity gradient. Here we show that the polarity gradient for the HIS2 gene of Saccharomyces cerevisiae is high at the 3′ end of the gene, implying that the promoter of HIS2 is not the initiation site.THE ras -related low-molecular-mass GTPases participate in signal transduction involving a variety of cellular functions, including cell-cycle progression, cellular differentiation, cytoskeletal organization, protein transport and secretion^1,2. The cycling of these proteins between GTP-bound and GDP-bound states is partially controlled by GTPase activating proteins (GAPs) which stimulate the intrinsic GTP-hydrolysing activity of specific GTPases^1–6. The ras GTPase-activating protein (Ras-GAP) forms a complex with a second protein, p190 ( M _r 190,000), in growth-factor stimulated and tyrosine-kinase transformed cells^7,8. At its carboxy-terminal end, p190 contains a region that is conserved in the breakpoint cluster region, n -chimaerin, and Rho-GAP^9. Each of these three proteins exhibits GAP activity for at least one member of the rho family of small GTPases^10. We have tested recombinant p190 protein for GAP activity on GTPases of the ras , rho and rab families, and show here that p190 can function as a GAP specifically for members of the rho family. Consequently, the formation of a complex between Ras-GAP and p190 in growth-factor stimulated cells may allow the coupling of signalling pathways that involve ras and rho GTPases.INOSITOL phospholipid turnover is enhanced during mitogenic stimulation of cells by growth factors^1 and the breakdown of phosphatidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate (PtdInsP_2) may be important in triggering cell proliferation. PtdInsP_2 also binds actin-binding proteins to regulate their activity^2–7, but it is not yet understood how this control is achieved. The protein α -actinin from striated muscle contains large amounts of endogenous PtdInsP_2, whereas that from smooth muscle has only a little but will bind exogenously added PtdInsP_2. In vitro α -actinin binds to F-actin and will crosslink actin filaments, increasing the viscosity of F-actin solutions^8,9. We report here that α -actinin from striated muscle is an endogenous PtdInsP_2-bound protein and that the specific interaction between α -actinin and PtdInsP_2 regulates the F-actin-gelating activity of α -actinin. Although the F-actin-gelating activity of α -actinin from smooth muscle is much reduced compared with that from striated muscle, exogenous PtdInsP_2 can enhance the activity of smooth muscle α -actinin to the level seen in striated muscles. These results show that PtdInsP_2 is present in striated muscle α -actinin and that it is necessary for α -actinin to realize its maximum gelating activity.Rendezvous in Space: The Science of Comets. By John C. Brandt and Robert D. Chapman. W. H. Freeman: 1992. Pp. 290. $23.95, £16.95.RHODOPSIN kinase^1 and β -adrenergic receptor kinase ( β ARK)^2 are related members of a serine/threonine kinase family that specifically initiate deactivation of G-protein-coupled receptors. After stimulus-mediated receptor activation, these cytoplasmic kinases translocate to the plasma membrane^3,4. Here we show that the molecular basis for this event involves a class of unsaturated lipids called isoprenoids. Covalent modification in vivo of rhodopsin kinase by a 15-C (farnesyl) isoprenoid^5 enables the kinase to anchor to photon-activated rhodopsin. Mutations that alter or eliminate the isoprenoid, fully disable light-specific Rhodopsin kinase translocation. Other receptor kinases (such as β ARK), which lack an intrinsic lipid, are activated^6 on exposure to brain βγ subunits of the signal-transducing G proteins, the γ subunit of which bears a 20-C (geranylgeranyl) isoprenoid^7,8. Using chimaeric β ARKs that undergo isoprenylation in vitro , we demonstrate that membrane association and activation of these kinases can occur in the absence of βγ . These results indicate that rhodopsin kinase (by means of an integral isoprenoid) and β ARK (through its association with βγ ) both rely on the function of isoprenyl moieties for their translocation and activity, illustrating distinct, though related, modes of biological regulation of receptor function.UNTIL now, the only well documented, fast excitatory neurotrans-mitter in the brain has been glutamate. Although there is evidence for adenosine 5′-triphosphate (ATP) acting as a transmitter in the peripheral nervous system^1–4, suggestions for such a role in the central nervous system^1,5–11 have so far not been supported by any direct evidence. Here we report the recording of evoked and miniature synaptic currents in the rat medial habenula. The fast rise time of the currents showed that they were mediated by a ligand-activated ion channel rather than a second messenger system, thus limiting the known transmitter candidates. Evidence was found for the presence on the cells of glutamate, γ-aminobutyric acid, acetylcholine and ATP receptors, but not for 5-hydroxytryptamine (5HT_3) or glycine receptors. The evoked currents were unaffected by blockers of glutamate, γ-aminobutyric acid or acetylcholine receptors but were blocked by the ATP receptor-blocker, suramin and the desensitizing ATP receptor-agonist α,β-methylene-ATP. Our evidence identifies for the first time synaptic currents in the brain, mediated directly by ATP receptors.THE Earth's magnetic field provides an important source of directional information for terrestrial organisms^1,5, but the sensory receptor or receptors responsible for magnetic field detection have yet to be identified. Theoretical models of the mechanism of magnetoreception have implicated specialized photoreceptors^6,7. The proposed mechanisms would amplify the weak interaction of the geomagnetic field with a single electron spin to the level of photon detection, resulting in a modulation of the photoreceptor response to light. Although behavioural^8,9 and neurophysiological^10–12 studies have established a link between magnetic field sensitivity and the visual system, definitive evidence for the use of a light-dependent magnetoreception mechanism has been lacking. Here we show that magnetic compass orientation in a semiaquatic salamander is affected by the wavelength of light^13, and that this wavelength-dependence is due to a direct effect of light on the underlying magnetoreception mechanism.LARGE, rapidly sinking organic aggregates are an important component of the carbon flux from the ocean's surface to its depths. Marine snow, the main type of large (<0.5 mm) aggregate, is heavily colonized by bacteria in surface waters^1, yet the carbon demand of the attached bacteria is so small that months to years are required to consume the aggregates' carbon^2–5. This has led to the conclusion that marine aggregates are resistant to degradation by attached bacteria, and thus act as refractory carriers of carbon to the deep ocean. Here we report that aggregates play host to intense activities of hydrolytic enzymes (presumably due to cell surface bound and released enzymes of the attached bacteria), which render the aggregates soluble. Particulate amino acids were hydrolysed rapidly (turnover time 0.2–2.1 days), with very little of the hydrolysate being taken up by the attached bacteria. Our results support the hypothesis^6,7 that such 'uncoupled' hydrolysis is a biochemical mechanism for large-scale transfer of organic matter from sinking particles to the dissolved phase, and may supply the slowly degradable dissolved organic matter for downward export postulated by recent models^8–10.DURING the past two decades, catastrophic changes have occurred in the Black Sea ecosystem: the influx of pollution from the major rivers has caused intense eutrophication at the northwest coastal margin^1, and fish stocks have collapsed throughout the sea^2. The hydrochemical details of these events are still poorly understood^3–7, and a way needs to be found to distinguish long-term variations from short-term natural fluctuations^3,4 if future management of the Black Sea ecosystem is to be successful. We show here that a coherent description may be achieved by analysing the hydro-chemical data as a function of water density rather than depth. Our findings suggest that, contrary to the suggestion of Murray et al .^3, the upper boundary of the low-lying anoxic waters has remained stationary since 1969, whereas the intermediate suboxic zone has enlarged, reducing the overall depth of the oxygenated upper waters by ∼20 m. Moreover, a long-term increase in the nitrate concentration and a concomitant decrease in the silicate and ammonia concentrations in this upper layer are indicative of the considerable changes taking place in the biochemical regime of the Black Sea.RECENT analyses of global ozone measurements have confirmed that ozone reductions are not confined to the Antarctic, but now extend to mid-latitudes in both hemispheres^1,2. Ozone reductions lead to increases in biologically damaging ultraviolet radiation^3, and such increases have been observed in Antarctica^1,4 and Australia^5. Little is known, however, about hemispheric differences in ultraviolet intensities. Here we use a combination of spectral measurements made in Germany and New Zealand with the same spectroradiometer, together with model calculations, to show that in the New Zealand summer of 1990–1991 biologically weighted ultraviolet irradiances were nearly a factor of two greater than those in the summer at similar northern latitudes in Germany. These differences are larger than expected^3,6, and are due mainly to decreased stratospheric ozone over New Zealand and increased levels of tropospheric ozone over Germany.THE study of chemical phase separation in multicomponent thin organic films typically involves the addition of a dye which is selectively more soluble in one of the phases, thereby making it possible to probe the domain structures by fluorescence microscopy^1–4. The resolution of this approach is generally limited to tens of micrometres. The atomic force microscope, on the other hand, has recently proved useful for imaging organic thin films down to the atomic scale^5–9, but this technique provides details of the overall film topography, rather than the chemical composition. Here we show that the recently developed friction force microscope^10–13, which simultaneously measures both the normal and lateral forces on the scanning tip, can be used to image and identify compositional domains with a resolution of ∼5 Å. Although the topography of the individual domains can be imaged with a standard atomic force microscope, it is the additional information provided by the friction measurement that allows them to be chemically differentiated.MANY of the compact near-infrared sources observed in the central parsec of our Galaxy have been shown to be very massive, luminous blue stars with strong helium lines and fast winds, perhaps similar to Wolf–Rayet stars^1–3; and the complex near-infrared source IRS16, which appears to be the central concentration of such sources, has now been shown^3 to consist of about 20 luminous blue stars, not 100 main-sequence stars, as had been suggested earlier^4. These young blue stars, rather than any object associated with the nearby compact radio source SgrA* (ref. 8), may be the pre-dominant source of ionizing radiation1 and hydrodynamic activity^5–7 in the inner two parsecs of the Galaxy. An earlier argument^4 that the distribution of IRS16 components precludes the existence of a million-solar-mass black hole at or near SgrA* remains valid even if there are fewer than two dozen stars in IRS16. Here I argue further that the presence of young stars in this region is incompatible with the presence of a giant black hole or any other centrally condensed mass, because tidal forces would have inhibited star formation.FROM a statistical analysis of nearly 9,400 spiral galaxies^1, Valentijn^2 has claimed that the disks of spirals are largely opaque. His argument derives from a lack of inclination dependence in the average surface brightness of the spirals, which if they were transparent would be brighter when seen edge-on than face-on. This statistically derived result is however vulnerable to several selection effects^3, and seems to contradict the fact that the survey was successfully performed (as we live in a transparent spiral galaxy) as well as anecdotal examples of galaxies visible through other galaxies. We have tried to measure directly optical extinction in a number of spiral disks, using pairs in which a foreground spiral is backlit by another galaxy. In our best example substantial extinction of starlight occurs, but the extinction is mostly associated with the spiral features in which much of the light arises in the first place. This correlation of extinction with emission may account for both the transparency and apparent opacity of spiral galaxies.Variations in sea-floor depth and heat flow with age provide the main constraints on the thermal structure and evolution of the oceanic lithosphere. Joint fitting of heat flow and bathymetry yields a model with a hotter, thinner lithosphere than in previous models. The new model provides a significantly better fit to the data, including those from older lithosphere previously treated as anomalous. This will facilitate the analysis of lithospheric processes, including the effects of mid-plate volcanism and swells, regional subsidence, and hydrothermal circulation near spreading centres.Discrimination against women in science is wrong but so is a quota system.Next week's referendum in France on the European treaty on monetary union is bound to be a milestone; the best hope is that it will mark the beginning of a better and wider Europe.The British Association for the Advancement of Science claims to have found a viable strategy for its own survival and for doing good works. It should be given the benefit of one last doubt.Featured this week — oligonucleotide purification and analysis kits, an instrument for automated oligo synthesis and a host of peptide-related products.The physical mapping of chromosomes will be facilitated by methods of breaking large DNA into manageable fragments, or cutting uniquely at genetic markers of interest. Key issues in the design of sequence-specific DNA cleaving reagents are the specificity of binding, the number of different sequences that can be targeted and the cleavage yield.Natural or artificially created mutant strains of mice are of great value in studying development and disease, but often such models reveal more differences than expected.Nature 358, 162-164 (1992) IN two figures in the paper in the 9 July issue, areas of shading failed to show up on the printed page. Revised versions below show the correct shading. The published figure legends are unchanged. CZr- pC7S37 pST3.8 pEW7 pHS7 pGEH7 pSAL7 -13kb- < 0.01 < 0.01 < 0.01 0.THE protozoan Toxoplasma gondii is a prevalent parasite in wild and domestic animals worldwide, being transmitted through the food chain by carnivorous feeding and scavenging^1. Toxoplasma normally divides asexually to yield a haploid form that can infect virtually any vertebrate but it also has a well defined sexual cycle that occurs exclusively in cats^1. Toxoplasma has become important as an often fatal opportunistic pathogen in patients with AIDS^2,3, although the 15–85% of adult human populations that are chronically infected with T. gondii are typically asymptomatic^4–7. Infections in immunocompromised hosts have variable outcomes. For example, only 30 to 50% of AIDS patients that are chronically infected with the parasite develop toxoplasmic encephalitis^2,3 and only about half of acute maternal infections result in congenital disease of the newborn^8. T. gondii strains differ in their virulence in animals^1, but the extent to which different strains are related has not been determined. Here we analyse 28 strains from a variety of hosts on five continents and find that the ten virulent strains have an essentially identical genotype, whereas the nonvirulent strains are moderately polymorphic. These data strongly suggest that virulent strains of T. gondii originated from a single lineage which has remained genetically homogeneous despite being globally widespread, and despite the ability of this organism to reproduce sexuallyThe New York City Board of Education is in the dark ages, demanding that AIDS education emphasize abstinence.The world's foreign exchanges have been like bear-pits in the past few weeks, but the causes of the turmoil have long roots, in the US budget deficit and in most of Europe's tradition of tolerating inflation.CLONAL deletion or clonal anergy establish tolerance in T cells that bear potentially autoreactive antigen receptors^1–15. Here we report that concomitant infection with the nematode Nippostron-gylus brasiliensis breaks an established T-cell tolerance induced by injection of mice with Staphylococcus enterotoxin B (SEB)^16,17. CD4^+ T cells from SEB-tolerant mice did not produce either interleukin-2 or interleukin-4 when challenged in vitro with SEB. N. brasiliensis infection of SEB-primed animals resulted in a normal expansion of SEB-tolerant CD4+Vβ8^+ T cells in vivo as well as an equivalent increase of SEB-reactive, interleukin-4-producing CD4^+Vβ8^+ T cells both in SEB-tolerant and in normal animals. Thus, infection with N. brasiliensis circumvented the tolerance established with SEB. Activation of anergic, potentially autoreactive CD4^+ T cells by infectious agents seems to be a major pathway for the initiation of autoimmune diseases^15. Our results suggest that infectious agents may break tolerance in potentially autoreactive CD4^+ T cells by activation of alternative reaction pathways.A CRITICAL point during mammalian pregnancy is the implantation of the blastocyst when the embryo attaches to the wall of the uterus. The autonomously developing preimplantation embryo then becomes dependent on the maternal environment for its continued development. Little is known about the regulation of implantation, except that a complex interaction between peptide and steroid hormones synchronizes the preparation of the uterus for implantation with the development of the embryo. Whether the implantation event is under maternal or embryonic control is also unclear (reviewed in refs 1, 2). We have previously shown that a cytokine, leukaemia inhibitory factor (LIF), is expressed in the uterine endometrial glands specifically on the fourth day of pregnancy^3. This burst of expression is under maternal control and always precedes implantation of the blastocyst. Here we report that transient expression of LIF in mice is essential for implantation. Females lacking a functional LIF gene are fertile, but their blastocysts fail to implant and do not develop. The blastocysts, however, are viable and, when transferred to wild-type pseudopregnant recipients, they can implant and develop to term.IN the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae , PAS genes are essential for the biogenesis and proliferation of peroxisomes^1,2. Recently, the first two genes, PAS1 (ref. 3) and PAS3 (ref. 4), have been characterized. Here we report the cloning and sequencing of the PAS2 gene. It encodes a new member of the ubiquitin-conjugating (UBC) protein family^5–7 and is the first member associated with peroxisomes. The proposed function of the Pas2 protein as a UBC enzyme (UBC10) is supported by the fact that site-directed mutagenesis of a strictly conserved and functionally essential cysteine residue of UBC proteins leads to mutant Pas2 proteins unable to complement pas2 mutant strains. Ubiquitination of proteins is known to play an important part in DNA repair, sporulation, cell cycle control and degradation of abnormal proteins^5–8. We provide evidence for a crucial role of the ubiquitin-conjugation pathway in organelle formation.XERODERMA pigmentosum (XP) is a rare human autosomal recessive disease characterized by solar sensitivity, high predisposition for developing cancers on areas exposed to sunlight, and, in some cases, neurological abnormalities^1,2. XP cells are defective in DNA repair^3, and complementation of this defect has been used to identify eight genetic groups (A–G and variant)^4. We have developed a simple, highly efficient complementary DNA expression system for use in human cells^5. Here we use this system to isolate a cDNA clone that restores the ultraviolet sensitivity and unscheduled DNA synthesis of XP-C cells to normal levels. The XP-C complementing clone XPCC encodes a highly hydrophilic protein which is composed of a predicted 823 amino acids and shares limited homology with the product of the yeast DNA repair gene RAD4 . The XPCC transcript is undetectable by northern blotting in most XP-C cell lines examined.SYNTHETIC antisense oligonucleotides have been used to dissect gene function in vitro . Technical difficulties prevented the use of this approach for investigating the effect of gene products in vivo . Here we report the use of local delivery of antisense c- myb oligonu-cleotide to suppress intimal accumulation of rat carotid arterial smooth muscle cells. Our results suggest that antisense oligonucleotides can be used to define the in vivo biological role of specific macromolecules in the blood vessel wall and could potentially serve as a new class of therapeutic agents for cardiovascular disorders.A PATHOLOGICAL hallmark of Alzheimer's disease is the deposition of amyloid fibrils in the brain. The principal component of amyloid fibrils is β/A4 amyloid protein^1,2, which can be generated by the aberrant processing of a large membrane-bound glycoprotein, the β/A4 amyloid protein precursor (APP)^3. To test whether overexpression of APP generates abnormally processed derivatives that affect the viability of neurons, we stably transfected full-length human APP complementary DNA into murine embryonal carcinoma P19 cells. These cells differentiate into post-mitotic neurons and astrocytes after exposure to retinoic acid^4–6. When differentiation of the APP cDN A-transfected P19 cells was induced, all neurons showed severe degenerative changes and disappeared within a few days. The degenerating neurons contained large amounts of APP derivatives that were truncated at the amino terminus and encompassed the entire β/A4 domain. These results suggest that post-mitotic neurons are vulnerable to overexpressed APP, which undergoes aberrant processing to generate potentially amyloidogenic fragments.CRITICAL issues in the cognitive neuroscience of language are whether there are multiple systems for the representation of meaning, perhaps organized by processing system (such as vision or language^1–6), and whether further subsystems are distinguishable within these larger ones. We describe here a patient (K.R.) with cerebral damage whose pattern of acquired deficits offers direct evidence for a major division between visually based and language-based higher-level representations, and for processing subsystems within language. K.R. could not name animals regardless of the type of presentation (auditory or visual), but had no difficulty naming other living things and objects. When asked to describe verbally the physical attributes of animals (for example, 'what colour is an elephant?'), she was strikingly impaired. Nevertheless, she could distinguish the correct physical attributes of animals when they were presented visually (she could distinguish animals that were correctly coloured from those that were not). Her knowledge of other animal properties was completely intact, regardless of input stimulus. To explain this selective deficit, these data mandate the existence of two distinct representations of such properties in normal individuals, one visually based and one language-based. Furthermore, these data establish that knowledge of physical atrributes is strictly segregated from knowledge of other properties in the language system.The Evolution of Life Histories. By Stephen C. Stearns. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 249. £16.95, $29.95.THE mutation rate per genome for local affecting fitness is crucial in theories of the evolution of sex and recombination^1,2 and of outbreeding mechanisms^3. Mutational variation in fitness may also be important in the evolution of mate choice in animals^2,4,5. No information is available on the rate at which spontaneous mutations with small effects on fitness arise, although viability (probability of survival to adulthood) has been studied in Drosophila melanogaster ^6–9. These experiments involved the accumulation of spontaneous mutations in the virtual absence of natural selection, in a set of independently maintained lines with a common origin. The rates of decline in mean and increase in variance among lines permit estimation of limits to the mean number of new mutations arising per generation ( U ) and the average homozygous effect of a new mutation of minor effect ( s )^7,9,10. For the second chromosome of D. melanogaster , the value of U is at least 0.17 (ref. 7), and (1 – h ) s is less than 0.02, where hs is the average decline in fitness of heterozygotes. As the second chromosome is about 40% of the genome, these data indicate a mutation rate per haploid genome of at least 0.42 for viability. Here we present similar data on the effects of homozygous spontaneous mutations on a measure of fitness in D. melanogaster.THE segregation of melts from the Earth's upper mantle into the crust is an important process in the chemical evolution of the crust–mantle system. The processes of melt formation and migration in the upper mantle are inadequately understood, but some important characteristics of these processes can be inferred from upper-mantle rocks exposed at the Earth's surface. The Horoman peridotite body in northern Japan is a layered upper-mantle rock. The major-element compositions of the layers are consistent with their formation as residues from varying extents of melting; however, abundances of rare-earth elements (REE) require additional processes to have occurred^1, such as post-melting enrichment (metasomatism) resulting from reaction with a migrating fluid phase. We report here that chondrite-normalized REE patterns in clinopyroxenes show abrupt changes in slope, which vary with stratigraphic position and rock type. These data can be modelled by chromatographic fractionation as melts migrated through and interacted with peridotite, creating compositional heterogeneities in the upper mantle. In the Horoman peridotite these heterogeneities occur on a scale length of tens of metres.MELT segregation from a solid matrix in the upper mantle is the first step in the formation of magmas. The mechanisms of melt segregation proposed so far have been based on two different physical models: the percolation of interstitial melt driven by a density difference between melt and matrix, associated with compaction and deformation of the matrix^1; or the suction of interstitial melt into fractures from a surrounding porous matrix^2–4. Although the latter process was originally invoked to explain the occurrence of dunite and pyroxenite–gabbro dykes with zones depleted in melt component on both sides^2,5–7, most of these zones are discordant, small in scale and clearly formed by reaction between peridotite and basaltic melt^8. I have suggested^9 that thick, concordant dunite zones in the most depleted peridotite layers of the Horoman peridotite complex formed by suction of partial melt towards fractures later filled by dunite. Here I report a detailed mineralogical variation across the dunite which, when set in its geological and petrographic context, provides clearer evidence for melt segregation by dynamic forcing^3, rather than passive percolation. This mechanism of melt segregation may play an important role in the formation of primary magmas with low production rate and large geochemical variability.THE eruption of Toba in Sumatra 73,500 years ago was the largest known explosive volcanic event in the late Quaternary^1. It could have lofted about 10^15 g each of fine ash and sulphur gases to heights of 27–37 km, creating dense stratospheric dust and aerosol clouds. Here we present model calculations that investigate the possible climatic effects of the volcanic cloud. The increase in atmospheric opacity might have produced a 'volcanic winter'^2—a brief, pronounced regional and perhaps hemispheric cooling caused by the volcanic dust—followed by a few years with maximum estimated annual hemispheric surface-temperature decreases of 3–5 °C. The eruption occurred during the stage 5a-4 transition of the oxygen isotope record, a time of rapid ice growth and falling sea level^3. We suggest that the Toba eruption may have greatly accelerated the shift to glacial conditions that was already underway, by inducing perennial snow cover and increased sea-ice extent at sensitive northern latitudes. As the onset of climate change may have helped to trigger the eruption itself^4, we propose that the Toba event may exemplify a more general climate–volcano feedback mechanism.AEROSOLS injected into the stratosphere by large volcanic eruptions may induce ozone destruction through processes including heterogeneous chemical reactions. The effect of ozone reductions on surface ultraviolet irradiation is not obvious, however, because aerosols also increase the reflection of sunlight. Here we use a radiative transfer model to estimate the changes in biologically effective ultraviolet radiation (UV–BE) at the Earth's surface produced by the El Chichón (1982) and Mount Pinatubo (1991) eruptions. We find that in both cases surface UV–BE intensity can increase because the effect of ozone depletion outweighs the increased scattering.ANTIGEN processing provides major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class I molecules with short peptides, which they selectively bind and present to cytotoxic T lymphocytes^1–4. The proteolytic system generating these peptides in the cytosol is unidentified, but their delivery into the endoplasmic reticulum is mediated by the TAP1–TAP2 transporter encoded in the MHC class II region^5–9. Closely linked to TAP1 and TAP2 are genes for the LMP2 and LMP7 proteins^10, which resemble components of proteasomes^11–13, proteolytic complexes known to degrade cytosolic proteins^14. This association has led to the common assumption that proteasomes function in this immunological pathway (discussed in ref. 15). We now show that the expression of stably assembled class I molecules and apparently normal peptide processing can be completely restored in the absence of LMP2 and LMP7 in the human lymphoblastoid cell line mutant 721.174 (refs 16, 17). The identity of LMP7 is directly confirmed by reconstitution of a proteasomal subunit after gene transfer. These results therefore dispute the hypothetical involvement of proteasomes in antigen processing, although a more subtle effect of LMP2 and LMP7 cannot be ruled out.Identifying diseases in need of a cure is easy and the temptation to follow that with money appears to be irresistible, but it has not always proved to be successful. Research money should follow scientific opportunity.Insights from the classic work of Luria and Delbriick on bacterial mutation rates may be applied to tracking human gene defects prevalent in isolated populations.For centuries, scientists have been bombarded with pleas for plain language. Why have these pleas had no effect, when the problem of unreadable prose could be solved at a stroke?AMONG the genes thought to be involved in patterning the nervous system are a family of developmentally regulated paired box-containing (Pax) genes. Mutations in some of these Pax genes lead to severe developmental abnormalities. Zebrafish pax [ b ] ( pax [ zf-b ]) is a member of the Pax gene family that is expressed in the presumptive posterior midbrain from the end of gastrulation and, at later stages, in other localized regions of the developing embryo^1. Here we show that injection of antibodies raised against the pax [ b ] protein causes a localized malformation at the mid-brain–hindbrain boundary. In situ hybridizations demonstrate that antibody injection causes downregulation of pax [ b ] transcripts in the posterior midbrain and alteration of wnt -1 and eng -2 expression in this area. The data demonstrate an involvement of pax [ b ] in the formation of the midbrain–hindbrain junction.MUTATIONS in the Schizosaccharotnyces pombe cdc8 gene impair cytokinesis^1. Here we clone cdc8 ^+ and find that it encodes a novel tropomyosin. Gene disruption results in lethal arrest of the cell cycle, but spore germination, cell growth, DNA replication and mitosis are all unaffected. Haploid cdc8 gene disruptants are rescued by expression of a fibroblast tropomyosin complementary DNA. Immunofluorescence microscopy of wild type and cdc8 gene distruptants indicates that cdc8 tropomyosin is present in two distinct cellular distributions: in dispersed patches, and during cytokinesis as a transient medial band. Collectively these results indicate that cdc8 tropomyosin has a specialized role which, we suggest, is to form part of the F-actin contractile ring at cytokinesis. These results establish the basis for further genetic studies of cytokinesis and of contractile protein function in S. pombe .STIMULATION of β-adrenoceptors in cardiac ventricular myocytes activates a strong chloride ion conductance^1–5 as a result of phosphorylation by cyclic AMP-dependent protein kinase (PKA)^2,4. This Cl^− conductance, which is time- and voltage-independent^1,5, counters^2,5 the tendency of the simultaneously enhanced Ca^2+ channel current to prolong the ventricular action potential. Using inside-out giant patches^6 excised from guinea-pig myocytes, we show here that phosphorylation by the PKA catalytic subunit plus Mg-ATP elicits discrete Cl^− channel currents. In almost symmetrical Cl^− solutions (∼150 mM), unitary current amplitude scales with membrane potential, and reverses sign near 0 mV, to yield a single channel conductance of ∼12 pS. Opening of the phosphorylated channels requires hydrolysable nucleoside triphosphate, indicating that phosphorylation by PKA is necessary, but not sufficient, for channel activation. The properties of these PKA-regulated cardiac Cl^− channels are very similar, if not identical, to those of the cystic fibrosis transmembrane conductance regulator (CFTR)^7, the epithelial cell Cl^− channel whose regulation is defective in patients with cystic fibrosis. The full cardiological impact of these Cl^− channels and of their possible malfunction in patients with cystic fibrosis remains to be determined.The Vatican's half-hearted rehabilitation of Galileo will not prevent the recurrence of errors of the same kind.The outcome of the election in the United States will matter greatly both for the indigenous research enterprise and for its international ramifications.SITE-SPECIFIC mutation^1 and membrane reconstitution^2 experiments provide compelling evidence that the product of the gene which is at fault in the disease cystic fibrosis, termed the cystic fibres is transmembrane conductance regulator (CFTR)^3, is a small-conductance chloride channel activated by phosphorylation^4. As transport of chloride ions is passive, the predicted presence of two nucleotide-binding domains in CFTR seems as puzzling as a report^5 that ATP hydrolysis is essential to activate the channel. We now find that in the sweat duct, which expresses high levels of CFTR^6 and has a very high Cl^− conductance^7, intracellular concentrations of ATP must be about normal (5 mM)^8 for activation of this conductance, apparently by a non-hydrolytic, perhaps allosteric, mechanism. This passive dependence on ATP should mean that even a modest depletion of cell energy levels will significantly lower the energy demands of electrolyte transport by decreasing chloride conductance. We believe this direct coupling between cellular ATP levels and chloride channel activity is an adaptive mechanism to protect the tissue from damage resulting from excessive energy depletion^9.THE temporal and spatial distribution of increases in intracellular Ca^2+ concentration is an important factor in cellular signal transdaction^1. Inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate (InsP_3) plays a key part in agonist-induced Ca^2+ release^1, which can take place abruptly^2 and in a confined space^3 by a mechanism that is not fully understood. Here we analyse the kinetics of InsP_3-induced Ca^2+ release following flash photolysis^4–7 of caged InsP_3 or caged Ca^2+, and demonstrate that Ca^2+-dependent immediate feedback control is an important determinant of the time course of Ca^2+ release. The positive feedback mechanism is also important for the 'loading dependence' of InsP_3-induced Ca2^2+ release^8. Furthermore, our results support the operation of positive cooperativity in channel opening^9 and feedback control augments the steep InsP_3 concentration-Ca^2+ release relation. These inherent properties of InsP_3-induced Ca^2+ release are expected to give rise to temporally abrupt and/or spatially confined Ca^2+ release within the cell.A CENTRAL controversy in current research on visual attention is whether figures are segregated from their background preattentively^1–8, or whether attention is first directed to unstructured regions of the image^9–13. Here we present neurological evidence for the former view from studies of a brain-injured patient with visual neglect. His attentional impairment arises after normal segmentation of the image into figures and background has taken place. Our results indicate that information which is neglected and unavailable to higher levels of visual processing can nevertheless be processed by earlier stages in the visual system concerned with segmentation.THE quantal hypothesis proposes that chemical synaptic transmission involves the probabilistic release of multimolecular packets of transmitter^1. Analysis of the resulting trial-to-trial fluctuations in postsynaptic response can provide estimates both of the number of quanta released and of the size of their postsynaptic effect. This in turn permits the quantification of the relative contributions of pre- and postsynaptic factors to the strength of a given synapse. Quantal analysis of excitatory synapses in the hippocampus has proved difficult^2–6 and has led to contradictory conclusions when applied to long-term potentiation^7–14. Here we report the use of a combination of quantal analysis procedures to provide evidence that both pre- and postsynaptic changes can contribute substantially to the maintenance of long-term potentiation in the CA1 region of the hippocampus. The initial setting of the presynaptic release mechanism seems to determine their relative importance.IT has been suggested^1–3 that the first steps in visual processing strive to compress as much information as possible about the outside world into the limited dynamic range of the visual channels. Here I compare measured neural images with theoretical calculations based on maximizing information, taking into account the statistical structure of natural images. Neural images were obtained by scanning an image while recording from a second-order neuron in the fly visual system. Over a 5.5-log-units-wide range of mean intensities, experiment and theory correspond well. At high mean intensities, redundancy in the image is reduced by spatial and temporal antagonism. At low mean intensities, spatial and temporal low-pass filtering combat noise and increase signal reliability.CONTROVERSY exists over whether aluminium has a role in the aetiology of Alzheimer's disease. Alzheimer's disease is neuropathologically characterized by the occurrence of a minimum density of neurofibrillary tangles and neuritic plaques in the hippocampus and the association cortex of the brain^1,2. The purported association of aluminium with Alzheimer's disease is based on: (1) the experimental induction of fibrillary changes in the neurons of animals by the injection of aluminium salts into brain tissue^3,4; (2) reported detection of aluminium in neuritic plaques^5–8 and tangle-bearing neurons^9,10; (3) epidemiological studies linking aluminium levels in the environment, notably water supplies, with an increased prevalence of dementia^11–14; and (4) a reported decrease in the rate of disease progression following the administration of desferroxamine, an aluminium chelator, to clinically diagnosed sufferers of Alzheimer's disease^15. Here we use nuclear microscopy, a new analytical technique involving million-volt nuclear particles, to identify and analyse plaques in postmortem tissue from patients with Alzheimer's disease without using chemical staining techniques and fail to demonstrate the presence of aluminium in plaque cores in untreated tissue.THE wound response of several plant species involves the activation of proteinase inhibitor ( pin ) genes and the accumulation of pin proteins at the local site of injury and systemically throughout the unwounded aerial regions of the plant^1,2. It has been suggested that a mobile chemical signal is the causal agent linking the local wound stimulus to the distant systemic response, and candidates such as oligosaccharides^3, abscisic acid^4 and a polypeptide^5,6 have been put forward. But the speed of transmission is high for the transport of a chemical signal in the phloem. The wound response of tomato plants can be inhibited by salicylic acid^7 and agents like fusicoccin that affect ion transport^8, and wounding by heat^9 or physical injury produces electrical activity that has similarities to the epithelial conduction system^10 used to transmit a stimulus in the defence responses of some lower animals^11. Here we design experiments to distinguish between a phloem-transmissible chemical signal and a physically propagated signal based on electrical activity. We show that translocation in the phloem of tomato seedlings can be completely inhibited without effect on the systemic accumulation of pin transcripts and pin activity, and without hindrance to propagated electrical signals.THE spring phytoplankton bloom in temperate and boreal waters represents a pulsed source of organic carbon that is important to ecosystem productivity^1 and carbon flux^2 in the world ocean. It is widely accepted that the seasonal development of a thermocline, in combination with increasing solar elevation in spring, is requisite for the development of the bloom in shelf and open ocean environments^3–7. Here we report results for the offshore waters of the Gulf of Maine which suggest that the spring bloom can precede the onset of vertical water column stability, and may even be a contributing factor in the development of the thermocline. Deep penetration of light in relatively clear, late-winter waters, and weak, or absent, wind-driven vertical mixing, appear to support cell growth rates that overcome the vertical excursion rates in the neutrally stable water column, leading to a bloom. Phytoplankton forms typical of a spring bloom, including gelatinous colonies and chains, may contribute to the cells' ability to maintain a vertical position in a water column lacking stability.THE strontium, neodymium and lead isotopic compositions of most island-arc magmas seem to require a component in the source region with the characteristics of ocean-island basalts (OIB)^1–5. In contrast, however, the trace-element compositions of arc magmas and OIB do not match: OIB sources are highly enriched in incompatible elements, whereas island-arc basalts are depleted in high-field-strength and light rare-earth elements. Peridotite that has undergone an episode of melting, and hence depletion of incompatible elements, is an appropriate source for island-arc basalts^6,7. I have previously proposed that an OIB component with the characteristics of the mantle endmember HIMU^8 (notably, high U/Pb ratio) is present in arc magmas of the Mariana Island region (Philippine Sea). Here I show, using isotopic comparisons of Philippine Sea arc and basin magmas, including the highly magnesian lavas known as boninites, that this HIMU component is refractory and is selectively incorporated into the depleted mantle lithosphere during extraction of mid-ocean-ridge basalt and back-arc-basin basalt. This process creates the mixture of depleted and OIB-source mantle required for island-arc basalt.LITTLE is known of the interdecadal variability in the thermohaline circulation of the world's oceans, yet such knowledge is essential as a background to studies of the effects of natural and anthropogenic climate change. The subpolar North Atlantic is an area of extensive water mass modification by heat loss to the atmosphere. Lying as it does at the northern limit of the global thermohaline "conveyor belt"^12, changes in this region may ultimately have global consequences. Here we report that in August 1991 the waters between Greenland and the United Kingdom were on average 0.08 °C and 0.15 °C colder than in 1962 and 1981, respectively, and slightly less saline than in 1962. The cause appears to be renewed formation of intermediate water in the Labrador Sea from cooler and fresher source waters, and the spreading of this water mass from the west. Variations in the source characteristics of Labrador Sea Water can be traced across the North Atlantic, with a circulation time of 18–19 years between the Labrador Sea and Rockall Trough. More recently formed Labrador Sea Water, with even lower temperature and salinity, should cool and freshen the North Atlantic still further as it circulates around the ocean in the coming decade.RIGID, rod-like polymers are of considerable technological importance in the production of high-strength and high-modulus fibres^1. Polymerization reactions generally require near-parallel orientation of such molecules, and because of the slow rotational diffusion of the reacting species^2, the rate of polymerization is found to decrease significantly in the later stages of the reaction; this ultimately limits the molecular weight of the polymer. It is known, however, that rod-like molecules can be readily oriented in solution by means of imposed flow fields. Here we examine the effect of a shear flow on the polymerization reaction between p -phenylene diamine and terephthaloyl chloride, where the product, poly( p -phenylene terephthalamide), has a rigid, rod-like structure^1. We find that once the molecular weight of the reactants exceeds a critical value, shearing of the reaction mixture induces a pronounced orientation of the molecules, accompanied by a significant increase in the polymerization rate. The technological implications are clear: exposure of polymerizing mixtures of rod-like molecules to high shear rates can result in a dramatic enhancement in the molecular weight of the resulting polymer.THE dynamic behaviour of the quantized vortices of magnetic flux that penetrate type II superconductors, and specifically their interaction with pinning sites, is a topic of both scientific and technological interest, particularly since the discovery of high-transition-temperature (high- T _c) superconductors^1. Until now, however, it has not been possible to study this behaviour in 'real time'. The Bitter technique^2, scanning tunnelling microscopy^3 and scanning electron microscopy^4 have so far provided only static images, whereas a magneto-optical technique that provides time-resolved information^5 does not resolve individual vortices. Here we report the real-time observation of vortices in a thin film of niobium, using the technique of Lorentz microscopy6. The coherent and penetrating beam of a recently developed 300-kV field-emission electron microscope^6 allows us to observe, at 30 frames per second, the motion of thermally activated vortices, and their response to an applied magnetic field.WHITE dwarfs are the most common endpoint of stellar evolution. Thermonuclear reactions have ceased, and the star settles into a compact object governed by relativistic, almost degenerate electrons. Bare nuclei of carbon and other heavier elements, normally considered as classical particles moving in the degenerate electron sea, are forced into a crystal lattice in the interior^1 as the star cools, and a freezing front moves outward. Numerical simulations of the freezing of classical point charges in a uniform neutralizing background have been used to model the crystallization of white dwarfs^2–4, but we show here that the classical approximation is not a good one: the energy per particle is significantly modified by quantum effects. The freezing process is then a transformation of a quantum liquid to a quantum solid, and the temperature of freezing may be reduced from the classical value. For lower mass stars particularly, the quantum corrections in liquid and solid seem to be comparable, and the physical conditions at freezing, classically typified by the ratio of the root-mean-square atomic displacement to the nearest-neighbour distance, are not greatly changed. Nevertheless, these new considerations may have an important effect on the cooling rate of white dwarfs, and thereby on their inferred evolution and ages.SEVERAL globular clusters have low-luminosity X-ray sources at their cores^1–3, of which X0021.8–7221 in 47 Tucanae (NGC104) is one of the brightest. The nature of these sources is a mystery, and attempts to detect optical counterparts have been frustrated by the overcrowding of stars in cluster cores. The resolution of ground-based observations is insufficient to pick out the faint blue objects that are likely to be the optical counterparts to the X-ray sources, but the Faint Object Camera (FOC) on the Hubble Space Telescope has proved effective in identifying blue objects in dense clusters such as 47 Tuc^4. Thus encouraged to use the FOC to search for the optical counterpart to X0021.8–7221, we have discovered a faint, variable and very blue object located in the error circle5 for X0021.8–7221 from the Einstein satellite High-Resolution Imager. The object has the spectral characteristics of a cataclysmic variable, and the high inferred X-ray to optical brightness ratio suggests that it is a magnetic cataclysmic variable, one of the candidates that has been suggested as the X-ray source in globular clusters.The structure of a central component of the eukaryotic transcriptional apparatus, a TATA-box binding protein (TBP or TFIID τ ) from Arabidopsis thaliana , has been determined by X-ray crystallography at 2.6 Å resolution. This highly symmetric α/β structure contains a new DMA-binding fold, resembling a molecular 'saddle' that sits astride the DMA. The DNA-binding surface is a curved, antiparallel β -sheet. When bound to DMA, the convex surface of the saddle would be presented for interaction with other transcription initiation factors and regulatory proteins.The US Congress must reverse its growing tendency to play the role of peer reviewer.Complex microtubule assemblies are essential components of eukaryotic cilia and flagella. They are extremely stable and are not affected by agents that normally induce polymer disassembly. The molecular basis of this microtubular stability is unknown, and it is not related to any feature of the constitutive tubulin. In sea urchin sperm flagella, axonemal microtubules are found to be stabilized by a protein identical to histone H1, a result that defines a new role for this histone and provides evidence for a concerted evolution of chromatin and microtubular structures.A common public perception is that global warming will accelerate the melting of polar ice sheets, causing sea level to rise. A common scientific position is that the volume of grounded Antarctic ice is slowly growing, and will damp future sea-level rise. At present, studies supporting recent shrinkage or growth depend on limited measurements that are subject to high temporal and regional variability, and it is too early to say how the Antarctic ice sheet will behave in a warmer world.The Cytokine Handbook. Edited by Angus Thomson. Academic: 1991. Pp. 425. $115, £59.Neural Networks for Perception. Vol. 1: Human and Machine Perception. Vol. 2: Computation, Learning and Architectures. Edited by Harry Wechsler. Academic: 1991. Pp. 520/363. $59.95, £39.50/$49.95, £33.Breaking the Maya Code. By Michael D. Coe. Thames and Hudson: 1992. Pp. 304. £14.95, $29.95.Artificial Life: The Quest for a New Creation. By Steven Levy. Cape / Pantheon: 1992. Pp. 390. £16.99, $25.The idea that particles can surmount the walls of potential wells to escape from them is so familiar that the complexity of attempts to broaden the problem is a surprise.The ethics of biological research, and its general impact, are hotly debated in the West. Japanese silence on the issues is counterproductive. Will the Human Genome Project provide the catalyst for change?Late Quaternary Environmental Change: Physical and Human Perspectives. By M. Bell and M. J. C. Walker. Longman: 1992. Pp. 273. £±5.99, $39.95 (pbk).Studies show no correlation between dietary fat and breast cancer. It is time to move on.Featured this week – DNA sequencing and analysis software, human genomic mapping probes and an enzyme-linked assay for the identification of amplified target DNA.The trial in France of four government officials for complicity in the use of contaminated blood may have ended with the verdicts announced last Friday, but the recriminations will continue.Fluorescent intercalation complexes of certain polycationic ligands with double-stranded DNA provide a new class of multichromophore labels for fluorescence assays.THE fast reaction of the actin-based cytoskeleton in motile cells after stimulation with a chemoattractant requires a signal-transduction chain that creates a very specific environment at distinct regions beneath the plasma membrane^1. Dictyostelium hisactophilin, a unique actin-binding protein, is a submembranous pH sensor that signals slight changes of the H^+ concentration to actin by inducing actin polymerization and binding to microfilaments only at pH values below seven^2. It has a relative molecular mass of 13.5K and its most unusual feature is the presence of 31 histidine residues among its total of 118 amino acids. The transduction of an external signal from the plasma membrane to the cytoskeleton is poorly understood. Here we report the protein's structure in solution determined by nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy. The nuclear Overhauser effect intensities of the three-dimensional nuclear Overhauser spectra^3,4 were used directly in the calcula-tions^5. The overall folding of hisactophilin is similar to that of interleukin-1 β ^6–9 and fibroblast growth factor^10, but the primary amino-acid sequence of hisactophilin is unrelated to these two proteins.THE Src-homologous SH3 domain is a small domain present in a large number of proteins that are involved in signal transduction, such as the Src protein tyrosine kinase, or in membrane-cyto-skeleton interactions, but the function of SH3 is still unknown (reviewed in refs 1–3). Here we report the three-dimensional struc-ture at 1.8 Å resolution of the SH3 domain of the cytoskeletal protein spectrin expressed in Escherichia coli . The domain is a compact β-barrel made of five antiparallel β-strands. The amino acids that are conserved in the SH3 sequences are located close to each other on one side of the molecule. This surface is rich in aromatic and carboxylic amino acids, and is distal to the region of the molecule where the N and C termini reside and where SH3 inserts into the α-spectrin chain. We suggest that a protein ligand binds to this conserved surface of SH3.THE glycoprotein P-selectin is a cell adhesion molecule of stimulated platelets and endothelial cells, which mediates the interaction of these cells with neutrophils and monocytes^1,2. It is a membrane component of cell storage granules^3–6, and is a member of the selectin family which includes E-selectin and L-selectin^7,8. P-selectin recognizes both lineage-specific carbohydrate ligands on monocytes and neutrophils, including the Lewis x antigen, sialic acid, and a protein component^9–12. In inflammation and thrombosis, P-selectin may mediate the interaction of leukocytes with platelets bound in the region of tissue injury and with stimulated endothelium^1,2. To evaluate the role of P-selectin in platelet–leukocyte adhesion in vivo , the accumulation of leukocytes within an experimental thrombus was explored in an arteriovenous shunt model in baboons^13. A Dacron graft implanted within an arteriovenous shunt is thrombogenic, accumulating platelets and fibrin within its lumen. These bound platelets express P-selectin^14. Here we show that antibody inhibition of leukocyte binding to P-selectin expressed on platelets immobilized on the graft blocks leukocyte accumulation and inhibits the deposition of fibrin within the thrombus. These results indicate that P-selectin is an important adhesion molecule on platelets, mediating platelet–leukocyte binding in vivo , that the presence of leukocytes in thrombi is mediated by P-selectin, and that these leukocytes promote fibrin deposition.THE thymus positively selects thymocytes that bear T-cell receptors which recognize antigen presented by self major histocompatibility complex (MHC) proteins^1,2. Positive selection is usually driven by MHC products on radiation-resistant cortical epithelial cells^3–5. It is unknown whether positive selection is mediated by all thymic epithelial cells or by some specialized subsets^4. Here we introduce an H–2^b-expressing thymic epithelial cell line into the thymuses of lethally irradiated H–2^k animals reconstituted with H–2^b/k F_1 BM or fetal liver cells. I–A^b-restricted T cells are found in these animals, demonstrating that selection occurs on the introduced epithelial cells.THE retinae of Old World primates contain three classes of light-sensitive cone, which exhibit peak absorption in different spectral regions^1–4. But how are the different types of cone arranged in the hexagonal mosaic of the fovea? This question has often been answered with artists' impressions^5–7, but never with direct measurements. Staining for antibodies specific to the short-wave photopigment has revealed a sparse, semiregular array of cones^8; but nothing is known about the arrangement of the more numerous long- and middle-wave cones. Are they randomly distributed, with chance aggregations of one type, as Hartridge postulated in these columns nearly 50 years ago^9,10? Or do they exhibit a regular alternation, recalling the systematic mosaics seen in some non-mammalian species^6,11? Or, conversely, is there positive clumping of particular cone types, as might be expected if local patches of cones were descended from a single precursor cell? We have made direct microspectrophotometric measurements of patches of foveal retina from Old World monkeys, and report here that the distribu tion of long- and middle-wave cones is locally random. These two cone types are present in almost equal numbers, and not in the ratio of 2:1 that has been postulated for the human fovea.Genes and the Biology of Cancer. By Harold Varmus and Robert A. Weinberg. Scientific American Library (W. H. Free-man): 1992. Pp. 224. $32.95, £17.95.NEURONS develop a highly polarized morphology consisting of dendrites and a long axon. Both axons and dendrites contain microtubules and microtubule-associated proteins (MAPs) with characteristic structures^1. Among MAPs, MAP2 is specifically expressed in dendrites^2 whereas MAP2C and tau are abundant in the axon^2–5. But the influence of MAP2, MAP2C and tau on the organization of microtubule domains in dendrites versus axons is unknown. Both MAP2 and tau induce microtubule bundle formation in fibroblasts after transfection of complementary DNAs^6,7, and a long process resembling an axon is extended in Sf9 cells infected with recombinant baculovirus expressing tau^8,9. We have now expressed MAP2 and MAP2C in Sf9 cells in order to compare their morphology and the arrangement of their microtubules to that found in Sf9 cells expressing tau. We report here that the spacing between microtubules depends on the MAP expressed: in cells expressing MAP2, the distance is similar to that found in dendrites, whereas the spacing between microtubules in cells expressing MAP2C or tau is similar to that found in axons.PROGRESSIVE cerebral deposition of the 39–43-amino-acid amy-loid β-protein (Aβ) is an invariant feature of Alzheimer's disease which precedes symptoms of dementia by years or decades. The only specific molecular defects that cause Alzheimer's disease which have been identified so far are missense mutations in the gene encoding the β-amyloid precursor protein (β3-APP) in certain families with an autosomal dominant form of the disease (familial Alzheimer's disease, or FAD)^1–5. These mutations are located within or immediately flanking the Aβ region of β-APP, but the mechanism by which they cause the pathological phenotype of early and accelerated Aβ deposition is unknown. Here we report that cultured cells which express a β-APP complementary DNA bearing a double mutation (Lys to Asn at residue 595 plus Met to Leu at position 596) found in a Swedish FAD family5 produce ∼6–8-fold more Aβ than cells expressing normal β-APP. The Met 596 to Leu mutation is principally responsible for the increase. These data establish a direct link between a FAD genotype and the clinicopathological phenotype. Further, they confirm the relev-ance of the continuous Aβ production by cultured cells^6–8 for elucidating the fundamental mechanism of Alzheimer's disease.ELEVATED plasma levels of the lipoprotein Lp( a ) are associated with increased risk for atherosclerosis and its manifestations, myocardial infarction, stroke and restenosis (for reviews, see refs 1–3). Lp( a ) differs from low-density lipoprotein by the addition of the glycoprotein apolipoprotein( a ), a homologue of plasminogen that contains many tandemly repeated units which resemble the fourth kringle domain of plasminogen, and single homologues of its kringle-5 and protease domain^4. As plasma Lp(a) concentration is strongly influenced by heritable factors and is refractory to most drug and dietary manipulation, the effects of modulating it are difficult to mimic experimentally. In addition, the absence of apolipoprotein( a ) from virtually all species other than primates precludes the use of convenient animal models. Here we show that transgenic mice expressing human apolipoprotein( a ) are more susceptible than control mice to the development of lipid-staining lesions in the aorta, and that apolipoprotein( a ) co-localizes with lipid deposition in the artery walls.Black Holes. By Jean-Pierre Luminet. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 312. £30, $59.95 (hbk); £±0.95, $22.95 (pbk).THE Blackcap, Sylvia atricapilla , a widespread Palearctic migratory bird, rarely wintered in Britain until the 1950s. The winter population has since increased to several thousand birds^1,2. Ringing indicates that these are not British Blackcaps forestalling migration, but birds breeding in Continental Europe reaching Britain on a novel westerly migration route^3,4. The proportion of north-western migrants among Blackcaps ringed in parts of Germany and Austria has increased from 0% before 1960 to currently 7–10%^5–7. We bred British wintering Blackcaps in captivity and determined the migratory direction of their offspring. Here we report that these birds migrate west-northwest in autumn, a direction genetically distinct from the British breeding population and the predominantly southwestern migratory population of west–central Europe. The novel route must have evolved within the past 30 years with selection favouring birds wintering some 1,500 km further north than most of their conspecifics. To our knowledge, this is the first case in any vertebrate in which a drastic and recent evolutionary change of behaviour has been documented and its genetic basis established.UNLIKE animals, where individuals engage in direct sexual encounters, higher plants interact sexually only through minute, usually animal-mediated pollen grains, a trait that has hampered understanding of processes that govern plant evolution. A new technique using micro-tags to mark individual orchid pollinia and monitoring of all stigmas for pollination made it possible to measure exactly pollen transfer and mating pattern in a plant species. We report here that in populations of a hawkmoth-pollinated orchid, Aerangis ellisii , pollen transfers were found to be infrequent, to involve single pollen parents, and to occur mostly within 5 metres. Pollinator-mediated patterns of disproportional reproductive success suggest that floral traits are being shaped by mutual sexual selection as proposed by Darwin^1–3. The microtag method opens an avenue for novel exploration of plant evolution.RECENT modelling of volcanic eruptions has shown that the efficiency of subsurface degassing of magmas determines whether magma erupts explosively or effuses quietly^1,2. Slow uprise of magma is often accompanied by effective degassing, leading to the extrusion of lava flows and domes. Although lava dome extrusion is one of the less explosive modes of eruption, it is often accompanied by explosive pyroclastic activities^3–5. The 1991 eruption of Unzen volcano provided an opportunity to observe at close range several types of small-scale pyroclastic flow (glowing avalanches) originating from lava domes. Most of the pyroclastic flows are of Merapi type, caused by blocks falling from a collapsing dome; others are of Peléan type originating in an explosion from the side of a dome. The lavas apparently show variable degrees of self-explosivity. We suggest that variable degrees of degassing of the magma produced a wide range of excess pore pressures in the extruded lava domes, resulting in both Merapi-type and Peléan-type pyroclastic flows from the domes.ISLAND arc basalts are thought to derive from the melting of the wedge of mantle overlying the subducting slab^1; hence, the composition of this mantle wedge, and the nature of any metasomatic fluids or magmas introduced from the slab, have been the subject of much speculation^2–6. Most of the evidence bearing on these questions has been indirect, coming from the chemistry of island arc lavas, or from mantle xenoliths originating elsewhere than immediately below the arc^7,8. Here we report trace element data for mantle xenoliths from the Luzon arc (Philippines)^9, which come from the mantle wedge directly below the arc-front volcanoes. The trace element patterns reflect metasomatism of a relatively depleted mantle (more depleted than the source of mid-ocean-ridge basalts), and identify the metasomatizing agent as a hydrous fluid, rather than a melt. We suggest that the depletion of high-field-strength elements in arc magmas originates from a combination of low initial concentrations in the mantle before metasomatism, and the inability of hydrous fluids to transport these elements.The crystal structure of the nitrogenase molybdenum–iron protein from Azotobacter vinelandii has been determined at 2.7 Å resolution. The α - and β -subunits in this α _2 β _2 tetramer have similar polypeptide folds. The FeMo-cofactor is completely encompassed by the α -subunit, whereas the P-cluster pair occurs at the interface between α - and β -subunits. Structural similarities are apparent between nitrogenase and other electron transfer systems, including hydrogenases and the photosynthetic reaction centreElectrons can be made to pass through a circuit one by one, in nanoscale devices based on the combination of the Coulomb interaction between electrons and their passage by quantum tunnelling through an insulating barrier. Single-electron devices provide a new way of measuring the charge quantum, and clarify how electronic signal processing at the molecular level might function.The Andromeda Galaxy. By Paul Hodge. Kluwer: 1992. Pp. 358. DFL 160, $79, á£55.Fearful Symmetry: Is God a Geometer? By lan Stewart and Martin Golubitsky. Blackwell: 1992. Pp. 287. £16.95, $21.95.Scenes From Deep Time: Early Pictorial Representations of the Prehistoric World. By Martin J. S. Rudwick. University of Chicago Press: 1992. Pp. 280. $45, £39.95.Nature 359, 70-73 (1992) THIS Letter in the 3 September issue contains an error affecting two codons in the sequence of the XPCC gene shown in Fig. 3 a. The corrected sequence appears below, starting at position 612 of the cDNA. GTG AAG TGG TTC ATT V K W F I This correction does not alter any of theconclusions of the paper and the open reading frame remains at 823 amino acids.An argument about a fossil suggests that the decade-old lessons of cladistics have not yet been fully appreciated.In Somalia, the world is fighting an unprecedented war in the name of basic nutrition. In the United States, the government has gone overboard on the matter of nutrition and health.ORNITHINE decarboxylase (ODC), a key enzyme in polyamine biosynthesis, is the most rapidly turned over mammalian enzyme^1. We have shown that its degradation is accelerated by ODC antizyme^2,3 an inhibitory protein induced by poly amines^4,5. This is a new type of enzyme regulation and may be a model for selective protein degradation. Here we report the identification of the protease responsible for ODC degradation. Using a cell-free degradation system, we demonstrate that immunodepletion of proteasomes from cell extracts causes almost complete loss of ATP-and antizyme-dependent degradation of ODC. In addition, purified 26S proteasome complex, but not the 20S proteasome, catalyses ODC degradation in the absence of ubiquitin. These results strongly suggest that the 26S proteasome, widely viewed as specific for ubiquitin-conjugated proteins, is the main enzyme responsible for ODC degradation. The 26S proteasome may therefore have a second role in ubiquitin-independent proteolysis.MOLECULES encoded by the human GDI locus on chromosome 1 (ref. 33) are recognized by selected CD4^−8^− T-cell clones expressing either αβ or γδ T-cell antigen receptors^1,2. The known structural resemblance of GDI molecules to antigen-presenting molecules encoded by major histocompatibility complex (MHG) genes on human chromosome 6 (refs 3, 4, 34, 35), suggested that GDI may represent a family of antigen-presenting molecules separate from those encoded in the MHC^1,5,6. Here we report that the proliferative and cytotoxic responses of human CD4^−8^− αβ TCR^+ T cells specific for Mycobacterium tuberculosis can be restricted by GDlb, one of the four identified protein products of the GDI locus. The responses of these T cells to M. tuberculosis seemed not to involve MHG encoded molecules, but were absolutely dependent on the expression of GDlb by the antigen-presenting cell and involved an antigen processing requirement similar to that seen in MHC class Il-restricted antigen presentation. These results provide, to our knowledge, the first direct evidence for the proposed antigen-presenting function of GDI molecules and suggest that the GDI family plays a role in cell-mediated immunity to microbial pathogens.DYSTROPHIN-RELATED protein (DRP or 'utrophin'^1) is localized in normal adult muscle primarily at the neuromuscular junction^2–4. In the absence of dystrophin in Duchenne muscular dystrophy (DMD) patients, DRP is also present in the sarcolemma^3–7. DRP is expressed in fetal and regenerating muscle and may play a similar role to dystrophin in early development^3,7–9, although it remains to be determined whether DRP can functionally replace dystrophin in adult tissue. Previously we described a 3.5-kilobase complementary DNA clone that exhibits 80 per cent homology to the C-terminal domain of dystrophin^10. This sequence identifies a 13-kilobase transcript that maps to human chromosome 6 (refs 2, 11). Antibodies raised against the gene product identify a polypeptide with a relative molecular mass of about 400K in all tissues examined^7,8,12. To investigate the relationship between DRP and dystrophin in more detail, we have cloned and sequenced the whole DRP cDNA. Homology between DRP and dystrophin extends over their entire length, suggesting that they derive from a common ancestral gene. Comparative analysis of primary sequences highlights regions of functional importance, including those that may mediate the localization of DRP and dystrophin in the muscle cell.Products featured this week from companies based in Scandinavia include an RNA/DNA calculator, an automatic peptide synthesizer optimized for Fmoc polyamide chemistry and an ATP biomass kit.Nature 328, 686-691 (1987) EXPERIMENTS recently performed by one of the authors of this paper cast doubt on the involvement of per in gap junction-mediated intercellular communication. For details see Scientific Correspondence, page 542 of this issue.DYSTROPHIN is associated with a complex of muscle membrane (sarcolemmal) glycoproteins that provide a linkage to the extracellular matrix protein, laminin^1–8. The absence of dystrophin leads to a dramatic reduction of the dystrophin-associated proteins (156DAG, 59DAP, 50DAG, 43DAG and 35DAG) in the sarcolemma of patients with Duchenne muscular dystrophy and mdx mice^2,6–8. Here we demonstrate that dystrophin-related protein (DRP, utrophin), an autosomal homologue of dystrophin^9,17, is associated with an identical or antigenically similar complex of sarcolemmal proteins and that DRP and the dystrophin/DRP-associated proteins colocalize to the neuromuscular junction in Duchenne muscular dystrophy and mdx muscle. The DRP and dystrophin/DRP-associated proteins are found throughout the sarcolemma in small-calibre skeletal muscles and cardiac muscle of adult mdx mice. Because these muscles show minimal pathological changes^18–20, our results could provide a basis for the upregulation of DRP as a potential therapeutic approach.Economic difficulties, and the challenge of entering the European Communities, are each prompting Europe's northernmost countries to reassess their approach to the organization and funding of science.UNDER general viewing conditions, objects are often partially camouflaged, obscured or occluded, thereby limiting information about their three-dimensional position, orientation and shape to incomplete and variable image cues. When presented with such partial cues, observers report perceiving 'illusory' contours and surfaces (forms) in regions having no physical image contrast^1–7. Here we report that three-dimensional illusory forms share three fundamental properties with 'real' forms: (1) the same forms are perceived using either stereo or motion parallax cues (cue invariance^8,9); (2) they retain their shape over changes in position and orientation relative to an observer (view stability^10); and (3) they can take the shape of general contours and surfaces in three dimensions^11 (morphic generality). We hypothesize that illusory contours and surfaces are manifestations of a previously unnoticed visual process which constructs a representation of three-dimensional position, orientation and shape of objects from available image cues.The IPCC assessment of climate change is full of assumptions unfair to the developing countries. It is essential that revisions take these problems into account if effective strategies are to ensue.WHEN a person walks through a rigid environment while holding eyes and head fixed, the pattern of retinal motion flows radially away from a point, the focus of expansion (Fig. l a )^1,2. Under such conditions of translation, heading corresponds to the focus of expansion and people identify it readily^3. But when making an eye/head movement to track an object off to the side, retinal motion is no longer radial (Fig. 1 b )^4. Heading perception in such situations has been modelled in two ways. Extra-retinal models monitor the velocity of rotational movements through proprioceptive or efference information from the extraocular and neck muscles and use that information to discount rotation effects^5. Retinal-image models determine (and eliminate) rotational components from the retinal image alone^6–12. These models have been tested^13,14 by measuring heading perception under two conditions. First, observers judged heading while tracking a point on a simulated ground plane. Second, they fixated a stationary point and the flow field simulated the effects of a tracking eye movement. Extra-retinal models^5 predict poorer performance in the simulated condition because the eyes do not move. Retinal-image models^6–12 predict no difference in performance because the two conditions produce identical patterns of retinal motion. Warren and Hannon^13,14 observed similar performance and concluded that people do not require extra-retinal information to judge heading with eye/head movements present, but they used extremely slow tracking eye movements of 0.2–1.2 deg s^−1; a moving observer frequently tracks objects at much higher rates (L. Stark, personal communication). Here we examine heading judgements at higher, more typical eye movement velocities and find that people require extra-retinal information about eye position^15 to perceive heading accurately under many viewing conditions.HOUSE mice ( Mus musculus domesticus ) form communal nests and appear to nurse each other's pups indiscriminately. Communal nesting probably functions to reduce infanticide^1, but it also makes females vulnerable to exploitation if nursing partners fail to provide their fair share of care. Kinship theory predicts that females will preferentially form communal nests with relatives to minimize exploitation and further increase inclusive fitness^2–4. Here we provide evidence from seminatural populations that females prefer communal nesting partners that share allelic forms of major histocompatibility complex genes. Such behaviour would lead to the selection of close relatives as communal nesting partners^5–7. Although criteria for the demonstration of kin recognition are currently embroiled in controversy^8,9, this is the first vertebrate study to meet Grafen's restrictive requirements^8,10: discrimination is based on genetic similarity at highly polymorphic loci, incidental correlations due to relatedness are experimentally controlled, and strong reasons exist for expecting the assayed behaviour to be kin-selected.THE increasingly rapid pace at which genomic DNA sequences are being determined has created a need for more efficient techniques to determine which parts of these sequences are bound in vivo by the proteins controlling processes such as gene expression, DNA replication and chromosomal mechanics. Here we describe a whole-genome approach to identify and characterize such DNA sequences. The method uses endogenous or artificially introduced methylases to methylate all genomic targets except those protected in vivo by protein or non-protein factors interfering with methylase action. These protected targets remain unmethylated in purified genomic DNA and are identified using methylation-sensitive restriction endonucleases. When the method was applied to the Escherichia coli genome, 0.1% of the endogenous adenine methyltransferase (Dam methylase) targets were found to be unmethylated. Five foreign methylases were examined by transfection. Database-matched DNA sequences flanking the in vivo -protected Dam sites all fell in the non-coding regions of seven E. coli operons ( mtl , cdd , flh , gut , car , psp and fep ). In the first four operons these DNA sequences closely matched the consensus sequence that binds to the cyclic AMP-receptor protein. The in vivo protection at the Dam site upstream of the car operon was correlated with a downregulation of car expression, as expected of a feedback represser-binding model.NON-CLATHRIN coated vesicles have been implicated in early steps of intercompartmental transport^1–4. A distinct set of coat proteins are peripherally associated with the exterior of purified mammalian intra-Golgi transport vesicles^5. The 'coatomer', a cytosolic complex containing a similar subunit composition to and sharing at least one subunit ( β -COP) with the coat found on vesicles, has been postulated to be the precursor of this non-clathrin coat^6. Here we describe the characterization of SEC21 , an essential gene required for protein transport from the endoplasmic reticulum to the Golgi in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae . The 105K product of this gene, Sec21p, participates in a cytosolic complex that we show to be a yeast homologue of the mammalian coatomer. These observations demonstrate that a non-clathrin coat protein plays an essential role in intercompartmental transport.SPECIFICATION of the R7 cell fate in the developing Drosophila eye requires activation of the Sevenless (Sev) receptor tyrosine kinase, located on the surface of the R7 precursor cell, by its interaction with the Boss protein, expressed on the surface of the neighbouring R8 cell^1–3. Four genes that participate in the intracellular transmission of this signal have so far been identified and molecularly characterized: Rasl , Sos , Gapl and sina (refs 4–8). The Drosophila homologue of the mammalian Raf-1 serine/threonine kinase, which has been implicated in signal transduction pathways activated by many receptor tyrosine kinases (reviewed in refs 9 and 10), is encoded by the raf locus (also known as l(l)polehole ^11, Draf-1 ^12 or Draf ^13). Here we show that the Drosophila Raf serine/threonine kinase also plays a crucial role in the R7 pathway: the response to Sev activity is dependent on raf function, and a constitutively activated Raf protein can induce R7 cell development in the absence of sev function. We also present genetic evidence suggesting that Raf acts downstream of Rasl and upstream of Sina in this signal transduction cascade.Koobi Fora Research Project. Volume 4: Hominid Cranial Remains. By Bernard Wood. Oxford University Press: 1991. Pp. 466. £95, $220.MARINE species commonly have broadly dispersing juveniles called larvae. Their return to the adult populations is highly variable^1–3, often generating large fluctuations in population size^4–6, yet the causes of the variation are poorly understood. Historically, attention has been focused on the roles of variable reproductive output by adults and variable mortality during larval development^7,8. The limited success of these factors as general explanations prompted a more recent focus on the influence of variable transport of the larvae^9–13. Here we show that nearly a decade of settlement variation of the barnacle, Semibalanus balanoides (L), closely matched predictions based solely on a transport hypothesis: differences in transport generate recruitment variation by determining whether larvae complete development near a favourable habitat. The irregular nature of coastlines, particularly the presence of bays and estuaries, generates substantial regional variation in coastal transport that may generate correspondingly large variation in recruitment to marine populations.Nature 358, 493-495 (1992) IN this letter dealing with cooperative breeding on the Cousin and Cousine Islands in the Seychelles, in four places in the text Cousin is referred to instead of Cousine. These are in the following places: Line 22 in the right-hand column on page 494; and in lines 1, 4 and11 in the left-hand column on page 495.AN inherited deficiency of β -glucuronidase in humans^1, mice^2 and dogs^3 causes mucopolysaccharidosis VII (Sly syndrome), a progressive degenerative disease that reduces lifespan (to an average of 5 months in mice^2) and results from lysosomal storage of undegraded glycosaminoglycans in the spleen, liver, kidney, cornea, brain and skeletal system^1–4. Bone marrow transplantation in mutant mice provides a source of normal enzyme (‘cross-correction’^5), which substantially improves the clinical condition and extends the average lifespan to 18 months^6. Gene therapy by transfer of a β -glucuronidase gene into mutant haematopoietic stem cells is an alternative approach^7,8, but it is not known whether the low expression of vector-transferred genes in vivo ^9,10 would be sufficiently effective. Here we show that retroviral vector-mediated transfer of the gene to mutant stem cells results in long-term expression of low levels of β -glucuronidase which partially corrects the disease by reducing lysosomal storage in liver and spleen.HAEMATOPOIETIC stem cells are a population of cells capable both of self renewal and of differentiation into a variety of haematopoietic lineages^1–4. Enrichment techniques of human haematopoietic stem cells have used the expression of CD34, present on bone marrow progenitor cells^5–7. But most CD34^+ bone marrow cells are committed to their lineage, and more recent efforts have focused on the precise characterization of the pluripotent subset of CD34^+ cells^8–17. Here we report the characterization of two distinct subsets of pluripotent stem cells from human fetal bone marrow, a CD34^+, HLA-DR^+, CD38^− subset that can differentiate into all haematopoietic lineages, and a distinct more primitive subset, that is CD34^+, HLA-DR^−, CD38^−, that can differentiate into haematopoietic precursors and stromal cells capable of supporting the differentiation of these precursors. These data represent, to our knowledge, the first identification of a single cell capable of reconstituting the haematopoietic cells and their associated bone marrow microenvironment.THE proto-oncogene c- fos is the cellular homologue of v- fos originally isolated from murine osteosarcoma^1. Fos protein is a major component of the AP-1 transcription factor complex, which includes members of the jun family^2. Stable expression of c- fos in mice has been demonstrated in developing bones and teeth, haematopoietic cells, germ cells and in the central nervous system^3–11. It has been proposed that c- fos has an important role in signal transduction, cell proliferation and differentiation^12–15. We have previously demonstrated that overexpression of c- fos in transgenic and chimaeric mice specifically affects bone, cartilage and haematopoietic cell development^16–20. To understand better the function of c- fos in vivo , we used gene targeting in embryonic stem cells to generate cells and mice lacking c- fos . Here we report that heterozygous fos +/− mice appear normal, although females exhibit a distorted transmission frequency. All homozygous fos −/− mice are growth-retarded, develop osteopetrosis with deficiencies in bone remodelling and tooth eruption, and have altered haematopoiesis. These data define the c-Fos protein as an essential molecule for the development of specific cellular compartments.IT has been suggested that Hox genes play an important part in the patterning of limbs^1–3, vertebrae^4–6 and craniofacial structures^5,7–9 by providing an ordered molecular system of positional values, termed the Hox code^10,11. Little is known about the nature of the signals that govern the establishment and regulation of Hox genes, but retinoic acid can affect the expression of these genes in cell lines^12–14 and in embryonic tissues^2,11,15–17. On the basis of experimental and clinical evidence, the hindbrain and branchial region of the head are particularly sensitive to the effects of retinoic acid ^15,18–21, but the phenotypes are complex and hard to interpret, and how and if they relate to Hox expression has not been clear. Here we follow the changes induced by retinoic acid to hindbrain segmentation and the branchial arches using transgenic mice which contain lacZ reporter genes that reveal the endogenous segment-restricted expression of the Hox-Bl ( Hox-2.9 ), Hox-B2 ( Hox-2.8 ) and Krox-20 genes. Our results show that these genes rapidly respond to exposure to retinoic acid at preheadfold stages and undergo a progressive series of changes in segmental expression that are associated with specific phenotypes in hindbrain of first branchial arch. Together the molecular and anatomical alterations indicate that retinoic acid has induced changes in the hindbrain Hox code which result in the homeotic transformation of rhom-bomeres (r) 2/3 to an r4/5 identity. A main feature of this rhom-bomeric phenotype is that the trigeminal motor nerve is transformed to a facial identity. Furthermore, in support of this change in rhombomeric identity, neural crest cells derived from r2/3 also express posterior Hox markers suggesting that the retinoic acid-induced transformation extends to multiple components of the first branchial arch.AT the midblastula transition in the zebrafish, three, and only three, spatially separate mitotic domains arise with distinctive cycle lengths and rhythms. As in Drosophila ^1 and at about the equivalent stage, the mitotic domains reflect the fate map, but they do so only very crudely: two are extraembryonic and the third forms the entire embryo. The domains appear not to subdivide during gastrulation, when the germ layers form and when cells probably commit to their eventual fates. The domains may signal specification of morphogenesis rather than cell fate, because, shortly after they appear, each assumes a different role during epiboly, the first morphogenetic movement of the embryo. During meroblastic cleavage, and continuing in the early blastula, zebrafish blastomeres divide rapidly and synchronously. At the time of the tenth cleavage, the beginning of the midblastula transition, the cell cycle lengthens, and, as in Xenopus ^2 and Drosophila ^3, cycle length comes under nucleocytoplasmic control (D.A.K. and C.B.K., manuscript in preparation). This nucleocytoplasmic control seems to be maintained during cycle lengthening in the next 2 or 3 cycles, comprising a midblastula transition period. We now show that functionally distinct subsets of cells that arise during this period have reproducibly different mitotic cycle lengths.KONSO-GARDULA is a palaeoanthropological area discovered by the 1991 Palaeoanthropological Inventory of Ethiopia^1–5 in the southern Main Ethiopian Rift. The Konso-Gardula sediments span the period about 1.3–1.9 million years ago. They contain rich Acheulean archaeological occurrences. Vertebrate fossils include early Homo .Nature 358, 407-410 (1992) IN this letter in the 30 July issue, Stephen A. Smith (Virginia-Maryland Regional College of Veterinary Medicine, Virginia Poly-technic Institute, Blacksburg, Virginia 24061-0442, USA), a former collaborator of the second author, was inadvertently omitted and should be added as a fifth author.THE volume of early Archaean crust that still survives today is very small (less than 1% of the present continental volume). This has been interpreted as indicating that crustal growth did not begin until about 4.0 Gyr ago, before which the silicate Earth remained well mixed and essentially undifferentiated. But the existence in some early Archaean rocks^1–6 of inferred initial ^143Nd/^144Nd ratios higher than that of the bulk Earth suggests that by 3.8 Gyr ago the volume of the crust was as large as about 40% of the present value^3,7,8. Given the apparently low rate of recycling in the Hadean era (that is, before 4 Gyr ago)^7,8, consideration of ^147Sm–^143Nd systematics then suggests that primordial differentiation of the Earth may have begun ~4.5 Gyr ago. Here we present evidence for early differentiation, based on measurements of ^143Nd/^144Nd and ^142Nd/^144Nd ratios in a ~3.8-Gyr-old supracrustal rock from Isua, West Greenland. Coupled ^146,147Sm–^142,143Nd systematics suggest that fractionation of Sm/Nd took place 4.44–4.54 Gyr ago, owing to extraction of a light-rare-earth-element-enriched primordial crust.METASOMATISM of the lithospheric upper mantle by magmas and/or other fluids may induce significant changes in its chemical and mineralogical composition. It is not yet clear whether metasomatism takes place earlier than, concurrent with or subsequent to alkaline igneous activity and melt migration. Clues about the timing of metasomatism beneath the Kaapvaal craton in southern Africa are provided by metasomatized peridotites brought to the surface as xenoliths in young (80–95-Myr-old) group I kimberlites^1,2: the question that arises is whether the metasomatic alterations of the xenoliths are related to the host kimberlites themselves or to earlier igneous events such as the group II kimberlite eruptions (120–150 Myr)^1,2. Here we report a precise U–Pb age of 85±2 Myr for zircons in a veined and metasomatized harzburgite xenolith from Kimberley, which indicates that this particular style of metasomatism (MARID-related^3) is concurrent with the migration of the kimberlite magma that hosts the xenolith. This temporal link supports previous isotopic evidence^4 for a genetic link between the group I kimberlite magmatism and the accompanying metasomatism.IT has long been recognized that the electrical conductivity of the lower continental crust is anomalously high. Both pore-saturating brines^1–5 and conducting films of carbon at grain boundaries^6–10 have been proposed to explain this, but the evidence remains inconclusive. Here we report measurements of electrical conductivity at high temperatures and pressures^11–13 on samples of carbon-bearing and carbon-free granulites with a range of electrolyte saturations. The application of pressure to nominally dry carbon-free samples reduces the electrical conductivity as a result of a progressive reduction in pore connectivity, whereas the carbon-bearing samples show an increase in conductivity under the same conditions—an effect that we ascribe to reconnection of carbon conduction pathways during compaction. Moreover, we find a greater increase in conductivity with temperature for the carbon-bearing samples. In the light of work indicating that the abundance of carbon in high-grade rocks has been underestimated in the past^7,8, our results provide strong evidence for the role of carbon in lower-crustal conductivity.A DECADE ago, Lovelock and Whitfield^1 raised the question of how much longer the biosphere can survive on Earth. They pointed out that, despite the current fossil-fuel induced increase in the atmospheric CO_2 concentration, the long-term trend should be in the opposite direction: as increased solar luminosity warms the Earth, silicate rocks should weather more readily, causing atmospheric CO_2 to decrease. In their model^1, atmospheric CO_2 falls below the critical level for C3 photosynthesis, 150 parts per million (p.p.m.), in only 100 Myr, and this is assumed to mark the demise of the biosphere as a whole. Here, we re-examine this problem using a more elaborate model that includes a more accurate treatment of the greenhouse effect of CO_2 (refs 2–4), a biologically mediated weathering parameterization, and the realization that C4 photosynthesis can persist to much lower concentrations of atmospheric CO_2(<10 p.p.m.)^5,6. We find that a C4-plant-based biosphere could survive for at least another 0.9 Gyr to 1.5 Gyr after the present time, depending respectively on whether CO_2 or temperature is the limiting factor. Within an additional 1 Gyr, Earth may lose its water to space, thereby following the path of its sister planet, Venus.Recommendations for a reorganization of US research on the environment are vitiated by the absence of any indication of the likely costs.Nature 358, 749-750 (1992) IN Table 1 of this letter, the looking times for experiment 2, test trials of group 2-1 are reversed. They should indicate that LT(1) = 8.05 and LT(2) - 10.98.TECHNIQUES for surface modification are of considerable technological interest for the fabrication of water-repellent and anti-fouling coatings. Silanization^1 (the chemical grafting of organic molecules onto a substrate via a trichlorosilane group) stands out among these techniques by virtue of its ability to provide highly compact coatings of optical quality, extreme chemical inertness and adjustable wettability^2. Although the silanization reaction has been extensively characterized^3–8, the properties of the grafted layers are still too variable for most commercial applications; for example, the quality of the grafted layers depends critically on the presence of trace amounts of water, and on the temperature at which the silanization reaction takes place^9. Here we provide evidence for the existence of a near-ambient temperature threshold, T _c, which represents an upper bound for obtaining the highest-quality films. This threshold temperature is found to be an intrinsic property of the silane molecules: it depends linearly on their chain length, but is independent of the solvent used for the reaction. We suggest that T _c is analogous to the triple point in the phase diagram of Langmuir monolayers.THE structure of the solar corona is believed to be governed by the solar magnetic field induced by currents at the surface of the Sun and perhaps within the corona itself^1. Inhomogeneities in the corona are well known from radially compensated eclipse images^2 in white light or coronal emission lines^3. We have used two whitelight images taken about three hours apart by the Multi-station International Coronal Experiment^4 during the July 1991 total eclipse in an attempt to deduce directly the three-dimensional structure of the corona. We observed prominent coronal structures, including broad threads, rays and streamers, and used them to calibrate a model based on solid-body rotation and bulk coronal outflow. The errors in the reconstruction method are small enough to give us confidence that quasi-rigid rotation is a reasonable approximation over these timescales. We illustrate the deduced coronal structure by means of a stereogram.Nature 354, 82-84 (1991) IN this paper we inadvertently omitted to cite the work of Furka and colleagues (A. Furka, F. Sebestyen, M. Asgedom and G. Dibo 14th Int. Congr. Biochem. FR013; 1988), who independently described a similar synthetic method for producing multiple peptide sequences (which we called "split synthesis").ZWICKY^1 argued long ago that tidal forces can tear long tails of stars and gas from the bodies of interacting disk galaxies, and that this debris may include self-gravitating objects which could become small galaxies. Some recent observations revealing small clumps of stars and gas in tidal tails lend weight to this idea^2–4. Here we report the results of numerical simulations of encounters between disk galaxies^5, each modelled with a central bulge, an exponential disk and a spheroidal dark-matter halo. We find that dwarf systems form in material drawn out during the encounter; these objects can capture large amounts of moderately enriched gas, but retain little dark matter from their parents' haloes. They should therefore have lower mass-to-light ratios than galaxies formed directly by the collapse of primordial material.Life in Amber. By George O. Poinar Jr. Stanford University Press: 1992. Pp. 350. $55.The Beginnings of Western Science: The European Scientific Tradition in Philosophical, Religious and Institutional Context, 600 BC to AD 1450. By David C. Lindberg. University of Chicago Press: 1992. Pp. 455. $57, á£45 (hbk); $19.95, á£15.95 (pbk). The Struggle to Understand: A History of Human Wonder and Discovery. By Herbert C. Corben. Prometheus: 1992. Pp. 398. $29.95, á£18.95.It is traditional, as the year draws to a close, to try to predict what the future holds in store. It is less common to ask, as Caldeira and Kasting do in this issue, “how much future?” .The British government's request for input into its promised White Paper on science has stimulated an unprecedented and often controversial stream of suggestions from the scientific community.Nature 357, 698-700 (1992) IN Fig. 2 of this letter, the last five amino acid residues (401-405) were not shown. They are "AKLFK".Nature 360, 464-467 (1992) THE third author's name was shown incorrectly in this letter. It should read Magnar Bj0ras, as above. In addition, Fig. 2b is not, as stated, a western blot but is an autoradiogram of an SDS-polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis gel.IN Snell (dw) and Jackson (dw^j) dwarf mice, mutations in the gene encoding Pit-1, a tissue-specific POU-domain transcription factor, lead to the absence of somatotroph, lactotroph and thyrotroph cells^1–6. Pre-somatotroph proliferation is stimulated by increased intracellular levels of cyclic AMP, normally induced by growth hormone releasing factor (GRF; refs 7–17). Here we report the cloning of mouse and rat complementary DNAs encoding a new member of the seven-transmembrane-helix, G-protein-coupled receptor family restricted to the pituitary gland, which mediates increases in intracellular cAMP and cAMP-dependent gene transcription in response to GRF. The receptor is expressed in a spatial and temporal pattern corresponding precisely to growth hormone gene expression, and neither is expressed in dw/dw mice. The pituitary hypoplasia in these mice thus appears to be due, at least in part, to the absence of GRF receptor, which is in turn due to the absence of functional Pit-1.IN the yeast Sacchromyces cerevisiae , addition of glucose to starved cells triggers a transient rise in the intracellular level of cyclic AMP that induces a protein phosphorylation cascade^1. The glucose signal is processed by the Cdc25/Ras/adenylyl cyclase pathway^2, where the role of Cdc25 is to catalyse the GDP–GTP exchange on Ras^3. The molecular mechanisms involved in the regulation of the activity of Cdc25 are unknown. We report here the use of highly selective anti-Cdc25 antibodies^4 to demonstrate that Cdc25 is a phospho protein and that in response to glucose it is hyper-phosphorylated, within seconds, by the cyclic AMP-dependent protein kinase. It is also demonstrated that, concomitantly with hyperphosphorylation, Cdc25 partially relocalizes to the cytoplasm, reducing its accessibility to membrane-bound Ras. These results are of general significance because of the highly conserved sequence of Ras–guanyl nucleotide exchange factors from yeasts to mammals.Nature 358, 325-327 (1992) THE full address for correspondence (with R.R.) relating to this letter is: The Department of Biomedical Sciences, CNR Center for the Study of Mitochondrial Physiology, University of Padova, Via Trieste 75, 35121 Padova, Italy. In addition, the following sentence should beadded to Acknowledgements: The financial support of the V AIDS project is also acknowledged.REGULATION of cell volume is essential for every cell and is accomplished by the regulated loss or gain of intracellular ions or other osmolytes^1–4. Regulatory volume decrease often involves the parallel activation of potassium and chloride channels^5–10. Overexpression of P-glycoprotein leads to volume-activated Cl^− currents^11,12 but its physiological importance for volume regulation is unclear^13. CIC-2 is a ubiquitously expressed Cl^− channel^14 activatable by non-physiologically strong hyperpolarization. We now show that CIC-2 can be activated by extracellular hypotonicity, which suggests that it has a widespread role in volume regulation. Domains necessary for activation by both voltage and volume are localized to the amino terminus. Mutations in an ‘essential’ region lead to constitutively open channels unresponsive to medium tonicity, whereas deletions in a ‘modulating’ region produce partially opened channels responsive to both hypo- and hypertonicity. These domains can be transplanted to different regions of the protein without loss of function.MOTONEURONS innervating the skeletal musculature were among the first neurons shown to require the presence of their target cells to develop appropriately^1,2. But the characterization of molecules allowing motoneuron survival has been difficult. Ciliary neurotrophic factor prevents the death of motoneurons^3–6, but its gene is not expressed during development^7. Although the presence of a neurotrophin receptor on developing motoneurons^8–10 has suggested a role for neurotrophins, none could be shown to promote motoneuron survival in vitro ^3. We report here that brain-derived neurotrophic factor can prevent the death of axotomized motoneurons in newborn rats, suggesting a role for this neurotrophin for motoneuron survival in vivo .DURING normal vertebrate development, about half of spinal motoneurons are lost by a process of naturally occurring or programmed cell death^1,2. Additional developing motoneurons degenerate after the removal of targets^3,4 or afferents^5. Naturally occurring motoneuron death as well as motoneuron death after loss of targets or after axotomy can be prevented by in vivo treatment with putative target (muscle) derived or other neurotrophic agents^6–8. Motoneurons can also be prevented from dying in vitro ^9–12 and in vivo (Y.Q.-W., R.W., D.P., J. Johnson and L. Van Eldik, unpublished data and refs 7, 13, 14) by treatment with central nervous system extracts (brain or spinal cord) and purified central nervous system and glia-derived proteins. Here we report that in vivo treatment of chick embryos with brain-derived neurotrophic factor rescues motoneurons from naturally occurring cell death. Furthermore, in vivo treatment with brain-derived neurotrophic factor (and nerve growth factor) also prevents the induced death of motoneurons that occurs following the removal of descending afferent input (deafferentation)^5. These data indicate that members of the neurotrophin family can promote the survival of developing avian motoneurons.The city of Baltimore will offer Norplant in health clinics affiliated with public schools.CURRENT ideas about the dependence of neurons on target-derived growth factors were formulated on the basis of experiments involving neurons with projections to the periphery^1,2. Nerve growth factor (NGF) and recently identified members of the NGF family of neuronal growth factors, known as neurotrophins, are thought to regulate survival of sympathetic and certain populations of sensory ganglion cells during development^3–8. Far less is known about factors that regulate the survival of spinal and cranial motor neurons, which also project to peripheral targets. NGF has not been shown to influence motor neuron survival^9,10, and whether the newly identified neurotrophins promote motor neuron survival is unknown. We show here that brain-derived neurotrophic factor (BDNF) is retrogradely transported by motor neurons in neonatal rats and that local application of BDNF to transected sciatic nerve prevents the massive death of motor neurons that normally follows axotomy in the neonatal period. These results show that BDNF has survival-promoting effects on motor neurons in vivo and suggest that BDNF may influence motor neuron survival during development.THE apparent conflict between pollen evidence for widespread Artemisia steppe^1–6 (implying semi-arid conditions) and geomorphological evidence for high lake levels^4,7–11 has produced controversy about the ice-age palaeoclimate of the Mediterranean region. Here we use a water-balance model^12 (to predict catchment runoff) and a biome model^13 (to predict vegetation type) to reconstruct the palaeoenvironment around Lake loannina—a type locality for the northern Mediterranean region. We show that both sets of evidence are compatible with a summer-dry, winter-wet regime with seasonal temperature anomalies similar to those predicted by atmospheric model simulations of the Last Glacial Maximum^14–18. The drying effect of the cold North Atlantic Ocean may have been counteracted in winter by increased storm frequency under a southward-shifted jet stream, as shown by several atmospheric models^16–18.LOW-ENERGY electron diffraction (LEED) has become the most successful technique in surface crystallography^1, but because of the complexity of the surface-electron scattering interactions, analyses of LEED data are still conducted on a trial-and-error basis: a direct-inversion method for treating LEED intensity data remains an attractive goal^2. Building on recent theoretical and experimental developments in electron holography from surface structures^3–16, we show here that three-dimensional images with atomic resolution can be obtained by a direct transform of conventional LEED intensity spectra.THE brightness of the Sun varies during the 11-year solar cycle, typically by less than 0.1% (refs 1, 2), and a larger brightness variation is thought to have occurred during the Maunder minimum, from AD 1645 to 1715 (refs 3–5). But because individual solar cycles are different in form, amplitude and length, and because accurate solar data have been available only for the most recent two or three cycles, there is no direct way of understanding long-term solar variability. Here we present a compilation of eight years of observations of 33 Sun-like stars and report year-to-year brightness changes that substantially exceed the analogous solar fluctuations. We have also measured chromospheric magnetic activity in these stars and find that it correlates with the brightness variations. During 1980–88, solar chromospheric variability was comparable to that observed in the stellar survey, but solar brightness variations were only one-quarter as large. This suggests that the Sun is in an unusually steady phase compared to similar stars, which means that reconstructing the past historical brightness record, for example from sunspot records, may be more risky than has been generally thought.THE flat rotation curves of spiral galaxies are usually regarded as the most convincing evidence for dark matter. The assumption that gravity alone is responsible for the motion of gas beyond the visible disks of galaxies leads directly to the conclusion that there must be perhaps 10 times as much dark matter as visible matter. Other forces besides gravity are usually neglected, as order-of-magnitude arguments seem to suggest they cannot be important. The existence of dark matter is, however, so important an issue that we believe it is wise to consider other possibilities. Here we argue that an azimuthal magnetic field can carry slightly ionized gas with the general galactic rotation, rendering dark matter unnecessary (a related idea was first proposed by Nelson^1). For the illustrative case of M31, a magnetic field of 6 μG is required, and the synchrotron emission of relativistic electrons in this field is compatible with the observations.General-circulation-model simulations used to estimate the sensitivity of the Indian monsoon to changes in orbital parameters, the orography of Tibet—Himalaya, atmospheric C0_2 concentration and the extent of glacial-age surface boundary conditions show that increased elevations and increased summer solar radiation are most effective in strengthening the monsoon. Strong monsoons (similar to today's) can be induced by strong solar forcing only when the elevation is at least half that of today. These conditions may have been attained in the late Miocene.Between 10 and 20 million years ago, a variety of hominoid primates lived in Africa, Europe and Asia. The question of which of these, if any, lie closest to the ancestries of humans and modern apes remains a lively source of debate. Recent fossil discoveries, though, shed light on the environments in which the various groups of hominoid emerged and, it is hoped, on their evolution. But the lack of a hominid fossil record before about 5 million years ago—and any fossil record for the African apes—is still a frustrating barrier.Accidental Empires: How the Boys of Silicon Valley Make Their Millions, Battle Foreign Competition, and Still Can't Get a Date. By Robert X. Cringely. R. X. Addison- Wesley/Viking: 1992. Pp. 336. $19.95, £16.99.The Creationists: The Evolution of Scientific Creationism. By Ronald L. Numbers. Knopf: 1992. Pp. 456. $27.50.There were high hopes that comet Swift–Tuttle might be on collision course with the Earth, but it now seems that enthusiasts for destruction will have to wait for another ill-omened body.The world's chemical weapons are due to be destroyed within 10 years. How sensible is a radical proposal to destroy Russia's stockpiles by means of underground nuclear explosions?Pre-coated coverslips, cell separation flasks, an assay for in vitro toxicity testing, microtomes, assorted media and media supplements — new products in the cell and tissue culture line.Nature 351, 579-583 EXAMINATION of the sequence for a homologue of the poly-peptide described in the above paper (EMBL accession number X62160) raised the possibility that a small segment of the rat sequence as originally reported was in an incorrect translational frame. We have closely examined theoriginal data and conclude that two sequencing errors caused the reading frame for nucleo-tides 1,099-1,214 to be shifted by one base.EXON sequences present on separate RNA molecules can be joined by trans -splicing in trypanosomatids, Euglena , and in the nematode and trematode worms^1–3. Trans -splicing involves an interaction between a 5′ splice site present in a spliced leader RNA and a 3′ splice site located near the 5′ end of pre-messenger RNAs. In vitro trans -splicing of artificial mammalian pre-mRNAs has been reported, but the efficiency of splicing appears to depend on sequence complementarity between the two substrates^4–7. There has been speculation that some natural pre-mRNAs can be trans -spliced in mammalian cells in vivo ^8,9, but alternative interpretations have not been ruled out. Here we show that spliced leader RNAs can be accurately trans -spliced in mammalian cells in vivo and in vitro . Both nematode and mammalian 3′ splice sites can function as acceptors for trans -splicing in vivo . These results reveal functional conservation in the splicing machinery between lower eukaryotes and mammals, and they directly demonstrate the potential for trans -splicing in mammalian cells.US President-elect Bill Clinton is putting pragmatism ahead of ideology in his first major appointments of people with some sympathy for a national science policy.THE mammalian shc gene encodes two overlapping, widely expressed proteins of 46 and 52K, with a carboxy-terminal SH2 domain that binds activated growth factor receptors, and a more amino-terminal glycine/proline-rich region^1. These shc gene products (Shc) are transforming when overexpressed in fibroblasts^1. Shc proteins become phosphorylated on tyrosine in cells stimulated with a variety of growth factors^1, and in cells transformed by v- src (ref. 2), suggesting that they are tyrosine kinase targets that control a mitogenic signalling pathway. Here we report that tyrosine-phosphorylated She proteins form a specific complex with a non-phosphorylated 23K polypeptide encoded by the grb2/sem -5 gene^3,4. The grb2/sem -5 gene product itself contains an SH2 domain, which mediates binding to Shc, and is implicated in activation of the Ras guanine nucleotide-binding protein by tyrosine kinases in both Caenorhabditis elegans and mammalian cells^3,4. Consistent with a role in signalling through Ras, shc overexpression induced Ras-dependent neurite outgrowth in PC 12 cells. These results suggest that She tyrosine phosphorylation can couple tyrosine kinases to Grb2/Sem-5, through formation of a Shc-Grb2/Sem-5 complex, and thereby regulate the mammalian Ras signalling pathway.THE activation of heterotrimeric G proteins results in the exchange of GDP bound to the α-subunit for GTP and the subsequent dissociation of a complex of the β- and γ-subunits (Gβγ). The α -subunits of different G proteins interact with a variety of effectors^1–7, but less is known about the function of the free Gβγ complex. Gβγ has been implicated in the activation of a cardiac potassium channel^8, a retinal phospholipase A_2 (ref. 9) and a specific receptor kinase^10, and in vitro reconstitution experiments indicate that the G_βγ complex can act with G_α subunit to modulate the activity of different isoforms of adenylyl cyclase^11. Of two phospholipase activities that can be separated in extracts of HL-60 cells, purified G_βγ is found to activate one of them^12. Here we report that in co-transfection assays G_βγ subunits specifically activate the β2 and not the β1 isoform of phospholipase, which acts on phosphatidylinositol. We use transfection assays to show also that receptor-mediated release of G^βγ from G proteins that are sensitive to pertussis toxin can result in activation of the phospholipase. This effect may be the basis of the pertussis-toxin-sensitive phospholipase C activation seen in some cell systems (reviewed in refs 13 and 14).HYDROLYSIS by phospholipase C (PLC) of phosphatidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate is a key mechanism by which many extracellular signalling molecules regulate functions of their target cells^1,2. At least eight distinct isozymes of PLC are recognized in mammalian cells^3,4. Receptor-controlled PLC is often regulated by G proteins, which can be modified by pertussis toxin in some cells but not in others^5 6. In the latter cells, PLC-β1, but not PLC-γl or PLC-δ1, may be activated by members of the α_q-subfamily of the G protein α-subunits^7–10. An unidentified PLC in soluble fractions of cultured human HL-60 granulocytes is specifically stimulated by G protein βγ subunits purified from retina and brain^11. Identification of a second PLC-β complementary DNA (PLC-β2) in an HL-60 cell cDNA library^9 prompted us to investigate the effect of purified G protein βγ subunits on the activities of PLC-β1 and PLC-β2 transiently expressed in cultured mammalian cells. We report here that PLC-β1 and PLC-β2 were stimulated by free βγ subunits and that PLC-β2 was the most sensitive to βγ stimulation. Thus stimulation of PLC by βγ subunits is isozyme-selective and PLC-β2 is a prime target of βγ stimulation. Activation of PLC-β2 by βγ subunits may be an important mechanism by which pertussis toxin-sensitive G proteins stimulate PLC.THE structurally unrelated immunosuppressants FK506 and cyclosporin A (CsA) act similarly, inhibiting a Ca^2+-dependent signal required for interleukin-2 transcription and T-cell activation^1. Each drug binds to its cytosolic receptor, FKBP-12 and cyclophilin, respectively, and the drug-receptor complexes inhibit the Ca^2+/calmodulin-dependent protein phosphatase, calcineurin^2–4. In yeast, calcineurin has been implicated in recovery from α-mating factor arrest^5,6. Here we show that FK506 bound to yeast FKBP-12 appears to form a complex with yeast calcineurin. Moreover, recovery from mating factor arrest is highly sensitive to FK506 or CsA, and this sensitivity requires the presence of FKBP-12 or cyclophilin, respectively. These results define a key physiological target of an FK506- and CsA-sensitive signal pathway in yeast, suggest a high degree of mechanistic conservation with mammalian cells, and indicate that further examination of the yeast system should provide insight into the same process in T cells.HUMAN activities have increased global emissions of sulphur gases by about a factor of three during the past century, leading to increased sulphate aerosol concentrations, mainly in the Northern Hemisphere. Sulphate aerosols can affect the climate directly, by increasing the backscattering of solar radiation in cloud-free air, and indirectly, by providing additional cloud condensation nuclei^1–4. Here we use a global transport–chemistry model to estimate the changes in the distribution of tropospheric sulphate aerosol and deposition of non-seasalt sulphur that have occurred since pre-industrial times. The increase in sulphate aerosol concentration is small over the Southern Hemisphere oceans, but reaches a factor of 100 over northern Europe in winter. Our calculations indicate, however, that at most 6% of the anthropogenic sulphur emissions is available for the formation of new aerosol particles. This is because about one-half of the sulphur dioxide is deposited on the Earth's surface, and most of the remainder is oxidized in cloud droplets so that the sulphate becomes associated with pre-existing particles. Even so, the rate of formation of new sulphate particles may have doubled since pre-industrial times.MICROPOROUS and mesoporous inorganic solids (with pore diameters of ≤20 Å and ∼20–500 Å respectively)^1 have found great utility as catalysts and sorption media because of their large internal surface area. Typical microporous materials are the crystalline framework solids, such as zeolites^2, but the largest pore dimensions found so far are ∼10–12 Å for some metallophosphates^3–5 and ∼14 Å for the mineral cacoxenite^6. Examples of mesoporous solids include silicas^7 and modified layered materials^8–11, but these are invariably amorphous or paracrystalline, with pores that are irregularly spaced and broadly distributed in size^8,12. Pore size can be controlled by intercalation of layered silicates with a surfactant species^9,13, but the final product retains, in part, the layered nature of the precursor material. Here we report the synthesis of mesoporous solids from the calcination of aluminosilicate gels in the presence of surfactants. The material^14,15 possesses regular arrays of uniform channels, the dimensions of which can be tailored (in the range 16 Å to 100 Å or more) through the choice of surfactant, auxiliary chemicals and reaction conditions. We propose that the formation of these materials takes place by means of a liquid-crystal 'templating' mechanism, in which the silicate material forms inorganic walls between ordered surfactant micelles.Field and laboratory observations suggest that the porosity within fault zones varies over earthquake cycles so that fluid pressure is in long-term equilibrium with hydrostatic fluid pressure in the country rock. Between earthquakes, ductile creep compacts the fault zone, increasing fluid pressure, and finally allowing frictional failure at relatively low shear stress. Earthquake faulting restores porosity and decreases fluid pressure to below hydrostatic. This mechanism may explain why major faults, such as the San Andreas system, are weak.Neurons and Networks: An Introduction to Neuroscience. By John E. Dowling. Belknap (Harvard University Press): 1992. Pp. 447. $45, £29.95. The Neuron: Cell and Molecular Biology. By Irwin B. Levitan and Leonard K. Kaczmarek. Oxford University Press: 1991. Pp. 450. £55, $65 (hbk); £18.95, $39.95 (pbk). An Introduction to Molecular Neurobiology. Edited by Zach W. Hall. W. H. Freeman (UK)/Sinauer (US): 1992. Pp. 555. £32.95, $46.95.Science and Religion: Some Historical Perspectives. By John Medley Brooke. Cambridge University Press: 1991. Pp. 422. £27.50, $44.50 (hbk); £±0.95, $12.95 (pbk).The Planets: Portraits of New Worlds. By Nigel Henbest. Viking: 1992. Pp. 207. £20, $35. (US publication in December.) Worlds in the Sky: Planetary Discovery from Earliest Times Through Voyager and Magellan. By William Sheehan. University of Arizona Press: 1992. Pp 243. $35 (hbk), $17.95 (pbk). (UK distribution by Roundhouse.)Conservation Biology: The Theory and Practice of Nature Conservation, Preservation and Management. Edited by Peggy L. Fiedler and Subodh K. Jain. Chapman and Hall: 1992. Pp. 507. £52, $79 (hbk); £22.95, $35 (pbk). Wildlife Research and Management in the National Parks. By R. Gerald Wright. University of Illinois Press: 1992. Pp. 224. $32.50.THE discovery^1 of buckminsterfullerene (C_60) and its production in macroscopic quantities^2 has stimulated a great deal of research. More recently, attention has turned towards other curved graphitic networks, such as the giant fullerenes (C_ n , n > 100)^3,4 and carbon nanotubes^5–8. A general mechanism has been proposed^9 in which the graphitic sheets bend in an attempt to eliminate the highly energetic dangling bonds present at the edge of the growing structure. Here, I report the response of carbon soot particles and tubular graphitic structures to intense electron-beam irradiation in a high-resolution electron microscope; such conditions resemble a high-temperature regime, permitting a degree of structural fluidity. With increased irradiation, there is a gradual reorganization of the initial material into quasi-spherical particles composed of concentric graphitic shells. This lends weight to the nucleation scheme proposed^9 for fullerenes, and moreover, suggests that planar graphite may not be the most stable allotrope of carbon in systems of limited size.Activins can induce mesoderm in embryonic explants and have been proposed as the natural inducer in Xenopus . A mutant activin receptor that inhibits activin signalling is used to show that activin is required for the induction of mesoderm in vivo and the patterning of the embryonic body plan. Blocking the activin signal transduction pathway also reveals autonomous induction of a neural marker and unmasks a relationship between activin and fibroblast growth factor.The oxidation of the Earth's crust and the increase in atmospheric oxygen early in Earth history have been linked to the accumulation of reduced carbon in sedimentary rocks. Trends in the carbon isotope composition of sedimentary organic carbon and carbonate show that during the Proterozoic aeon (2.5–0.54 Gyr ago) the organic carbon reservoir grew in size, relative to the carbonate reservoir. This increase, and the concomitant release of oxidizing power in the environment, occurred mostly during episodes of global rifting and orogeny."Improbability of effective vaccination against human immunodeficiency virus...",declares the title of a newpaper by Dr Albert Sabin. But three immunologists see flaws in his argument.Columbus, for all the criticism of the past few weeks, deserves his place in history.By charging drug companies 'user fees' that will be spent hiring new staff, the US Food and Drug Administration will reduce the time it takes to review new pharmaceuticals from an average of two years to one.Nature 359, 129-131 (1992) IN this letter in the 10 September issue, the third sentence in the bold first paragraph should be replaced with the following: "This statistically-derived result (concluding that spiral galaxies are opaque) is however vulnerable to several selection effects, and seems to contradict the fact that the (extragalactic) survey was successfully performed (since we live in a spiral galaxy which must then be partially transparent) as well as anecdotal examples of galaxies visible through other galaxies.SHORT alanine peptides, containing 16 or 17 residues, appear to form α-helices in aqueous solution^1–4. But the main spectroscopic analyses used on helical peptides (circular dichroism^5 and nuclear magnetic resonance^6–8) cannot distinguish between an α-helix (in which the i th residue is hydrogen-bonded to residue i +4; ref. 9) and the next most common peptide helix, the 3_10-helix^10 ( i → i + 3 hydrogen-bonding). To address this problem we have designed single and doubly spin-labelled analogues of alanine-based peptides in which the nitroxide spin label forms an unbranched side chain extending from the sulphur atom of a cysteine residue. Here we report the circular dichroism, Fourier-transform infrared and electron-spin resonance spectra of these peptides under helix-forming conditions. The infrared absorbance gives an amide I' band with a frequency that is substantially different from that observed for α-helices. The electron-spin resonance spectra of doubly labelled helices show that the ranking of distances between side chains, around a single turn (residues 4–8), is inconsistent with an α-helical structure. Our experiments suggest that the more likely peptide geometry is a 3_10-helix.THE bZIP DNA-binding proteins are characterized by a 50-amino-acid DNA binding and dimerization motif, consisting of a highly basic DNA-binding region ('b') followed by a leucine zipper dimerization region ('ZIP')^1. The best characterized bZIP DNA-binding protein is GCN4, a yeast transcriptional activator^2–6. GCN4 binds to a 9-base-pair two-fold-symmetric DNA site, 5'−A_−4T_−3G_−2A_−1C_0T_+1C_+2A_+3T_+4−3' (refs 7–10). A detailed model known as the 'induced helical fork' model has been proposed for the structure of the GCN4–DNA complex^4. Using a site-specific bromouracil-mediated photocrosslinking method, we show here that the alanine at position 238 of GCN^4 contacts, or is close to, the thymine 5-methyl of A·T at position +3 of the DNA site in the GCN4–DNA complex. Our results strongly support the induced helical fork model^4. Our site-specific bromouracil-mediated photocrosslinking method requires no prior information regarding the structure of the protein or the structure of the protein–DNA complex and should be generalizable to DNA-binding proteins that interact with the DNA major groove^11,12IN polarized neurons, axons and dendrites perform different functions, which are reflected in their different molecular organization. Studies on the sorting of viral and endogenous glycoproteins in epithelial cells and hippocampal neurons suggest that there may be similarities in the mechanism of sorting in these two cell types^1–3. The mechanisms that maintain the distinct composition of the two plasma membrane domains in these two cell types must, however, be different. We have proposed the existence of a functional barrier at the axonal hillock/initial segment which prevents the intermixing of membrane constituents^1,2. Here we test this hypothesis by fusing liposomes containing fluorescent phospholipids into the plasma membrane of polarized hippocampal cells in culture. Fusion was induced by lowering the pH and mediated by influenza virus haemagglutinin expressed on the axonal surface of neurons infected with fowl plague virus. Labelling was found exclusively on axons after fusion. Although the fused lipids were mobile on the axonal membrane, no labelling was detected on the cell body and dendritic surfaces. These results suggest that there is a diffusion barrier at the axonal hillock/initial segment which maintains the compositional differences between the axonal and somatodendritic domains.REACTIVE oxygen species have been implicated both in the ageing process and in degenerative diseases, including arthritis and cancer^1,2. Bacteria adapt to the lethal effects of oxidants such as hydrogen peroxide by inducing the expression of protective stress genes^3,4. Analogous responses have been identified in human cells. For example, haem oxygenase is a major stress protein in human cells treated with oxidants^5, and reactive oxygen intermediates activate NF-κB, a transcriptional regulator of genes involved in inflammatory and acute-phase responses^6. We report here the isolation and characterization of a novel complementary DNA (CL100) corresponding to a messenger RNA that is highly inducible by oxidative stress and heat shock in human skin cells. The cDNA contains an open reading frame specifying a protein of M_r 39.3K with the structural features of a non-receptor-type proteintyrosine phosphatase^7 and which has significant amino-acid sequence similarity to a Tyr/Ser-protein phosphatase encoded by the late gene H1 of vaccinia virus^8. The purified protein encoded by the CL100 open reading frame expressed in bacteria has intrinsic phosphatase activity. Given the relationship between the levels of protein-tyrosine phosphorylation, receptor activity, cellular proliferation and cell-cycle control, the induction of this gene may play an important regulatory role in the human cellular response to environmental stress.FACTORS involved in the pathogenesis of atherosclerosis, thrombosis and vasoconstriction^1,2 contribute to the development of coronary heart disease. In a study comparing patients after myocardial infarction with controls, we have explored a possible association between coronary heart disease and a variation found in the gene encoding angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE). The polymorphism ACE /ID is strongly associated with the level of circulating enzyme^3. This enzyme plays a key role in the production of angiotensin II and in the catabolism of bradykinin, two peptides involved in the modulation of vascular tone and in the proliferation of smooth muscle cells. Here we report that the DD genotype, which is associated with higher levels of circulating ACE than the ID and II genotypes, is significantly more frequent in patients with myocardial infarction ( n =610) than in controls ( n =733) ( P = 0.007), especially among subjects with low body-mass index and low plasma levels of ApoB ( P < 0.0001). The ACE/ID polymorphism seems to be a potent risk factor of coronary heart disease in subjects formerly considered to be at low risk according to common criteria.PERSISTENT neuronal plasticity, including that observed at some hippocampal synapses, requires N -methyl-D-aspartate (NMDA)-mediated transmission. NMDA receptor activation may be necessary for hippocampus-dependent learning as antagonists block acquisition in many such tasks. The behavioural effects of NMDA agonists are less well defined. We have shown that a monoclonal antibody (B6B21) displaced [^3H]-glycine that was bound specifically to the NMDA receptor, and enhanced the opening of its integral cation channel in a glycine-like fashion, effects that were competitively antagonized by 7-chlorokynurenic acid^1. B6B21 also enhanced long-term potentiation in hippocampal slices^1. We report here that intraventricular infusions of B6B21 significantly enhances acquisition rates in hippocampus-dependent trace eye blink conditioning in rabbits, halving the number of trials required to reach a criterion of 80% conditioned responses. Peripheral injections of D-cycloserine, a partial agonist of the glycine site on the NMDA receptor which crosses the blood–brain barrier, also doubles rabbits' learning rates. Pseudoconditioning control experiments indicated a lack of nonspecific behavioural sensitization effects. Our data suggest that enhanced activation of the glycine coagonist site on the NMDA receptor/channel complex facilitates one form of associative learning and may be used in other learning tasks.VISUAL imagery is the creation of mental representations that share many features with veridical visual percepts. Studies of normal and brain-damaged people reinforce the view that visual imagery and visual perception are mediated by a common neural substrate and activate the same representations^1–4. Thus, brain-damaged patients with intact vision who have an impairment in perception should have impaired visual imagery. Here we present evidence to the contrary from a patient with severely impaired object recognition (visual object agnosia) but with normal mental imagery. He draws objects in considerable detail from memory and uses information derived from mental images in a variety of tasks. In contrast, he cannot identify visually presented objects, even those he has drawn himself. He has normal visual acuity and intact perception of equally complex material in other domains. We conclude that rich internal representations can be activated to support visual imagery even when they cannot support visually mediated perception of objects.MODELS for the maintenance of androdioecy (the presence of male and hermaphrodite individuals in a breeding population) in plants predict that males must have a fertility at least double the male fertility of hermaphrodites in order to be maintained by selection^1–3. An even greater advantage is required in partially self-fertilizing populations^1–3 as the gain in fitness through increased pollen production is least when few ovules are available for outcrossing. Because such stringent theoretical requirements make the evolutionary stability of this breeding system highly unlikely, functional androdioecy is thought to be rare in plants, and indeed the only documented instance occurs in populations of Datisca glomerata (Datiscaceae)^4. As such, these populations provide a unique opportunity to test predictions concerning the evolution of androdioecy in plants. Here we report high outcrossing rates (65–92%) in two androdioecious populations of D. glomerata using random amplified polymorphic DNA markers. These outcrossing rates, when analysed with respect to existing evidence concerning pollen production and inbreeding depression in this species, are sufficiently high to satisfy theoretical requirements for the maintenance of androdioecy.STUDIES of mating systems are often hindered by an inability to determine parentage unequivocally. DNA fingerprinting advanced the field by allowing determination of parentage^1–3 especially when alternate mating tactics such as extra-pair fertilizations and parasitic egg-laying are used^4–6. A very different, yet essentially unexplored, alternate mating tactic involves fertilization by the sperm of previous mates that is stored for long periods of time. Some birds have the potential to be fertilized by sperm stored in the oviduct for over a month^7, but studies of long-term sperm storage among wild birds are limited. In the polyandrous spotted sandpiper ( Actitis maculario ), territorial females pair with, defend and lay clutches for several males in rapid succession. Here we report that males pairing early in the season cuckold their females' later mates by means of stored sperm. Thus, early-pairing males not only have greater confidence of paternity, but also increase their reproductive success by fertilizing a proportion of eggs laid for, and incubated by, their females' subsequent mates, in addition to those they incubate themselves.CONODONTS were small eel-shaped animals with vertebrate affinities^1–4. Known almost exclusively from the small, tooth-like, phosphatic elements of their feeding apparatus, they have one of the finest fossil records of any group of organisms. Until recently the identity of the animal to which conodont elements belonged was one of palaeontology's great mysteries; the function of the elements themselves, particularly blade-shaped elements, remains uncertain (compare refs 3 and 4). But recent insights into the conodont skeletal Bauplan^5 allow the debate over function to be taken beyond arguments of analogy. Here we present a functional analysis of opposed blade-shaped-element pairs as components of an integrated apparatus. From this we conclude that such elements operated as cutting teeth within a grasping and food-processing apparatus.THE transition zone between the Earth's core and mantle plays an important role as a boundary layer for mantle and core convection^1. This zone conducts a large amount of heat from the core to the mantle, and contains at least one thermal boundary layer^2,3; the proximity of reactive silicates and molten iron leads to the possibility of zones of intermediate composition^4. Here we investigate one region of the core–mantle boundary using seismic waves that are converted from shear to compressional waves by reflection at the boundary. The use of this phase (known as ScP), the large number of receiving stations, and the large aperture of our array all provide higher resolution than has previously been possible^5–7. For the 350-km-long section of the core–mantle boundary under the northeast Pacific sampled by the reflections, the local boundary topography has an amplitude of less than 500 m, no sharp radial gradients exist in the 400 km above the boundary, and the mantle-to-core transition occurs over less than 1 km. The simplicity of the structure near and above the core–mantle boundary argues against chemical heterogeneity at the base of the mantle in this location.ISOTOPIC heterogeneity in ocean island basalts has generally been ascribed to processes related to the long-term cycling of mantle material^1–6. A recent study of Cameroon line lavas reported higher ^208Pb/<^204Pb and ^206Pb/<^204Pb ratios towards the continent/ocean boundary (c.o.b.), but no corresponding increase in ^207Pb/<^204Pb, indicating large in situ fractionations of uranium and thorium relative to lead in the upper mantle ∼10^8 years ago^7. Here we present neodymium, strontium and lead isotope data for a variety of central Atlantic islands, and show that similar offsets in lead isotope ratios are found in lavas from the islands of Madeira and Trinidade. Like the Cameroon line c.o.b. lavas, these lavas are characterized by high U/Pb and Ce/Pb, low K/U and are located in areas of old oceanic lithosphere^8. But in contrast to the Cameroon line^7, the Madeira lavas are derived from an enriched MORB-type source with low ^207Pb/<^204Pb and ^87Sr/<^86Sr and high ^143Nd/<^144Nd The lead isotope data can be explained if the U/Pb ratios in the sources are comparable to those observed for the lavas and the U/Pb fractionation occurred at the time of formation of the local oceanic lithosphere. Although we do not have a satisfactory explanation for the U/Pb fractionation, it must have occurred at shallow depths in the mantle, near a spreading ridge; and the resulting enriched source regions have since remained fixed relative to the migrating lithosphere.THE electrical and optical properties of ferroelectric liquid crystals make them of considerable technological interest^1. Although the symmetry of most liquid crystalline phases is too high to allow spontaneous polarization, it has long been recognized that a tilted smectic phase made up of chiral molecules can be ferroelectric, owing to a reduction in the overall symmetry of the material^2. This forms the basis for conventional ferroelectric liquid crystals, in which the bulk polarization lies within the plane of the smectic layers. Here we describe a new class of organic ferroelectrics composed of achiral 'polyphilic' molecules^3,4. Ferroelectricity is demonstrated by measurements of an acoustically induced piezoelectric response and the determination of repolarization currents. The mechanism by which the polar phase is generated differs from that found in conventional chiral smectics, and should in principle allow the preparation of a phase in which the bulk polarization is parallel to the long axis of the constituent molecules.Funding for a new programme, with only $1.5 million for grants, is hardly enough to scratch the surface.Before division, cells must ensure that they finish DNA replication, DMA repair and chromosome segregation. They do so by using feedback controls which can detect the failure to complete replication, repair or spindle assembly to arrest the progress of the cell cycle at one of three checkpoints. Failures in feedback controls can contribute to the generation of cancer.Pigment of the Imagination: A History of Phytochrome Research. By Linda C. Sage. Academic: 1992. Pp. 562. £66, $99.50.Steps Towards Life: A Perspective on Evolution. By Manfred Eigen. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 173. £16.95, $29.95.Macromolecular Structures 1991/1992. Edited by Wayne A. Hendrickson and Kurt Wüthrich. Current Biology: 1991/ 1992. Pp. 286/369. £±50, $260 (institutional); £90, $150 (personal); £60, $105 (student).Protein Architecture: A Practical Approach. By A. M. Lesk. Oxford University Press/IRL: 1991. Pp. 287. £32.50, $65 (hbk); £22.50, $45 (pbk).The Investigation of Difficult Things: Essays on Newton and the History of the Exact Sciences. Edited by Peter M. Harman and Alan E. Shapiro. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 531. £90, $175.THE outer parts of Saturn's rings display a variety of local non-uniformities in their particle distributions. Azimuthal brightness variations are seen in the A-ring^1,2, and may be attributable to the gravitational aggregation of particles into linear wakes that trail the rotation of the ring^3–5; Voyager's stellar occultation experiments revealed large differences, on length scales as small as 150 m, in the surface density of particles^6. Theoretical arguments^7,8 suggest that local instabilities may occur in both the A-and B-rings, the instability criterion depending on the velocity dispersion of ring particles and the orbital velocity and mass density in the ring. These arguments, however, are derived from the purely gravitational dynamics of an idealized, infinitesimally thin ring, made of identical particles. Here I use numerical simulations, including both gravitational interactions and dissipative impacts between particles, to study realistic models of Saturn's rings. For the C-ring there is no instability, but for the B- and A-rings gravitational wakes form. In the A-ring these wakes are so strong that particles trapped in them form metre-sized aggregate particles, which themselves lead to further instability. These different behaviours are consistent with the observational evidence.PULSAR rotation rates generally decrease steadily owing to external electromagnetic braking torques, but occasionally show sudden increases ('glitches') followed by gradual recoveries that may last days or years. These events are thought to be consequences of angular momentum transfer between a solid crust, which rotates at the measured pulsar periodicity, and a more rapidly rotating "loose' component of the neutron star interior. Sudden braking of the differential rotation between the two components will cause a glitch^1, and the subsequent re-establishment of rotational equilibrium between the two components represents the recovery^2. Earlier studies, using particular models for the coupling between crust and interior, showed that the loose component carries ∼2.8% and ≳1% of the total moment of inertia of the Vela pulsar^3 and PSR 1737 – 30 (ref. 4) respectively. Here, we analyse post-glitch recovery in four pulsars, and deduce that the loose component carries at least 0.8% of the total moment of inertia, independent of the form of the coupling. In the context of the 'vortex creep' model of recovery, in which the loose component is the inner-crust neutron superfluid^2'5–7, the constraint on the moment of inertia rules out equations of state that are soft at high densities.OF the more than 500 known radio pulsars, only three have been detected as γ-ray sources. Using the Energetic Gamma Ray Experiment Telescope (EGRET) on the Compton Gamma Ray Observatory satellite, we have detected pulsed γ-radiation, above 100 MeV in energy, from a fourth radio pulsar, PSR1706–44. Within the pulse period of 102 ms, the γ-emission forms a single broad peak, in contrast to the two narrow peaks seen in the other high-energy γ-ray pulsars. The emission mechanism in all cases is probably the same, the differences arising from the geometry of the magnetic and rotation axes and the line of sight. In these pulsars, γ-ray emission accounts for as much as 1% of the total neutron star spin-down energy, much more than emerges at optical or radio frequencies, so study of this emission is important in understanding pulsar emission and evolution.Attempts to dispense with the need for galactic dark matter by altering the inverse square law of gravitational attraction have attracted a small but persistent advocacy.The dominant transcriptional regulator of the papiIlomaviruses, E2, binds to its specific DNA target through a previously unobserved dimeric ant i para I lei β-barrel. The DNA is severely but smoothly bent over the barrel by the interaction of successive major grooves with a pair of symmetrically disposed α-helices. The specific interface is an 'interwoven' network of interactions where the identifying base pairs of the target contact more than one amino-acid side chain and the discriminating amino acids interact with more than one base pair.Introduction by site-directed mutagenesis of three amino acids from the Mil segment of glycine or & GAMMA;-aminobutyric acid (GABA_A) receptors into the Mil segment of α7 nicotinic receptor was sufficient to convert a cation-selective channel into an an ion-selective channel gated by acetylcholine. A critical mutation was the insertion of an uncharged residue at the amino-terminal end of Mil, stressing the importance of protein geometrical constraints on ion selectivity.What are the reasons why the English-language literature of science is understood only with difficulty elsewhere? And what might make it more accessible?The persistent controversy surrounding the role of the German scientists in developing an atomic bomb during the Second World War can be laid to rest by the release of the Farm Hall transcripts.Europe seems keen on construction projects with benefits for the environment: will environmentalists agree?The US Congress has been teasing the administration by tagging a nuclear test-ban onto a domestic spending bill. The trick will help to advertise an important question, but the need now is for serious and energetic diplomacy.Scientific graphing calculators that make light work of problem solving, a pulse controller to provide enhanced resolution of DNA samples and an imaging system for low-cost photography are featured this week.Competitive reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR) can be used to obtain quantitative information of mRNA levels comparable to traditional RNA blot techniques, with the added advantages of PCR.THE bcl -2 proto-oncogene is activated by translocation in a variety of B-lymphoid tumours and synergizes with the c-myc oncogene in tumour progression^1. The mechanism of synergy is unclear but bcl -2 expression inhibits apoptosis^2–6, a property presumably pertinent to its proto-oncogenic mode of action^4. We have shown that the c-myc gene is a potent inducer of apoptosis, in addition to its established role in mitogenesis^7. Here we show that expression of the bcl -2 protein, Bcl-2, specifically abrogates c-mvoinduced apoptosis without affecting the c-myc mitogenic function. This provides a novel mechanism for oncogene cooperation, of potential importance both in carcinogenesis and in the evolution of drug resistance in tumours.APOPTOSIS is a form of physiological cell death, characterized by chromatin condensation, cytoplasmic blebbing and DNA fragmentation^1, which often depends on RNA and protein synthesis by the dying cell^2–4. The c-myc proto-oncogene, usually implicated in cell transformation, differentiation and cell-cycle progression^5–9 also has a central role in some forms of apoptosis^10–13. These opposing roles of myc in cell growth and death require that other gene products dictate the outcome of c-Myc expression on a cell. A candidate for such a modifying gene is bcl -2, whose product prolongs cell survival^14–16 and blocks apoptosis in some systems^17–21. Here we demonstrate that Bcl-2 prevents apoptotic death induced by c-Myc, provide a mechanism whereby cells can express c-Myc without undergoing apoptosis, and give a possible explanation for the ability of Bcl-2 to synergize with c-Myc in cell transformation^21–23.PRIMORDIAL germ cells (PGCs) are first identifiable as a population of about eight alkaline phosphatase-positive cells in the 7.0 days postcoitum mouse embryo^1. During the next 6 days of development they proliferate to give rise to the 25,000 cells that will establish the meiotic population^2. Steel factor is required for PGC survival both in vivo ^3 and in vitro ^4,5 and together with leukaemia inhibitory factor stimulates PGC proliferation in vitro ^6. In feeder-dependent culture, PGCs will proliferate for up to 7 days, but their numbers eventually decline and their proliferative capacity is only a fraction of that seen in vivo ^6,7. Here we report a further factor that stimulates PGC proliferation in vitro , basic fibroblast growth factor (bFGF). Furthermore, bFGF, in the presence of steel factor and leukaemia inhibitory factor, stimulates long-term proliferation of PGCs, leading to the derivation of large colonies of cells. These embryonic germ cells resemble embryonic stem cells, pluripotent cells derived from preimplantation embryos, or feeder-dependent embryonal carcinoma cells, pluripotent stem cells of PGC-derived tumours (teratomas and teratocarcinomas)^8. To our knowledge, these results provide the first system for long-term culture of PGCs.AIDS 91 Summary: A Practical Synopsis of the VII International Conference. Edited by J. R. Berger eta/. Philadelphia Sciences Group, 11232 Midlothian Turnpike, Suite 325, Richmond, Virginia 23235-9620, USA: 1992. Pp. 350. $85 (pbk). AIDS 1991: A Year in Review. Edited by F. Wong-Staal et al. Current Science: 1992. Pp. 270. á£35, $59.DURING cell differentiation in the thymus, self-reactive T cells can be generated. The majority of these seem to be deleted after intrathymic encounter with the relevant autoantigen^1. As all self antigens are unlikely to be present in the thymus, some autoreactive T cells may escape censorship. Here we study the fate of these cells using transgenic mice expressing the class I molecule H–2K^b(K^b) in the insulin-producing β -cells of the pancreas^2,3. These mice were crossed with mice transgenic for genes encoding a K^b-specific T-cell antigen receptor (TCR)^4 which could be detected using a clonotype-specific monoclonal antibody^5. Although T cells expressing the highest level of transgenic TCR were deleted intrathymi-cally in double-transgenic mice, K^b-specific T cells were detected in the periphery. These cells caused the rejection of K^b-expressing skin grafts, but ignored islet K^b antigens even after priming. But when double-transgenic mice were crossed with transgenic mice expressing the lymphokine interleukin-2 in the pancreatic β-cells^6, there was a rapid onset of diabetes. These results indicate that autoreactive T cells that ignore self antigens may cause autoimmune diabetes when provided with exogenous 'help' in the form of interleukin-2.An HPLC methods development service, columns for radial-flow chromatography and software modules that turn a flatbed scanner into a scanning densitometer — new products and services within the realm of separation technology.A brief description of electrospray theory and operation is presented with emphasis on the determination of lower molecular weight molecules.AS methods for determining protein three-dimensional (3D) structure develop, a continuing problem is how to verify that the final protein model is correct. The revision of several protein models to correct errors^1–6 has prompted the development of new criteria for judging the validity of X-ray^7–9 and NMR^10,11 structures, as well as the formation of energetic^12–14 and empirical methods^15,16 to evaluate the correctness of protein models. The challenge is to distinguish between a mistraced or wrongly folded model, and one that is basically correct, but not adequately refined. We show that an effective test of the accuracy of a 3D protein model is a comparison of the model to its own amino-acid sequence, using a 3D profile^16, computed from the atomic coordinates of the structure 3D profiles of correct protein structures match their own sequences with high scores. In contrast, 3D profiles for protein models known to be wrong score poorly. An incorrectly modelled segment in an otherwise correct structure can be identified by examining the profile score in a moving-window scan. The accuracy of a protein model can be assessed by its 3D profile, regardless of whether the model has been derived by X-ray, NMR or computational procedures.γ-TUBULIN is a newly identified member of the tubulin family whose sequence is highly conserved from yeast to man. This minor microtubule protein is localized to the microtuble organizing centres^1–3 and a mutation in the gene encoding it produces a microtubuleless mitotic arrest in the filamentous fungus Aspergillus nidulans ^4,5. Here we investigate the in vivo function of γ-tubulin in mammalian cells using a synthetic peptide to generate a polyclonal antibody that binds to a highly conserved segment of γ-tubulin. After microinjection into cultured mammalian cells, immunofluorescence localization revealed that this antibody binds to native centrosomes at all phases of the cell cycle. In the presence of the γ-tubulin antibody, microtubules fail to regrow into cytoplasmic arrays after depolymerization induced by nocodazole or cold. Furthermore, cells injected immediately before or during mitosis fail to assemble a functional spindle. Thus in vivo γ-tubulin is required for microtubule nucleation throughout the mammalian cell cycle.The pay of British academics and researchers is scandalously low, but how can it be improved?The UN Conference arranged for June is more likely to succeed if over-ambitious planning can be somehow tempered by a sense of what is politically and financially feasible.CELL polarization requires that a cellular axis or cell-surface site be chosen and that the cytoskeleton be organized with respect to it. Details of the link between the cytoskeleton and the chosen axis or site are not clear^1. Cells of the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae exhibit cell polarization in two phases of their life cycle, during vegetative growth and during mating, which reflects responses to intracellular and extracellular signals, respectively. Here we describe the isolation of two mutants defective specifically in cell polarization in response to peptide mating pheromones. The mutants carry special alleles (denoted bem1-s ) of the BEM1 gene required for cell polarization during vegetative growth^2,3. Unlike other beml mutants, the bem1-s mutants are normal for vegetative growth. Complete deletion of BEM1 leads to the defect in polarization of vegetative cells seen in beml mutants23. The predicted sequence of the BEM1 protein (Bem1p) reveals two copies of a domain (denoted SH3) that is found in many proteins associated with the cortical cytoskeleton and which may mediate binding to actin or some other component of the cell cortex^4,5. The sequence of Bemlp and the properties of mutants defective in this protein indicate that it may link the cytoskeleton to morphogenetic determinants on the cell surface.SEVERAL mitotic and meiotic gene products are related to the microtubule motor kinesin, providing insight into the molecular basis of the complex motile events responsible for spindle formation and function^1. Of these genes, three have been shown to affect spindle structure when mutated^2–6. The most severe phenotype is seen in Aspergillus nidulans bimC and Schizosaccharomyces pombe cut7 mutants. In both fungi the intranuclear spindle is bipolar, with microtubules that emanate from spindle pole bodies at either pole, interdigitating in a central overlap zone. In bimC and cut7 mutants, microtubule interdigitation does not appear to take place, instead two unconnected half spindles form and chromosome separation fails^2,6,7. Here we report that cut7 protein concentrates on or near the spindle pole bodies throughout mitotic and meiotic nuclear division and associates with mitotic spindle microtubules in a stage-specific manner, associating with the mid-anaphase B midzone. In cut7 ^ts mutants, spindle pole bodies stain but mitotic microtubules do not.ACTIVATION of receptor-linked and cytoplasmic protein tyrosine kinases is crucial in the control of normal and abnormal cell growth and differentiation^1,2. Some substrates of protein tyrosine kinases such as phospholipase C γ and ras GTPase-activating protein (GAP) contain sequences homologous to the src protein domains SH2 and SH3 (refs 3–9). The proto-oncogene vav is expressed in haematopoietic cells and its product Vav contains sequence motifs commonly found in transcription factors, such as helix–loop–helix, leucine-zipper and zinc-finger motifs and nuclear localization signals^10–12, as well as a single SH2 and two SH3 domains. Here we show that stimulation of T-cell antigen receptor on normal human peripheral blood lymphocytes or on human leukaemic T cells, and the crosslinking of IgE receptors on rat basophilic leukaemia cells, both promote the phosphorylation of tyrosine residues in Vav. Moreover, activation of the receptor for epidermal growth factor leads to marked tyrosine phosphorylation of Vav in cells transiently expressing vav , and Vav associates with the receptor through its SH2 domain. We propose that vav encodes a new class of substrates whose tyrosine phosphorylation may provide a mechanism for direct signal transduction linking receptors at the cell surface to transcriptional control.SEVERAL proteins implicated in the regulation of cellular responses to mitogenic stimuli contain a common non-catalytic domain, SH2 (for src -homologous domain 2), that mediates their interaction with activated tyrosine protein kinases. Here we report that p95^ vav , a proto-oncogene product specifically expressed in cells of the haematopoietic system, contains an SH2 domain and is a substrate for tyrosine protein kinases. Exposure of quiescent NIH3T3 cells ectopically expressing p95^ vav to either epidermal or platelet-derived growth factors induces the rapid phosphorylation of this protein on tyrosine residues. Activation of the receptors for these growth factors by their cognate ligand results in their association with p95^ vav , a process mediated by its SH2 domain. In T cells, co-activation of the T-cell receptor and the accessory CD4 cell-surface protein also results in the phosphorylation of the endogenous p95^ vav protein in tyrosine residues. Phosphorylation of p95^ vav is rapid, transient and precedes the appearance of most other phosphotyrosine-containing proteins. In addition to the SH2 domain, p95^ vav contains structural motifs not found in other tyrosine kinase substrates. One such motif is a helix–loop–helix/leucine zipper-like domain which shares some sequence similarity with these motifs in the Myc and Max proteins. Deletion of the helix–loop–helix-like motif causes oncogenic activation of p95^ vav . These results indicate that p95^ vav is a new type of signal transduction molecule and suggest a possible role for this protein in the transduction of tyrosine phosphorylation signalling into transcriptional events.HUMAN papillomaviruses associated with cutaneous^1 and ano-genital^2 cancers induce intraepithelial precursor lesions which may regress spontaneously or progress into invasive carcinomas^3,4. Cell-mediated immune responses are probably involved in regression of precancerous lesions^1,5–8 and the polymorphism of the genes responsible may thus have a key role in the variability of the host response. Skin warts and cancers induced in rabbits by Shope papillomavirus^9–12 provide a model to test this hypothesis. We analysed a restriction-fragment-length polymorphism of major histocompatibility complex class I and class II genes^13,14 and T-cell receptor β -chain genes^15 in infected domestic rabbits. We found a strong linkage between wart regression and a DRαEco RI fragment, and an increased relative risk of malignant transformation associated with a DQα Pvu II fragment. This indicates a genetic control of wart evolution, involving genes in the class II region of the major histocompatibility complex.EXPERIMENTAL autoimmune encephalomyelitis (EAE) is an inflammatory condition of the central nervous system with similarities to multiple sclerosis^1,2. In both diseases, circulating leukocytes penetrate the blood-brain barrier and damage myelin, resulting in impaired nerve conduction and paralysis^3–5. We sought to identify the adhesion receptors that mediate the attachment of circulating leukocytes to inflamed brain endothelium in EAE, because this interaction is the first step in leukocyte entry into the central nervous system. Using an in vitro adhesion assay on tissue sections, we found that lymphocytes and monocytes bound selectively to inflamed EAE brain vessels. Binding was inhibited by antibodies against the integrin molecule α 4 β l, but not by antibodies against numerous other adhesion receptors. When tested in vivo , anti- α 4 integrin effectively prevented the accumulation of leukocytes in the central nervous system and the development of EAE. Thus, therapies designed to interfere with α 4 β l integrin may be useful in treating inflammatory diseases of the central nervous system, such as multiple sclerosis.I N synapses, a rise in presynaptic intracellular calcium leads to secretory vesicle fusion in less than a millisecond, as indicated by the short delay from excitation to postsynaptic signal^1–4. In non-synaptic secretory cells, studies at high time resolution have been limited by the lack of a detector as fast and sensitive as the postsynaptic membrane. Electrochemical methods may be sensitive enough to detect catecholamines released from single vesicles^5,6. Here, we show that under voltage-clamp conditions, stochastically occurring signals can be recorded from adrenal chromaffin cells using a carbon-fibre electrode as an electrochemical detector. These signals obey statistics characteristic for quantal release; however, in contrast to neuronal transmitter release, secretion occurs with a significant delay after short step depolarizations. Furthermore, we identify a pedestal or 'foot' at the onset of unitary events which may represent the slow leak of catecholamine molecules out of a narrow 'fusion pore' before the pore dilates for complete exocytosis.Apoptosis: The Molecular Basis of Cell Death. Edited By L. David Tomei. Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory Press: 1991. Pp. 336. $44 (pbk)Consciousness Explained. By Daniel C. Dennett. Little, Brown: 1991. Pp. 511. $27.95. To be published in the United Kingdom by Alien Lane The Penguin Press on 16 March at £20.CHLORIDE channels have several functions, including the regulation of cell volume^1,2, stabilizing membrane potential^3,4, signal transduction^5,6 and transepithelial transport^7. The plasma membrane Cl^− channels already cloned belong to different structural classes: ligand-gated channels^5,6, voltage-gated channels^8,9, and possibly transporters of the ATP-binding-cassette type (if the cystic fibres is transmembrane regulator^10 is a Cl^− channel^11–13). The importance of chloride channels is illustrated by the phenotypes that can result from their malfunction: cystic fibrosis, in which transepithelial transport is impaired, and myotonia^3, in which ClC-1, the principal skeletal muscle Cl^− channel, is defective^9. Here we report the properties of CIC-2, a new member of the voltage-gated Cl^− channel family. Its sequence is ~50% identical to either the Torpedo electroplax Cl^− channel, ClC-0 (ref. 8), or the rat muscle Cl^- channel, ClC-1 (ref. 9). Isolated initially from rat heart and brain, it is also expressed in pancreas, lung and liver, for example, and in pure cell lines of fibroblastic, neuronal, and epithelial origin, including tissues and cells affected by cystic fibrosis. Expression in Xenopus oocytes induces Cl^− currents that activate slowly upon hyperpolarization and display a linear instantaneous current-voltage relationship. The conductivity sequence is Cl^− ≥Br^− > I^−. The presence of ClC-2 in such different cell types contrasts with the highly specialized expression of ClC-1 (ref. 9) and also with the cloned cation channels, and suggests that its function is important for most cells.DIEL vertical migrations (DVM) of zooplankton are nearly ubiquitous and vary widely in timing and magnitude^1–5. Predation can be both an evolutionary and proximal ('inducing') agent in promoting this variation^6–14. Because aquatic predators are strongly size-selective^15, vulnerability to predation changes during an individual's ontogeny. Accordingly, natural selection on photo-taxis, timing and magnitude of migration should also vary during ontogeny. Furthermore, biogeographic variation in the composition, density and behaviour of predators would probably select for different ontogenies of DVM. Whether predator-induced or developmentally fixed (canalized) migrations would be favoured probably depends on the variability of predatory risk^16–19. Here I compare experimentally DVMs of calanoid copepods from populations with contrasting histories of vertebrate and invertebrate predation. Results show predator- and population-specific migrations that differed with life history stage/size. Both develop-mentally fixed and predator-induced migrations were found at various life-stages in the same group of individuals. Ontogenetic patterns, however, differed among populations adapted to different suites of predators. Genes coding for differences in phenotypic expression of migratory behaviour seem to have been selected by local predation at each stage/size.UNDERSTANDING the changes in porosity that occur during burial of sediments is of importance both in modelling fluid flow in sedimentary basins and for prediction of petroleum reservoir quality. When deposited, up to 50% of the volume of sands is intergranular pore space. Porosity generally decreases with depth because of compaction and precipitation of diagenetic minerals, but some sandstones retain an anomalously high porosity. Whether this is due to dissolution and removal of material or to its local redistribution is not clear. We originally intended to quantify losses of major chemical components during burial of a complete sedimentary unit. We have investigated ten reservoir sandstones, of Permian to Tertiary age, from oilfields worldwide. These show consistent results, and here we present detailed data from four of them. We found that the silica content of these sandstones actually increased, by 220 to 350 kg m^−3, following compaction. No statistically significant changes were observed for aluminium, potassium or sodium. The flux of silica cannot be modelled satisfactorily using currently accepted values of permeability, silica solubility and flow rates, posing a challenge for existing models of fluid flow and ore emplacement.THE hydroxyl radical, OH, is the chief oxidizing agent in the atmosphere, and is responsible for removing many natural and anthropogenic trace gases^1. At present, OH cannot be measured directly with sufficient accuracy over the spatial and temporal scales needed for global models of atmospheric chemistry^2. Consequently, estimates of atmospheric OH abundance rely on a combination of models incorporating OH chemistry and observations of trace gases sensitive to OH. ^14CO is an important diagnostic of OH abundance^3–6. It is produced in the atmosphere mainly by the immediate oxidation of ^14C produced by cosmic radiation, and it is subsequently removed more slowly through oxidation to ^14CO_2 by hydroxyl radicals^7. The mean lifetime of^14CO in clean air during summer in the middle and low latitudes is about one month, which makes ^14CO a more sensitive indicator of OH than the longer-lived trace gases commonly used. Until now, only a few Northern Hemisphere ^14CO determinations have been published^3,8. Using accelerator mass spectrometry we present here an extensive set of ^14CO data in New Zealand and several new Northern Hemisphere results. We find that Southern Hemisphere^14CO concentrations are ∼40% lower than at comparable latitudes in the Northern Hemisphere. Such a large difference is surprising because the dominant sources and sinks are believed to be similar in both hemispheres. Although there are several complicating factors, from our results we suggest that OH abundances may be significantly higher in the Southern Hemisphere than in the Northern Hemisphere, in contrast to predictions using current photochemical models.ONE advantage of using conjugated polymers in semiconductor applications is that they can be processed using techniques well established for conventional polymers. We reported recently that poly( p -phenylenevinylene) could be used as the active layer in a light-emitting diode^1, producing yellow/green emission. We have now found that related copolymers, comprising a combination of different arylene units, can be chemically tuned to provide a range of materials with considerably improved properties for this and other applications. By incorporating two different leaving groups into a precursor copolymer, we can selectively eliminate one of these, to give a conjugated/non-conjugated copolymer, or both, to give a fully conjugated copolymer. This allows us to induce local variations in the Π-Π^* electronic energy gap at both the molecular and supramolecular level. Variations at the molecular level can act to trap excitons, hindering their migration to quenching sites, and we find that these materials give strongly enhanced quantum yields for electroluminescence (by a factor of up to 30). They also allow control of the colour of emission. Variations at the supramolecular level, by patterning the films to control the progress of conversion, allow the production of structures suitable for multicolour displays. The ability to pattern the film also allows for fabrication of optical waveguides, as regions with different energy gaps have different refractive indices.English-speaking academies have stated a global problem, but have yet to answer it.As the number of academic biologists with ties to business increases, the pool of independent scientists for service on advisory boards and peer review panels is dwindling. Will it eventually disappear?WE have isolated a set of ligand-binding DNA sequences from a large pool of random sequence DNAs by selection and amplification in vitro, using similar methods to those described for the isolation of ligand-binding RNAs^1. The ligand–DNA inter-actions are both sequence- and ligand-specific, and are dependent on proper folding of the single-stranded DNA. Some ligands led to the isolation of more DNA sequences than RNA sequences, and vice versa. Analysis of individual sequences reveals that ligand binding is DNA-specific; RNAs of identical sequence could not interact with the same ligands. Ligand-binding DNAs might be more suitable than RNAs as potential pharmacological reagents^2–4 because of the greater stability of DNA. The apparent primacy of RNA in the early evolution of life^5–7 may have been due to its availability rather than to its functional superiority.LIGHT energy for photosynthesis is collected by the antenna system, creating an excited state which migrates energetically 'downhill'. To achieve efficient migration of energy the antenna is populated with a series of pigments absorbing at progressively redshifted wavelengths. This variety in absorbing species in vivo has been created in a biosynthetically economical fashion by modulating the absorbance behaviour of one kind of (bacterio)chlorophyll molecule. This modulation is poorly understood but has been ascribed to pigment–pigment and pigment–protein interactions. We have examined the relationship between aromatic residues in antenna polypeptides and pigment absorption, by studying the effects of site-directed mutagenesis on a bacterial antenna complex. A clear correlation was observed between the absorbance of bacteriochlorophyll a and the presence of two tyrosine residues, αTyr44 and αTyr45, in the a subunit of the peripheral light-harvesting complex of Rhodobacter sphaeroides , a purple photosynthetic bacterium that provides a well characterized system for site-specific mutagenesis^1–3. By constructing single (αTyr44,αTyr45-→;PheTyr) and then double (αTyr44, αTyr45→PheLeu) site-specific mutants, the absorbance of bacteriochlorophyll was blueshifted by 11 and 24 nm at 77 K, respectively. The results suggest that there is a close approach of tyrosine residues to bacteriochlorophyll, and that this proximity may promote redshifts in vivo .TUMOUR progression is a fundamental feature of the biology of cancer^1. Cancers do not arise de novo in their final form, but begin as small, indolent growths, which gradually acquire characteristics associated with malignancy. In the brain, for example, low-grade tumours (astrocytomas) evolve into faster growing, more dysplastic and invasive high-grade tumours (glioblastomas)^2,3. To define the genetic events underlying brain tumour progression, we analysed the p53 gene in ten primary brain tumour pairs. Seven pairs consisted of tumours that were high grade both at presentation and recurrence (group A) and three pairs consisted of low-grade tumours that had progressed to higher grade tumours (group B). In group A pairs, four of the recurrent tumours contained a p53 gene mutation; in three of them, the same mutation was found in the primary tumour. In group B pairs, progression to high grade was associated with a p53 gene mutation. A subpopulation of cells were present in the low-grade tumours that contained the same p53 gene mutation predominant in the cells of the recurrent tumours that had progressed to glioblastoma. Thus, the histological progression of brain tumours was associated with a clonal expansion of cells that had previously acquired a mutation in the p53 gene, endowing them with a selective growth advantage. These experimental observations strongly support Nowell's clonal evolution model of tumour progression^4.THE creation of neural circuits depends on the formation of synapses between specific sets of neurons. Little is known, however, of the molecular mechanisms governing synaptic choice. A muta-tion in the unc-4 gene alters the pattern of synaptic input to one class of motor neurons in the Caenorhabditis elegans ventral nerve cord. In unc-4(e120) , the presynaptic partners of VA motor neurons are replaced with interneurons appropriate to motor neurons of the VB class. This change in neural specificity is not accompanied by any detectable effects on neuronal morphology or process extension^1,2. We show that the absence of a functional unc-4 gene product accounts for the mutant phenotype. The unc-4 gene encodes a homeodomain protein and thus is likely to function as a transcription factor. The limited effect of the unc-4 null mutation on cell fate may mean that unc-4 regulates the expression of a small number of target genes and that the products of these genes are directly involved in the choice of synaptic partners.IDENTIFICATION of the genes orchestrating neurogenesis would greatly enhance our understanding of this process. Genes have been identified that specify neuron type (for example cut ^1 and numb ^2 in Drosophila and mec-3 in Caenorhabditis elegans ^3) and process guidance (for example, unc-5 , unc-6 and unc-40 in C . elegans ^4and the fas-1 gene of Drosophila ^5). We sought genes defining synaptic specificity by identifying mutations that alter synaptic connectivity in the motor circuitry in the nematode C . elegans . We used electron microscopy of serial sections^6 to recon-struct the ventral nerve-cords of uncoordinated ( unc ) mutants^7,8 that have distinctive locomotory choreographies. Here we describe the phenotype of mutations in the unc-4 gene in which a locomotory defect is correlated with specific changes in synaptic input to a subset of the excitatory VA motor neurons, normally used in reverse locomotion. The circuitry alterations do not arise because of the inaccessibility of the appropriate synaptic partners, but are a consequence of changes in synaptic specificity. The VA motor neurons with altered synaptic inputs are all lineal sisters of VB motor neurons; the VA motor neurons without VB sisters have essentially the same synaptic inputs as in wild-type animals. The normal function of the wild-type allele of unc-4 may thus be to invoke the appropriate synaptic specificities to VA motor neurons produced in particular developmental contexts.HEREDITARY ovalocytosis is common in some areas of Melanesia and South East Asia where malaria is endemic. These red cells resist invasion by malarial parasites in vitro ^ 1,2 and ovalocytic individuals are less parasitized than normal^3. This has been attributed to the greater rigidity of ovalocytic red cells^4,5. It has been suggested that South East Asian ovalocytosis results from the heterozygous presence of an altered membrane anion transporter (band 3)^6,7. We have used the polymerase chain reaction to clone the abnormal band 3 complementary DNA from an ovalocytic of Indian origin^8 and found two changes from the normal protein: a point mutation (Lys56-→Glu) and the deletion of the sequence AFSPQVLAA (residues 400–408), but no evidence for an N-terminal extension^7. The deletion is also found in the abnor-mal band 3 of South East Asian ovalocytes^9 and seems to be responsible for the unusual properties of the ovalocytic red cell. We show here that the membrane domain of the abnormal ovalocyte band 3 has a substantially altered structure and that the protein is defective in anion transport activity. The changed transport properties of the red cells may have a role in the reduced para-sitaemia of ovalocytic individuals.IN many cell types an increase in cytosolic calcium is the main signal for the exocytotic release of stored secretory components such as hormones and neurotransmitters. The site of action of calcium in exocytosis is not known, neither are the participating molecules^1,2. In the case of the intracellular membrane fusions that occur during transport through early stages of the secretory pathway, several cytosolic and peripheral membrane proteins are necessary^3–6. Permeabilized cells have been useful in understanding the requirements for calcium and nucleotides in regulated exocytosis^7,8 and under certain conditions there is leakage of soluble protein components and run-down of the exocytotic response^9–14. This system can be used to identify the soluble proteins involved in exocytosis, one candidate in chromaffin cells being annexin II (calpactin)^9. Here we use this assay to identify two other cytosolic protein factors that regulate exocytosis in permeabilized adrenal chromaffin cells, which we term Exol and Exo2. Exol from brain cytosol resolves on electrophoresis in SDS–polyacrylamide gels as a group of polypeptides of relative molecular mass ˜30,000 and shares sequence homology with the 14–3–3 family of proteins. The ability of Exol to reactivate exocytosis is potentiated by protein kinase C activation and there-fore Exol may influence the protein kinase C-mediated control of Ca^2+-dependent exocytosis.EXPRESSION of P-glycoprotein, the product of the MDR1 gene, confers multidrug resistance on cell lines and human tumours (reviewed in refs 1,2). P-glycoprotein (relative molecular mass 170,000) is an ATP-dependent, active transporter which pumps hydrophobic drugs out of cells^3, but its normal physiological role is unknown. It is a member of the ABC (ATP-binding cassette) superfamily of transporters^4, which includes many bacterial transport systems, the putative peptide transporter from the major histocompatibility locus, and the product of the cystic fibres is gene (the cystic fibrosis transmembrane regulator, CFTR). CFTR is located in the apical membranes of many secretory epithelia^5 and is associated with a cyclic AMP-regulated chloride channel^6–8. At least two other chloride channels are present in epithelial cells, regulated by cell volume and by intracellular Ca^2+, respectively^9,10. Because of the structural and sequence similarities between P-glycoprotein and CFTR^4,11, and because P-glycoprotein is abundant in many secretory epithelia^121–4, we examined whether P-glycoprotein might be associated with one or other of these channels. We report here that expression of P-glycoprotein generates volume-regulated, ATP-dependent, chloride-selective channels, with properties similar to channels characterized previously in epithelial cells.VOLTAGE-DEPENDENT calcium channels mediate calcium entry into neurons, which is crucial for many processes in the brain including synaptic transmission, dendritic spiking, gene expression and cell death^1–5. Many types of calcium channels exist in mam-malian brains^6–19, but high-affinity blockers are available for only two types, L-type channels (targeted by nimodipine and other dihydropyridine channel blockers^20–22) and N-type channels (targeted by ω-conotoxin^22–26). In a search for new channel blockers, we have identified a peptide toxin from funnel web spider venom, ω-Aga-IVA, which is a potent inhibitor of both calcium entry into rat brain synaptosomes and of 'P-type' calcium channels^8 in rat Purkinje neurons. ω-Aga-IVA will facilitate characterization of brain calcium channels resistant to existing channel blockers and may assist in the design of neuroprotective drugs.ALTHOUGH theoretical studies show that overcompensatory density-dependent mechanisms can potentially generate regular or chaotic fluctuations in animal numbers, the majority of realistic single-species models of invertebrate populations are not overcompensatory enough to cause sustained population cycles^1–3. The possibility that Overcompensation may generate cycles or chaos in vertebrate populations has seldom been considered. Here we show that highly overcompensating density-dependent mortality can generate recurrent population crashes consistent with those observed in a naturally limited population of Soay sheep. The observed interval of three or more years between crashes points to sharp 'focusing' of mortality over a narrow range of population density.OVER the past 50 years there has been much speculation about the energetic cost of swimming and wave-riding by dolphins^1–11. When aligned properly in front of the bow of moving ships^1–3, in the stern wake of small boats^4,5, on wind waves^6, and even in the wake of larger cetaceans^7–9, the animals appear to move effortlessly through the water without the benefit of propulsive strokes by the flukes. Theoretically, body streamlining as well as other anatomical and behavioural adaptations contribute to low transport costs in these animals. The economy of movement permitted by wave-riding has been perceived as an energetic advantage for the swimming dolphin^2,310, but has been hard to prove in the absence of physiological data for exercising cetaceans. Here we determine the aerobic and anaerobic costs of swimming and wave-riding in bottlenose dolphins and find that the minimum cost of transport for swimming dolphins is 1.29±0.05 J kg^-1 m^-1 at a cruising speed of 2.1 m s^-1. Aerobic costs are nearly twice as high for swimming seals and sea lions, and 8–12 times higher for human swimmers^12. Wave-riding by dolphins provides additional benefits in terms of speed. The results indicate that behavioural, physiological and morphological factors make swimming an economical form of high-speed travel for dolphins.Powerful first-order analysis of intraprotein electron transfer is developed from electron-transfer measurements both in biological and in chemical systems. A variation of 20 Å in the distance between donors and acceptors in protein changes the electron-transfer rate by 10^12-fold. Protein presents a uniform electronic barrier to electron tunnelling and a uniform nuclear characteristic frequency, properties similar to an organic glass. Selection of distance, free energy and reorganization energy are sufficient to define rate and directional specificity of biological electron transfer, meeting physiological requirements in diverse systems.Long-period precursors to the SS seismic phase are used to produce global maps of topography for the discontinuity at 660 km depth in the upper mantle. These maps indicate discontinuity depth variations of up to 30 km and suggest a correlation between regional depressions in the 660-km discontinuity and subduction zones—a result more consistent with models in which the subducting slabs are deflected horizontally at the discontinuity than with models of unhindered slab penetration into the lower mantle.SYMPATRIC species that belong to the same ecological guild usually differ in their behaviour and morphology, and these differences are often interpreted as adaptations to having to make use of different resources. Evidence supporting this interpretation comes from association between ecology and morphology among species^1, in which an a priori functional relationship is reasonable. But one problem with such comparisons is that members of a guild may be closely related, so the more closely related species can share a greater similarity in their morphology and ecology simply as a result of the lingering legacy of a common ancestor^2–5. In principle, the importance of historical legacy can be evaluated from phylogenetic relationships and times since divergence for all species^2,6, but this is rarely possible because these data are not available. Here we use a phylogeny for eight sympatric species of warbler in the genus Phylloscopus , based on their mitochondrial DNA sequences, to remove the effects of historical legacy. Without these effects, we find strong support for adaptive interpretations of among-species variation in habitat selection, prey-size choice and feeding method. Ecological variation along any of these three niche axes is associated with predictable morphological variation. We also find evidence for historical legacy in that more closely related species are often more similar behaviourally and morphologically. This paradoxical result can be reconciled because the most closely related species tend to differ along only one niche axis, habitat choice. In contrast, the evolution of prey-size choice and feeding method occurred rapidly and early in the diversification of this group. Once a new ecological zone was occupied, subsequent morphological change along these niche axes was limited, accounting for the similarity of closely related species.DIFFERENT parts of the global mid-ocean ridge system create oceanic crust at rates that differ by more than a factor of ten. The rates of supply of heat to these different systems must also vary substantially, and it is this heat supply, in the form of hot mantle material rising beneath the ridge axis, that determines the nature of the magmatic, tectonic and hydrothermal processes that control the production of new oceanic crust. Here we present evidence suggesting that a systematic relationship exists between the depth to zones of elevated temperature and partial melt beneath mid-ocean ridges and their spreading rate. Recent seismic measurements provide robust determinations at six different locations of the depth to the top of the axial low-seismic-velocity zone which suggest that as full spreading rate decreases from 150 to 20 mm yr^-1 the depth below the sea floor to the top of the LVZ increases from ∼1 to ∼4 km. Although this relationship might arise in a number of ways, our preferred explanation is that the major faults that extend to greater depths on slower-spreading ridges^1 allow a vigorous circulation of cooling sea water to reach greater depths, blocking the upward migration of large melt bodies.A SERIES of C_37–39 alkenones synthesized by prymnesiophyte algae is commonly preserved in marine sediments, and can be used for estimating past sea surface temperatures (SSTs)^1,2. Here we present an alkenone analysis of sediments taken from the central equatorial Pacific Ocean (core W8402A-14GC; 0° 57′N, 138° 57′W) which shows that SST varied slightly (<2°C) but coherently with Milankovitch insolation cycles over the past 250 kyr. The in-phase response of the SST to the precessional component of insolation indicates that this part of the SST time series may be driven by changes in local trade-wind strength, and the longer 100-kyr eccentricity component indicates a response to basin-wide South Pacific winds. Using a simple heat-balance model, we use our palaeotemperature record to constrain the upwelling rates that have occurred in the past. Similar SST records from the eastern Pacific could constrain the horizontal advection component of the SST record and allow for better estimates of upwelling. Upwelling and palaeoproductivity then could be compared to determine whether changes in equatorial nutrient levels actually cause equivalent changes in productivity.OBSERVATIONS from satellite and ground-based instruments^1–3 indicate that between 1979 and 1990 there have been statistically significant losses of ozone in the lower stratosphere of the middle to high latitudes in both hemispheres. Here we determine the radiative forcing of the surface–troposphere system^4–6 due to the observed decadal ozone losses, and compare it with that due to the increased concentrations of the other main radiatively active gases (CO_2, CH_4, N_2O and chlorofluorocarbons) over the same time period. Our results indicate that a significant negative radiative forcing results from ozone losses in middle to high latitudes, in contrast to the positive forcing at all latitudes caused by the CFCs and other gases. As the anthropogenic emissions of CFCs and other halocarbons are thought to be largely responsible for the observed ozone depletions^1, our results suggest that the net decadal contribution of CFCs to the greenhouse climate forcing is substantially less than previously estimated.It is remarkable that the taxonomy and phylogenetic relationships of the earliest known representatives of our own genus, Homo , remain obscure. Advances in techniques for absolute dating and reassessments of the fossils themselves have rendered untenable a simple unilineal model of human evolution, in which Homo habilis succeeded the australopithecines and then evolved via H. erectus into H. sapiens — but no clear alternative consensus has yet emerged.Thomas Henry Huxley: Communicating for Science. ByJ. Vernon Jensen. Uni-versity of Delaware Press and Asso-ciated University Presses: 1991. Pp. 253. $38.50, £29.95.The Earth as Transformed by Human Action: Global and Regional Changes in the Biosphere Over the Past 300 Years.. ByW. C. Clark R. W. Kates J. F. Richards J. T. Mathews W. B. Meyer. Cambridge University Press with Clark University: 1991. Pp. 713. £75, $100.Neural Nets in Electric Fish. ByWalter F. Heiligenberg.MIT Press: 1991. Pp. 179. $50.50, £33.75.CHAOS is exhibited by a wide variety of systems governed by nonlinear dynamic laws^1–3. Its most striking feature is an apparent randomness which seems to contradict its deterministic origin. The best-studied chaotic chemical system is the Belousov–Zhabotinsky (BZ) reaction^4–6 in a continuous-flow stirred-tank reactor (CSTR). Here we present a simple mechanism for the BZ reaction which allows us to develop a description in terms of a set of differential equations containing only three variables, the minimum number required to generate chaos in a continuous (non-iterative) dynamical system^2. In common with experiments, our model shows aperiodicity and transitions between periodicity and chaos near bifurcations between oscillatory and steady-state behaviour, which occur at both low and high CSTR flow rates. While remaining closely related to a real chaotic chemical system, our model is sufficiently simple to allow detailed mathematical analysis. It also reproduces many other features of the BZ reaction better than does the simple Oregonator^7 (which cannot produce chaos).ACOUSTIC pulses are used extensively for imaging, materials characterization and non-destructive testing. Here we describe a method for producing trains of square-wave photoacoustic pulses. Our device comprises an alternating series of light-absorbing and transparent fluid layers. When this layered structure is irradiated with an amplitude-modulated laser, constructive and destructive interference of the resulting photoacoustic waves generates pressure waves at specific resonance frequencies, the bandwidths of which are determined by the number of layers and their acoustic impedances. When operated at the resonance condition, a device consisting of a large number of layers produces ultrasonic waves that are highly directional in space. A structure excited by a single short pulse from a Nd:YAG laser generates a train of acoustic square waves, the pulsewidth of each being determined by the transit of sound across the absorbing layer.JETS in radio galaxies have a variety of observed morphologies, in particular appearing in both one-sided and two-sided forms. It is not known whether jets can be intrinsically one-sided, or if the one-sided appearance is the result of an asymmetry in a two-sided jet. An asymmetry could be real, or apparent because of geometrical and possibly relativistic effects creating a large difference in the apparent visibility of the two sides. The elliptical galaxy M87 hosts a weak but well known one-sided radio jet, which is very visible at optical and even X-ray wavelengths. Using the New Technology Telescope of the European Southern Observatory in Chile, we have identified an optical counterpart to the radio hotspot in the southeast lobe of M87, at about the same distance as the radio jet but oppositely located. Polarization data identify the optical emission as synchrotron radiation, and the severe energetic requirements of maintaining this emission suggest con-tinuous replenishment at the site of the hotspot. We propose that this is provided by an invisible 'counterjet'. We argue that the counterjet cannot be identical to the visible known jet, but must be intrinsically somewhat fainter.RADIO galaxies are divided into two broad classes^1 according to whether they show extended radio lobes ending in hotspots (compact bright sources of radio emission) at some distance from the nucleus (Fanaroff–Riley class II) or instead have bright regions or knots close to the nucleus (FR I). Hotspots and knots emit synchrotron radiation, sometimes even in the optical range^2,3. The galaxy M87 (NGC4486) in Virgo is the closest giant elliptical galaxy showing a jet and double-lobe radio structure, and is classified as FR I mainly because of the morphology of the jet-dominated west radio lobe, even though the east radio lobe resembles typical FR II objects and shows a hotspot^4. We report here the detection of the optical counterpart of this hotspot. Because the lifetime of optically emitting synchrotron electrons is short, we suggest that this hotspot is fed by an unseen counterjet. This conclusion adds weight to the idea that apparently one-sided jet sources are intrinsically two-sided, with the visibility of the receding jet reduced by beaming effects.The Seeds of Time: The Life of Sir Macfarlane Burnet. ByChristopher Sexton. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp.300. £19.95.The excitement of a rapidly advancing research field may be swamped by the confusion generated by the competition of researchers (and journals) to be the first in print.On the evidence of Nature's recent conference in Tokyo, technologies at the nanometre scale are now within reach. But how are they to be realized, and what form will they take?The tendency for the world to be sprinkled with small countries has recently accelerated, and is disconcerting, but may yet offer a solution for British Ulster, where 26 people have been killed since the year began.The convention that the concept of consciousness is so ill-defined that it lies beyond the reach of serious study seems to be losing ground. But definition is still some way off.The first international conference on the global environment was held in 1972. Has the world come any closer to solving its environmental problems in the intervening 20 years?ORIGINALLY E2F sites were identified as elements in the promoters of adenovirus early genes that are necessary for activation of these genes by the early protein E1a (ref. 1). E2F promoter elements have been shown to be important for transcriptional activation of several genes critical for progression through the cell cycle^2–^4. During the G1 phase of the cell cycle, the E2F protein forms a complex with the cell-cycle protein Rb (ref. 5) and it has been suggested that this binding of Rb to E2F inactivates E2F ( ref . 5). Here we show that Rb-E2F is an active complex that, when bound to the E2F site, inhibits the activity of other promoter elements and thus silences transcription. We propose that the ability of this complex to inhibit transcription is integral to the function of Rb and provide evidence that E2F is a positive element in the absence of an active form of Rb. It has been shown that binding of Rb to E2F depends on the phosphorylation state of Rb (only the underphosphorylated form binds)^5 and that the phosphorylation state of Rb changes during progression through the cell cycle^6,7. We therefore suggest that the E2F site alternates between a positive and negative element with the phosphorylation/dephosphorylation cycle of Rb. This cyclic activity may be responsible for activating and then inhibiting genes during the cell cycle.IN the pathogenesis of AIDS it is not yet understood whether the small fraction of CD4^+ T cells (~1%) infected with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) are randomly targeted or not. Here we present evidence that human CD4 T-cell lines expressing selected T-cell antigen receptor Vβ gene products can all be infected in vitro with HIV-1, but give markedly different titres of HIV-1 virion production. For example, Vβ12 T-cell lines from several unrelated donors reproducibly yielded up to 100-fold more gag gene product (p24^gag antigen) than Vβ6.7a lines. This is consistent with a superantigen effect, because the Vβ selectivity was observed with several divergent HIV-1 isolates, was dependent on antigen-presenting cells and on major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class II but was not MHC class II-restricted. The in vivo significance of these findings is supported by the preferential stimulation of Vβ12^+ T cells by freshly obtained irradiated antigen-presenting cells from some HIV-1-seropositive but not HIV-1-negative donors. Moreover, cells from patients positive for viral antigen (gp120) were enriched in the Vβ12 subpopulation. Vβ12^+ T cells were not deleted in AIDS patients, however, raising the possibility that a variety of mechanisms contribute to T-cell depletion. Our results indicate that a superantigen targets a subpopulation of CD4^+ cells for viral replication.IN addition to the antigen-specific T-cell receptor (TCR), T cells bear an array of 'accessory' molecules that can contribute to stable adhesion to the antigen-bearing cell^1 and provide costimulatory signals^1–7. For several of these^2–7, T-cell adhesion to the ligand can be activated by TCR-dependent signalling (a signal from the TCR primes the coreceptor to bind to its ligand). It is unclear whether the individual coreceptors share common mechanisms of priming and cosignalling, and perhaps act in a redundant manner, or whether they act in a distinct way and contribute uniquely to the activation process. We report here the use of isolated alloantigen, class I proteins and fibronectin ligands to show that coreceptors on cytotoxic T lymphocytes are activated sequentially and deliver distinct biochemical signals on binding to their ligands. TCR engagement activates CDS by a protein ryrosine kinasedependent pathway, and CDS then acts as a signal for initiation of polyphosphoinositide hydrolysis on binding to class I. In contrast, activated adhesion to fibronectin does not initiate polyphos- phoinositide hydrolysis, but amplifies hydrolysis once it has been initiated. Thus, cytotoxic T-lymphocyte activation involves a TCR-initiated cascade of adhesion and signalling events leading to response.THE murine t-complex encodes t-complex polypeptide-1 (TCP1)^1, which is constitutively expressed in almost all cells, and upregulated during spermatogenesis^2,3. Mammalian sequences have >96% identity with each other, and >60% identity with Drosophila melanogaster and yeast orthologues^4–9. TCP1 is essential in yeast^9, and is postulated to be the cytosolic mammalian equivalent of groEL^10,11. We report here that, in the native state, murine and human TCP1 is distributed throughout the cytosol as an 800K–950K hetero-oligomeric particle in association with four to six unidentified proteins and two Hsp70 heat-shock proteins. Negative-stain electron microscopy indicates that the structure is two stacked rings, 12–16 nm in diameter. Therefore, despite similarities with the chaperonin 60 proteins, these data indicate that TCP1 is biochemically and structurally unique. We suggest that TCP1 may represent one of a family of molecules in the eukaryotic cytosol involved in protein folding and regulated in part by their heteromeric associations.A ROLE in folding of newly translated proteins in the cytosol of eukaryotes has been proposed for t-complex polypeptide-1 (TCP1), although its molecular targets have not yet been identified^1–3 Tubulin is a major cytosolic protein whose assembly into microtubules is critical to many cellular processes^4–8. Although numerous studies have focused on the expression of tubulin^9–20, little is known about the processes whereby newly translated tubulin subunits acquire conformations that enable them to form α-β-heterodimers. We examined the biogenesis of α- and β-tubulin in rabbit reticulocyte lysate, and report here that newly translated tubulin subunits entered a 900K complex in a protease-sensitive conformation. Addition of Mg-ATP, but not nonhydrolysable analogues, released the tubulin subunits as assembly-competent protein with a conformation that was relatively protease-resistant. The 900K complex purified from reticulocyte lysate contained as its major constituent a 58K protein that cross-reacted with a monoclonal antiserum against mouse TCP1. We conclude that TCP1 functions as a cytosolic chaperone in the biogenesis of tubulin.THE hydrolysis of phosphatidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate (PtdInsP_2) is a widespread receptor-coupled signalling system at the plasma membrane of most eukaryotic cells. The existence of an entirely separate nuclear phosphoinositide signalling system is suggested from evidence that purified nuclei synthesize PtdInsP_2and phosphatidylinositol 4-phosphate (PtdlnsP) in vitro ^ 1 and that a transient decrease in the mass of these lipids occurs when Swiss 3T3 cells are cultured in the presence of insulin-like growth factor-1 (IGF-1)^2–4. These IGF-1-dependent changes in inositol lipids coincide with an increase in nuclear diacylglycerol^4 and precede translocation to the nucleus and activation of protein kinase C (refs 5, 6). Circumstantial evidence that links these changes with mitosis comes from the isolation of a 3T3 clone that expresses the type-1 IGF receptor and binds IGF-1 peptide but does not respond mitogenically or show transient mass changes in nuclear inositol lipids^7. A key question is how IGF-1 initiates the rapid breakdown of PtdlnsP and PtdlnsP^2, in the nucleus. Here we present evidence that nuclei of 3T3 cells contain the β-isozyme of phosphoinositidase C, whereas the γ-isozyme is confined to the cytoplasm and that IGF-1 treatment stimulates exclusively the activity of nuclear phosphoinositidase C.LOWE'S oculocerebrorenal syndrome^1–3 (OCRL) is a human X-linked developmental disorder of unknown pathogenesis^4–8 and has a pleiotropic phenotype affecting the lens, brain and kidneys. The OCRL locus has been mapped to Xq25-q26 by linkage^9–11 and by finding de novo X; autosome translocations at Xq25-q26 in two unrelated females with OCRL^12,13. Here we use yeast artificial chromosomes with inserts that span the X chromosomal breakpoint from a female OCRL patient in order to isolate complementary DNAs for a gene that is interrupted by the translocation. We show that the transcript is absent in both female OCRL patients with X; autosome translocations and that it is absent or abnormally sized in 9 of 13 unrelated male OCRL patients with no detectable genomic rearrangement. The open reading frame encodes a new protein with 71% similarity to human inositol polyphosphate-5-phosphatase. Our results suggest that OCRL may be an inborn error of inositol phosphate metabolism.Biosensor Principles and Applications. Edited by Loïc J. Blum and Pierre R. Coulet. Marcel Dekker: 1991. Pp. 357. $125. Techniques and Instrumentation in Analytical Chemistry 11: Biosensors. By Frieder Scheller and Florian Schubert. Elsevier: 1992. Pp. 359. Dfl 315, $161.50. Immunochemical Assays and Biosensor Technology for the 1990s. Edited by R. M. Nakamura, Y. Kasahara and G. A. Rechnitz. American Society for Microbiology: 1992. Pp. 411. $43 (members), $51 (non-members).IN the limb bud the 5' members of the Hox-4 gene cluster are expressed in a nested set of overlapping domains which are progressively restricted in the posterior and distal directions^1. These domains arise early in limb bud development and come to approximate the primordia of the major structural elements of the limb along the anterior/posterior axis^2 (Fig. 1). This pattern, and the fact that surgical manipulations which lead to mirror image duplications along the anterior/posterior axis give rise to mirror image duplications of the domains of expression of these genes, have led to the proposal that these transcription factors specify positional identity along the anterior/posterior axis^3,4. Here we test this hypothesis directly using replication-competent retroviral vectors to expand the domain of expression of the Hox-4.6 gene anteriorly during limb development in vivo. We report that alteration of the domain of expression of the Hox-4.6 gene in the developing limb leads to reproducible pattern alterations consistent with a posterior homeotic transformation.MAMMAL-LIKE reptiles of the Order Therapsida document the emergence of mammals from more primitive synapsids^1 and are of unique zoological and palaeontological interest on that account^2. Therapsids, first appearing in the Early Permian^3, were thought to become extinct in the Middle Jurassic^4,5, soon after the Late Triassic origin of mammals^6. Here, however, we report the discovery of a therapsid from the late Palaeocene, 100 million years younger^7 than the youngest previous occurrence of the order. This discovery nearly doubles the stratigraphic range of therapsids and furnishes their first record from the Cenozoic. The documenting fossils, an incomplete dentary containing three teeth, and four isolated teeth from other, conspecific individuals (Fig. 1), are from the Paskapoo Formation, at Cochrane, Alberta, Canada, from beds yielding a diverse mammalian fauna of early Tiffanian age^8. These specimens are catalogued in the collections of the University of Alberta Laboratory for Vertebrate Paleontology (UALVP) and provide the basis for a new taxon, as named and described below.PALAEOMAGNETIC records provide information about the behaviour of the geomagnetic field during reversals^1,2. Existing records are incompatible with transitional field configurations that are either entirely dipolar or entirely zonal (dependent only on latitude)^3,4. Recent compilations^5–8 have indicated that the transi-tional paths of virtual geomagnetic poles (VGPs) for the past few reversals are located preferentially within two antipodal longitudinal bands, suggesting that simple but non-zonal field configurations dominate during reversals. Here I point out that one of the longitudinal bands coincides with that expected from the reversal of a non-axial-dipole field exactly like that present today; the other requires only a sign change in the non-axial-dipole terms of today's field. Evidence for persistent non-zonal contributions to the field has generally^9–13 (but not always^14,13) been regarded as not statistically significant in the light of poor data distributions. I show here that a non-zonal bias, similar to that observed in reversal data, is evident in data on secular variation of the field over the past 5 Myr, even after normalization according to site locations. These results suggest that the time-averaged field does indeed contain persistent (but not constant) non-zonal contributions.A science-minded politician has appeared on the Demo-crats' ticket for the US election — in the nick of time.Professor Luc Montagnier says that, contrary to the statement in Nature (358, 6; 1992), he was not an adviser to the French government in 1983-85. However, as early as August 1983, Montagnier did warn government offi-cials that production facilities for HIV (then LAV) were urgently needed for blood test-ing.THE positions of the virtual geomagnetic pole (VGP) during a large number of reversals of the Earth's magnetic field seem to show a remarkable confinement to longitudes over the Americas or to antipodal longitudes^1,2, although it has been argued that this confinement is statistically insufficiently constrained^3. It has also been pointed out^4 that the same bands of longitude appear in other geophysical observations, such as the pattern of fluid motion in the outer core and regions of higher seismic velocities in the lower mantle, suggesting a causal relationship. Here we show that longitudinal confinement of VGPs can arise from the smoothing of non-antipodal stable directions (just) before and after a geomagnetic reversal, because of the filtering effect of the remanence acquisition process in sediments. The origin of this non-antipodality is still uncertain and must remain speculative until more reversal records become available that include sufficiently long pre- and post-transitional intervals.CHANGES in the thickness of polar sea-ice have the potential to provide a signal of climate change, but attempts to identify trends must take into account the range of natural variability. Here we present an analysis of measurements of the subsurface ice thickness (draft) of sea-ice around the North Pole made from 1977 to 1990. These data were collected during six submarine cruises in late April/early May of 1977, 1979, 1986, 1987, 1988 and 1990, and represent the most extensive dataset so far for ice draft in the central Arctic at the same season and location. The results reveal considerable interannual variability both in mean ice draft (±1.0 m) and in open-water extent (±2.5%). This variability limits the confidence that can be placed in any apparent trends observed for sea-ice thickness or type since the late 1970s, and illustrates the need for a reliable baseline against which to assess future trends.THE Poisson ratio of a solid characterizes its response to uniaxial stress. It is defined as the negative ratio of the transverse strain to the corresponding axial strain. Normally, this ratio is positive, as most solids expand in the transverse direction when subjected to a uniaxial compression. Although a negative Poisson ratio is not forbidden by thermodynamics, it is rare in crystalline solids: the results of recent experiments^1 which observed a negative Poisson ratio in α-cristobalite were therefore unexpected. We have investigated the elastic behaviour of α-cristobalite and other forms of silica with first-principles calculations and classical interatomic potentials. Our calculations reproduce the negative Poisson ratio in α-cristobalite, and predict that α-quartz, the most common form of crystalline silica, will also exhibit a negative Poisson ratio under large uniaxial tension. We attribute the occurrence of a negative Poisson ratio in low-density silica polymorphs to the high rigidity of the SiO_4 tetrahedra.INTEREST in carbon fibres^1,2 has been stimulated greatly by the recent discovery of hollow graphitic tubules of nanometre dimensions^3. There has been much speculation about the properties and potential application of these nanotubes^4–8. Theoretical studies predict that their electronic properties will depend on their diameter and degree of helicity^4,5. Experimental tests of these ideas has been hampered, however, by the lack of macroscopic quantities of the material. Here we report the synthesis of graphitic nanotubes in gram quantities. We use a variant of the standard arc-discharge technique for fullerene synthesis under a helium atmosphere. Under certain conditions, a carbonaceous deposit forms on one of the graphite rods, consisting of a macroscopic (diameter of about 5 mm) cylinder in which the core comprises pure nanotubes and nanoscale particles in high yield. The purity and yield depend sensitively on the gas pressure in the reaction vessel. Preliminary measurements of the conductivity of the bulk nanotube material indicate a conductivity of about 100 S cm^–1^1.Articulating the Elephant Man: Joseph Merrick and His Interpreters. By Peter W. Graham and Fritz H. Oehlschlaeger. Johns Hopkins University Press: 1992. Pp. 212. $24.50, £18.NONLINEAR forecasting has recently been shown to distinguish between deterministic chaos and uncorrelated (white) noise added to periodic signals^1, and can be used to estimate the degree of chaos in the underlying dynamical system^2. Distinguishing the more general class of coloured (autocorrelated) noise has proven more difficult because, unlike additive noise, the correlation between predicted and actual values measured may decrease with time—a property synonymous with chaos. Here, we show that by determining the scaling properties of the prediction error as a function of time, we can use nonlinear prediction to distinguish between chaos and random fractal sequences. Random fractal sequences are a particular class of coloured noise which represent stochastic (infinite-dimensional) systems with power-law spectra. Such sequences have been known to fool other procedures for identifying chaotic behaviour in natural time series^9, particularly when the data sets are small. The recognition of this type of noise is of practical importance, as measurements from a variety of dynamical systems (such as three-dimensional turbulence, two-dimensional and geostrophic turbulence, internal ocean waves, sandpile models, drifter trajectories in large-scale flows, the motion of a classical electron in a crystal and other low-dimensional systems) may over some range of frequencies exhibit power-law spectra.RECENT observations^1,2 with the γ-ray telescope SIGMA, on the GRANAT satellite, indicated that the hard X-ray source 1E1740.7 – 2942 may be the source of the strongest outbursts of 511-keV electron-positron annihilation radiation from the Galactic Centre region^3. We have observed this source using the Very Large Array, and find that its radio structure is that of a doublesided jet emanating from a compact and variable core. The changes in flux density and spectral index of the core are correlated with variations in the hard X-ray output. The jets are symmetrical about the core, and end in edge-brightened radio lobes; they are probably a result of synchrotron emission of electrons and positrons from the compact core. Our observation suggest that 1E1740.7 – 2942 is a 'microquasar' stellar remnant near the Galactic Centre, which ejects positrons that travel more than a parsec before slowing and annihilating in the interstellar gas.Professor Philippe Rushton from the University of Western Ontario is skating on thin ice in seeking to use an analysis of the cranial capacity of US Army soldiers to support his views on racial differences in IQ.An informed debate on the manner in which legislation on migration from food packaging is introduced is badly needed. Until then, scientific resources are being needlessly wasted.The three-dimensional structure of human serum albumin has been determined crystallographically to a resolution of 2.8 Å. It comprises three homologous domains that assemble to form a heart-shaped molecule. Each domain is a product of two subdomains that possess common structural motifs. The principal regions of ligand binding to human serum albumin are located in hydrophobic cavities in subdomains IIA and IIIA, which exhibit similar chemistry. The structure explains numerous physical phenomena and should provide insight into future pharmacokinetic and genetically engineered therapeutic applications of serum albumin.Simple replicating molecules are likely to have played a critical role in the origin of life. Recent experiments show that non-enzymatic replication is conceivable in a wide range of synthetic chemical systems. The challenge now facing these studies is how to develop information-coding systems from simple prebiotic precursors.The Evolutionary Biology of Hearing. Edited by Douglas B. Webster, Richard R. Fay and Arthur N. Popper. Springer: 1992. Pp. 859. $129, £88.50.I. E. Tamm: Selected Papers. Edited by B. M. Bolotovskii and V. Ya Frenkel. Springer: 1991. Pp. 325. $98, £49.50.Conservation of Biodiversity for Sustainable Development. Edited byO. T. Sandlund, K. Hinder and A. H. D. Brown. Oxford University Press/Scandinavia University Press: 1992. Pp. 327. £35.The United States could (and should) do more to prevent the confusion caused by genome patenting.Last week's meeting of seven industrialized governments in Munich accomplished little, but rather is a saddening reminder that even the most powerful governments are sometimes mesmerized by the voters' power.New products featured this week include a gel designed specifically for the detection of point mutations and a nonradioactive assay for detecting HIV DMA.Scanning tunnelling microscopy and atomic force microscopy, one scanning the tunnelling current and the other the repulsive atomic force between sample and probe, can give high-quality surface topographies of proteins, which have been difficult to obtain by more conventional methods such as transmission electron microscopy.THE heat-shock protein Hsp90 is the most abundant constitutively expressed stress protein in the cytosol of eukaryotic cells^1,2, where it participates in the maturation of other proteins, modulation of protein activity in the case of hormone-free steroid receptors, and intracellular transport of some newly synthesized kinases^3–5. A feature of all these processes could be their dependence on the formation of protein structure. If Hsp90 is a molecular chaperone involved in maintaining a certain subset of cellular proteins in an inactive form, it should also be able to recognize and bind non-native proteins, thereby influencing their folding to the native state. Here we investigate whether Hsp90 can influence protein folding in vitro and show that Hsp90 suppresses the formation of protein aggregates by binding to the target proteins at a stoichiometry of one Hsp90 dimer to one or two substrate molecule(s). Furthermore, the yield of correctly folded and functional protein is increased significantly. The action of Hsp90 does not depend on the presence of nucleoside triphosphates, so it may be that Hsp90 uses a novel molecular mechanism to assist protein folding in vivo .THE Gram-negative bacterial pathogen Shigella flexneri causes dysentery by invading the human colonic mucosa^1. Bacteria are phagocytosed by enterocytes^2, escape from the phagosome into the cytoplasm^3 and spread to adjacent cells^4. After crossing the epithelium, Shigella reaches the lamina propria of intestinal villi, the first line of defence. This tissue is densely populated with phagocytes that are killed in great numbers, resulting in abscesses^5,6. The genes required for cell invasion^7 and macrophage killing^2 are located on a 220-kilobase plasmid. We report here on the mechanism of cytotoxicity used by S. flexneri to kill macrophages. Each of four different strains was tested for its capacity to induce cell death. An invasive strain induced programmed cell death (apoptosis^8,9), whereas its non-invasive, plasmid-cured isogenic strain was not toxic; neither was a mutant in ipa B (ref. 10) (invasion protein antigen), a gene necessary for entry. A non-invasive strain expressing the haemolysin operon of Escherichia coli ^11 induced accidental cell death (necrosis), demonstrating that other bacterial cytotoxic mechanisms do not lead to apoptosis. This is the first evidence that an invasive bacterial pathogen can induce suicide in its host cells.ASTACIN, a digestive zinc-endopeptidase from the crayfish Astacus astacus L.^1,2, is the prototype for the 'astacin family'^3–5, which includes mammalian metallo-endopeptidases^5 and develop-mentally regulated proteins of man^6, fruitfly^7, frog^8 and sea urchin^9,10. Here we report the X-ray crystal structure of astacin, which reveals a deep active-site cleft, with the zinc at its bottom ligated by three histidines, a water molecule and a more remote tyrosine. The third histidine (His 102) forms part of a consensus sequence, shared not only by the members of the astacin family, but also by otherwise sequentially unrelated proteinases, such as vertebrate collagenases^11. It may therefore represent the elusive 'third' zinc ligand in these enzymes. The amino terminus of astacin is buried forming an internal salt-bridge with Glu 103, adjacent to His 102. Astacin pro-forms extended at the N terminus, as observed for some 'latent' mammalian astacin homologues, did not exhibit this 'active' conformation, indicating an activation mechanism reminiscent of trypsin-like serine proteinases.HUMAN cytomegalovirus (HCMV) is a major pathogen in immunosuppressed individuals, including patients with acquired immune deficiency syndrome. The nucleoside analogue ganciclovir (9-(l,3-dihydroxy-2-propoxymethyl)-guanine) is one of the few drugs available to treat HCMV infections, but resistant virus is a growing problem in the clinic^1 and there is a critical need for new drugs. The study of ganciclovir-resistant mutants has indicated that the selective action of ganciclovir depends largely on virus-controlled phosphorylation in HCMV-infected cells^2–5. The enzyme(s) responsible have not been identified. Here we report that the HCMV gene UL97 , whose predicted product shares regions of homology with protein kinases, guanylyl cyclase and bacterial phosphotransferases^6–8, controls phosphorylation of ganciclovir in HCMV-infected cells. A four-amino-acid deletion of UL97 in a conserved region, which in cyclic AMP-dependent protein kinase participates in substrate recognition^9, causes impaired ganciclovir phosphorylation. The implications of these results for antiviral drug development and drug resistance are discussed.HUMAN cytomegalovirus (HCMV, a betaherpes virus) is the cause of serious disease in immunologically compromised individuals, including those with acquired immunodeficiency syndonie^1. One of the compounds used in the chemotherapy of HCMV infections is the nucleoside analogue 9-(l,3-dihydroxy-2-propoxymethyl)-guanine (ganciclovir). The mechanism of action of this drug is dependent on the formation of the nucleoside triphosphate, which is a strong inhibitor of the viral DNA polymerase^2–4. Thymidine kinase, which is encoded by many of the herpesviruses, catalyses the initial phosphorylation of ganciclovir. But there is no evidence for the coding of this enzyme by HCMV^2,5,6, and DNA sequence analysis of the HCMV genome has shown that there is no open reading frame characteristic of a herpesvirus thymidine kinase^7. Here we present biochemical and immunological evidence that the HCMV UL97 open reading frame codes for a protein capable of phosphorylating ganciclovir. This protein seems to be responsible for the selectivity of ganciclovir and will be useful tool in the understanding and refinement of the antiviral activity of new selective anti-HCMV compounds.ALTHOUGH the hormone-stimulated synthesis of 3-phosphorylated inositol lipids is known to form an intracellular signalling system^1–5, there is no consensus on the crucial receptor-regulated event in this pathway and it is still not clear which of the intermediates represent potential output signals. We show here that the key step in the synthesis of 3-phosphorylated inositol lipids in 3T3 cells stimulated by platelet-derived growth factor is the activation of a phosphatidylinositol(4,5)-bisphosphate (3)-hydroxy (PtdIns(4,5)P_2 3-OH) kinase. A similar conclusion has been applied to explain the actions of formyl-Met-Leu-Phe on neutrophils^6, and it may be that receptors that couple through intrinsic tyrosine kinases or through G proteins stimulate the same step in 3-phosphorylated inositol lipid metabolism. The close parallel between these two mechanisms for the activation of PtdIns(4,5)P_2 3-OH kinase and those described for the activation of another key signalling enzyme, phospholipase C (ref. 7), focuses attention on the product of the PtdIns(4,5)P_2 3-OH kinase, PtdIns(3,4,5)P_3, as a possible new second messenger.IMMUNIZATION with myelin basic protein (MBP) induces experimental allergic encephalomyelitis (EAE), a prototype of CD4^+ T-cell mediated autoimmune disease. In rodents, MBP-reactive T-cell clones are specific for a single, dominant determinant on MBP and use a highly restricted number of T-cell receptor genes^1–3. Accordingly, EAE has been prevented by various receptor-specific treatments^1–8, suggesting similar strategies may be useful for therapy of human autoimmune disease. Here we report that in (SJL x B 10.PL)F_1 mice, immune dominance of a single determinant, MBP: Ac1–11, is confined to the inductive phase of EAE. In mice with chronic EAE, several additional determinants of MBP in peptides 35–47, 81–100 and 121–140 recall proliferative responses. Most importantly, reactivity to the latter determinants was also detected after induction of EAE with MBP peptide Ac1–11 alone; this demonstrates priming by endogenous MBP determinants. Thus, determinants of MBP that are cryptic^9–11 after primary immunization can become immunogenic in the course of EAE. Diversification of the autoreactive T-cell repertoire due to 'determinant spreading' has major implications for the pathogenesis of, and the therapeutic approach to, T-cell driven autoimmune disease.THE primate cortical visual system is composed of many structurally and functionally distinct areas^1–3, each receiving and sending about 10 projections from and to other cortical areas^1. The visual cortex is thus served by many cortico–cortical connections to form a network of considerable complexity. Thus the gross organization of this cortical processing system presents a formidable topological problem: although the spatial position of the areas in the brain is reasonably well established, the gross 'processing architecture' defined by the connections, is less well understood. Here I report an optimization approach that gives both qualitative and quantitative insight into the connectional topology of the primate cortical visual system. This approach supports suggestions that the system is divided into a dorsal 'stream' and a ventral 'stream' with limited cross-talk, that these two streams reconverge in the region of the principal sulcus (area 46) and in the superior temporal polysensory areas, that the system is hierarchically organized, and that the majority of the connections are from 'nearest-neighbour' and 'next-door-but-one' areas.Road-blocks are in the best French traditions, but this time deepen the shadow over the European enterprise.Nationalism and Internationalism in Science, 1880–1939: Four Studies of the Nobel Population. By Elisabeth Crawford. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 157. £27.95, $44.95.THE dopamine D4 receptor structurally and pharmacologically resembles the dopamine D2 and D3 receptors^1–5. Clozapine, an atypical antipsychotic that is relatively free of the adverse effects of drug-induced parkinsonism and tardive dyskinesia^6,7, binds to the D4 receptor with an affinity 10 times higher than to the D2 and D3 receptors^1. This may explain clozapine's atypical properties. Here we report the existence of at least three polymorphic variations in the coding sequence of the human D4 receptor. A 48-base-pair sequence in the putative third cytoplasmic loop of this receptor exists either as a direct-repeat sequence (D4.2), as a fourfold repeat (D4.4) or as a sevenfold repeat (D4.7). Two more variant alleles were detected in humans. Expression of the complementary DNA for the three cloned receptor variants showed different properties for the long form (D4.7) and the shorter forms (D4.2, D4.4) with respect to clozapine and spiperone binding. To our knowledge, this is the first report of a receptor in the catecholamine receptor family that displays polymorphic variation in the human population. Such variation among humans may underlie individual differences in susceptibility to neuropsychiatric disease and in responsiveness to antipsychotic medication.EVOLUTIONARY conflicts of interest are expected to arise in genetically diverse social groups^1. In eusocial insect societies, a potential conflict exists between the queen and her workers over how active the workers should be^2–5, and evidence exists that queen aggression increases activity levels of her lazier workers^2,3. Here I provide evidence that queen aggression (shoving) in laboratory colonies of the eusocial mammal, the naked mole-rat ( Heterocephalus glaber ), is a convergently evolved manifestation of queen–worker conflict over worker activity. Queen-initiated shoves activate inherently lazy workers, which tend to be larger and/or less related to the queen than are infrequently shoved, industrious workers. In addition, queen removal selectively depresses the activity of workers that are larger and less related to her. Finally, queen shoving and worker inactivity are pronounced when colonies are satiated but not when colonies are hungry, indicating that the underlying 'work-conflict' is highly context-specific.THE deformation of the upper mantle beneath a collisional belt is key to the dynamics of the belt, but this deformation is difficult to observe. Seismic azimuthal anisotropy manifested by shear-wave splitting provides the best geophysical evidence of deformation in the upper mantle. Here we use observations of shear-wave splitting to investigate deformation in the upper mantle beneath the Tien Shan in Central Asia. We find that underneath most of the Tien Shan the fast direction of azimuthal anisotropy is roughly parallel to the axis of the belt, but it deviates by nearly 90° where the upper mantle is anomalously hot. The former relationship, previously observed in other collisional belts, seems to be usual for this environment. The anomalous directions, however, provide evidence of a rising plume beneath the range, suggesting more generally that the along-strike flow of the mantle beneath collisional belts is a reflection of thermally driven convection.GEOPHYSICAL anomalies on the Yucatán peninsula define a buried circular structure with an approximate diameter of 180 km (refs 1–3). These anomalies, along with stratigraphic and petrological data, including evidence for shock metamorphism, have been used to interpret the structure as an impact crater^4. This structure, known as Chicxulub, is particularly interesting because it formed at or near the end of the Cretaceous period, in the geographical region where an impact is believed to have occurred, in large part because of a thick ejecta deposit found on Haiti^5. Glassy tektite-like relics in this deposit^6–9 are unusually calcic (up to 31 wt % CaO; ref. 7), providing a further circumstantial link with the Chicxulub structure, which penetrates a carbonate and evaporite sequence^7,8. Here we strengthen this link by showing that a simple chemical relationship exists between the glasses and an augite-bearing melt rock found within the Chicxulub structure, and argue that the composition of this melt rock could not easily have been produced by volcanic processes.CONCENTRATIONS of mercury in the environment are increasing as a result of human activities, notably fossil-fuel burning and incineration of municipal wastes. Increasing levels of mercury in aquatic environments and consequently in fish populations are recognized as a public-health problem^1,2. Enhanced mercury concentrations in lake sediments relative to pre-industrial values have also been attributed to anthropogenic pollution. It is generally assumed that atmospheric mercury deposition is dominated by global-scale processes, consequently being regionally uniform. Here, to the contrary, we report a significant gradient in concentrations and total amounts of mercury in organic litter and surface mineral soil along a transect of forested sites across the north central United States from northwestern Minnesota to eastern Michigan. This gradient is accompanied by parallel changes in wet sulphate deposition and human activity along the transect, suggesting that the regional variation in mercury content is due to deposition of anthropogenic mercury, most probably in particulate form.FERROELECTRIC materials are characterized by a switchable macroscopic polarization. Most technologically important ferroelectrics are oxides with a perovskite structure. The origin of their ferroelectric behaviour is unclear, however, and there is incomplete understanding of why similar, but chemically different, perovskites should display very different ferroelectric behaviour. The great sensitivity of ferroelectrics to chemistry, defects, electrical boundary conditions and pressure arises from a delicate balance between long-range Coulomb forces (which favour the ferroelectric state) and short-range repulsions (which favour the nonpolar cubic structure). To model the transition accurately, total-energy techniques are required which incorporate the effects of charge distortion and covalency. Here I report results of electronic-structure calculations on two classic examples of ferroelectric perovskites, BaTiO_3 and PbTiO_3, and demonstrate that hybridization between the titanium 3 d states and the oxygen 2 p states is essential for ferroelectricity. The different ferroelectric phase behaviour of the two materials is also clear: in PbTiO_3, the lead and oxygen states hybridize, leading to a large strain that stabilizes the tetragonal phase, whereas in BaTiO_3 the interaction between barium and oxygen is completely ionic, favouring a rhombohedral structure.MANY problems involving transport in physics, astrophysics and biology can be described in terms of a discrepancy between the experimentally observed flux of a quantity U and that predicted by elementary diffusion theory: this is known as anomalous transport. In such cases, there is often evidence for discrete structures or processes, spatially localized at fixed sites within the system, which can enhance the transport by giving rise to intermittent percolating pathways across the system ; examples include Kelvin–Helmholtz vortices in astrophysical accretion disks, island structures in plasma magnetic turbulence and enzymatic processes at the interfaces of cells. Such structures may themselves depend on U . To study the nonlinear elementary processes operating in these systems, we introduce a general model comprising localized structures coupled by two sets of variables: the transported quantity { U _ i }, and a measure {δ_i} of the influence of each structure on the diffusion of U . The model is related to, but distinct from, cellular automata, which use only one set of coupling variables. We study the evolution of this model using anomalous transport in a turbulent magnetic plasma as an example. We believe that this model could provide a basis for studying the behaviour of a wide range of nonlinear systems.WHEN the possibility of anthropogenic ozone depletion was first identified, it was thought that it would occur primarily in the upper stratosphere, at altitudes near 42 km. It is now recognized that ozone losses due to heterogeneous reactions involving chlorine and bromine^1 are greatest in the lower stratosphere, near 20 km (ref. 2), and this is the main cause of ozone depletion over polar latitudes^3. Despite satellite observation of the upper stratosphere for nearly a decade^4, the question of possible ozone depletion in this region has remained unresolved because of instrument degradation and incomplete monitoring^5. Recent observations of ozone concentrations in the upper stratosphere have been made with the Shuttle Solar Backscatter Ultraviolet (SSBUV) spectrometer carried by the Space Shuttle. Here we combine the SSBUV data for October 1989 with measurements made in October 1980 by the similar SBUV instrument on NASA's Nimbus-7 satellite, to show that the ozone concentration near 45 km has decreased during this period by about 7 ± 2%. The trend is consistent with the predictions of a two-dimensional photochemical model. Although this contribution to total column ozone depletion is small, the changes may have implications for the radiative properties of the upper atmosphere.THE maximum abundance of lithium in the oldest stars of the Galaxy is a factor of ten less than that of young stars and the local interstellar medium^1, prompting an active search for sources of lithium. Type II supernovae, novae and accretion disks around black holes may be important sites of lithium production^2,3. Stars in general are unlikely to produce lithium, as it is destroyed in their interiors through (p, α) reactions. Recently we showed that the transient X-ray source V404 Cyg is a low-mass X-ray binary with a black-hole primary^4. Here we describe the discovery of lithium in the spectrum of V404 Cyg, as has also been noted independently by Wallerstein^5 in our previously published spectra^4. We derive a high lithium abundance in the secondary star of V404 Cyg, close to that of very young stars. Without lithium production, the secondary would have to be comparable in age to the Pleiades cluster (∼100Myr). If we are not seeing the system at an early moment in its lifetime, there must have been lithium production, which could be associated either with the supernova explosion that created it, or with the accretion disk now there. Further observations of this and similar systems may reveal that they are important sources of galactic lithium enrichment.In catalysis by group I introns, the helix (P1) containing the RNA cleavage site must be positioned next to the guanosine binding site. We have identified a conserved adenine in the catalytic core that contributes to the stability of this arrangement and propose that it accepts a hydrogen bond from a specific 2′-OH in P1. Such base-backbone tertiary interactions may be generally important to the organization of RNA tertiary structure.SINCE their discovery at the turn of the century^1, the species assemblages of cichlid fishes in the East African Lakes Victoria, Malawi and Tanganyika have fascinated evolutionary biologists. Many models have attempted to account for the 'explosive' evolution of several hundred species within these lakes^2–7. Here we report a case of surprisingly large genetic divergence among populations of the endemic Tropheus lineage of Lake Tanganyika. This lineage of six species contains twice as much genetic variation as the entire morphologically highly diverse cichlid assemblage of Lake Malawi and six times more variation than the Lake Victoria species flock. Although it is highly variable in coloration, this group of species and its closest relatives have not undergone appreciable morphological change. The observed geographic pattern of genetic variation suggests that major lake level fluctuations affected the distribution and speciation of this lineage of cichlid fishes.DEPLETION of stratospheric ozone will increase the intensity of solar mid-ultraviolet (280–320 nm) radiation reaching the biosphere^1. Predictions of increases in biologically effective ultraviolet radiation require knowledge of both the solar spectral intensity and the wavelength-dependent sensitivity (action spectrum) for damaging the biological target^2. A generalized action spectrum for plant damage encompassing wavelengths from 280 to 313 nm^3–5 has been widely used to predict the consequences of ozone depletion. Calculations^6 based on this spectrum and new satellite measurements of atmospheric ozone suggest that plants will be among those organisms most severely affected. Here we report an absolute action spectrum for cyclobutyl pyrimidine dimer induction in DNA in intact alfalfa seedlings, which reveals damage by wavelengths as long as 365 nm. Calculations based on this new action spectrum predict significantly smaller increases in biologically effective ultraviolet radiation resulting from ozone depletion, particularly at high latitudes, than calculations based on either the generalized plant action spectrum or the action spectrum for damaging unshielded DNA.RECENT seismological, heat flow and stress measurements in active fault zones such as the San Andreas have led to the suggestion^1,2 that such zones can be relatively weak. One explanation for this may be the presence of overpressured fluids along the fault^3–5, which would reduce the shear stress required for sliding by partially 'floating' the rock. Although several mechanisms have been proposed for overpressurizing fault fluids^3,4,6,7, we recall that 'pressure seals' are known to form in both sedimentary^8 and igneous^9 rocks by the redistribution of materials in solution; the formation of such a seal along the boundaries of a fault will prevent the communication of fluids between the porous, deforming fault zone and the surrounding country rock. Compaction of fault gouge, under hydrostatic loading and/or during shear, elevates pore pressure in the sealed fault and allows sliding at low shear stress. We report the results of laboratory sliding experiments on granite, which demonstrate that the sliding resistance of faults can be significantly decreased by sealing and compaction. The weakening that results from shear-induced compaction can be rapid, and may provide an instability mechanism for earthquakes.CORAL skeletons have been used to monitor a wide range of environmental parameters, including water temperature, insolation, siltation, river runoff and pollutant concentrations^1–9. In most cases, interpretation of the coral record relies on a determination of the growth rate. Radiographic techniques^9–13, which have been verified by a number of approaches^8,14,15, are most commonly used for this purpose, but are restricted to the determination of yearly average growth rates. Interpolation procedures have been used to extract growth rates on shorter timescales, but their accuracy depends on various assumptions about relative growth rates of skeletal bands with different densities^9,16. Here we report that reflectance optical microscopy can be used to measure daily growth rates of massive corals. This method should greatly expand the potential use of corals as environmental indicators.FLOW phenomena that link the stratosphere and the troposphere are a key component of mid-latitude weather systems^1, and can influence substantially the distribution of atmospheric gases and aerosols^2,3. Little is known, however, about the detailed structure of these features. Here we combine satellite measurements with data from a weather prediction model to show that fine-scale structure can be resolved in intrusions of stratospheric air into the troposphere. We observe intrusions that develop into elongated (about 2,000km) and slender (about 200km) streamers which break up into a train of vortex-like disturbances while the streamer's tip splits and/or rolls up. The appearance of these structures might influence the daily development of weather systems, and will induce local, irreversible isentropic mixing of stratospheric air with the troposphere, possibly accounting for a substantial portion of the net stratosphere-to-troposphere exchange.THE dynamics of trapped vortices of magnetic flux in the high- T _c oxide superconductors have been much studied^1–4, but remain poorly understood; in particular, we have much to learn about vortex 'creep' at low temperatures. Using a scanning Hall micro-probe to measure directly the spatial and temporal variation of the flux density in YBa_2Cu_3O_7 single crystals, we have uncovered a remarkable asymmetry in the magnetization profile, which is induced by the direction of the field (applied normal to the a–b crystal face). The external field imparts a rotation to the vortex motion, which strongly distorts the remanent profile away from the form predicted by conventional critical-state models^5. This rotation was not anticipated and, to our knowledge, is not accounted for in existing theories.SHORTLY after the birth of quantum mechanics, von Neumann and Wigner made the remarkable proposal^1 that certain spatially oscillating attractive potentials could support bound states at energies above the potential barriers (that is, spatially confined states within the continuum) by means of diffractive interference. Because of their unusual geometry, such potentials were regarded as mathematical curiosities^2,3, although more recently it has been suggested that they might be found in certain atomic and molecular systems^4,5. Following the observation of discrete electronic states in ultra-thin semiconductor layered structures^6,7 (for example, in quantum wells), Stillinger^8 and Herrick^9 proposed that super-lattices might be used to construct potentials supporting these 'positive energy' bound states. Here we report direct evidence of such states in semiconductor heterostructures grown by molecular-beam epitaxy^10. Infrared absorption measurements reveal a narrow, isolated transition from a bound state within a quantum well to a bound state at an energy greater than the barrier height; this state is spatially localized by Bragg reflections.The major mineral phases contained in individual carbonaceous chondrite meteorites exhibit both positive and negative anomalies in their ^54Cr abundances. No significant chromium-bearing phase has a terrestrial (solar) chromium isotopic composition. These observations provide evidence that the chromium isotopic composition of the Solar System results from the mixing of several major components with distinct isotopic compositions. The formation of the solar nebula from material carrying different isotopic signatures may provide constraints on nucleosynthetic models.Scientific Literacy and the Myth of the Scientific Method. By Henry H. Bauer. University of Illinois Press: 1992. Pp. 192. $24.95.Biological Anomalies: Humans I. A Catalog of Biological Anomalies. Compiled by William R. Corliss. The Sourcebook Project, PO Box 107, Glen Arm, MD 21057, USA: 1992. Pp. 304. $19.95.There is mild excitement at the prospect of using anti-hydrogen as a means of telling whether the charges of protons and antiprotons differ, and, if so, by how much.Not every day (worse luck) is the equivalent of a new research council magicked into being.Settling Yugoslavia's tribal wars is an urgent need, but in the long run Europe must trade cultural diversity for economic development away from its agrarian roots.This midsummer selection features purified vitronectin, an intron-encoded endonuclease, transcription kits and an electronic animal ID system.The advent of ^33P nucleotide triphosphates has widened the options available for labelling nucleic acids. Choosing the most appropriate label requires a careful consideration of experimental needs and circumstances.Encyclopedia of Immunology. 3 Volumes. Edited by Ivan M. Roitt and Peter J. Delves. Academic: 1992. Pp. 1,578. $450, á£300.IN normal humans the fetal stage-specific γ-globin genes are silenced after birth and not expressed in the adult. Exceptions are seen in cases of hereditary persistence of fetal haemoglobin (HPFH). These are clinically important because the elevated levels of γ-globin can alleviate β-thalassaemia and sickle cell anaemia. One class of mutations is associated with point mutations in the promoter of the γ-globin genes (non-deletion HPFH), whereas others seem to be caused by large deletions 3′ to the γ-globin genes^1. To test whether the point mutation found in the Greek non-deletion HPFH^2,3 (guanine to adenine at nucleotide position –117) is the cause of the raised γ-globin levels in the adult stage and is not just a linked polymorphism, we engineered this mutation into a γ-globin gene. When this gene was introduced into mice, the presence of the –117 mutation results in persistence of γ-globin expression at a high level and a concomitant decrease in β-globin expression in fetal and adult mice. We show that these changes correlate with the loss of binding of the transcription factor GATA1 to the γ-globin promoter, suggesting that it may act as a negative regulator of the γ-globin gene in adults.OUR understanding of the biology and origins of human immunodeficiency virus type 2 (HIV-2) derives from studies of cultured isolates from urban populations experiencing epidemic infection and disease^1–8. To test the hypothesis that such isolates might represent only a subset of a larger, genetically more diverse group of viruses, we used nested polymerase chain reactions to characterize HIV-2 sequences in uncultured mononuclear blood cells of two healthy Liberian agricultural workers, from whom virus isolation was repeatedly unsuccessful, and from a culture-positive symptomatic urban dweller. Analysis of pol, env and long terminal repeat regions revealed the presence of three highly divergent HIV-2 strains, one of which (from one of the healthy subjects) was significantly more closely related to simian immunodeficiency viruses infecting sooty mangabeys and rhesus macaques (SIV_SM/SIV_MAC) than to any virus of human derivation. This subject also harboured multiply defective viral genotypes that resulted from hypermutation of G to A bases. Our results indicate that HIV-2, SIV_SM and SIV_MAC comprise a single, highly diverse group of lentiviruses which cannot be separated into distinct phylogenetic lineages according to species of origin.COOPERATIVE breeding, which often involves young remaining on their natal territory and helping their parents to raise subsequent broods^1–3 is mostly explained by habitat saturation: young are constrained from becoming independent breeders by a shortage of breeding territories^2,4. Here I present two lines of evidence against this hypothesis for the cooperatively breeding Seychelles warbler Acrocephalus sechellensis . first, territory quality has a significant effect on dispersal: vacancies arising on territories are mostly filled by prebreeding birds from territories of the same or lower quality. Second, individuals that delay reproduction in high-quality territories, but which eventually breed there, have greater lifetime fitness than those that disperse at one year of age and breed immediately in lower-quality territories. These results support the 'benefits of philopatry^,5,6 hypothesis, which emphasizes the lifetime inclusive fitness benefits from staying at home. The transfers of warblers to unoccupied islands was the strictest experimental test of this hypothesis. At first there was no cooperative breeding, but as all high-quality areas became occupied, young birds born on high-quality territories began to stay as helpers, rather than occupying breeding vacancies on low-quality territories. Therefore habitat saturation and territory quality are both involved in the evolution of cooperative breeding.THE Mid-Atlantic Ridge (MAR) between the Kane and Atlantis fracture zones consists of segments 20–85 km in length^1; bull's-eye patterns in the mantle Bouguer gravity anomaly field^2 centred on several segments associated with narrow rift valleys^3 have been interpreted as centres of strong mantle upwelling and thick crust. Here I present a map of normal faults inferred from ∼5 × 10^4 km^2of Sea Beam bathymetry^4 along the MAR between 28° N and the Atlantis fracture zone. Faults are mapped both on- and off-ridge using a criterion that distinguishes them from volcanic topography. Abyssal hill lineations seem to form at the rift valley walls through the growth of the normal faults; towards ridge segment ends these faults are more widely spaced, with larger throws than those at segment centres, and often define the boundaries of the gravity bull's-eyes. These two different faulting styles, which probably reflect changes in lithospheric strength, are preserved into the rift mountains. Large-throw faults are highly correlated with the mantle Bouguer highs, suggesting that amagmatic extension on the large faults contributes to the crustal thinning inferred towards the segment ends.Retroviral vectors for gene transfer experiments have their limitations — hence the attraction of using other viral vehicles to administer genes directly to affected organs.FLOWER colours, from red through purple to blue, are mostly from anthocyanins, a type of flavonoid^1–5. Although there are many colours, only a few anthocyanidins, chromophores of the pigments, have been found. The colour of the pigments is stable in plants for a few days to one month but the extracted anthocyanins are, nevertheless, unstable and quickly lose colour by hydration in a neutral aqueous solution^1–5. In 1915 Willstätter proposed that flower-colours vary because anthocyanins change their colour with the pH^6. Shibata and Shibata questioned the theory because most plant cell sap was weakly acidic or neutral. Their alternative, based on metal-complex theory^7 was refuted by Everest^8. In 1958 Hayashi isolated in crystal form a blue pigment^9, commelinin, a metal-complex anthocyanin (named metalloanthocyanin)^10,11, from the blue petals of Commelina communis . But the existence of a blue-coloured magnesium complex was denied by Bayer et al .^12. We obtained the same blue pigment as intact commelinin by reconstruction from its components^13. We also prepared Cd-commelinin in which the complexation metal Mg^2+ was replaced with Cd^2+. We report here the X-ray crystal structure of a real anthocyanin and a sugar-containing flavonoid, using Cd–commelinin. The blue flower-colour development and the stability of the colour can be explained by metal complexation of antho-cyanin and intermolecular hydrophobic association.Two distinct steps in nuclear envelope assembly can be assayed in vitro^1–3: the protein-mediated binding^4 of nuclear-specific vesicles to chromatin, and the subsequent fusion^5 of these vesicles to enclose the chromatin within a double nuclear membrane. Nuclear vesicle fusion, like fusion in the secretory pathway^6,7, requires ATP^8,9 and cytosol^1,3,5 and is inhibited by nonhydrolysable GTP analogues^1,2. The sensitivity of nuclear vesicle fusion to GTP- γ S requires a GTP-dependent soluble factor, the properties of which are strikingly similar to a GTP-dependent Golgi binding factor (GGBF) that inhibits Golgi vesicle fusion in the presence of GTP-γS and belongs to the ADP-ribosylation factor (ARF) family of small GTPases^10,11. In the presence of GTP- γ S, ARF proteins and α -, β -, γ -, δ -COP (‘coatomer’) subunits are associated with Golgi transport vesicles^6,12,13, but the exact roles of ARF proteins in secretion are not yet understood. We report here that purified ARF1 and GGBF have GTP-dependent soluble factor activity in the nuclear vesicle fusion assay. Our results show that the function of ARF is not limited to the Golgi apparatus, and indicate that there may be a link between the formation of nuclear vesicles during mitosis and proteins involved in secretion.SHIGA toxin and some other protein toxins that act on targets in the cytosol have previously been shown to enter the trans -Golgi network^1–9. Transport by this route may be necessary for translocation of the toxin to the cytosol and for intoxication^5–9, but it is not known whether the enzymatically active part of the toxins actually enters the cytosol from the fraiw-Golgi network. It has been suggested that such toxins are transported in a retrograde manner to the endoplasmic reticulum and that translocation occurs in this organelle^10, but retrograde transport of endocytosed material beyond the trans -Golgi network has never been demonstrated. Here we show that in butyric acid-treated A431 cells endocytosed Shiga toxin is not only transported to the trans -Golgi network, but also to all Golgi stacks, to the endoplasmic reticulum and to the nuclear envelope. Furthermore, butyric acid sensitizes the cells to Shiga toxin, which is consistent with the possibility that retrograde transport is required for translocation of the toxin to the cytosol.INTERACTION of the elastic lithosphere with the underlying anelastic asthenosphere causes strain to propagate along the Earth's surface in a diffusion-like manner following tectonism at plate boundaries. This process transfers stress between adjacent tectonic segments and influences the temporal tectonic pattern along a plate boundary. Observations of such strain transients have been rare, and have hitherto been confined to strike-slip and underthrusting plate boundaries^1. Here we report the observation of a strain transient at the divergent (spreading) plate boundary in Iceland. A Global Positioning System survey undertaken a decade after an episode of dyke intrusion accompanying several metres of crustal spreading reveals a spatially varying strain field with the expected diffusion-pulse shape and an amplitude three times greater than the 5.7 cm that would be expected from the average spreading rate^2. A simple one-dimensional model with a thin elastic layer overlying a viscous layer fits the data well and yields a stress diffusivity of 1.1 á±0.3 m^2s^−1. Combined with struc-tural information from magnetotelluric measurements, this implies a viscosity of 0.3−2 × 10^19 Pa s—a value comparable to that derived for Iceland from post-glacial rebound^23, but low compared with estimates for mantle viscosity obtained elsewhere^3.ABRUPT and short climate changes, such as the Younger Dryas, punctuated the last glacial-to-interglacial transition^1–4. Broecker et al.^5 proposed that these may have been caused by an interruption of thermohaline circulation as inputs of glacial meltwater freshened the surface waters of the North Atlantic. The finding^6that meltwater discharge was minimal during the Younger Dryas, however, led to the suggestion that the surface-water salinity drop might have been caused instead by changes in the freshwater budget (the difference between precipitation and evaporation), accompanied by a reduction in poleward advection of saline subtropical water. Here we use micropalaeontological and stable-isotope records from foraminifera in two cores from the North Atlantic to generate two continuous, high-resolution records of sea surface temperature and salinity changes over the past 18,000 years. Despite the injection of glacial meltwater during warm episodes, we find that sea surface salinity and temperature remain positively correlated during deglaciation. Cold, low-salinity events occurred during the early stages of deglaciation (14,500–13,000 years ago) and the Younger Dryas, but the minor injections of meltwater at high latitudes during these events are insufficient to account for the observed salinity changes. We conclude that an additional feedback from changes in the hydrological cycle and in advection was necessary to trigger changes in thermohaline circulation and thus in climate. This feedback did not act when the meltwater injection occurred at low latitude.POLYMER gels can undergo a volume phase transition (either continuous or discontinuous) when an external condition, such as temperature or solvent composition, is altered^1–3. During this transition, the volume may change by a factor of several thousand, and various patterns develop in the gel. The patterns arising from swelling and shrinking differ in both their appearance and their physical mechanisms. The mechanism for the formation and evolution of patterns on swelling gels has been established as being due to a single kind of mechanical instability^4–7; in contrast, the shrinking patterns seem to be sensitive to both the initial and final states of the transition. Here we classify the various shrinking patterns in the form of a phase diagram, and explain the poly-morphism in terms of macroscopic phase separation.SUPERANTIGENS^1–4 bind class II major histocompatibility pro-teins^5,6 and stimulate powerful proliferative responses of T lymphocytes bearing particular V β sequences as part of their αβ antigen receptor^7. Exogenous bacterial superantigens are respon-sible for food poisoning and toxic shock syndrome. Murine virus-encoded self-superantigens induce clonal deletion of T lym-phocytes. Although superantigen-like properties have been suggested for human immunodeficiency virus-1, no viral superantigen has been identified in humans^8. Here we report that the nucleocapsid of the rabies virus is an exogenous superantigen specific for V β 8 human T lymphocytes which binds to HLA class II α -chains.THE molecule CD23, a low-affinity receptor for IgE (FcεR_2)^1,2, is a type II transmembrane molecule expressed on many haemopoietic cell types^3,4. CD23 has pleiotropic roles in the control of lymphocyte behaviour^5–9, suggesting that CD23 may interact with another ligand in addition to IgE. To identify such a CD23 ligand, we expressed and purified full-length recombinant CD23, incorporated it into fluorescent liposomes and used these as a probe. We report here that fluorescent liposomes carrying CD23 interact specifically with the cell-surface protein CD21, identified as the receptor for Epstein–Barr virus and the complement recep-tor-2 on B cells, some T cells and follicular dendritic cells. In addition, fluorescent CD23–liposomes were shown to bind to ham-ster kidney cells (BHK-21) transfected with CD21 complementary DNA. The interaction between fluorescent CD23–liposomes and B cells or CD21-transfected BHK-21 cells was specifically inhibited by anti-CD21 and anti-CD23 monoclonal antibodies. Western blotting analysis revealed that ^14C-labelled liposomes carrying CD23, in contrast to anti-CD21 antibodies, reacted with a subtype of CD21 molecules. Triggering of CD21 either with an anti-CD21 antibody or with recombinant soluble CD23 was shown to increase specifically interleukin-4-induced IgE production from blood mononuclear cells. These results demonstrate that the cell-surface protein CD21 is a ligand for CD23 and that the pairing of these molecules may participate in the control of IgE production.CILIARY neurotrophic factor (CNTF) supports the survival of embryonic motor neurons in vitro ^1,2 and in vivo ^3, and prevents lesion-mediated degeneration of rat motor neurons during early post-natal stages^4. Here we report that CNTF greatly reduces all the functional and morphological changes in pmn/pmn mice^5, an autosomal recessive mutant leading to progressive caudo-cranial motor neuron degeneration. The first manifestations of progressive motor neuronopathy in homozygous pmn/pmn mice become apparent in the hind limbs at the end of the third post-natal week, and all the mice die up to 6 or 7 weeks after birth from respiratory paralysis. Treatment with CNTF prolongs survival and greatly improves motor function of these mice. Moreover, morphological manifestations, such as loss of motor axons in the phrenic nerve and degeneration of facial motor neurons, were greatly reduced by CNTF, although the treatment did not start until the first symptoms of the disease had already become apparent and substan-tial degenerative changes were already present. The protective and restorative effects of CNTF in this mouse mutant give new perspectives for the treatment of human degenerative motor neuron diseases with CNTF.SHORT-TERM acidification of lakes and streams can cause bio-logical damage by lowering pH and increasing concentrations of inorganic aluminium^1–4. Storms laden with acids and sea salts, rapid melting of acidic snow and remobilization of acids stored in catchment soils can cause episodes of acidification lasting from hours to months. These episodes can help to reveal the mechanisms that regulate catchment runoff chemistry^5–7. Here we use extreme, climatically triggered acidification episodes in 18 intensively monitored streams in Canada to test a geochemical theory^8 that predicts the chemical response of catchments to changes in acid loading. At all 18 catchments, changes in base cation (Ca^2+, Mg^2+, Na^+, K^+, NH^+_4) concentrations offset about 75–95% of the observed changes in acid anion (SO^2−, NO^−_3, Cl^−, OA^−) levels; increases in hydrogen and aluminium ions and decreases in bicarbonate accounted for the remaining 5–25%. In response to equal acid anion increases, however, some catchments released over 35 times more H^+ or 50 times more inorganic aluminium than others. The observed chemical responses to shifts in acid anion loading agreed with a priori geochemical predictions derived^8 from the chemical composition of runoff, indicating that catchment vulnerability to acidification can be assessed, in advance, directly from surveys of lake and stream chemistry.PHOTONS of TeV energy have been observed from a few sources in our Galaxy, notably the Crab Nebula^1. We report here the detection of such photons from an extragalactic source, the giant elliptical galaxy Markarian 421. Mk 421 has a nucleus of the BL Lacertae type^2,3, and emission from it has been observed at radio^4–6, optical^3,6 and X-ray^6–8 frequencies, and most recently in the MeV-GeV bands, by the EGRET detector aboard the Compton observatory^9. In March–June 1992, we observed Mk 421 with the Whipple Observatory γ-ray telescope^10, a ground-based detector that images Cerenkov light from air showers, and found a signal with statistical significance of 6er above background. The flux above 0.5 TeV is 0.3 of that from the Crab Nebula. The source location agrees with the position of Mk 421 within the angular uncertainty (6 arc minutes) of the Whipple instrument. The fact that we have observed this relatively nearby source (redshift z = 0.031), whereas active galaxies and quasars that are brighter at EGRET energies but more distant have not been detected in the TeV energy range, may be consistent with suggestions^11,12 that TeV photons are strongly attenuated by interaction with extragalactic starlight.British Telecom, the privatized British telephone mo-nopoly, is running out of numbers, but should not worry.The lin-3 gene is necessary for induction of the Caenorhabditis elegans vulva by the anchor cell. It encodes a molecule similar to epidermal growth factor and to transforming growth factor-a and acts through the epidermal growth factor receptor homologue let-23 . Expression of lin-3 in the anchor cell stimulates vulval induction; lin-3 may encode the vulval inducing signal.Last week's international conference on AIDS seems merely to have confirmed the impression of earlier conferences in the series — that science, for the time being, has little to say to those with AIDSKarl Popper's ideas have been the touchstone for judging science during much of this century. Here, in acknowledgement of his 90th birthday on 28 July, is a celebration of the man and his works.Nature 354, 82-84 (1991) IN this paper we inadvertently omitted to cite the work of Fukura and colleagues (A. Fukura, F. Sebestyen, M. Asgedom and G. Dibo 14th Int. Congr. Biochem. FR013; 1988), who indepen-dently described a similar synthetic method for producing mul-tiple peptide sequences (which we called "split synthesis").The time has come to think again, and constructively, about plutonium as a nuclear fuel.There may be more to the new NIH strategy document than a mere projection of the past into the future, but it is a great misfortune that the document is so inward-looking.Paleomagnetism: Magnetic Domains to Geologic Terranes. By Robert F. Butler Blackwell Scientific: 1992. Pp. 319. £29.50, $44.95Increased awareness of the importance of the environment, accompanied by tighter legislation, has increased the number of jobs available in conservation, but has also made them highly prized.Featured this week — an ultra-low-noise patch-clamp amplifier, a 120-channel signal-stacking seismograph and alpha/beta liquid scintillation counters that feature automatic crossover optimization and ultra-low-level counting.Nature 356, 763-767 (1992) WE have discovered that the sequence of our FACC gene in Fig. Ic is in error. The corrected sequence appears below, starting at position 787 of the cDNA. GAG CGA GTG GCG TCC CTG TCA CGA GTT ERVASLSRV TGT GTC CCA CTT An ACC CTG ACA C V P L I T L T The change does not alter any of the conclusions of the paper.THE production of fullerene molecules typically involves extreme high-temperature conditions (electric arcs^1, flames^2 or resistive heating^3), and the reactive processes involved are poorly understood. Once separated^4,5, these molecules can undergo several important reactions, including formation of charge-transfer^6,7 and adduct^8,9 compounds, and the encapsulation of atoms^10–12. Here we present evidence for coalescence reactions between fullerene molecules: mass spectrometric measurements on hot, dense vapours of small fullerenes (C_60 and C_70) reveal the formation of stable higher fullerenes which are multiples of the initial masses. The heat of coalescence is released through emission of small, even-numbered fragments which, in a very dense vapour, are efficiently captured by other coalesced fullerenes. These findings have implications for the mechanisms of fullerene formation and growth, and may open the way to new synthetic routes to selected higher fullerenes and encapsulation compounds.IF the current abundance of interplanetary dust is representative of its long-term value^1, there must be a source of dust replenishing the ∼10^7 g s^–1 (mostly in the form of particles of 10^–4 to 1 g) destroyed by dissipative processes^2. Short-period comets are the most likely such source^3, but their dust production rate is uncertain. Coma spectrophotometry of several short-period comets excludes significant contributions of dust from them^4,5, but observations by the Infrared Astronomical Satellite^6 have suggested the opposite. Here I use a numerical model^7 to analyse an optical image of the dust tail of comet P/Schwassman–Wachmann 1, which contains information about grains 5 μm to 2 cm in diameter, ejected from 900 to 30 days before perihelion. During the three years covered by the model, the mass loss rate reached an estimated (6±3) × 10^5 g s^–1, for an assumed albedo^9 of 0.1 at the observation phase angle of 4°. This one short-period comet thus apparently provides ∼6% of the mass required to balance the losses of the interplanetary dust cloud.THE distribution of neutral hydrogen absorption lines in quasars indicates that the intergalactic medium is fully formed even at the highest redshifts^1,2: highly ionized gas fills most of space, but there are many denser, lower-entropy condensations with a higher fraction of neutral gas, and a few very dense, optically thick clouds thought to be associated with the progenitors of modern galaxies. This early ionization requires there to have been some form of energy injection (heat or light) at redshift z > 5, but its precise origin is unknown. (Possible sources of ionizing energy range from decaying massive neutrinos^3–5 to faint but numerous active galaxies.) I argue here that any fairly uniform source of ionizing photons can be the cause of an instability in the pre-galactic medium on scales larger than a photon path length. Underdense regions receive more ionizing energy per atom and reach higher temperature and entropy, driving the density down still further. Fluctuations created by this instability can lead to the formation of structures resembling protogalaxies and intergalactic clouds, obviating the need for gas clouds or density perturbations of earlier cosmological provenance, as is usually assumed in theories of galaxy and structure formation.The US federal agency with responsibility for national emergencies has flunked again.The three-domain structure of porphobilinogen deaminase, a key enzyme in the biosynthetic pathway of tetrapyrroles, has been defined by X-ray analysis at 1.9 Å resolution. Two of the domains structurally resemble the transferrins and periplasmic binding proteins. The dipyrromethane cofactor is covalently linked to domain 3 but is bound by extensive salt-bridges and hydrogen-bonds within the cleft between domains 1 and 2, at a position corresponding to the binding sites for small-molecule ligands in the analogous proteins. The X-ray structure and results from site-directed mutagenesis provide evidence for a single catalytic site. Interdomain flexibility may aid elongation of the polypyrrole product in the active-site cleft of the enzyme.Model simulations of the West Antarctic ice sheet suggest that sporadic, perhaps chaotic, collapse (complete mobilization) of the ice sheet occurred throughout the past one million years. The irregular behaviour is due to the slow equilibration time of the distribution of basal till, which lubricates ice-sheet motion. This nonlinear response means that predictions of future collapse of the ice sheet in response to global warming must take into account its past history, and in particular whether the present basal till distribution predisposes the ice sheet towards rapid change.Intelligence and Development: A Cognitive Theory. By Mike Anderson Black-well: 1992. Pp. 256. £40, $44.95 (hbk); £11.95, $19.95 (pbk).Cardinal Choices: Presidential Science Advising from the Atomic Bomb to SDI. By Gregg Herken. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 317. £22.50, $24.50.Hard Drive: Bill Gates and the Making of the Microsoft Empire By James Wallace and Jim Erickson. Wiley: 1992. Pp. 425. £±4.95, $25.95.PROTEOLIPID protein (PLP; M _r 30,000) is a highly conserved major polytopic membrane protein in myelin but its cellular function remains obscure. Neurological mutant mice can often provide model systems for human genetic disorders. Mutations of the X-chromosome-linked PLP gene are lethal, identified first in the jimpy mouse^1,2 and subsequently in patients with PelizaeusMerzbacher disease^3,4. The unexplained phenotype of these mutations includes degeneration and premature cell death of oligodendrocytes with associated hypomyelination^5. Here we show that a new mouse mutant rumpshaker ^6 is defined by the amino-acid substitution Ile-to-Thr at residue 186 in a membrane-embedded domain of PLP. Surprisingly, rumpshaker mice, although myelindeficient, have normal longevity and a full complement of morphologically normal oligodendrocytes^7. Hypomyelination can thus be genetically separated from the PLP-dependent oligodendrocyte degeneration. We suggest that PLP has a vital function in glial cell development, distinct from its later role in myelin assembly, and that this dichotomy of action may explain the clinical spectrum^8 of Pelizaeus–Merzbacher disease.Vital Circuits: On Pumps, Pipes, and the Workings of Circulatory Systems. By Steven Vogel. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 315. £19.95, $24.95.VISUAL information from the retina is transmitted to the cerebral cortex by way of the lateral geniculate nucleus (LGN) in the thalamus. In primates, most of the retinal ganglion cells that project to the LGN belong to one of two classes, P and M, whose axons terminate in the parvocellular or magnocellular subdivisions of the LGN. These cell classes give rise to two channels that have been distinguished anatomically, physiologically and behaviourally^1–3,16,17. The visual cortex also can be subdivided into two pathways, one specialized for motion processing and the other for colour and form information^4. Several lines of indirect evidence have suggested a close correspondence between the subcortical and cortical pathways, such that the M channel provides input to the motion pathway and the P channel drives the colour/form pathway^5–7. This hypothesis was tested directly by selectively inactivating either the magnocellular or parvocellular subdivision of the LGN and recording the effects on visual responses in the cortex. We have previously reported that, in accordance with the hypothesis, responses in the motion pathway in the cortex depend primarily on magnocellular LGN^8. We now report that in the colour/form pathway, visual responses depend on both P and M input. These results argue against a simple correspondence between the subcortical and cortical pathways.LIGHT is a primary environmental signal regulating plant growth and form^1. The receptor phytochrome responds to red light and induces changes in membrane properties and gene expression^2,3 through an unknown transduction pathway which is the subject of intense study. Etiolated wheat leaf protoplasts swell in response to red light^4, by a mechanism believed to be similar to that involved in phytochrome-regulated leaf growth and unrolling^5–7. Here we report that this physiological response is preceded by a transient increase in free calcium in the cytosol, followed by a decrease to below resting level. The timing of this response varied between protoplasts. Cytosolic calcium transients induced by photolytic release of calcium or inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate from chemically caged forms^8–13 inside these protoplasts resulted in red light-induced increases in protoplast volume being mimicked. Our results support the hypothesis that phytochrome-mediated signals are transduced through calcium and help to resolve a long-standing issue in plant physiology.Those persuaded that natural selection is a pack of lies deserve no help from the serious press.ELUCIDATION of the nature of the gene interactions that underly the sterility of interspecific hybrids is important in evolutionary biology^1,2. The interactions between the heterospecific X and Y (or Z and W) chromosomes are often used as an explanation for two reasons. First, the fertility of the hybrids of the heterogametic sex is much more often affected than that of the homogametic sex (Haldane's rule^3) and X–Y interactions are specific to the heterogametic sex. Second, sex chromosomes, especially the X chromosome, are often considered to be of special importance in determining the fertility of hybrids^1,2,4. X–Y interactions have been addressed in studies of males with a heterospecific Y chromosome in a mixed genetic background^5–8. A more stringent test of the X–Y interaction model requires each X chromosome sterility factor to be tested separately for its interaction with the Y chromosome in a homogeneous background of the pure species. Here we report such a test of the X–Y interaction model and conclude that X–Y interactions should not be assumed to be the only or even the most common cause of hybrid sterility.HUMAN infants can discriminate between different small numbers of items^1–4, and can determine numerical equivalence across perceptual modalities^5,6. This may indicate the possession of true numerical concepts^1,4–7. Alternatively, purely perceptual discriminations may underlie these abilities^8,9. This debate addresses the nature of subitization, the ability to quantify small numbers of items without conscious counting^10,11. Subitization may involve the holistic recognition of canonical perceptual patterns that do not reveal ordinal relationships between the numbers^12, or may instead be an iterative or 'counting' process that specifies these numerical relationships^4,13. Here I show that 5-month-old infants can calculate the results of simple arithmetical operations on small numbers of items. This indicates that infants possess true numerical concepts, and suggests that humans are innately endowed with arithmetical abilities. It also suggests that subitization is a process that encodes ordinal information, not a pattern-recognition process yielding non-numerical percepts.ROCKS of crustal origin metamorphosed at ultra-high pressures ( P >2.5 GPa) have been described from several orogenic belts^1–5. In the western Alps, for example, ultra-high pressure rocks originally equilibrated at about 750 °C and 3.5 GPa (ref. 1). During decompression, these rocks were cooled considerably and therefore did not pass through the granulite stability field. Here we describe ultra-high-pressure metasediments that have equilibrated at higher temperatures (> 1,100 °C) and followed a different exhumation path. A calcsilicate marble from the Bohemian massif contains clinopyroxenes with potassium-rich feldspar exsolutions. Potassium contents in the original clinopyroxenes indicate crystallization at pressures above 3–4 GPa (refs 6, 7). The high peak pressures and temperatures inferred for this rock, and its association with high-temperature peridotites and high-pressure granulites, suggest that carbonate sediments were subducted into the upper mantle, equilibrated at mantle conditions and were then emplaced in the crust along with mantle rocks. Our observations thus support suggestions based on less direct evidence (such as mass-balance considerations in orogenic belts^8, and ocean-island basalt geochemistry^9,10) that a limited amount of sediment must be recycled into the mantle.WHEN crystals grow from a multicomponent fluid phase under conditions where ionic diffusion in the solid is negligible compared to that in the liquid, any compositional gradients in the crystal record the evolution of the solid/liquid interface composition during growth. For the particular case of oscillatory zoning^1–3, a relatively common feature of natural crystal growth^4, there has been considerable theoretical interest^4–6, but the specific question of whether high or low supersaturations are required to explain the development of the zoning remains unanswered. Experimentally produced compositional oscillations have been observed^7,8, but the role of supersaturation had to be inferred, rather than measured directly. Here we describe major-element oscillatory zoning in (Ba, Sr)SO_4 solid solutions grown by the counter-diffusion of (Ba^2+, Sr^2+) and SO^2−_4 ions through a porous silica-gel transport medium. We demonstrate how the different solubilities of the two pure phases determine the threshold supersaturation for nucleation, and show how coupling between the compositional gradients in the solid and the liquid results in the observed oscilla-tory behaviour.THE world's carbon budget has not been in steady state since the beginning of the Industrial Revolution^1. At present, carbon dioxide released by anthropogenic activities adds about 7±1.2 gigatonnes (Gt)Cyr^−1 to the atmosphere, of which about 2Gt Cyr^−1 is thought to be sequestered in the oceans^2. In the steady state, phytoplankton fix about 35–50 Gt C yr^−1, representing a significant component of the natural carbon cycle^1. If ocean productivity were changing, these biological processes could have a significant influence on anthropogenic CO_2 levels by drawing down the CO_2 concentration in surface waters and increasing the concentration gradient across the air–sea interface^1,3,4. The question of productivity changes is unresolved, however^2,5,6. Venrick et al .^7 reported that phytoplankton chlorophyll concentrations had roughly doubled in the central North Pacific gyre between 1965 and 1985. Here we use historical records of Secchi depth data to investigate whether such dramatic changes in phytoplankton biomass have occurred throughout the North Pacific ocean during this century. We find that, although very minor changes may have occurred in this basin over the past 70 years, they are too small to have a significant effect on the rise in atmospheric CO_2 concentrations.AN understanding of the natural sources and sinks of atmospheric carbon dioxide is necessary for predictions of future atmospheric loading and its consequences for global climate. Present estimates of emissions and uptake do not balance^1, and although some have attributed the imbalance to a terrestrial sink^2, the magnitude of the oceanic sink remains unresolved^2–4. It is known^5–8 that the upper 1 mm or so of the oceans represents a cool 'skin', with a temperature gradient such that the surface is generally cooler than the bulk mixed layer by about 0.3 °C as a result of the upward heat flux. Here we discuss the consequences of the 'skin effect' for the global air–sea flux of CO_2. We show that it produces an increased oceanic global uptake of about 0.7 Gt C yr^−1, when the flux from the atmosphere to the oceans is calculated on the basis of measured surface-ocean partial pressures of CO_2. This correction helps to bring into closer agreement the oceanic CO_2 uptake calculated by different methods^2–4.WHEN a dilute ionic solution freezes, differences in the partitioning of ions in the aqueous and ice phases can generate electric potentials which may influence electrochemical reactions^1–3. Fitter and co-workers^4,5 have studied the influence of freezing on the endothermic oxidation of sulphide to sulphate in growing ice crystals inside a cloud chamber. Here we report that the oxidation of nitrite by dissolved oxygen to form nitrate, which is a very slow process in solution, is accelerated markedly when it takes place in a solution undergoing freezing. At pH 4.5 and a temperature of 25 °C, the rate is increased by a factor of about 10^5 for a freezing rate of 0.2 g solution per minute; the reaction rate increases as the freezing rate increases. Although the mechanism of this acceleration is not yet clear, we are able to eliminate the possibilities of thennochemical, photochemical and simple electrochemical reactions, and of catalysis on the ice surface. Processes of this sort may be important for chemical reactions taking place in freezing cloud and fog droplets in the atmosphere.THE luminosity profile of elliptical galaxies for the most part follows a smooth distribution of the de Vaucouleurs form^1, but recent observations have shown that most ellipticals possess fine structure, including sharp-edged 'shells'^2–5 and 'ripples'^6–8. This suggests that the underlying dynamical structure is not fully relaxed, and Schweizer's proposal^6 that these features result from the accretion of matter from a less massive companion galaxy has been amply confirmed by simulations of galaxy encounters and mergers^9–14. A likely supply of shell-forming material is dwarf spheroidal and disk galaxies, which tend to be gas-rich, but shell galaxies do not seem to have any notable excess of gas^15,16. Here we report simulations of shell-forming galaxy mergers in which gas and stars are tracked separately. We find that the two components are effectively segregated: the stars form sharp-edged features by oscillating back and forth in their orbits, but most of the gas settles into a compact disk or ring in the nucleus of the primary. Shocks in the gas are likely to lead to star formation, perhaps accounting for the presence of young stars in the nuclei of some shell galaxies; if the primary galaxy contains a central black hole, evolution of the new supply of gas may yield an active galactic nucleus. Mergers between large galaxies and gas-rich satellites may therefore be a way of activating dormant elliptical galaxies.Porins form aqueous channels that aid the diffusion of small hydrophilic molecules across the outer membrane of Gram-negative bacteria. The crystal structures of matrix porin and phosphoporin both reveal trimers of identical subunits, each subunit consisting of a 16-stranded anti-parallel β-barrel containing a pore. A long loop inside the barrel contributes to a constriction of the channel where the charge distribution affects ion selectivity. The structures explain at the molecular level functional characteristics and their alterations by known mutations.Measurements of changes in atmospheric molecular oxygen using a new interferometric technique show that the O_2 content of air varies seasonally in both the Northern and Southern Hemispheres and is decreasing from year to year. The seasonal variations provide a new basis for estimating global rates of biological organic carbon production in the ocean, and the interannual decrease constrains estimates of the rate of anthropogenic CO_2 uptake by the oceans.The Crisis in Clinical Research: Over-coming Institutional Obstacles. By Edward H. Ahrens Jr. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 236. £27.50, $29.95.Climate Since AD 1500. Edited by Raymond S. Bradley and Philip D. Jones. Routledge: 1992. Pp. 679. £85.Models for Embryonic Periodicity. By Lewis I. Held Jr. Karger: 1992. Pp. 119. SFr. 195, DM 234, £84.80, $156.The bankruptcy of Wang Laboratories is sad — and confirmation that even the best cannot stand still.Neither the Republican nor Democratic party has produced a 'platform' spelling out a policy agenda for science and technology in any meaningful detail.From Stone to Star: A View of Modern Geology. By Claude Allègre. Translated by Deborah K. Van Dam. Harvard University Press: 1992. Pp. 300. $39.95, £31.95.After a delay of more than 40 years, It seems that a gloss on Feynman's way of doing quantum mechanics will help in calculating atomic ground states.TO validate procedures of rational drug design, it is important to develop computational methods that predict binding sites between a protein and a ligand molecule. Many small molecules have been tested using such programs, but examination of protein–protein and peptide–protein interactions has been sparse. We were able to test such applications once the structures of both the maltosebinding protein^1 (MBP) and the ligand-binding domain of the aspartate receptor^2, which binds MBP, became available. Here we predict the binding site of MBP to its receptor using a 'binary docking' technique in which two MBP octapeptide sequences containing mutations that eliminate maltose chemotaxis are independently docked to the receptor. The peptides in the docked solutions superimpose on their original positions in the structure of MBP and allow the formation of an MBP–receptor complex. The consistency of the computational and biological results supports this approach for predicting protein–protein and peptide–protein interactions.PEROXISOMES are cytoplasmic organelles which are important in mammals in modulation of lipid homeostasis, including the metabolism of long-chain fatty acids and conversion of cholesterol to bile salts (reviewed in refs 1 and 2). Amphipathic carboxylates such as clofibric acid have been used in man as hypolipidaemic agents and in rodents they stimulate the proliferation of peroxisomes. These agents, termed peroxisome proliferators, and all- trans retinoic acid activate genes involved in peroxisomal-mediated β-oxidation of fatty acids^1–4. Here we show that the receptor activated by peroxisome proliferators^5 and the retinoid X receptor-α (ref. 6) form a heterodimer that activates acyl-CoA oxidase gene expression in response to either clofibric acid or the retinoid X receptor-α ligand, 9- cis retinoic acid, an all- trans retinoic acid metabolite^7,8; simultaneous exposure to both activators results in a synergistic induction of gene expression. These data demonstrate the coupling of the peroxisome proliferator and retinoid signalling pathways and provide evidence for a physiological role for 9- cis retinoic acid in modulating lipid metabolism.UNDERSTANDING the process whereby the ribosome translates the genetic code into protein molecules will ultimately require high-resolution structural information, and we report here the first crystal structure of a protein from the small ribosomal subunit. This protein, S5, has a molecular mass of 17,500 and is highly conserved in all lifeforms^1–4. The molecule contains two distinct α/β domains that have structural similarities to several other proteins that are components of ribonucleoprotein complexes. Mutations in S5 result in several phenotypes which suggest that S5 may have a role in translational fidelity and translocation. These include ribosome ambiguity or ram ^5, reversion from streptomycin dependence^6 and resistance to spectinomycin^6. Also, a cold-sensitive, spectinomycin-resistant mutant of S5 has been identified which is defective in initiation^7. Here we show that these mutations map to two distinct regions of the molecule which seem to be sites of interaction with ribosomal RNA. A structure/function analysis of the molecule reveals discrepancies with current models^8,9 of the 308 subunit.PEPTIDES bound to class I molecules are 8–10 amino acids long, and possess a binding motif representative of peptides that bind to a given class I allele^1–4. In the only published study of naturally processed peptides bound to class II molecules (mouse I–A^b and I–E^b), these peptides were longer (13–17 amino acids) and had heterogenous carboxy terminals but precise ammo-terminal truncations^5. Here we report the characterization of acid-eluted peptides bound to HLA-DR1 by high-performance liquid chromatography, mass spectrometry and microsequencing analyses. The relative molecular masses of the peptides varied between 1,602 and 2,996 (13–25 residues), the most abundant individual M _r values being between 1,700 and 1,800, corresponding to an average peptide length of 15 residues. Complete sequence data were obtained for twenty peptides derived from five epitopes, of which all but one were from self proteins. These peptides represented sets nested at both the N- and C-terminal ends. Binding experiments confirmed that all of the isolated peptides had high affinity for the groove of DR1. Alignment of the peptides bound to HLA-DR1 and the sequences of 35 known HLA-DRl-binding peptides revealed a putative motif. Although peptides bound to class II molecules may have some related features (due to the nonpolymorphic HLA-DR α-chain), accounting for degenerate binding to different alleles^6, particular amino acids in the HLA-DR β-chains presumably define allelic specificity of peptide binding.CYSTIC fibrosis transmembrane conductance regulator (CFTR) is a plasma membrane Cl^− channel regulated by cyclic AMP-dependent phosphorylation and by intracellular ATP^1–7. Mutations in CFTR cause cystic fibrosis^8–10 partly through loss of cAMP-regulated Cl^− permeability from the plasma membrane of affected epithelia^11,12. The most common mutation in cystic fibrosis is deletion of phenylalanine at residue 508 (CFTRΔF508) (ref. 10). Studies on the biosynthesis^13,14 and localization^15 of CFTRΔF508 indicate that the mutant protein is not processed correctly and, as a result, is not delivered to the plasma membrane. These conclusions are consistent with earlier functional studies which failed to detect cAMP-stimnlated Cl^− channels in cells expressing CFTRΔF508 (refs 16,17). Chloride channel activity was detected, however, when CFTRΔF508 was expressed in Xenopus oocytes^18, Vero cells^19 and Sf9 insect cells^20. Because oocytes and Sf9 cells are typically maintained at lower temperatures than mammalian cells, and because processing of nascent proteins can be sensitive to temperature^21, we tested the effect of temperature on the processing of CFTRΔF508. Here we show that the processing of CFTRΔF508 reverts towards that of wild-type as the incubation temperature is reduced. When the processing defect is corrected, cAMP-regulated Cl^− channels appear in the plasma membrane. These results reconcile previous contradictory observations and suggest that the mutant most commonly associated with cystic fibrosis is temperature-sensitive.A PRINCIPAL objective in the study of heterogeneous catalysis is the determination of the structure and composition of solid surfaces under reaction conditions. Most applicable spectroscopic methods achieve surface sensitivity by detecting ejected electrons which have very short mean free paths in the solid^1. But such measurements must be carried out in vacuum, whereas catalytic reactions are typically carried out at pressures of at least one atmosphere. Although such a gas environment can be penetrated by X-rays or neutrons, these probe the bulk properties of solids rather than their surface properties^2–6. Here, we describe how a catalyst sample and its gas environment may be configured so as to constitute a photocathode ionization detector^7. By monitoring the ionization cascade rather than photon absorption, we show that X-ray absorption spectroscopy can be used to examine monolayer amounts of adsorbate on the surface of a practical catalyst at one atmosphere pressure. The wider application of this technique to complex systems in a variety of environments has considerable potential for the study of heterogeneous catalysis, and may be extended to other areas of interfacial science.SOLAR energy can be used and stored by the efficient production of long-lived photoinduced charge separation^1–3—a state achieved in photosynthetic systems by the formation of a long-lived radical pair^4–7. A number of artificial systems have been reported that efficiently undergo photochemical charge transfer^8–10; unfortunately, the thermal back electron transfer often proceeds at an appreciable rate, limiting the utility of these systems. Here we report the photochromic behaviour of novel layered zirconium phosphonate/viologen compounds which show very efficient photo-induced charge transfer, and form a charge-separated state which is long-lived and stable in air. Spectroscopic studies indicate that the photoproduct is the dialkyl viologen radical cation, produced in the inter lamellar region of the zirconium phosphonate. We suggest that the remarkable stability of the charge-separated state arises from structural features which allow for stabilization of the radicals by delocalization and shielding from molecular oxygen.THE Crab nebula, the remnant of the celebrated supernova of 1054 (refs 1, 2), lies 2 kpc from the Earth^3,4 and is the most powerful neutron-star-driven nebulosity known. Its emission from radio to X-ray wavelengths is predominantly synchrotron radiation, with a power-law spectrum that steepens abruptly at 10^13 and 10^16 Hz (ref. 4). The infrared satellite observatory IRAS revealed significant excess emission, above the synchrotron spectrum, peaking between 60 and 100 μm in wavelength^5. This was attributed to thermal radiation by dust with at least two characteristic temperatures in the range 40–100 K (refs 5,6). We have now reanalysed the IRAS data, taking care to remove contamination by background emission, and find that the revised infrared flux densities are in fact well explained by a single dust component at a temperature of 46 K. The required dust mass is 0.02 solar masses ( M _⊙), corresponding to a gas to dust ratio of 100:1. We also determine more accurately the break frequency, 1.4 × 10^13 Hz, in the power-law spectrum. This value implies, for a steady-state synchrotron model, a time-averaged magnetic field of 420 μ,G, which is less than the value corresponding to an equipartition of energy between radiating particles and magnetic field, but probably greater than the present field strength.The Carnegie Commission would like to see better management of international environmental research.Three-dimensional structures of complexes of the SH2 domain of the v- src oncogene product with two phosphotyrosyl peptides have been determined by X-ray crystallography at resolutions of 1.5 and 2.0 Å, respectively. A central antiparallel β-sheet in the structure is flanked by two α -helices, with peptide binding mediated by the sheet, intervening loops and one of the helices. The specific recognition of phosphotyrosine involves amino–aromatic interactions between lysine and arginine side chains and the ring system in addition to hydrogen-bonding interactions with the phosphate.Phosphorylation of the carboxy-terminal domain of the largest subunit of RNA polymerase II is believed to control the transition from transcription initiation to elongation. The general transcription factor IIH (TFIIH) contains a kinase activity capable of phosphorylating this domain. Factors that promote the association of RNA polymerase II with the preinitiation complex stimulate this activity. The transcription factor HE, which is required for the stable association of TFIIH with the preinitiation complex, affects the processivity of TFIIH kinase.The GATT negotiations now mercifully reaching the end of their six-year course are not arcane procedures invented to keep diplomats busy, but a vital means by which the benefits of technology are widely shared.The Transformed Cell: Unlocking the Mysteries of Cancer. By Steven A. Rosenberg and John M. Barry. Putnam/ Chapmans: 1992. Pp. 353. $24.95, £15.99.Protein Structure: New Approaches to Disease and Therapy. By Max Perutz. W. H. Freeman: 1992. Pp. 326. $39.95, £32.95 (hbk); $29.95, £21.95 (pbk).The Creative Moment: How Science Made Itself Alien to Modern Culture. By Joseph Schwartz. Jonathan Cape/HarperCollins. Pp. 252. £16.99, $25.Referees are the most honourable men and women, but they should not fight shy of refusing to referee manuscripts in which their interest is overdirect.MULTISTRANDED DNA structures based upon guanine association have been proposed to be important in the structure of chromosome telomeres^1 and in immunoglobulin class switching^2. Nucleic acids containing runs of guanine bases form a number of structures in vitro ^3–6, including fold-back structures (Fig. l a )^7–9 and parallel-stranded quadruplex structures in DNA^2,10 and RNA^11. The features of fold-back structures have now been determined at high-resolution^12–14. The different structures are probably based on a tetrad of hydrogen-bonded guanine bases (Fig. 1 b ), with buffer conditions and sequence effects mediating isomerization between the different forms^4,15–18. Here we use NMR spectroscopy to investigate the solution structure of the complex formed by the hexadeoxynucleotide d(TG_4T) in the presence of sodium ions. We have observed the formation of a parallel-stranded quadruplex containing hydrogen-bonded tetrads of guanine. The parallel-stranded form differs significantly from the fold-back form, with individual nucleotide conformations being closer to those of B-form DNA.PAIRWISE recognition of splice sites as a result of a scanning mechanism is an attractive model to explain the coordination of vertebrate splicing^1. Such a mechanism would predict a polarity-of-site recognition in the scanned unit, but no evidence for a polarity gradient across introns has been found^2–4. We have suggested that the exon rather than the intron is the unit of recognition in vertebrates^5 and that polyadenylation and splicing factors interact during recognition of 3′-terminal exons^6–8. Interaction is reflected in maximal rates of in vitro polyadenylation. If scanning across the exon is operating during this interaction, then insertion of a 5′ splice site should depress polyadenylation. Here we report recognition in vitro and in vivo of a 5′ splice site situated within a 3′-terminal exon, and a concomitant depression of polyadenylation and ultraviolet crosslinking of a polyadenylation factor. Decreased crosslinking was only found when the 3′ and 5′ splice sites were within 300 nucleotides of each other. These results are consistent with an exon scanning mechanism for splice-site selection.THE first step in flower development is the transition of an inflorescence meristem into a floral meristem. Each floral meristem differentiates into a flower consisting of four organ types that occupy precisely defined positions within four concentric whorls. Genetic studies in Arabidopsis thaliana and Antirrhinum majus have identified early-acting genes that determine the identity of the floral meristem, and late-acting genes that determine floral organ identity^1–5. In Arabidopsis, at least two genes, APETALA1 and LEAFY, are required for the transition of an inflorescence meristem into a floral meristem^1. We have cloned the APETALA1 gene and here we show that it encodes a putative transcription factor that contains a MADS-domain^2. APETALA1 RNA is uniformly expressed in young flower primordia, and later becomes localized to sepals and petals. Our results suggest that APETALA1 acts locally to specify the identity of the floral meristem, and to determine sepal and petal development.STUDIES of intracellular traffic in yeast and mammalian systems have implicated members of the Rab family of small GTP-binding proteins as regulators of membrane fusion^1–10. We have used the patch clamp technique to measure exocytotic fusion events directly and investigate the role of GTP-binding proteins in regulating exocytosis in mast cells. Intracellular perfusion of mast cells with GTP-γS is sufficient to trigger complete exocytotic degranulation in the absence of other intracellular messengers^11. Here we show that GTP is a potent inhibitor of GTP-γS-induced degranulation, indicating that sustained activation of a GTP-binding protein is sufficient for membrane fusion. We have found that synthetic oligopeptides, corresponding to part of the effector domain of Rab3a^12, stimulate complete exocytotic degranulation, similar to that induced by GTP-γS. The response is selective for Rab3a sequence and is strictly dependent on Mg^2+ and ATP. This suggests that sustained activation of a Rab3 protein causes exocytotic fusion. The peptide response can be accelerated by GDP-βS, suggesting that Rab3a peptides compete with endogenous Rab3 proteins for a binding site on a target effector protein, which causes fusion on activation.MAMMALS have separate enzymatic and cellularly mediated detoxification systems. Glutathione S -transferases (GSTs) protect against xenobiotic chemicals which continuously enter the body, largely through mucous membranes^1–5. These enzymes catalyse the conjugation of glutathione with a wide variety of electrophilic compounds rendering them non-toxic. Mammals also mount a cellular immunological response on entry of foreign cells, viruses or macro molecules into the body^6–8. T lymphocytes mobilize at the site of foreign body entry and secrete protein messengers called lymphokines. Secondary to T lymphocytes, macrophages concentrate at the infection site and function in antigen processing and phagocytosis. In vitro , macrophage movement is arrested by one class of lymphokines known as macrophage migration inhibitory factors (MIFs). We report here the purification of milligram quantities of a unique multifunctional protein from rat liver which links enzymatic and immunological detoxification systems. This protein actuates both GST and MIF activity and matches the primary structure of a human MIF^9 in 25 out of 26 amino-terminal amino acids. Primary structure comparisons revealed significant similarity between GSTs and MIF. The glutathione affinity chromatography purification described here yields a 100-fold increase in obtaining MIF^9–11 and will aid understanding of its precise biological function.CLASS II major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecules function as antigen-presenting elements as well as signal transducers on B lymphocytes. We previously reported that a B lym-phoma cell transfectant, 5C2, expressing genetically engineered I-A^k molecules with truncated cytoplasmic domains was severely impaired in both antigen presentation and in anti-Ia-induced intracytoplasmic signalling^1–5. These two functions could be restored by preculturing 5C2 cells with cyclic AMP analogues^6,7. Here we demonstrate that impaired signal transduction by truncated class II molecules results in a deficiency in induction of the newly defined B-cell accessory molecule B7 (ref. 8), which can be reversed by restoration of B7 expression. These data imply that contact of the T-cell antigen receptor with MHC/antigen ligand results in signal transmission through the class II cytoplasmic domain. This signal, which can be mimicked by dibutyryl cAMP, induces expression of B7, resulting in effective antigen presentation. The fact that crosslinking of surface class II MHC also induces B7 expression on normal resting human B cells^9 supports this contention.THE lifespan of thymic-derived or T lymphocytes is of particular interest because of their central role in immunological memory. Is the recall of a vaccination or early infection, which may be demonstrated clinically up to 50 years after antigen exposure^1, retained by a long-lived cell, or by its progeny? Using the observation that T lymphocyte expression of isoforms of CD45 corresponds with their ability to respond to recall antigens, we have investigated the lifespan of both CD45RO (the subset containing responders, or 'memory' cells) and CD45RA (the unresponsive, or 'naive' subset) lymphocytes in a group of patients after radiotherapy. Here we report rapid loss of unstable chromosomes from the CD45RO but not the CD45RA pool. Immunological memory therefore apparently resides in a population with a more rapid rate of division. Differing survival curves for the two subsets are best described by a model in which there is also reversion in vivo from the CD45RO to the CD45RA phenotype. Expression of CD45RO in T cells may therefore be reversible.THE skeletal muscle dihydropyridine (DHP) receptor serves dual functions, as a voltage sensor for excitation–contraction coupling and as an L-type calcium channel^1–3. Biochemical analysis indicates the presence of two forms of the DHP receptor polypeptide in skeletal muscle, a full-length translation product present as a minor species and a much more abundant form that has a truncated carboxy-terminus^4–6. On the basis of these and other observations^7, it has been proposed^8 that, in skeletal muscle, only the full-length DHP receptor can function as a calcium channel and that the truncated form can only function as a voltage sensor for excitation–contraction coupling. To resolve this issue, we have now constructed a complementary DNA (pC6Δl) encoding a protein corresponding to the truncated DHP receptor in skeletal muscle. Expression of pC6Δl in dysgenic myotubes fully restores both excitation–contraction coupling and calcium current, consistent with the idea that a single class of DHP receptors performs both functions.THE functional activity of ion channels and other membrane proteins requires that the proteins be correctly assembled in a transmembrane configuration. Thus, the functional expression of ion channels, neurotransmitter receptors and complex membrane-limited signalling mechanisms from complementary DNA has required the injection of messenger RNA or transfection of DNA into Xenopus oocytes or other target cells that are capable of processing newly translated protein into the surface membrane^1–4. These approaches, combined with voltage-clamp analysis of ion channel currents, have been especially powerful in the identification of structure–function relationships in ion channels^5–7. But oocytes express endogenous ion channels^8,9, neurotransmitter receptors^10 and receptor–channel subunits^11, complicating the interpretation of results in mRNA-injected eggs. Furthermore, it is difficult to control experimentally the membrane lipids and post-translational modifications that underlie the regulation and modulation of ion channels in intact cells. A cell-free system for ion channel expression is ideal for good experimental control of protein expression and modulatory processes. Here we combine cell-free protein translation, microsomal membrane processing^12–14 of nascent channel proteins, and reconstitution of newly synthesized ion channels into planar lipid bilayers^15 to synthesize, glycosylate, process into membranes, and record in vitro the activity of functional Shaker potassium channels.GLUTAMATE is important in several forms of synaptic plasticity such as long-term potentiation, and in neuronal cell degeneration^1,2. Glutamate activates several types of receptors, including a metabotropic receptor that is sensitive to trans -1-amino-cyclopenthyl-l,3-dicarboxylate, coupled to G protein(s) and linked to inositol phospholipid metabolism^3–6. The activation of the metabotropic receptor in neurons generates inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate, which causes the release of Ca^2+ from intracellular stores and diacylglycerol, which activates protein kinase C^7–9. In nerve terminals, the activation of presynaptic protein kinase C with phorbol esters enhances glutamate release^10. But the presynaptic receptor involved in this protein kinase C-mediated increase in the release of glutamate has not yet been identified. Here we demonstrate the presence of a presynaptic glutamate receptor of the metabotropic type that mediates an enhancement of glutamate exocytosis in cerebrocortical nerve terminals. Interestingly, this potentiation of glutamate release is observed only in the presence of arachidonic acid, which may reflect that this positive feedback control of glutamate exocytosis operates in concert with other pre- or post-synaptic events of the glutamatergic neurotransmission that generate arachidonic acid. This presynaptic glutamate receptor may have a physiological role in the maintenance of long-term potentiation where there is an increase in glutamate release mediated by postsynaptically generated arachidonic acid^11.NEUROPSYCHIATRIC disorders such as anxiety, depression, migraine, vasospasm and epilepsy may involve different subtypes of the 5-hydroxytryptamine (5-HT) receptor^1,2. The IB subtype, which has a unique pharmacology, was first identified in rodent brain^3–7. But a similar receptor could not be detected in human brain^6, suggesting the absence in man of a receptor with equivalent function. Recently a human receptor gene was isolated (designated 5-HT_1B receptor^8,9, 5-HT_1D β receptor^10,11, or S^12 receptor^12) which shares 93% identity of the deduced protein sequence with rodent 5-HT_1B receptors^13–15. Although this receptor is identical to rodent 5-HT_1B receptors in binding to 5-HT, it differs profoundly in binding to many drugs. Here we show that replacement of a single amino acid in the human receptor (threonine at residue 355) with a corresponding asparagine found in rodent 5-HT_1B receptors renders the pharmacology of the receptors essentially identical. This demonstrates that the human gene does indeed encode a 1B receptor, which is likely to have the same biological functions as the rodent 5-HT_1B receptor. In addition, these findings show that minute sequence differences between homologues of the same receptor from different species can cause large pharmacological variation. Thus, drug–receptor interactions should not be extrapolated from animal to human species without verification.MOST models of neural networks have assumed that neurons process information on a timescale of milliseconds and that the long-term modification of synaptic strengths underlies learning and memory^1. But neurons also have cellular mechanisms that operate on a timescale of tens or hundreds of milliseconds, such as a gradual rise in firing rate in response to injection of constant current^2 or a rapid rise followed by a slower adaptation^3. These dynamic properties of neuronal responses are mediated by ion channels that are subject to modulation^4. We demonstrate here how a neural network with recurrent feedback connections can convert long-term modulation of neural responses that occur over these intermediate timescales into changes in the amplitude of the steady output from the system. This general principle may be relevant to many feedback systems in the brain. Here it is applied to the vestibulo–ocular reflex, whose amplitude is subject to long-term adaptive modification by visual inputs^5. The model reconciles apparently contradictory data on the neural locus of the cellular mechanisms that mediate this simple form of learning and memory.Structure and Evolution of Single and Binary Stars. By C. W. H. de Loore and C. Doom. Kluwer: 1992. Pp. 458. DFL 240, á£84, $142 (hbk); DFL 120, á£42, $69 (pbk).SEXUAL dimorphism in body size is widespread in the animal kingdom. Whereas male giantism has been studied and explained extensively^1,2, male dwarfism has not. Yet it is neither rare^3–7 nor without theoretical interest^8,9. Here we provide experimental and comparative data on spiders to support the theory that dwarf males are associated with high differential adult mortality, with males at much greater risk. Species with sedentary (low-risk) females have dwarf, roving (high-risk) males. Life-history theory could readily explain dwarfing if juvenile, but not adult, male mortality were large. We present a new model in which high mortality of searching mature males reduces the adult sex ratio (males: females), relaxing male–male competition and reducing the importance of male body size to favour dwarfing by early maturation. Early maturity also reduces male juvenile mortality and thus opposes adult mortality. This provides a mechanism that buffers skews in adult sex ratio and which is quite distinct from Fisher's principle^10 and allied mechanisms^9,11 for the primary sex ratio.CHRONIC pollution of the open ocean has occurred since 1986 through disposal of municipal sewage sludge at a deep-water (∼2,500 m) dumpsite off the coast of New Jersey. Dispersal and dilution of sewage particulates in surface waters were presumed to be sufficient to prevent or minimize accumulation of detectable amounts of sewage-derived material on the sea floor. Using stable isotope ratios of carbon, nitrogen and sulphur as tracers of sewage-derived organic material, we show here that this material reaches the sea floor and enters the benthic food web, specifically through surface-deposit feeding activities of the urchin, Echinus affinus and the sea cucumber, Benthodytes sanguinolenta .Cellular telephony seems likely to turn the US telecommunications business upside down.ZHANG and Tanimoto^1 have used the results of a new high-resolution three-dimensional model of shear-wave velocities in the Earth's upper mantle^2 to conclude that, whereas hotspots are underlain by low-velocity anomalies extending to ∼200 km depth, the corresponding anomalies under mid-ocean ridges are shallower (∼100 km) in extent. Here we show that such a shallow origin for the mid-ocean-ridge anomalies is inconsistent, by a factor of 3–5, with the observed travel-time residuals for the seismic phase SS (ref. 3). A three-dimensional model describing shear velocities in the entire mantle^4, derived independently of the SS observations but based on a large set of waveforms (15,000 seismograms^5) and differential travel-time data (8,200 measurements^6,7), shows the velocity anomalies associated with all mid-ocean ridges as continuous features down to 300 km depth. Some of these low-velocity anomalies continue throughout the upper mantle, and may extend into the lower mantle.CONSIDERABLE controversy surrounds the suggestion, based on palaeomagnetic evidence, that large segments of the North American Cordillera travelled long distances parallel to the coast during the latest Cretaceous and early Tertiary periods, well after the amalgamation of exotic terranes. Discordant palaeomagnetic data from mid-Cretaceous plutonic rocks of the Peninsular Ranges batholith of coastal southern California and Baja and the Mount Stuart batholith of the Cascade Range in Washington play a pivotal role in the controversy. The discordant data were originally interpreted to reflect northward transport of ≥1,000 km relative to cratonal North America, after the batholiths cooled through their magnetic blocking temperatures^1–5. More recently it has been argued that the discordances arise from local tilting of batholiths, rather than northward offset^6,7. Here we present and implement new methods based on hornblende barometry^8 for determining the palaeohorizontal in granitic batholiths and correcting palaeomagnetic data for tilting. Our results indicate that the Peninsular Ranges and Mount Stuart batholiths have undergone northward offsets of ∼1,000 ±450 and ∼2,900±700 km, respectively, and also significant tilting.MEASUREMENTS of the cadmium content of marine CaCO_3 deposits, such as aragonitic corals^1 and foraminiferal shells^2,3, have been used to trace past ocean circulation^2 and as an indicator of labile nutrient concentrations^4. In particular, studies of foraminiferal cadmium have provided insight into the oceanic processes controlling atmospheric CO_2 concentration in glacial times^5,6. The use of Cd/Ca ratios in CaCO_3 as a labile nutrient indicator is made possible by a relationship between seawater cadmium and phosphate content that is remarkably uniform throughout the present ocean (Fig.l). In deep waters of the open ocean, [Cd] at a given value of [PO^3−_4] is consistent within about ±7%; However, there is a unusual kink in the relationship at [PO^3−_4]≈ 1.3 μmol kg^−1 whose cause is not known but which has been suggested^2 to result from a slightly deeper regeneration cycle for Cd relative to PO^3−_4. Points to the right of the kink correspond mainly to intermediate and deep waters of the North Pacific, whereas low PO^3−_4 concentrations to the left of the kink represent mainly Atlantic and upper-ocean waters^4. Waters of the Southern Ocean have a strong influence on the composition of the global ocean but few Cd–PO^3−_4 measurements are available for this region. Here we present recent data for Cd and PO^3−_4 in Southern Ocean waters, which suggest that the kink is created by the input of Cd-depleted Subantarctic waters into the intermediate waters of the global ocean.IONIC gels with the ability to absorb many times their dry weight of water have found widespread use as absorbents in medical, chemical and agricultural applications^1. The dramatic swelling power of these super-absorbent gels results from both the electrostatic repulsion between the charges on the polymer chains, and the osmotic pressure of the counter-ions^2. In salt solutions such as saline, urine or blood, however, excess Na^+ and Cl^− ions screen the polymer charges and eliminate the osmotic imbalance, effectively changing the properties of the material to that of a non-ionic gel^3: this greatly diminishes the swelling power, and hence the utility of these materials under physiological conditions. Here we report the development of a system combining a non-ionic gel with ionized surfactants, which shows super-absorbent behaviour even in the presence of salt. In water, the hydrophobic gel facilitates the formation of spherical surfactant micelles, which mimic the charged sites of an ionic gel. As the salt concentration is increased, the micelles become rod-like, maintaining the electrostatic repulsion along the polymer chains and thereby preserving the swelling power of the gel.THE enigmatic radio and optical nebula G70.7 + 1.2^1,2 has been suggested to be a young supernova remnant^3,4, a nova shell^4, a cometary^5 H II region^6 and a protostellar outflow^7. Claims^4,7 of strong nonthermal radio emission cast severe doubts on all but the supernova remnant model, but for this the expansion velocity^4 would be low. We present here new data that firmly establish the nonthermal nature of the radio emission, and from H α and [O I] Fabry–Perot observations we argue that the extended optical emission arises from a bow shock powered by a mass-losing luminous (Be) star moving supersonically through dense gas. The nonthermal emission is then explained as the shocked relativistic wind from a pulsar, which we propose is a companion to the Be star. The coincidence of the optical and radio emission requires the pulsar and stellar winds to be mixed together. The system has a large overall velocity, ∼60 km s^−1, which is inexplicable in all other models but which is typical of binary pulsars. Detection of pulsed emission and of the predicted proper motion would confirm our proposal.THE interstellar medium in our vicinity forms an elongated cavity of X-ray-emitting gas, extending up to 200 pc from the Sun^1,2. The gas inside this local bubble is very hot (∼ 10^6 K) and tenuous (electron density n _e ≈ 0.005 cm^−3), and is typical of material in the coronal phase of the interstellar medium, thought to occur when hot stars or supernovae blow out holes in cooler and denser interstellar gas. Little is known about turbulent density fluctuations in the coronal gas, but its physical state is important in understanding cosmic ray confinement and the energy balance of interstellar material, as well as the scattering of radio emission from compact sources^3,4. To probe turbulence in the local interstellar medium, we have made scintillation measurements at 50 MHz (6 m wavelength) of emission from the nearby pulsar 0950 + 08, which happens to lie near the edge of the local bubble. From the scintillation bandwidth we deduce the amplitude of the electron-density fluctuation spectrum in the coronal gas alone, and find it to be an order of magnitude lower than for any previously measured interstellar line of sight. We conclude that the interior of the bubble is relatively quiescent and that high levels of plasma turbulence—if they exist—must be localized to the cavity boundary.ACTIVE galactic nuclei (AGNs) exhibit high luminosity with rapid variability, especially in X-ray emission, for which the luminosity can be greater than that of a normal galaxy, and the variability timescale implies an emitting region in some cases smaller than one light hour^1. The hard X-ray spectrum of AGNs is nonthermal, probably arising from an electron–positron pair cascade, with some emission reflected off relatively cold matter^2,3. Energy can be pumped into a cascade by any process that produces relativistic pairs, but because electrons and positrons are hard to accelerate efficiently, there has been interest in models in which protons are accelerated^4,5, and create relativistic electrons on interaction with a local radiation field^6–8. Here we show that a sufficient column density of protons can lead to runaway pair production: photons generated by the relativistic pairs are the targets for the protons to produce more pairs. This process can produce X-ray flares with the observed characteristics, and our model predicts the maximum ratio of luminosity to source size ('compactness') as well as their spectrum in the early phases. The same mechanism may also be able to create the knots of synchrotron-radiating pair plasma seen in sources such as 3C273.C-type (Ca^2+-dependent) animal lectins such as mannose-binding proteins mediate many cell-surface carbohydrate-recognition events. The crystal structure at 1.7 Å resolution of the carbohydrate-recognition domain of rat mannose-binding protein complexed with an oligomannose asparaginyl-oligosaccharide reveals that Ca^2+ forms coordination bonds with the carbohydrate ligand. Carbohydrate specificity is determined by a network of coordination and hydrogen bonds that stabilizes the ternary complex of protein, Ca^2+ and sugar. Two branches of the oligosaccharide crosslink neighbouring carbohydrate-recognition domains in the crystal, enabling multivalent binding to a single oligosaccharide chain to be visualized directly.The concept of gene-for-gene coevolution is a major model for research on the evolution of resistance against parasites in crop plants, reciprocal evolution between species in natural plant populations, and mathematical models of the dynamics of coevolution. Recent studies have begun to challenge the prevailing view that natural selection within local plant populations is the major evolutionary process driving this form of coevolution. The emerging pattern from these studies suggests that metapopulation structure, including the effects of gene flow and genetic drift, may be at least as important as local natural selection in determining the genetic dynamics and outcomes of these evolutionary arms races.Insect Chemical Ecology: An Evolutionary Approach. Edited by Bernard D. Roitberg and Murray B. Isman. Chapman and Hall: 1992. Pp.359. á£55, $75 (hbk); á£24.95, $35 (pbk).The election of Bill Clinton as US president is good news for fetal tissue research and for AIDS.If the disappointments of the past few weeks have tarnished the hope of winning ratification of the Maastricht Treaty, why not confess that the treaty is far from perfect and renegotiate it?Dunaliella: Physiology, Biochemistry and Biotechnology. Edited by M. Avron and A. Ben-Amotz. CRC Press: 1992. Pp. 240. á£109, $149.95.Animal Minds. By Donald R. Griffin. University of Chicago Press: 1992. Pp. 320. $24.95, á£19.95.A History of the Mind: Evolution and the Birth of Consciousness. By Nicholas Humphrey. Chatto and Windus/Simon and Schuster: 1992. Pp. 238. á£16.99, $22.00. The Strange, Familiar and Forgotten: An Anatomy of Consciousness. By Israel Rosenfield. Knopf/Picador: 1992. Pp. 157. $20, á£14.99.A chamber for assessing the invasive properties of cells in vitro , tritium-labelled AZT-triphosphate and a gel microdrop maker are a selection of this week's new products in the scientific marketplace.The role of specific chemicals in the aetiology of human cancer can now be assessed using ^32P-postlabelling in combination with corroborative biomonitoring techniques.THE principal protein excreted in male rat urine, urinary α 2-globulin and the homologous mouse protein, major urinary protein, have been well characterized, although their functions remain unclear. Male rat urine affects the behaviour and sexual response of female rats^1, leading to the proposal that rodent urinary proteins are responsible for binding pheromones and their subsequent release from drying urine^2. Urinary α 2-globulin is also involved in hyaline droplet nephropathy, an important toxicological syndrome in male rats resulting from exposure to a number of industrial chemicals and characterized by the accumulation of liganded urinary α 2-globulin in lysosomes in the kidney, followed by the induction of renal cancer^3. We now report the three-dimensional structures of mouse major urinary protein (at 2.4 Å resolution) and rat urinary α 2-globulin (at 2.8 Å resolution). The results corroborate the role of these proteins in pheromone transport and elaborate the structural basis of ligand binding.CALCIUM-DEPENDENT or C-type carbohydrate-recognition domains are homologous protein modules found in a variety of animal lectins^1. Selective binding of sugars by these domains is essential for glycoprotein clearance, cell–cell adhesion and pathogen neutralization. Although various C-type carbohydrate-recognition domains share sequence identity ranging from 20 to 55%, their sugar-binding characteristics vary widely. The structure of a mannose-binding carbohydrate-recognition domain in complex with a saccharide ligand suggests that two glutamic acid–asparagine pairs are essential determinants of ligand binding by this domain^2. In C-type lectins that bind galactose with higher affinity than mannose, one of these pairs is replaced by glutamine–aspartic acid. Here we shift the sequence of the mannose-binding protein to correspond to that found in galactose-binding domains in order to test the importance of these residues in sugar-binding selectivity. This simple switch in the position of a single amide group alters the binding activity of the domain so that galactose becomes the preferred ligand.A demonstration of the successive excitations of rubidium atoms by lasers may be a model for the selective dissociation of molecules for which chemical engineers would (and will) give fortunes.The large Human Capital and Mobility programme may at first sight seem like good news for European scientists. But this is far from the case.SKIN wounds in embryos heal rapidly and perfectly. Even though the epidermis appears to be stretched taut over the surface of a structure such as a growing limb bud, its response to wounding is to close over the lesion, rather than to gape more widely. In adult wounds, the epidermis seems to migrate by means of lamellipodia, crawling over the exposed connective tissue^1–5. But in embryonic wounds we do not see lamellipodia. The epidermis at the edge of the wound looks smooth, as though under a circumferential tension. Here we show that a cable of filamentous actin appears to run continuously around most of the wound margin. It is confined to the single row of basal cells at the free edge of the epidermis. We suggest that the actin cable acts as a contractile 'purse string' to close up the embryonic wound.INACTIVATING mutations of the retinoblastoma gene ( RB ) are found in a wide variety of tumour cells^1. Replacement of wild-type RB can suppress the tumorigenicity of some of these cells, suggesting that the RB protein (Rb) may negatively regulate cell growth^2–4. As activation of c- myc expression promotes cell proliferation and blocks differentiation, it may positively regulate cell growth^5–9. The c- myc protein is localized in the nucleus and can physically associate with RB protein in vitro ^10, hence c- myc may functionally antagonize RB function. Microinjection of Rb in Gl phase reversibly arrests cell-cycle progression^11. Here we co-inject RB protein with c- myc , EJ- ras , c- fos or c- jun protein. Co-injection of c- myc , but not EJ- ras , c- fos or c- jun , inhibits the ability of Rb to arrest the cell cycle. The c- myc does not inhibit the activity of another tumour supressor, p53 (ref. 12). Thus, c- myc and RB specifically antagonize one another in the cell.MAJOR histocompatibility complex (MHC) class I molecules bind and deliver peptides derived from endogenously synthesized proteins to the cell surface for survey by cytotoxic T lymphocytes. It is believed that endogenous antigens are generally degraded in the cytosol, the resulting peptides being translocated into the endoplasmic reticulum where they bind to MHC class I molecules. Transporters containing an ATP-binding cassette encoded by the MHC class II region seem to be responsible for this transport^1–8. Genes coding for two subunits of the '20S' proteasome (a multicatalytic proteinase) have been found in the vicinity of the two transporter genes in the MHC class II region, indicating that the proteasome could be the unknown proteolytic entity in the cytosol involved in the generation of MHC class I-binding peptides^9–13. By introducing rat genes encoding the MHC-linked transporters into a human cell line lacking both transporter and proteasome subunit genes, we show here that the MHC-encoded proteasome subunits are not essential for stable MHC class I surface expression, or for processing and presentation of antigenic peptides from influenza virus and an intracellular protein.The retinoblastoma gene is mutated in several types of human cancer and is the best characterized of the tumour-suppressor genes. A mouse strain has been constructed in which one allele of Rb is disrupted. These heterozygous animals are not predisposed to retinoblastoma, but some display pituitary tumours arising from cells in which the wild-type Rb allele is absent. Embryos homozygous for the mutation die between days 14 and 15 of gestation, exhibiting neuronal cell death and defective erythropoiesis.LARGE changes in the direction of gaze are made with a combina-tion of fast saccadic eye movements and rather slower head move-ments. Since the first study on freely moving subjects^1, most authors have agreed that the head movement component of gaze is very variable, with a high ‘volitional’ component^2. But in some circum-stances head and eye movements can be quite predictable, for example when a subject is asked to shift gaze as quickly as possible^3. Under these conditions, laboratory studies have shown that the eye and head motor-systems both receive gaze-change commands, although they execute them in rather different ways^3–6. Here I reconsider the way gaze direction is changed during free movement, but in the performance of a task where the subject is too busy to exert conscious control over head or eye movements. Using a new portable and inexpensive method for recording head and eye movements, I examine the oculomotor behaviour of car drivers, particularly during the large gaze changes made at road junctions. The results show that the pattern of eye and head movements is highly preditable, given only the sequence of gaze targets.MESQUITE (Prosopis) trees growing in the rainless region of the Atacama Desert produce leaves that abscise and accumulate on a concrete-like carbonate surface, often attaining litter depths of 45 cm. The virtual lack of surface moisture inhibits leaf decomposi-tion, and prevents cycling of nitrogen, the mineral most often limiting plant growth. Leaves in the midpoint of a litter profile were aged to pre-bomb dates (older than 1950) and had both high nitrogen concentrations and a carbon to nitrogen ratio comparable to that of live leaves. The thick carbonate layer prevents root growth into the litter. Prosopis appear to persist by having roots that fix nitrogen in moist subsurface layers and by extracting water and other nutrients from ground water, allowing plants to persist in an ecosystem in which there is no nitrogen cycling.THE mineralization of organic carbon in the deep ocean has been considered an enigma in the North Pacific. Comparisons of the supply of particulate organic carbon (POC) with estimates of its mineralization to CO_2 by the sediment community have indicated that the supply of POC sinking into the benthic boundary layer may be as much as 97% short of meeting the organic carbon demand of the sediment community_1,2. These previous findings were based on short-time-series measurements (<14 days) conducted in situ with sediment traps and benthic respirometers. We report here a comparison of long-time-series measurements (2.3 years) of POC flux into the benthic boundary layer and concurrent, seasonal measurements of sediment community oxygen consump-tion. We chose a single abyssal station (4,100 m depth) in a region of the eastern North Pacific where there is a strong seasonal fluctuation in primary production, and where previous studies^1,2 showed the supply of POC to be as much as an order of magnitude lower than the demand by the sediment community. Our measure-ments, using the same methods, show agreement to within 15% between organic carbon supply and demand. This reconciliation is attributable to the inclusion of previously undetected episodic inputs of POC into the benthic boundary layer. These episodic inputs are critical to sustaining the sediment community at this station, and are probably important in other deep-sea environments where seasonal fluctuations in primary production are prominent in surface waters.Two prosperous countries in the West — Germany and the United States — are in trouble over health costs.THE Greenland ice sheet offers the most favourable conditions in the Northern Hemisphere for obtaining high-resolution continuous time series of climate-related parameters. Profiles of ^18O/<^16O ratio along three previous deep Greenland ice cores^1–3 seemed to reveal irregular but well-defined episodes of relatively mild climate conditions (interstadials) during the mid and late parts of the last glaciation, but there has been some doubt as to whether the shifts in oxygen isotope ratio were genuine representations of changes in climate, rather than artefacts due to disturbed stratification. Here we present results from a new deep ice core drilled at the summit of the Greenland ice sheet, where the depositional environ-ment and the flow pattern of the ice are close to ideal for core recovery and analysis. The results reproduce the previous findings to such a degree that the existence of the interstadial episodes can no longer be in doubt. According to a preliminary timescale based on stratigraphic studies, the interstadials lasted from 500 to 2,000 years, and their irregular occurrence suggests complexity in the behaviour of the North Atlantic ocean circulation.GAMMA-RAY bursts (GRBs) vary in duration from hundreds of seconds down to several milliseconds. Early studies^1 suggested that bursts with durations of <100 ms form a distinct class, accounting for a few per cent of the total number of detected bursts, and there is some evidence^2 for a break in the distribution of GRB durations at ∼600 ms, perhaps implying separate physical mechanisms for long and short bursts. Recently the estimated number of short GRBs has risen substantially. The shortest burst recorded so far is GRB820405, with duration ∼12ms (ref. 3), and the shortest spike within a burst, an unresolved feature with width <5 ms, was in GRB841215 (refs 4–7). GRB790305 had the shortest rise-time, 0.2ms. We report here that GRB910711, with apparently the shortest duration (∼8 ms) yet seen by the Burst and Transient Source Experiment (BATSE), has a time profile that shows significant submillisecond structure. The responses to this burst in the different BATSE detectors, from both direct and Earth-scattered γ-rays, show that the burst is both narrower and of higher energy than is indicated by a light-curve summed over all detectors. We detected a narrow spike of duration 200 μs in the light curve; variations on this timescale have not previously been observed in GRBs, and their explanation should be a stringent test of any GRB theory.FLUORESCENT emission from iron and the detection of a Compton reflection 'hump'^1–3 in the X-ray spectra^4,5 of many active galaxies are strong evidence for the presence of cold (nearly neutral) optically thick material in their nuclear regions. An apparent absorption edge at 8–9 keV, attributed to iron, in about half of a large number of Seyfert galaxies^5 indicates the additional presence of warm (partially ionized) absorbing material, which could modify the emergent X-ray spectrum and explain flux-correlated changes in spectral shape^6–8. If this interpretation is correct, the warm absorber should give rise to a number of spectral features, particularly absorption edges, whose energy can be used to deduce the ionization state of the material. Here we report the detection of such a feature in the bright Seyfert galaxy MCG-6-30-15, in the form of absorption at 0.8 keV arising from the presence of highly ionized oxygen. This warm absorber will be difficult to detect at other wavelengths but, may contribute significantly to the overall X-ray opacity of the nuclear region.Cystic flbrosis is a fatal genetic disorder which afflicts 50,000 people worldwide. A viable animal model would be invaluable for investigating and combating this disease. The mouse cystic flbrosis transmembrane conductance regulator gene was disrupted in embryonal stem cells using an insertional gene targeting vector. Germ-line chimaeras were derived and the offspring of heterozygous crosses studied. These homozygous mutant mice survive beyond weaning. In vivo electrophysiology demonstrates the predicted defect in chloride ion transport in these mice and can distinguish between each genotype. Histological analysis detects important hallmarks of human disease pathology, including abnormalities of the colon, lung and vas deferens. This insertional mouse mutation provides a valid model system for the development and testing of therapies for cystic fibrosis patients.Numerical simulations of protostars condensing out of turbulent interstellar gas clouds suggest that binary and multiple protostar systems are common. Such systems form from gas which has been strongly compressed and cooled in radiative shocks. Individual protostars result either from thermal fragmentation of extended layers, or from rotational fragmentation induced by accretion; they are much denser than their surroundings, well separated, and therefore likely to survive as separate entities.Foundations of Computer Science. By Alfred V. Aho and Jeffrey D. Ullman. Computer Science Press/W. H. Freeman: 1992. Pp. 765. £42.95, $56.95.Molds, Molecules, and Metazoa: Growing Points in Evolutionary Biology. Edited by Peter R. Grant and Henry S. Horn. Princeton University Press: 1992. Pp. 181. $32.50, £23.50.A Skeptical Biochemist. By Joseph S. Fruton. Harvard University Press: 1992. Pp. 330. $29.95, £23.95.Alarms about the risk of food contaminants may become a powerful non-tariff restraint on trade.A US Congressman is asking whether support for basic research can be taken for granted. The research community, which is inclined to react impatiently, should instead give a moderate response to a fair question.CYTOKINESIS defines the last stage in the division cycle, in which cell constriction leads to the formation of daughter cells. The biochemical mechanisms responsible for this process are poorly understood. In bacteria, the ftsZ gene product, FtsZ, is required for cell division^1–3,17, playing a prominent role in cytokinesis. The cellular concentration of FtsZ regulates the frequency of division^4 and genetic studies have indicated that it is the target of several endogenous division inhibitors^5. At the time of onset of septal invagination, the FtsZ protein is recruited from the cytoplasm to the division site, where it assembles into a ring that remains associated with the leading edge of the invaginating septum until septation is completed^6. Here we report that FtsZ specifically binds and hydrolyses GTP. The reaction can be dissociated into a GTP-dependent activation stage that is markedly affected by the concentration of FtsZ, and a hydrolysis stage in which GTP is hydrolysed to GDP. The results indicate that GTP binding and hydrolysis are important in enabling FtsZ to support bacterial cytokinesis, either by facilitating the assembly of the FtsZ ring and/or by catalysing an essential step in the cytokinetic process itself.ESCHERICHIA COLI divides by forming a septum across the middle of the cell. The biochemical mechanism underlying this process is unknown. Genetic evidence suggests that of all the fts (filamentation temperature sensitive) genes^1,2 involved in E. coli cell division, ftsZ plays a central role at the earliest known step of septation^3–5. Here we show that FtsZ protein binds GTP in vitro using unusual sequence elements^6–8. In contrast, such binding to the product of the conditional-lethal ftsZ 84 allele is impaired. Purified FtsZ displays a Mg^2+-dependent GTPase activity which is markedly reduced in the FtsZ84 protein. FtsZ copurifies with near stoichiometric amounts of noncovalently-bound GDP, implying the presence of a GTPase cycle in vivo , similar to that known for signal-transducing GTP-binding proteins^8,9. We also show that a small fraction of FtsZ exists as a distinct membrane-associated species that binds GTP. The membrane association of FtsZ and the known ability of GTPases to act as molecular switches^8,9 implicate FtsZ in a GTP-activated signal transduction pathway that may regulate the start of septation in E. coli .ACTIN is one of the most ubiquitous, abundant and well-conserved proteins of eukaryotes, participating in many crucial cellular processes including the maintenance of cell shape, motility and cell division^1,2. Actins from the most divergent sources still share amino-acid identities in excess of 70% (ref. 3). This may well explain why low-abundance homologues of actin have been difficult to isolate. Genes encoding distant relatives of actin in budding and fission yeast have now been cloned^3,4. We report here the discovery of a vertebrate actin-like protein, which we name centractin. A full-length complementary DNA clone was isolated whose sequence reveals amino-acid identities with actin of over 50%, increasing to more than 70% when conservative amino-acid changes are considered. Northern analysis and western blotting indicate a ubiquitous tissue and species distribution. Morphological and biochemical criteria show that centractin is associated with centrosomes.ACTIN is a cytoskeletal protein which is highly conserved across eukaryotic phyla. Actin filaments, in association with a family of myosin motor proteins, are required for cellular motile processes as diverse as vesicle transport, cell locomotion and cytokinesis^1,2. Many organisms have several closely related actin isoforms^3,4. In addition to conventional actins, yeasts contain actin-related proteins that are essential for viability^5,6. We show here that vertebrates also contain an actin-related protein (actin-RPV). Actin-RPV is a major component of the dynactin complex, an activator of dynein-driven vesicle movement^7,8, indicating that unlike conventional actins which work in conjunction with myosin motors, actin-RPV may be involved in cytoplasmic movements via a microtubule-based system.RAT basophilic leukaemia cells, like mast cells from which they are derived, have surface Feɛ receptors that trigger secretion of inflammatory mediators when crosslinked. Both GIF-binding proteins and a rise in cytosolic calcium concentration ([Ca^2+]_i) are implicated in the secretory mechanism^1–5. Here we use a video-imaging technique to report that transient rises in [Ca^2+]_i initiated in an individual cell can spread from cell to cell in a wave-like pattern by means of a secreted intermediate, in the absence of gap-junctional communication. We find that the leukaemia cells, peritoneal mast cells and mucosal mast cells have cell-surface P_2-type purinergic receptors that can trigger similar [Ca^2+]_i transients. We provide evidence that ATP is rapidly released, and that it can amplify [Ca^2+]_i signals and initial secretory responses during antigen-stimulation of rat basophilic leukaemia cells.Diversity and Evolution of Land Plants. By Martin Ingrouille. Chapman and Hall: 1992. Pp. 340. £17.95, $39.95 (pbk).HENSEN'S node of amniotes, like the Spemann organizer of amphibians, can induce a second body axis when grafted into a host embryo^1. The avian node, as well as several midline structures originating from it (notochord, floor plate), can also induce digit pattern duplications when grafted into the chick wing bud^2,3. We report here that the equivalent of Hensen's node from mouse is an effective inducer of digits in the chick wing bud. Tissues anterior and posterior to the node also evoke pattern duplications, but with a significantly lower efficiency. The finding that the murine node operates in an avian wing bud suggests that the same inducing agent(s) function in both primary and secondary embryonic fields and have been conserved during vertebrate evolution. Digit pattern duplications are also evoked by local administration of all- trans -retinoic acid^4,5. This similarity raises the possibility that Hensen's node is a source of retinoic acid. The mouse node is capable of synthesizing retinoic acid from its biosynthetic precursor all- trans -retinol at a substantially higher rate than either anterior or posterior tissues.HUMAN tumorigenesis is associated with the accumulation of mutations both in oncogenes and in tumour suppressor genes^1–3. But in no common adult cancer have the mutations that are critical in the early stages of the tumorigenic process been defined. We have attempted to determine if mutations of the APC gene play such a role in human colorectal tumours, which evolve from small benign tumours (adenomas) to larger malignant tumours (carcinomas) over the course of several decades. Here we report that sequence analysis of 41 colorectal tumours revealed that the majority of colorectal carcinomas (60%) and adenomas (63%) contained a mutated APC gene. Furthermore, the APC gene met two criteria of importance for tumour initiation. First, mutations of this gene were found in the earliest tumours that could be analysed, including adenomas as small as 0.5 cm in diameter. Second, the frequency of such mutations remained constant as tumours progressed from benign to malignant stages. These data provide strong evidence that mutations of the APC gene play a major role in the early development of colorectal neoplasms.ANTIDIURETIC hormone (arginine vasopressin) binds to and activates V2 receptors in renal collecting tubule cells. Subsequent stimulation of the G_s/adenylyl cyclase system promotes insertion of water pores into the luminal membrane and thereby reabsorption of fluid. In congenital nephrogenic diabetes insipidus (CNDI)^1, an X-linked recessive disorder, the kidney fails to respond to arginine vasopressin. Here we report that an affected male of a family with CNDI^2,3 has a deletion in the open reading frame of the V2 receptor gene, causing a frame shift and premature termination of translation in the third intracellular loop of the receptor protein. A normal receptor gene was found in the patient's brother. Both the normal and the mutant allele were detected in his mother. A different mutation, causing a codon change in the third transmem-brane domain of the V2 receptor, was found in the open reading frame of an affected male but not in the unaffected brother belonging to another family suffering from CNDI.OFTEN implicit in the interpretation of visual search tasks is the assumption that the detection of targets is determined by the feature-coding properties of low-level visual processing^1,2. But higher level processes have also been implicated as visual search ability is enhanced in a depth plane^3 or when two-dimensional shapes are interpreted as three-dimensional forms^4,5. Here we manipulate binocular disparity to degrade visual search, so that otherwise identical features become parts of surfaces through perceptual completion, rendering them less clearly distinguishable as targets and abstractors. Our results indicate that visual search has little or no access to the processing level of feature extraction but must have as an input a higher level process of surface representation.A SYSTEMATIC study of temporal changes in seismic b -values (defined as the log-linear slope of the earthquake frequency–magnitude distribution) has shown that large earthquakes are often preceded by an intermediate-term increase in b , followed by a decrease in the months to weeks before the earthquake^1. The onset of the b -value increase can precede earthquake occurrence by as much as 7 years. A recently proposed fracture mechanics model of the earthquake source^2 explains these temporal fluctuations in b in terms of the underlying physical processes of time-varying applied stress and crack growth. The model predicts two minima in b , separated by a short-lived maximum. Here we report the results of controlled laboratory deformation experiments, done in simulated upper-crustal conditions on both air-dried and water-saturated rock specimens. As found in previous experiments^3–5, shear fracture in dry specimens is characterized by a decline in b during anelastic deformation to a single minimum reached just before failure. But in water-saturated specimens, when pore-fluid volume is kept constant by servo-control we also observe a second, intermediate-term b -value minimum, so reproducing the double b -value anomaly predicted by the model^2.SIMPLE energy-balance climate models of the Budyko/Sellers type^1,2 predict that a small (2–5%) decrease in solar output could result in runaway glaciation on the Earth. But solar fluxes 25–30% lower early in the Earth's history^3,4 apparently did not lead to this result. One currently favoured explanation is that high partial pressures of carbon dioxide, caused by higher volcanic outgassing rates and/or slower rates of silicate weathering, created a large enough greenhouse effect to keep the planet warm^5–7. This does not resolve the problem of climate stability, however, because as we argue here, the oceans can freeze much more quickly than CO_2 can accumulate in the atmosphere. Had such a transient global glaciation occurred in the distant past when solar luminosity was low, it might have been irreversible because of the formation of highly reflective CO_2 clouds, similar to those encountered in climate simulations of early Mars^8. Our simulations of the early Earth, incorporating the possible formation of such clouds, suggest that the Earth might not be habitable today had it not been warm during the first part of its history.THE formation of horizons of organic-rich sediment (sapropels) in the eastern Mediterranean during the Holocene and Upper Pleistocene^1 has been ascribed^2 to enhanced preservation of organic carbon in bottom waters rendered anoxic by the restriction of deep-water renewal, either by lowered sea level during glacial maximum conditions^3 or by the presence of low-salinity surface waters derived from increased runoff^2,4. A second possibility is that the sapropels formed as a consequence of higher settling fluxes of organic matter caused by increased primary production connected with the increased runoff^5,6. Here we report that in a sediment core from close to the mouth of the Nile, the sapropels have significantly lighter nitrogen isotope ratios (^15N/<^14N) than the intercalated marl oozes. We adduce evidence that these large differences cannot be caused either by variable mixtures of marine and terrestrial organic matter having different isotopic compositions, or by differences in the extent and type of post-depositional alteration. The differences are consistent, however, with a higher utilization of dissolved nitrate during sapropel formation, implying that the sapropels were ultimately formed as a consequence of high plankton production, which led to high fluxes of organic matter to the sea floor.RECENT observations of abundant, nonliving, submicrometre particles in the upper ocean^1–3 and new measurements of 'dissolved^9organic carbon^4–^7 have fuelled speculation concerning the role of colloidal matter in ocean chemistry and biology. Colloids may act as reactive intermediates in the marine geochemistry of trace metals^8–^12, and a biologically labile pool of colloidal matter would affect models of ocean carbon cycling^13–^16. Here we report the use of naturally occurring ^234Th as an in situ tracer to estimate the residence time of colloidal matter in the surface waters near Bermuda. The ^234Th activity of colloidal matter (size range 10,000 nominal molecular weight to 0.2 μm) is similar to that of small particles (0.2–53 μm). Modelling of our results indicates a mean residence time of colloidal ^234Th with respect to aggregation into small particles of 10 days, which is roughly the same as for small-particle ^234Th, yet a factor of ∼6 less than for the dissolved pool. These results suggest that, more generally, macromolecular colloidal matter has a short residence time and hence a rapid turnover rate in the upper open ocean.To every measurable effect there seems to be an instrument whose purpose sometimes seems to be simply to measure the measurable causes of those effects. The purpose of a neat new magnetometer is not yet clear.TRANSFER of momentum from wind to the surface layer of lakes and oceans plays a central part in driving horizontal and vertical circulation of water masses. Much work has been devoted to understanding the role of waves in momentum transfer across the air–sea interface, but less is known about the energetics of the near-surface turbulence responsible for the mixing of momentum and mass into the underlying water column. In particular, it has remained unclear whether the structure of the turbulence in the surface layer can be described by analogy to wall-bounded shear flows or whether waves, either through breaking or wave–current interaction, introduce new length- and timescales which must be modelled explicitly. Here we report observations of turbulence in Lake Ontario, taken under conditions of strong wave breaking, which reveal a greatly enhanced dissipation rate of kinetic energy close to the air–water interface, relative to the predictions of wall-layer theory. Because wave breaking is intermittent, short-term measurements of the kinetic energy dissipation in the near-surface layer may therefore result in considerable underestimates, and any general treatment of upper mixed layer dynamics will have to take wave breaking explicitly into account.Global cooling in the Cenozoic, which led to the growth of large continental ice sheets in both hemispheres, may have been caused by the uplift of the Tibetan plateau and the positive feedbacks initiated by this event. In particular, tectonically driven increases in chemical weathering may have resulted in a decrease of atmospheric C0_2 concentration over the past 40 Myr.The Causes of Molecular Evolution. By John H. Gillespie. Oxford University Press: 1992, Pp. 336. £25, $35.Confronting Climate Change: Risks, Implications and Responses. Edited by Irving M. Mintzer. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 650. £50, $80 (hbk); £19.95, $34.95 (pbk).Malaria: Obstacles and Opportunities. Edited by Stanley C. Oaks Jr, Violaine S. Mitchell, Greg W. Pearson and Charles C. J. Carpenter. National Academy Press: 1991. Pp. 309. $48.Chance and Design: Reminiscences of Science in Peace and War. By Alan Hodgkin. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 412. £40, $59.95.Glutamate application at synapses between hippocampal neurons in culture produces long-term potentiation of the frequency of spontaneous miniature synaptic currents, together with long-term potentiation of evoked synaptic currents. The mini frequency potentiation is initiated postsynaptically and requires activity of NMDA receptors. Although the frequency of unitary quanta! responses increases strongly, their amplitude remains little changed with potentiation. Tests of postsynaptic responsiveness rule out recruitment of latent glutamate receptor clusters. Thus, postsynaptic induction can lead to enhancement of presynaptic transmitter release. The sustained potentiation of mini frequency is expressed even in the absence of Ca^2+ entry into presynaptic terminals.WE have discovered an error in the DNA sequence of our pOTR gene in Fig. \b. The nucleotides 714-717, CGGC should be GGCGGCG. The amino acids underneath should be Ala Ala Ala instead of Ala Gly. Accordingly, the complementary DNA encodes a 389 amino-acid protein with a relative molecular mass of 42,819.A multiprotein complex that specifically recognizes cellular origins of DNA replication has been identified and purified from the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae . We observe a strong correlation between origin function and origin recognition by this activity. Interestingly, specific DNA binding by the origin recognition complex is dependent upon the addition of ATP. We propose that the origin recognition complex acts as the initiator protein for S. cerevisiae origins of DNA replication.The relation between height and age of shorelines formed during the last interglacial period, as revealed by coral reefs, cannot be related directly to changes in ocean volume because of the effect of isostatic uplift in response to changes in ice-sheet loading. Sea-level changes at sites near the melting ice sheet, such as Bermuda and the Caribbean islands, differ from those along the Australian margin. Modelling of these differences constrains the times of onset and termination of the last interglacial, which are at variance with those deduced from oxygen-isotope studies of deep-sea cores.The Balance of Nature? Ecological Issues in the Conservation of Species and Communities. By Stuart L. Pimm. University of Chicago Press: 1992. Pp. 448. $62, £49.50 (hbk); $26.95, £21.50 (pbk).The Making of a Fly: The Genetics of Animal Design. By Peter A. Lawrence. Blackwell Scientific1992. Pp. 228. £16.95, $29.95 (pbk).The Physics of Astrophysics. Volume 1: Radiation. Volume 2: Gas Dynamics. By Frank H. Shu. University Science Books/W. H. Freeman: 1991. Pp. 429 (vol. l)/476 (vol. 2). $46.50, £29.95 each.Rhubarb: The Wondrous Drug. By Clifford M. Foust. Princeton University Press: 1992. Pp.371. $35, £27.50.The White House and Congress vie with each other in their Ignorant attacks on science.Disappointment with the draft global warming treaty agreed last week in New York should not get out of hand. What the world needs is a comprehensive deal and a lasting one. Last week was a good start.The report of the US National Institutes of Health is not so much a finding as a series of findings on the research that led to the discovery of the AIDS virus.IN Fig. 2a of the above letter the second and third rows were inadvertently interchanged. In addition, the sequence at position 15176 (ref. 1.) for both Sylvia and P. coronatus should read 'A' and not "F.THE organization of eukaryotic genes into exons separated by introns has been considered as a primordial arrangement^1,2 but because it does not exist in eubacterial genomes it may be that introns are relatively recent acquisitions^3. A self-splicing group I intron has been found in cyanobacteria at the same position of the same gene (that encoding leucyl transfer RNA, UAA anticodon) as a similar group I intron of chloroplasts^4,5, which indicates that this intron predates the invasion of eukaryotic cells by cyanobac-terial endosymbionts. But it is not clear from this isolated example whether introns are more generally present in different genes or in more diverse branches of the eubacteria. Many mitochondria have intron-rich genomes and were probably derived from the alpha subgroup of the purple bacteria^6 (or Proteobacteria ^7), so ancient introns might also have been retained in these bacteria. We describe here the discovery of two small (237 and 205 nucleotides) self- splicing group I introns in members of two proteobacterial subgroups, Agrobacterium tumefaciens (α) and Azoarcus sp. (β). The introns are inserted in genes for tRNA^Arg and tRNA^Ile respectively, after the third anticodon nucleotide. Their occurrence in different genes of phyogenetically diverse bacteria indicates that group I introns have a widespread distribution among eubacteria.AN understanding of the protein-DNA interactions in vivo at origins of DNA replication in eukaryotes is essential to delineate the mechanism of initiation of DNA synthesis and its control in the cell cycle^1,2. In the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae , a family of sequences known as autonomously replicating sequences (ARSs) function as origins of bidirectional DNA replication on plasmids and, in several instances, also in their normal chromosomal location^3. Here we use nucleotide resolution genomic footprinting to investigate the association of proteins with ARS1. Nuclease protection patterns indicate that at least two different cellular factors interact with functional elements in ARS1. The first seems to be ARS-binding factor 1. The second seems to be a novel protein that generates extensive protection over the essential ARS consensus sequence and phased DNasel-sensitive sites across a functionally important flanking sequence. Hypersensitivity of this region to cleavage by copper phenanthroline indicates that it is under torsional strain, analogous to that produced at transcriptional start sites by assembly of an initiation complex. The protection in situ is similar to that generated by the origin recognition complex (ORC) protein.WHEN bacterial or enkaryotic cells are exposed to high temperatures or other harsh conditions, they respond by synthesis of a specific set of heat-shock proteins^1–3 Certain heat-shock proteins such as groEL, called 'chaperonins', can prevent misfolding and promote the refolding and proper assembly of unfolded polypeptides generated under harmful conditions^2,4. We report here a new aspect of the heat-shock response in Escherichia coli : at high temperatures a fraction of groEL becomes modified covalently, altering its interaction with unfolded proteins. The heat-modified form can be eluted with ATP from an unfolded protein more easily than normal groEL. The critical heat-induced modification seems to be phosphorylation, which is reversed on return to low temperature. Treatment of the modified groEL with phosphatases caused its apparent size, charge and binding properties to resemble those of the unmodified form. Thus during heat shock some groEL is reversibly phosphorylated, which allows its ATP-dependent release from protein substrates in- the absence of its usual cofactor (groES), and probably promotes the repair of damaged polypeptides.PURIFIED major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class I molecules have been studied at high resolution by X-ray crystallography^1; the structure is a complex of a single heavy chain, β_2-microglobulin light chain and a tightly bound peptide moiety. We show here that complete MHC class I molecules are post-translationally assembled into tetramers (made up of four heavy chains and four β 2 -microglobulin units) and that this tetrameric species is expressed on the cell surface. The multivalent tetrameric structure of class I molecules can be reconciled with models of T-cell activation that invoke antigen-receptor crosslinking, as opposed to models that depend on an allosteric change.THE protein Lck (p56^lck) has a relative molecular mass of 56,000 and belongs to the Src family of tyrosine kinases^1–3. It is expressed exclusively in lymphoid cells, predominantly in thymocytes and peripheral T cells^4,5. Lck associates specifically with the cytoplasmic domains of both CD4 and CD8 T-cell surface glycoproteins^6,7 and interacts with the β-chain of the interleukin-2 receptor^8, which implicates Lck activity in signal transduction during thymocyte ontogeny^9–13 and activation of mature T cells^14–19. Here we generate an lck null mutation by homologous recombination in embryonic stem cells to evaluate the role of p56^lck in T-cell development and activation. Lck-deficient mice show a pronounced thymic atrophy, with a dramatic reduction in the double-positive (CD4^+CD8^+) thymocyte population. Mature, single-positive thymocytes are not detectable in these mice and there are only very few peripheral T cells. These results illustrate the crucial role of this T-cell-specific tyrosine kinase in the thymocyte development.THE response of the deep ocean to long-period temperature variations at the ocean surface is a crucial issue in understanding climate change^1. There are, however, very few observations available for studying changes in the thermal structure of ocean interiors. On the basis of measurements made 22 years apart of full-depth temperature sections in the Pacific Ocean between Australia and New Zealand, we show here that there has been a depth-averaged warming of 0.04 °C and 0.03 °C at 43° S and 28° S, respectively, throughout most of the water column below the mixed layer. The sea-level rise caused by expansion between a depth of 300 m and the ocean floor is 2-3 cm, consistent with the observed rate of global sea-level rise^2. In the main thermocline there is a coherent cooling and freshening on density surfaces, consistent with surface warming in the Southern Ocean where these waters originate. Similar observations in the North Atlantic^3 show comparable changes in the thermal structure and water-mass volumes, but further measurements in other regions are required before firm conclusions can be drawn about the global significance of these changes.MICELLES that can catalyse their replication have been described recently^1–3. In the previous experiments, micelles (or bilayer vesicles^4) were always present in the initial reaction mixture—that is, the system was presented with the bounded structures required for autocatalysis. Here we describe a system in which autocatalytic micelles are formed from amphiphiles that are themselves generated from a hydrolysis reaction in the absence of compartmental structures. Alkaline hydrolysis of ethyl caprylate (itself insoluble in water) yields sodium caprylate, initially at a very slow rate; but as soon as sufficient caprylate is formed for aggregation into micelles to take place, there is an exponential increase in reaction rate owing to micellar catalysis. These self-assembling surfactant structures may consequently provide a model system for studies of prebiotic chemistry. The possible relevance of this process to prebiotic chemistry is emphasized by our observation that the micelles can be converted into more-robust vesicles by a pH change induced by dissolved CO_2.MANY technological and scientific applications have been proposed for Langmuir–Blodgett (LB) films_1. These ordered arrays of oriented amphiphilic molecules may be useful as nonlinear optical systems^2, as insulating or patterning layers in microelectronics^3,4, as model systems for studies of two-dimensional phases^5 and as molecular templates for protein crystallization^6. The potential of LB films for these applications is sensitive to the details of their molecular packing; in particular, they require that the layers have a defect-free, periodic structure^1. Here we present images from atomic force microscopy of domain boundaries between regions of different crystallographic orientation in LB multilayers. The regular lattice structure is preserved to within 1 nm of the grain boundaries, and the domains are oriented in a near-twinning arrangement. We also observe a periodic buckling superstructure along a particular lattice symmetry direction, with a wavelength of about 2 nm and an amplitude of ≤0.1 nm. The buckling was independent of surface pressure during deposition, dipping direction, number of layers deposited and nature of the substrate, and was stable over many hours. These departures from two-dimensional periodicity may have an important bearing on applications that rely on perfect crystallinity.FULLERENES with metals encapsulated within the carbon cage have been prepared recently^1–6. Laser vaporization of a lanthanum-impregnated graphite rod yielded an air-stable, solvent-extractable species comprising a single La atom inside a C_82 cage^1, denoted La@ C_82; a cluster containing two La atoms (La_2@ C_82) was later reported^3. Similar techniques applied to graphite/yttrium rods have produced Y@ C_82 and Y_2@ C_82 (refs 5, 6). Here we describe the preparation of scandium-containing C_82 species, including an encapsulated scandium trimer, Sc_3@C_82. Mass spectrometry and ESR spectroscopy provide evidence that the Sc_3, trimer is indeed trapped within the cage.To identify components of the mammalian endoplasmic reticulum involved in the translocation of secretory proteins, crosslinking and reconstitution methods were combined. A multispanning abundant membrane glycoprotein was found which is in proximity to nascent chains early in translocation. In reconstituted proteoliposomes, this protein is stimulatory or required for the translocation of secretory proteins.The British government should not waste the opportunity it has given itself of restoring battered relations.The entire DNA sequence of chromosome III of the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae has been determined. This is the first complete sequence analysis of an entire chromosome from any organism. The 315-kilobase sequence reveals 182 open reading frames for proteins longer than 100 amino acids, of which 37 correspond to known genes and 29 more show some similarity to sequences in databases. Of 55 new open reading frames analysed by gene disruption, three are essential genes; of 42 non-essential genes that were tested, 14 show some discernible effect on phenotype and the remaining 28 have no overt function.Assessments of long-term ozone depletion by CFCs have relied on their relative effects as quantified by ozone depletion potentials (ODPs). These long-term ODPs, based on steady-state atmospheric impacts, are not appropriate for making shorter-term (decade-scale) forecasts. Time-dependent ODPs, derived using an empirical approach, show that some of the hydrochlorofluorocarbons proposed as replacements for CFCs may induce significant ozone destruction in the short term.Molecules of the Cytoskeleton ByLinda Amos W. Bradshaw Amos Macmillan/Guilford Press: 1991. Pp. 253. £40, $50 (hbk); £18.99, $25 (pbk). Cell Movements By Dennis Bray Garland: 1992. Pp. 406. $44.95 (hbk); $27.95 (pbk). (Distributed by European Book Services.)Children of the Atomic Bomb Survivors: A Genetic Study Edited By James V. Neel William J. Schull National Academy Press Distributed by Maruzen Co. Ltd. 3-10 Nihonbashi 2-Chome. Chuo-Ku, Tokyo 103 in Japan, and by Wiley (UK) in Europe, Africa and the Middle East. Price $60 (hbk), $36 (pbk): 1991. Pp. 530. $49.95 (hbk), $29.95 (pbk).Sperm Competition in Birds: Evolutionary Causes and Consequences By Tim R. Birkhead Anders P. Møller Academic: 1992. £39, $75 (hbk); £19.50, $39.95 (pbk).Understanding the Present: Science and the Soul of Modern Man. By Bryan Appleyard Picador: 1992. Pp. 283. £14.99. To be published in the United States by Doubleday early next year.New product ideas for the chromatographer — columns for environmental analyses and a compact LC system for biomolecule purification.The field of capillary electrophoresis has undergone rapid development over the past 10 years. Many advances have been made, but there are still some problems that must be addressed before the technique can reach its full potential.The complete nucleotide sequence of a yeast chromosome is not only a landmark in the sequencing of entire genomes, but also a pointer to the benefits these projects will yield.Despite initial hopes, the efficacy of tumour necrosis factor in treating cancer patients has been disappointing. But a more careful selection of patients, and more appropriate treatment, might be fruitful.CELLULOSIC biomass is recycled by a variety of microorganisms occupying different habitats^1. Studies of their cellulase systems have included the purification of enzyme components, the determination of their enzymological properties^2 and the cloning and characterization of their structural genes^3. Sequence analysis of more than 70 cellulases permits grouping into seven families corresponding to distinct structural types^4,5. The three-dimensional structure of the catalytic core of cellobiohydrolase CBHII from the fungus Trichoderma reesei has been reported^6. Here we show that endoglucanase CelD from Clostridium thermocellum , which is representative of a different family of cellulose-degrading enzymes consisting of at least 11 bacterial, fungal and plant endoglucanases^5,7, has a globular structure, with an amino-terminal immunoglobulin-like domain tightly packed against a larger catalytic domain. The latter shows a novel protein fold, shaped like an α-barrel of 12 helices connected by loops that form the active site. The structure of a complex CelD with a substrate analogue suggests a mechanism for substrate hydrolysis.AIDS, caused by human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), is one of the world's most serious health problems, with current protocols being inadequate for either prevention or successful long-term treatment. In retroviruses such as HIV, the enzyme reverse tran-scriptase copies the single-stranded RNA genome into double-stranded DNA that is then integrated into the chromosomes of infected cells. Reverse transcriptase is the target of the most widely used treatments for AIDS, 3'-azido-3'-deoxythymidine (AZT) and 2',3'-dideoxyinosine (ddl), but resistant strains of HIV-1 arise in patients after a relatively short time^1,2. There are several non-nucleoside inhibitors of HIV-1 reverse transcriptase^3–6, but resistance to such agents also develops rapidly^7. We report here the structure at 7 Å resolution of a ternary complex of the HIV-1 reverse transcriptase heterodimer, a monoclonal antibody Fab fragment^8, and a duplex DNA template-primer. The double-stranded DNA binds in a groove on the surface of the enzyme. The electron density near one end of the DNA matches well with the known structure of the HIV-1 reverse transcriptase RNase H domain^12. At the opposite end of the DNA, a mercurated derivative of UTP has been localized by difference Fourier methods, allowing tentative identification of the polymerase nucleoside triphosphate binding site. We also determined the structure of the reverse transcriptase/Fab complex in the absence of template-primer to compare the bound and free forms of the enzyme. The presence of DNA correlates with movement of protein electron density in the vicinity of the putative template-primer binding groove. These results have important implications for developing improved inhibitors of reverse transcriptase for the treatment of AIDS.THE taxonomic group Prochlorales (Lewin 1977) Burger-Wiersma, Stal and Mur 1989 was established to accommodate a set of prokaryotic oxygenic phototrophs which, like plant, green algal and euglenoid chloroplasts, contain chlorophyll b instead of phycobiliproteins. Prochlorophytes were originally proposed (with concomitant scepticism^1–3) to be a monophyletic group sharing a common ancestry with these 'green' chloroplasts^4–6. Results from molecular sequence phytogenies, however, have suggested that Prochlorothrix hollandica ^7 is not on a lineage that leads to plastids^8–12. Our results from 16S ribosomal RNA sequence comparisons, which include new sequences from the marine picoplankter Prochlorococcus mariniis ^13,14 and the Lissoclinum patella symbiont Prochloron sp.^15, indicate that prochlorophytes are polyphyletic within the cyanobacterial radiation, and suggest that none of the known species is specifically related to chloroplasts. This implies that the three prochlorophytes and the green chloro-plast ancestor acquired chlorophyll b and its associated structural proteins in convergent evolutionary events. We report further that the 16S rRNA gene sequence from Prochlorococcus is very similar to those of open ocean Synechococcus strains (marine cluster A (ref. 16)), and to a family of 16S rRNA genes shotgun-cloned from plankton in the north Atlantic and Pacific Oceans^17–19.PROCHLOROPHYTES are prokaryotes that carry out oxygenic photosynthesis using chlorophylls a and b , but lack phycobili-proteins as light-harvesting pigments^1. These characteristics distinguish them from cyanobacteria, which contain phycobiliproteins, but no chlorophyll b . Three prochlorophyte genera have been described: Prochloron ^1–3, Prochlorothrix ^4and Prochlorococcus ^5,6. The prochlorophytes share their pigment characteristics with green plant and euglenoid chloroplasts, which has led to a debate on whether these chloroplasts may have arisen from an endosymbiotic prochlorophyte rather than a cyanobacterium^2,7. Molecular sequence data, including those presented here based on a fragment of the rpoCl gene encoding a subunit of DNA-dependent RNA polymerase, indicate that the known prochlorophyte lineages do not include the direct ancestor of chloroplasts^8–11. We also show that the prochlorophytes are a highly diverged polyphyletic group. Thus the use of chlorophyll b as a light-harvesting pigment has developed independently several times in evolution. Similar conclusions have been reached in parallel studies using 16S ribosomal RNA sequences^12.GLUCOCORTICOID-REMEDIABLE Received 26 September; accepted 29 October 1991.aldosteronism (GRA), an autosomal dominant disorder, is characterized by hypertension with variable hyper aldosteronism^1,2 and by high levels of the abnormal adrenal steroids 18-oxocortisol and 18-hydroxy-cortisol^3–5, which are all under control of adrenocorticotropic hormone and suppressible by glucocorticoids^6. These abnormalities could result from ectopic expression of aldosterone synthase, which is normally expressed only in adrenal glomerulosa, in the adrenal fasciculata. Genes encoding aldosterone synthase^7–9 and steroid 11β-hydroxylase^7(expressed in both adrenal fasciculata and glomerulosa), which are 95% identical^7 and lie on chromosome 8q (refs 7, 10), are therefore candidate genes for GRA. Here we demonstrate complete linkage of GRA in a large kindred to a gene duplication arising from unequal crossing over, fusing the 5' regulatory region of 11β-hydroxylase to the coding sequences of aldosterone synthase (maximum lod score 5.23 for complete link-age, odds ratio of 170,000:1). This mutation can account for all the physiological abnormalities of GRA. Our result represents the demonstration of a mutation causing hypertension in otherwise phenotypically normal animals or humans.ANTIBODIES are usually prepared from recently boosted animals and reflect ongoing immune responses^1–6. In humans, this is restrictive as ethical constraints generally prevent antigen-boosting. Therefore the rich memory compartment of human antibody responses remains largely untapped^7. Severe combined immune deficiency (SCID) mice^8 populated with human cells^9–11allow the stimulation of human antibody memory without the usual constraints. Here we show how peripheral blood lymphocytes can be stimulated by antigen to produce large secondary responses after transfer to SCID mice. Specific monoclonal human Fab fragments can then be isolated from the mice by repertoire cloning even when the human donor's last contact with antigen was more than 17 years ago.ANTERIOR–POSTERIOR patterning in insects, vertebrates and nematodes involves members of conserved Antennapedia -class homeobox gene clusters (HOM-C) that are thought to give specific body regions their identities^1–5. The effects of these genes on region-specific body structures have been described extensively, particularly in Drosophila , but little is known about how HOM-C genes affect the behaviours of cells that migrate into their domains of function. In Caenorhabditis elegans , the Antennapedia -like HOM-C gene mab-5 not only specifies postembryonic fates of cells in a posterior body region, but also influences the migration of mesodermal and neural cells that move through this region^5–7. Here we show that as one neuroblast migrates into this posterior region, it switches on mab-5 gene expression; mab-5 then acts as a developmental switch to control the migratory behaviour of the neuroblast descendants. HOM-C genes can therefore not only direct region-specific patterns of cell division and differentiation, but can also act within migrating cells to programme region-specific migratory behaviour.IN the newly cellularized Drosophila embryo, progress through the cell cycle is regulated at the G2–M transition^1,2. We have examined cell-cycle regulation later in Drosophila development, in a group of postembryonic neuronal precursors. The S-phase precursor cells, which generate photoreceptor target neurons (lamina neurons) in the central nervous system, are not present in the absence of photoreceptor innervation^3. Here we report that axons selectively approach G1-phase precursors. Without axon ingrowth, lamina precursors do not enter their final S phase and by several criteria, arrest in the preceding G1 phase. These findings provide evidence that at this stage in development the control of cell division can occur at the G1-S transition.THE 'iterated prisoner's dilemma' is now the orthodox paradigm for the evolution of cooperation among selfish individuals. This viewpoint is strongly supported by Axelrod's computer tournaments, where 'tit for tat' (TFT) finished first^1. This has stimulated interest in the role of reciprocity in biological societies^1–8. Most theoretical investigations, however, assumed homogeneous populations (the setting for evolutionary stable strategies^9,10) and programs immune to errors. Here we try to come closer to the biological situation by following a program^6 that takes stochasticities into account and investigates representative samples. We find that a small fraction of TFT players is essential for the emergence of reciprocation in a heterogeneous population, but only paves the way for a more generous strategy. TFT is the pivot, rather than the aim, of an evolution towards cooperation.Santana Fossils: An Illustrated Atlas. By J. G. Maisey. T.F.H. Publications: 1991. Pp.459. £125, $200.SENSORY systems can adapt to the conditions imposed on them^1. In the visual system, adapting to a pattern increases the threshold of the ability to see that pattern, and reduces the perceived contrast of the pattern above threshold^2–4. Most neurons of the striate cortex reduce their responsiveness after being stimulated for some time by a high-contrast pattern^5–7. Such an effect may lie behind these psychophysical adaptation phenomena^2–4. These adaptation effects have been reported to be confined to patterns of similar orientation, which is understandable in that the visual neurons that adapt are only excited by a small range of orientations^8. Neurophysiological evidence suggests that neurons with different orientation preferences have inhibitory interconnections^9–13. It is therefore of interest to explore the possible effects of these connections on perception. Here we show that adapting to a horizontal pattern can reduce the perceived contrast of a vertical test pattern more than a horizontal test pattern. These 'cross-orientation' effects are modelled by a division-like process, whereas the more normal 'similar-orientation' effects are modelled by a subtractive process.THE volcanic islands of the Galapagos archipelago are the most recent products of a long-lived mantle hotspot^1,2. Little is known, however, of the submarine Galapagos platform on which the islands are built, or of the Cocos and Carnegie submarine ridges produced by past motion of the Cocos and Nazca plates across the hotspot^3,4. In 1990 we surveyed selected areas around the Galapagos platform and as far east as 85^°30' W on the Carnegie ridge, where we dredged abundant well-rounded basalt cobbles from a small sea-mount with a terraced summit region. Cobbles were also dredged from several other seamounts. We interpret these features, especially the presence of cobbles, as evidence for erosion near sea level and conclude that these seamounts were volcanic islands before subsiding to their present depths. Radiometric ages for these drowned islands range from 5 to 9Myr, consistent with predicted plate motions. They indicate that the time available for speciation of Galapagos organisms is much longer than the age range of the existing islands.ALTHOUGH model simulations predict a higher mean global temperature by the middle of the next century in response to increased atmospheric concentrations of greenhouse gases^1, the response of the cryosphere to specific changes in latitudinal and seasonal temperature distribution is poorly constrained by modelling^2,3 or through instrumental measurements of recent variations in snow cover^4and ice thickness^5,6. Here we examine the recent geological record (130 kyr to present) to obtain an independent assessment of ice-sheet response to climate change. The age and distribution of glacial sediments, coupled with marine and terrestrial proxy records of climate, support arguments that initial ice-sheet growth at the beginning of the last glacial cycle occurred at high northern latitudes (65–80^° N) under climate conditions rather similar to present. In particular, the conditions most favourable for glacier inception are warm high-latitude oceans, low terrestrial summer temperature and elevated winter temperature. We find that the geological data support the idea that greenhouse warming, which is expected to be most pronounced in the Arctic and in the winter months, coupled with decreasing summer insolation^7 may lead to more snow deposition than melting at high northern latitudes^8 and thus to ice-sheet growth.A SYSTEM capable of converting chemical energy to mechanical energy could serve as an actuator or an 'artificial muscle' in several applications. Here we describe a chemomechanical system of this sort based on a synthetic polymer gel. The gel network is anionic, and positively charged surfactant molecules can therefore bind to its surface, inducing local shrinkage by decreasing the difference in osmotic pressure between the gel interior and the solution outside. By using an electric field to direct surfactant binding selectively to one side of the gel, we can induce contraction and curvature of a strip of gel. Reversing the direction of the field causes contraction of the opposite side, and when the gel is suspended in solution from a ratchet mechanism, it can thereby be made to move with a worm-like motion at a velocity of up to 25 cm min^−1.Last summer's planet around a neutron star seems to be a computational artefact.A KEY feature in the mechanism of photosynthesis is the initial storage of a substantial fraction of the light energy in the form of a long-lived radical pair^1. In attempts to mimic this process in artificial systems^2–4, impressive progress has been made in increasing the efficiency of the charge-separation reaction between an excited photosensitizer and an appropriate electron acceptor, but prevention of the energy-wasting back-reaction to neutral species still constitutes a major challenge. The back-reaction limits the length of time during which charge separation (and thus energy storage) can be maintained. Here we report exceedingly long-lived (up to a few hours) photoinduced charge separation in an artificial photosynthetic system that does not require a secondary substrate to react with the charged species. Our system uses pyrene (Py^*) as the photosensitized electron donor and N,N' -dimethy 1-4,4'-bipyridinium (methyl viologen, MV^2+) as the electron acceptor, both immobilized in a porous sol–gel silica glass^5. The redox reaction is carried out by the mediation of a third mobile charge carrier in the intrapore space^6. The spatial separation between the donor and acceptor inhibits the back-reaction to produce the long lifetimes of the charge-separated pair.THE conjecture that atoms can be trapped inside closed carbon cages such as the fullerenes was first made by Kroto et al ^1. Mass spectroscopic evidence obtained soon after^2 suggested that lanthanum atoms were encapsulated in fullerenes prepared by laser vaporization of a lanthanum-impregnated graphite disk, and these results were later corroborated^3,4. Recently, helium atoms have been incorporated into fullerenes through collisions in the gas phase^5, and evidence has been obtained for the formation of metal-containing fullerenes during arc burning of composite graphite rods^6. All of these studies, however, have produced quantities too small for characterization using standard spectroscopic techniques. We report here the preparation of milligram quantities of lanthanum-containing C_82, which can be solvent-extracted in yields of about 2% along with empty C_60 and C_70 cages. We have measured the electron paramagnetic resonance spectrum of this mixture, both in solution and in the solid state, which reveals that the lanthanum atom has a formal charge of 3+, and the C_82a charge of 3-. This runs contrary to some expectations that the doubly charged f ulleride anions would be the most stable species^6,7; it also reveals that the fullerene cages have the same formal charge as in the superconducting alkali-metal-doped phases^8,9.C_6o MOLECULES are extremely stable, withstanding hydrostatic pressures of up to at least 20 GPa (ref. 1). It has been proposed that at high pressures they could form a solid harder than diamond^2. On the other hand, electrical resistivity measurements^3 have revealed the formation of an insulating phase above 20 GPa, which was attributed to the low-symmetry state found in X-ray diffraction studies under nonhydrostatic compression^1. Here we report that rapid, nonhydrostatic compression of C_60 to pressures of 20 ±5 GPa transforms it instantaneously into bulk polycrystal-line diamond at room temperature. Our measurements place a limit on the stability of the C_60molecular phase under nonhydrostatic pressure. The high efficiency and fast kinetics at room temperature suggest the possibility of using this transformation for fabrication of industrial diamonds.THE most probable angle of a meteoroid impact on a planet is 45°, and an impact at 15° from the horizontal or lower is as likely as at 75° or higher ^ 1,2 . Yet little direct evidence for oblique impacts exists on the Earth, for two reasons. Unless the impact angle is very low, any asymmetry created during the initial transfer of energy from impactor to target is lost as the crater is formed ^ 3 ; moreover, the shallow craters formed by oblique impact are more easily obscured by subsequent erosion. During routine flights two years ago, however, one of us (R.E.L.) noticed an anomalous alignment of oblong rimmed depressions (4 km x 1 km) on the otherwise featureless farmland of the Pampas in Argentina. We argue here, from sample analysis and by analogy with laboratory experiments, that these structures resulted from a low-angle impact and ricochet of a chondritic body originally 150–300 m in diameter.THE scattering of radio waves by plasma turbulence in the Galaxy is analogous to the scintillation of starlight due to the Earth's atmosphere, and similarly leads to a broadening of the apparent angular sizes of extragalactic radio sources^1–3, as well as the smearing out of pulsar pulse profiles. Previous investigations of the galactic plasma turbulence using these effects have suggested a monotonic increase in plasma turbulence towards the galactic plane^4–6 and towards the centre^7,8. Here I present a new map of galactic plasma turbulence derived from the results of a recent interplanetary scintillation radio survey^9, using a method of analysis based on the angular size distribution of radio sources. The map reveals that structure persists to high galactic latitudes, and that it agrees with the morphology of the soft X-ray background. These results suggest that the solar neighbourhood is encapsulated in an envelope of plasma turbulence, most probably the relic of the supernova explosion of a nearby massive star.RECENTLY Libbrecht and Woodard^1 and Elsworth et al .^2 have demonstrated that the frequencies of solar acoustic p-mode oscillations vary significantly over the solar cycle. We have previously suggested that cyclic variations in the magnetic activity of the Sun could modulate the p-mode frequencies in a similar way. In particular, we investigated^3–5simple models of the 'magnetic canopy', which permeates the solar atmosphere and overlies all of the Sun's surface, to determine its influence on p-mode frequencies. Here we make a comparison of our model predictions with the observations of Libbrecht and Woodard. We find that, despite the simplicity of our model, we are able to obtain good agreement with the observed frequency shifts for modes of frequency less than 4 mHz, through a mechanism in which an increasing magnetic field induces 'stiffening' of the Sun's chromosphere. Above this frequency there is clearly something missing from our model. We speculate that the behaviour above 4 mHz is related to a cutoff frequency in the solar atmosphere, above which waves are trapped only partially.Sources of organic molecules on the early Earth divide into three categories: delivery by extraterrestrial objects; organic synthesis driven by impact shocks; and organic synthesis by other energy sources (such as ultraviolet light or electrical discharges). Estimates of these sources for plausible end-member oxidation states of the early terrestrial atmosphere suggest that the heavy bombardment before 3.5 Gyr ago either produced or delivered quantities of organics comparable to those produced by other energy sources.The Fail-Safe Society: Community Defiance and the End of American Technological Optimism. By Charles Piller. Basic Books: 1991, Pp. 240. $20.Autism and Asperger Syndrome. By Uta Frith. Cambridge University Press: 1991. Pp. 247. £30 (hbk), £10.95 (pbk).ECos Estuarine Contaminant Simulator. Plymsolve, 32 Looe Street, Plymouth PL4 OEA, UK: 1991. Licence £560 or £280 (educational and research). Other rates and details on application.The Changing University: How Increased Demand for Scientists and Technology is Transforming Academic Institutions Internationally. Edited byDorothy S. Zinberg. Kluwer: 1991. Pp. 182. £41, $69.The real question is whether the US government should bear the full costs of academic research.Fears that reform in the former Soviet Union will be impeded by ignorance of market economics should be matched by the suspicion that the policies of experienced free market governments are undermined by ignorance of arithmetic.Our understanding of the Universe may be shaped in part by the circumstance that our knowledge of it derives exclusively from people like ourselves, but what if very different forms of life exist?MULTIDIMENSIONAL heteronuclear NMR has revolutionized solution structure determinations of proteins^1-3. But this technique has not been applied to nucleic acids because of difficulties in the synthesis of isotopically (^13C and/or ^15N) labelled molecules. Here we report the application of three–dimensional heteronuclear NMR to the study of a uniformly ^13C/^15N or ^15N–labelled RNA duplex of defined sequence. These experiments simplify resonance assignment and the analysis of proton–proton nuclear Overhauser effects^4 (and therefore distance information) in the molecule. Our results show that it is now possible to determine the structures of larger and more complex RNAs using multidimensional heteronuclear NMR.The economic benefits of NASA's programmes are greater than generally recognized. The main beneficiaries may not even realize the source of their good fortune.VARIOUS species of marine Vibrio produce two distinct types of flagella, each adapted for a different type of motility^1. A single, sheathed polar flagellum is suited for swimming in liquid medium, and numerous unsheathed lateral flagella, which are produced only under viscous conditions, are suited for swarming over viscous surfaces^2-3. Both types of flagella are driven by reversible motors embedded in the cytoplasmic membrane. Here we report that the energy source for the polar flagellar motor of Vibrio para-haemolyticus is the sodium-motive force, whereas the lateral flagellar motors are driven by the proton-motive force. This is evidence that two distinct types of flagella powered by different energy sources are functionally active in one cell.ACTIN, a major cytoskeletal component of all eukaryotic cells, is one of the most highly conserved proteins. It is involved in various cellular processes such as motility, cytoplasmic streaming, chromosome segregation and cytokinesis^1,2. The actin from the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae , encoded by the essential ACT1 gene^3–5, is 89% identical to mouse cytoplasmic actin and is involved in the organization and polarized growth of the cell surface^6–9. We report here the characterization of ACT 29 a previously undescribed yeast split gene encoding a putative protein (391 amino acids, relative molecular mass (Mr) 44,073) that is 47% identical to yeast actin. The requirement of the ACT2 gene for vegetative growth of yeast cells and the existence of related genes in other eukaryotes indicate an important and conserved role for these actin-like proteins. Superimposition of the Act2 polypeptide onto the three-dimensional structure^9,10 of known actins reveals that most of the divergence occurred in loops involved in actin polymerization, DNase I and myosin binding, leaving the core domain mainly unaffected. To our knowledge, the Act2 protein from 5. cerevisiae is the first highly divergent actin molecule described. Structural and physiological data suggest that the Act2 protein might have an important role in cytoskeletal reorganization during the cell cycle.THE cellular protein p107 and the retinoblastoma protein (pRB) have many features in common. Most strikingly, they contain homologous protein domains that mediate interaction with the oncoproteins of several small DNA tumour viruses, including adenovirus El A and SV40 large-T antigen^1–9. In cells that do not contain these viral oncoproteins, pRB interacts with the cellular transcription factor E2F (refs 10–12) or a related protein termed DRTF1 (ref. 13). E2F associates with a form of pRB that is found primarily in Gl cells^10. It seems that the E2F-pRB complex dissociates near the Gl-S boundary before the initiation of S phase, releasing free E2F and apparently stimulating the ability of E2F to activate transcription^14. Cells that express E1A have no or little pRB-E2F complex, presumably because of the association of E1A with pRB^10–15. During S phase, E2F forms a second complex that contains cyclin A but apparently lacks pRB^15. Here, we report that p107 is found in the cyclin A/E2F complex and that this complex also contains p33^cdk2. These observations suggest that p107 and pRB cooperate in the regulation of E2F activity, each affecting different stages of the cell cycle. Thus, by binding to pRB and pi 07, El A and large-T antigen target two distinct aspects of E2F regulation.THE transport of proteins destined for post-endoplasmic reticulum locations in the secretory pathway is mediated by small vesicular carriers^1–3. Transport vesicles have been generated in cell-free assays from the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae , and mammalian systems^4–14. Yeast genes encoding cytosolic components that par-ticipate in vesicular traffic were first identified from the collection of conditional-lethal sec (secretory) mutants^15–17. Mutations in the yeast SEC7 gene disrupt protein transport in the secretory pathway at the nonpermissive temperature18. The SEC7 gene product is a phosphoprotein of relative molecular mass 230,000 that functions from the cytoplasmic aspect of intracellular mem-branes^19–20. We report that in a yeast cell-free transport assay, the introduction of antibodies to Sec? protein (Sec7p) results in the accumulation of transport vesicles. These vesicles are retrieved with SecTp-specific antibodies by immuno-isolation for bio-chemical and electron microscopic characterization. SecTp on the surface of the accumulated transport vesicles, in combination with previous genetic and biochemical studies^18–20, implicate SecTp as part of a (non-clathrin) vesicle coat. This SecTp-containing coat structure is proposed to be essential for vesicle budding at multiple stages in the yeast secretory pathway.T LYMPHOCYTES expressing αβ T-cell receptors with sufficient affinity to major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecules expressed on thymus epithelial cells are positively selected and mature to functional T cells^1–6. But several studies have demonstrated that athymic nude mice^7–9grafted with MHC-incompatible thymuses developed T cells specific for nude host rather than thymic MHC^10–14. We examined this paradox by analysing the specificity of T lymphocytes derived from nude mice. We report here that nude T lymphocyte precursors transferred to allogeneic SCID (severe combined immunodeficiency) mice with a functioning thymus (but lacking T or B cells^15–17) generated host MHC-restricted effector T cells but also contained T cells restricted to donor MHC. If nude T cells were depleted from nude lympho-haemopoietic donor cells before or after transfer, only host MHC-specific T cells matured. The results may explain the unusual MHC specificities of nude T lymphocytes described in earlier studies ^10–14and demonstrate two separate differentiation steps: in nude mice, T cells may be positively selected for self-MHC restriction specificity extrathymically; then a functional thymus is required for efficient T cell maturation.THE incidence of human malaria has increased during the past 20 years; 270 million people are now estimated to be infected with the parasite^1. An important contribution to this increase has been the appearance of malaria organisms resistant to quinoline-containing antimalarials such as chloroquine and quinine^2. These drugs accumulate in the acid food vacuoles of the intraerythrocytic-stage malaria parasite^3–5, although the mechanism of their specific toxicity in this organelle is uncertain. The primary function of the food vacuole is the proteolysis of ingested red cell haemoglobin^6,7 to provide the growing parasite with essential amino acids. Haemoglobin breakdown in the food vacuole releases haem, which if soluble can damage biological membranes^8 and inhibit a variety of enzymes^9,10. Rather than degrading or excreting the haem, the parasite has evolved a novel pathway for its detoxification by incorporating it into an insoluble crystalline material called haemozoin or malaria pigment^11. These crystals form in the food vacuole of the parasite concomitant with haemoglobin degradation, where they remain until the infected red cell bursts. The structure of haemozoin comprises a polymer of haems linked between the central ferric ion of one haem and a carboxylate side-group oxygen of another^12. This tructure does not form spontaneously from either free haem or haemoglobin under physiological conditions^12–14, and the biochemistry of its formation is unclear. Here we report the identification and characterization of a haem polymerase enzyme activity from extracts of Plasmodium fal-ciparum trophozoites, and show that this enzyme is inhibited by quinoline-containing drugs such as chloroquine and quinine. This provides a possible explanation for the highly stage-specific anti-malarial properties of these drugs.NEUROTRANSMISSION from mossy fibre terminals onto cerebellar granule cells is almost certainly mediated by L-glutamate^1,2. By taking advantage of the small soma size, limited number of processes and short dendrite length of granule cells, we have obtained high-resolution recordings of spontaneous miniature excitatory postsynaptic currents (m.e.p.s.cs) and evoked currents in thin cerebellar slices^3. Miniature currents have a similar time-course and pharmacology to evoked currents and consist of an exceptionally fast non-NMDA ( n -methyl-D-aspartate) component (measured rise-time, 200µ estimated prefiltered rise-time <100 µ decay time constant, τ = 1.0 ms), followed by 50 pS NMDA channel openings that are directly resolvable. We could find no evidence for the recent proposal that miniature currents in granule cells are mediated solely by NMDA channels with a novel time course^4. The non-NMDA receptor component of m.e.p.s.cs has a skewed amplitude distribution, which suggests potential complications for quantal analysis. The difference in time course between the m.e.p.s.cs reported here and other synaptic currents in the brain^5–8could reflect differences in synaptic function or electrotonic filtering; the relative contribution of these possibilities has yet to be established.THE standard form of back-propagation learning^1 is implausible as a model of perceptual learning because it requires an external teacher to specify the desired output of the network. We show how the external teacher can be replaced by internally derived teaching signals. These signals are generated by using the assumption that different parts of the perceptual input have common causes in the external world. Small modules that look at separate but related parts of the perceptual input discover these common causes by striving to produce outputs that agree with each other (Fig. l a ). The modules may look at different modalities (such as vision and touch), or the same modality at different times (for example, the consecutive two-dimensional views of a rotating three-dimensional object), or even spatially adjacent parts of the same image. Our simulations show that when our learning procedure is applied to adjacent patches of two-dimensional images, it allows a neural network that has no prior knowledge of the third dimension to discover depth in random dot stereograms of curved surfaces.IN contrast to terrestrial locomotion in animals with rigid internal or external skeletons (such as insects or vertebrates), caterpillar crawling is slow and energetically costly^1. Biomechanical constraints may be responsible for the high cost of crawling locomotion^1, but the caterpillar body plan, which uses hydraulic-based skeletal and locomotory systems, does not necessarily preclude the possibility of high-#150;speed locomotion as has been suggested^1. I report here how the last-instar larva of the Mediterranean fruit-fly jumps. Jumping increases the maggot's speed to 0.5 m s^−1 per jump, or by 200-fold over crawling. Jumping occurs at a stage when the maggot is particularly vulnerable to parasitization and predation. The fly larva provides the only known example of jumping by a soft-bodied legless organism.COMMON rock-and soil-forming minerals are complicated structures of varying composition. Despite some encouraging progress^1,2 there is as yet no comprehensive rationale for predicting the dissolution rates of these minerals. Here we test the hypothesis^3 that dissolution rates of compositionally distinct orthosilicate minerals scale in a fashion similar to rates of water exchange around the corresponding dissolved, divalent cation. Although dissolution rates span several orders of magnitude, the hypothesis is sustained. Minerals containing alkaline-earth cations dissolve at rates that correlate with ionic size, whereas minerals containing first-row transition metals dissolve at rates that vary with the number of cation d -electrons. Both types of behaviour are consistent with the control of dissolution rate by the character of the bonds between the divalent cation and neighbouring oxygen atoms. This result supports the proposed link^3–6 between the mechanisms of mineral dissolution and the mechanisms by which a dissolved metal exchanges ligands. With this link it may be possible to predict dissolution rates for other nearly isostructural minerals that vary in composition.THE polycyclic hydrocarbons steranes and hopanes are nearly ubiquitous in petroleum, and their relative resistance to degradation makes them useful as 'biomarkers' for assessing the maturity and history of the oil. Steranes represent the reduced form of sterols, which serve as membrane rigidifiers in eukaryotic organisms; similarly, hopanes derive from hopanols, which serve the same function in prokaryotes. We have identified several homologous series of steranes with alkyl side chains (C_l to C_6) at the β position. These compounds, when liberated from the polar fractions of the oils by deuterated Raney nickel desulphurization, give fragmentation mass spectra indicating that the 3-alkyl side chains of the precursor steroids contained several functional groups. 3β-pentyl steranes are anomalously abundant in many samples. These data suggest that the precursors represent a new class of steroids, alkylated at the C–;3 position with a polyhydroxy n -alkane. These precursors may have been formed by the bacterial addition of a ribose sugar to Δ-sterenes, diagenetic alteration products of steroids synthesized by eukaryotes. 3-alkyl steroids might substitute for hopanols (of prokaryotic origin) in bacterial membranes^1.THEORIES of melting in two dimensions^1–3 predict that it may have a very different character from the three-dimensional transition. In particular, Halperin and Nelson^2 proposed that an intermediate hexatic phase, with long-range orientational but not positional order, might intervene between the two-dimensional solid and liquid. Hexatic order has since been identified in three-dimensional liquid-crystal phases^4. Several liquid-crystal compounds that exhibit a hexatic mesophase can form free-standing films ranging from two to thousands of molecular layers in thick-ness, permitting experimental investigation of theories of melting in two dimensions, free from the effects of a substrate. We have previously studied transitions between liquid, hexatic and crystal-line phases in films of n -heptyl-4'- n -pentyloxybiphenyl-4-carboxylate (75OBC), and for films thicker than four layers we observed separate liquid-hexatic transitions for surface and inner layers^5, revealed by heat-capacity measurements. Here we report that improvements to our measurement technique allow us to identify these transitions in individual molecular layers, even in films just three layers thick. We also observe a single liquid-hexatic transition in a two-layer film. These films therefore provide model systems for the study of truly two-dimensional phase transitions.RECENT measurements^1–7 in the Arctic have revealed episodic destruction of boundary-layer ozone from 30–40 parts per 10^9 by volume (p.p.b.v.) to undetectable levels on a timescale of less than a day, during periods when the boundary layer is very stable. The ozone destruction begins at polar sunrise, continues for the months of March and April, and is strongly associated with levels of filterable bromine which are much greater than during the rest of the year. Here we suggest that sea-salt Br^− reaches high concentrations in the snow pack during the long polar night, and is evolved into the atmosphere as Br_2at polar sunrise. Ordinarily, gas-phase photochemistry would convert Br_2 to HBr or brominated organic compounds with consequently little destruction of boundary-layer ozone. In view of several laboratory experiments^8–11, and by analogy with the marine boundary layer^12, we propose that the HBr and brominated organic compounds will be scavenged by the ambient aerosols and ice crystals, and that these heterogeneous reactions release Br_2 back to the atmosphere. We argue that this cycling of bromine between the aerosol and the gas phase should maintain sufficiently high levels of Br atoms and BrO radicals to destroy ozone, in agreement with observations^1–7.FOLLOWING an initial radio outburst^1 which decayed on a time-scale of a few weeks, supernova 1987A^2 was undetectable at radio wavelengths until recently. In mid-1990, 1,200 days after the explosion, radio emission was once again detected^3 with the Molonglo Observatory Synthesis Telescope and the Australia Telescope Compact Array. Our observations since then show that the source has increased in strength at all monitored frequencies between 843 MHz and 8.6 GHz, with considerable variations in spectral index. The extended radio emission is centred within 0.5 arcsec of the optical supernova, and probably lies within the [O III] ring imaged by the Bubble Space Telescope. We interpret the emission as optically thin synchrotron emission from shock–accelerated electrons. This is the first time the birth of a nearby radio supernova remnant has been witnessed, and future observations will allow the structure of the remnant to be compared with the many other known radio remnants.The utility of the clock-like pulses emitted by pulsars [see Nature 217 , 709-713 (1968)] did not end with the insights they have yielded into the properties of neutron stars, and hence of high-density matter. In 1992, Wolszczan and Frail reported precise pulsar timing measurements which exhibited periodic variations. Unlike similar observations reported in the previous year (cited as ref. 3 in the paper), these variations were not an artefact, but revealed the presence of two or more planet-sized objects orbiting the neutron star — the first such objects to be detected outside the Solar System. MILLISECOND radio pulsars, which are old (∼10^9yr), rapidly rotating neutron stars believed to be spun up by accretion of matter from their stellar companions, are usually found in binary systems with other degenerate stars^1. Using the 305-m Arecibo radiotelescope to make precise timing measurements of pulses from the recently discovered 6.2-ms pulsar PSR1257 +12 (ref. 2), we demonstrate that, rather than being associated with a stellar object, the pulsar is orbited by two or more planet-sized bodies. The planets detected so far have masses of at least 2.8 M _⊕ and 3.4 M _⊕ where M_⊕ is the mass of the Earth. Their respective distances from the pulsar are 0.47 AU and 0.36 AU, and they move in almost circular orbits with periods of 98.2 and 66.6 days. Observations indicate that at least one more planet may be present in this system. The detection of a planetary system around a nearby (∼500 pc), old neutron star, together with the recent report on a planetary companion to the pulsar PSR1829–10 (ref. 3) raises the tantalizing possibility that a non-negligible fraction of neutron stars observable as radio pulsars may be orbited by planet-like bodies.THE nature of the sources of cosmic γ-ray bursts is a long-standing problem in astrophysics. Lack of knowledge of their true spatial distribution and of their intrinsic brightness has hampered theoretical understanding of these enigmatic events. The Burst and Transient Source Experiment on the Compton Gamma-Ray Observatory has been detecting bursts at the rate of about one a day, and we report here an analysis of 153 events. The number versus intensity distribution does not follow the –3/2 power law expected for a spatially extended homogeneous distribution of sources, but at the same time the angular distribution is isotropic within statistical limits. Taken together, these results are inconsistent with the spatial distribution of any known population of galactic objects, but may be consistent with the bursts being at cosmological distances.The mechanism of DNA ejection, viral assembly and evolution are related to the structure of bacteriophage ΦX174. The F protein forms a T = 1 capsid whose major folding motif is the eight–stranded antiparallelβ barrel found in many other icosahedral viruses. Groups of 5 G proteins form 12 dominating spikes that enclose a hydrophilic channel containing some diffuse electron density. Each G protein is a tight β barrel with its strands running radially outwards and with a topology similar to that of the F protein. The 12 'pilot' H proteins per virion may be partially located in the putative ion channel. The small, basic J protein is associated with the DNA and is situated in an interior cleft of the F protein. Tentatively, there are three regions of partially ordered DNA structure, accounting for about 12% of the total genome.Nature 354, 522-525 (1991). As a result of an error in the Nature office, an uncorrected version of this letter appeared in the 19/26 December issue. In the legend to Fig. 3 and in Figs 36, 3 d and 4 the designation Sey1N should read SeyNeu as in the text, and a revised Fig. 3e is shown below. The penultimate sentence in paragraph 2 should read "In the homozygous Sey/Sey embryo (Fig.THE Shiga toxin family, a group of cytotoxins associated with diarrhoeal diseases and the haemolytic uraemic syndrome, includes Shiga toxin from Shigella dysenteriae type 1 and verotoxins^1 produced by enteropathogenic Escherichia coli . The family belongs to the A–B class of bacterial toxins, which includes the cholera toxin family, pertussis and diphtheria toxins. These toxins all have bipartite structures consisting of an enzymatic A subunit associated with a B oligomer which binds to specific cell-surface receptors, but their amino-acid sequences and pathogenic mechanisms differ. We have determined the crystal structure of the B oligomer of verotoxin-1 from E. coll . The structure unexpectedly resembles that of the B oligomer of the cholera toxin-like heat-labile enterotoxin from E. coli ^2, despite the absence of detectable sequence similarity between these two proteins. This result implies a distant evolutionary relationship between the Shiga toxin and cholera toxin families. We suggest that the cell surface receptor-binding site lies in a cleft between adjacent subunits of the B pentamer, providing a potential target for drugs and vaccines to prevent toxin binding and effect.THY-1, the smallest member of the immunoglobulin superfamily^1, is a major cell-surface component expressed by several tissues^2. The protein^1carbohydrate^3 and gene^4 structures of this molecule are known, yet its function is not. It is highly expressed in nervous tissue^5, where it appears on virtually all neurons after the cessation of axonal growth^6. Here we show that expression of Thy-1 by a neural cell line inhibits neurite outgrowth on mature astrocytes, but not on other cellular substrata which include Schwann cells and embryonic glia. This inhibition of neurite extension on astrocytes can be reversed by low concentrations (nanomolar) of soluble Thy-1. If a similar interaction between neuronal Thy-1 and astrocytes occurs in vivo , it could stabilize neuronal connec-tions and suppress axonal regrowth after injury in the astrocyte-rich areas of adult central nervous system.THE RAD10 gene of Saccharomyces cerevisiae is required for the incision step of excision repair of ultraviolet-damaged DNA (refs 1, 2), and it functions in mitotic recombination^3. RAD10 has homology to the human excision repair gene ERCC-1 (ref.4). Here we describe the purification of the protein encoded by RAD10 and show that it is a DNA-binding protein with a strong preference for single-stranded DNA. We also show that RAD1O promotes the renaturation of complementary DNA strands.Molecular Genetic Ecology: In Focus. ByA. Rus Hoelzel Gabriel A. Dover. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 100. £6.50, $14.95 (pbk).THE enzyme dUTPase catalyses the hydrolysis of dUTP^1 and maintains a low intracellular concentration of dUTP so that uracil cannot be incorporated into DNA^2. dUTPase from Escherichia coli is strictly specific for its dUTP substrate,^3 the active site discriminating between nucleotides with respect to the sugar moiety as well as the pyrimidine base. Here we report the three-dimensional structure of E. coli dUTPase determined by X-ray crystallography at a resolution of 1.9Å. The enzyme is a symmetrical trimer, and of the 152 amino acid residues in the subunit, the first 136 are visible in the crystal structure. The tertiary structure resembles a jelly-roll fold and does not show the 'classical' nucleotide-binding domain. In the quaternary structure there is a complex interaction between the subunits that may be important in catalysis. This possibility is supported by the location of conserved elements in the sequence.WHEN investigating the biological effects of ionizing radiation on the haemopoietic system, a confounding problem lies in possible differences between the biological effects of sparsely ionizing, low linear energy transfer radiation such as X-, (β or Γ-rays, and densely ionizing, high linear energy transfer radiation such as α-particles. To address this problem we have developed novel techniques for studying haemopoietic cells irradiated with environmentally relevant doses of α-particles from a plutonium-238 source. Using a clonogenic culture system, cytogenetic aberrations in individual colonies of haemopoietic cells derived from irradiated stem cells have been studied. Exposure to α-particles (but not X-rays) produced a high frequency of non-clonal aberrations in the clonal descendants, compatible with α-emitters inducing lesions in stem cells that result in the transmission of chromosomal instability to their progeny. Such unexpected instability may have important implications for radiation leukaemogenesis.WERNER'S syndrome (WS) is a rare autosomal recessive disease in which the affected individuals display symptoms of premature ageing^1–3. The substantial phenotypic overlap between WS and normal ageing indicates that these two conditions may have pathogenetic mechanisms in common^3–5. The WS mutation has pleiotropic effects, and patients and their cells show many differences compared with normals^5. Despite extensive study of the clinical and biochemical features of this disorder, the primary genetic defect remains unknown. We have undertaken a genetic linkage study in an effort to identify the locus of the primary defect^6. Here we report close genetic linkage of the WS mutation to a group of markers on chromosome 8.DYNAMIN was initially identified in calf brain tissue as a protein of relative molecular mass 100,000 which induced nucleotide-sensitive bundling of microtubules^1. Purified dynamin showed only trace ATPase activity. But in combination with an activating factor removed during the purification, it exhibited microtubule-activated ATPase activity and dynamin-induced bundles showed evidence of ATP-dependent force production^1. Dynamin is the product of the Drosophila gene shibire ^2,3, which has been implicated in synaptic vesicle recycling^4,5 and, more generally, in the budding of endocytic vesicles from the plasma membrane^6,7. Dynamin also shows^8 extensive homology with proteins that participate in vacuolar protein sorting^9 and spindle polebody separation^10 in yeast, and in interferon-induced viral resistance^11,12 in mammals. All members of this family contain consensus sequence elements consistent with GTP binding near their amino termini, although none has been shown to have GTPase activity. We report here that dynamin is a specific GTPase which can be stimulated to very high levels of activity by microtubules.RNA polymerase II transcripts, heterogeneous nuclear RNAs (hnRNAs), associate in the nucleus with specific proteins that bind premessenger RNA (hnRNP proteins)^1,2 and with small nuclear ribonucleoprotein particles (snRNPs)^3#150;5. These hnRNA-hnRNP-snRNP complexes assemble on nascent transcripts and hnRNA is processed to mRNA in them^6–8. HnRNP proteins have been localized to the nucleoplasm^9–13 and their functions were presumed to be limited to nuclear events in mRNA biogenesis. It was proposed that an exchange of hnRNP for mRNA-binding proteins accompanies transport of mRNA from the nucleus to the cytoplasm^1,14. We show here that several of the abundant hnRNP proteins, including Al, shuttle between the nucleus and the cytoplasm. HnRNP proteins may thus also have cytoplasmic functions. Furthermore, when in the cytoplasm, Al is bound to mRNA and RNA polymerase II transcription is necessary before it can return to the nucleus. We propose that the cytoplasmic ribonucleoprotein complex of mRNA with hnRNP proteins is the substrate of nuclear–cytoplasmic transport of mRNA.THE acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS) is the late-stage clinical manifestation of long-term persistent infection with the human immunodeficiency virus type 1 (HIV-1). Immune responses directed against the virus and against virus-infected cells during the persistent infection fail to mediate resolution of the infection. As a result, a successful AIDS vaccine must elicit an immune state that will prevent the establishment of the persistent infection following introduction of the virus into the host. The third hyper-variable (V3) domain of the HIV-1 gp120 envelope glycoprotein is a disulphide-linked closed loop of about 30 amino acids which binds and elicits anti-HIV-1 type-specific virus-neutralizing antibodies^1–7. The in vitro characteristics of anti-V3 domain antibody suggest that this antibody could by itself prevent HIV-1 infection in vivo ^8,9, an idea supported by chimpanzee challenge studies in which protection against the HIV-1 persistent infection seemed to correlate with the presence of anti-V3 domain antibody^10–12. Here we directly demonstrate the protective efficacy of anti-V3 domain antibody in vivo and propose that this antibody is potentially useful as both a pre- and post-exposure prophylactic agent.GLUCOCORTICOIDS, in conjunction with their cognate receptors, exert negative-feedback effects on the hypothalamus-pituitary-adrenal axis, suppressing adrenal steroid secretions. Two types of corticosteroid receptor, distinguishable by their ability to bind corticosterone, have been identified as classical mineralocorticoid (type I)^1 and glucocorticoid (type II)^2 receptors by cloning their complementary DNAs. The type I receptor controls the basal circadian rbvthm of corticosteroid secretion. Both receptor types are involved in negative feedback^3, but the type II receptor may be more important for terminating the stress response as it is the only one to be increased in animals rendered more sensitive to corticosteroid negative-feedback effects^4. Here we create a trans-genic mouse with impaired corticosteroid-receptor function by partially knocking out gene expression with type II glucocorticoid receptor antisense RNA. We use this animal to study the glucocor-ticoid feedback effect on the hypothalamus-pituitary–adrenal axis.ARACHIDONIC acid is released by phospholipase A_2 when activation of N -methyl- D -aspartate (NMDA) receptors by neurotransmitter glutamate raises the calcium concentration in neurons^1,2, for example during the initiation of long-term potentiation and during brain anoxia^3,4. Here we investigate the effect of arachidonic acid on glutamate-gated ion channels by whole-cell clamping isolated cerebellar granule cells. Arachidonic acid potentiates, and makes more transient, the current through NMDA receptor channels, and slightly reduces the current through non-NMD A receptor channels. Potentiation of the NMDA receptor current results from an increase in channel open probability, with no change in open channel current. We observe potentiation even with saturating levels of agonist at the glutamate- and glycine-binding sites on these channels; it does not result from conversion of arachidonic acid to lipoxygenase or cyclooxygenase derivatives, or from activation of protein kinase C. Arachidonic acid may act by binding to a site on the NMDA receptor, or by modifying the receptor's lipid environment. Our results suggest that arachidonic acid released by activation of NMDA (or other) receptors will potentiate NMDA receptor currents, and thus amplify increases in intracellular calcium concentration caused by glutamate. This may explain why inhibition of phospholipase A_2 blocks the induction of long-term potentiation^5.The reinstatement of Professor V. J. Gupta as a member of the faculty at Chandigarh is a surprise, to say the least of it.The primary sequence of two components of the dystrophin–glycoprotein complex has been established by complementary DNA cloning. The transmembrane 43K and extracellular 156K dystrophin-associated glycoproteins (DAGs) are encoded by a single messenger RNA and the extracellular 156K DAG binds laminin. Thus, the 156K DAG is a new laminin-binding glycoprotein which may provide a linkage between the sarcolemma and extracellular matrix. These results support the hypothesis that the dramatic reduction in the 156K DAG in Duchenne muscular dystrophy leads to a loss of a linkage between the sarcolemma and extra-cellular matrix and that this may render muscle fibres more susceptible to necrosis.Supernova 1987A is gradually changing from a supernova heated by the radioactive decay of heavy elements to a supernova remnant interacting with a surrounding medium whose structure has already been revealed through its illumination by radiation from the explosion. The nature of the compact remnant remains a central mystery.Odyssey of a Scientist: An Autobiography. ByHans Kalmus. Weidenfeld and Nicholson: 1991. Pp. 166. £17.99.THE origin of our own genus, Homo , has been tentatively correlated with worldwide climatic cooling documented at about 2.4 Myr (million years) (refs 1–5). It has also been conjectured that members of Homo made the first stone tools, currently dated at 2.6–2.4 Myr (refs 6–8). But fossil specimens clearly attributable to Homo before about 1.9 Myr have been lacking. In 1967 a fossil hominoid temporal bone (KNM-BC1) from the Chemeron Formation of Kenya was described as family Hominidae gen. et sp. indet.^9. Although a surface find, its provenance within site JM85 (BPRP site K002) was established and a stratigraphic section provided indicating the specimen's position^9. This evidence has been affirmed (see for example refs 10–12) but the exact age of the fossil was never determined, and the absence of suitable comparative hominid material has precluded a more definitive taxonomic assignment. Here we present ^40Ar/^39Ar age determinations on material from the hominid site indicating an age of 2.4 Myr. In addition, comparative studies allow us to assign KNM-BC1 to the genus Homo , making it the earliest securely known fossil of our own genus found so far.NITRATE, a common and serious contaminant of ground water, is removed at present either by physicochemical methods that do not degrade it, or via degradation by microorganisms, which is a slow process^1. We report here a rapid and efficient process for nitrate removal which involves catalytic reduction by immobilized enzymes. The reduction is driven by an electrical current, and results in complete conversion of nitrate to N_2 without residues. Our electro-bioreactor was constructed by co-immobilizing the enzymes (purified NADH: nitrate reductase from Zea mays ^2 and crude nitrite reductase and N_2O reductase from Rhodop-seudomonas ^3) with electron-carrying dyes in a polymer matrix, which was then attached in thin layers to the surface of the cathode. Nitrate-laden water is pumped past the anode and through the active matrix on the cathode while a low voltage is applied, resulting in two-stage nitrate reduction to N_2 via nitrite. The enzyme activity is higher in the co-immobilized state than in free solution. In principle, such electro-bioreactors could be developed for removal of other water contaminants such as pesticides, if appropriate enzymes and cofactors can be identified.THE conventional preparation of advanced ceramic parts based on silicon carbide or nitride involves pressureless sintering, hot pressing or hot isostatic pressing of appropriate ceramic starting powders^1. Owing to the covalent nature of the Si–C and Si–N bonds and hence the low diffusion coefficients in SiC and Si_3N_4, high sintering temperatures and the addition of sintering aids are normally used to enhance densification. During densification, the sintering additives form second phases located at grain boundaries, which commonly impair the mechanical and physical properties of the material, especially at higher temperatures. New processing routes that overcome these problems are therefore desirable. Here we report the direct transformation of a metallorganic precursor into non-oxide silicon-based ceramics with relative densities of up to 93%. This process can be used to make ceramic components and matrix composites at unusually low temperatures (1,000 °C) and without the addition of sintering aids.METALLIC and superconducting donor-type intercalation compounds of C_60 are now well established. These involve electron transfer from a sublattice of alkali-metal dopants to a sublattice of fullerene molecules. Three stoichiometric phases have been identified^1–3, and a binary phase diagram describing composition regions of two-phase coexistence has been proposed^2. Oxidative intercalation by electron acceptors, meanwhile, has not previously been reported. Ohno et al .^4 recently presented photoemission data suggesting that solid C_60 will take up only minor amounts of iodine, resulting in a non-metallic product which is not a stoichiometric compound^4. Here we report that, by using different reaction conditions, we have prepared a highly crystalline C_60: iodine compound of ideal stoichiometry C_60I_4, with an alternating guest–host layer structure closely resembling that of classic intercalation compounds. The 300-K resistivity exceeds 10^9 Ωcm and we observe no superconductivity down to 4 K, despite the fact that the inter-fullerene separation lies in the range of that in the superconducting M_3 C_60 phases (where M is K, Rb, Cs). C_60I_4 is apparently the first example of a fullerite intercalation compound in which there is no electron transfer between C_60 and the intercalate.AMONG the most intriguing features of the atmosphere of Venus is the presence of cellular structures near and downwind of the subpolar point. Ultraviolet images from the Mariner 10 and Pioneer Venus missions at cloud-top heights of 60–70 km indicate that these cells are chiefly found only during the afternoon at low latitudes, with dark-rimmed cells having horizontal scales of roughly 500–1,000 km, and bright-rimmed cells having horizontal scales of roughly 200–500 km (refs 1, 2). Images of the subsolar region from the recent Galileo flyby of Venus confirm these earlier observations—cellular features with horizontal scales of 250–1,000 km have been observed^3 (Fig. l a , b ). It has been suggested that the structures are atmospheric convection cells^2–5, and, in fact, numerical simulations of three-dimensional compressible convection produce features reminiscent of the cellular structures found in the subsolar Venus atmosphere (Fig. 1 c )^6. There has been some difficulty, however, in accounting for the sizes of these structures. The convection cells were thought to be located in a neutrally stable cloud layer, roughly 50 km above the surface, with a thickness of only a few kilometres. So broad and thin a convection cell would pose a severe challenge to the dynamics of convection. Here we propose that strongly penetrative convection into the stable regions above and below the neutrally stable cloud layer coupled with penetrative convection from the surface increases the vertical dimensions of the cells, thereby helping to explain their large horizontal extent.The Daguerreotype: Nineteenth-Century Technology and Modern Science.. ByM. Susan Barger William B. White. Smithsonian Institution Press: 1991. Pp. 252. £39.95, $67.95.Mountains of Fire: The Nature of Volcanoes. ByRobert W. Decker Barbara B. Decker. Cambridge University Press: 1991. Pp. 198. £30, $39.95 (hbk); £10.95, $15.95 (pbk).Reading the Shape of Nature: Comparative Zoology at the Agassiz Museum. ByMary P. Winsor. University of Chicago Press: 1991. Pp. 324. $21.95, £17.50 (pbk); $49.95, £39.95 (hbk).THEORETICAL suggestions^1–3 that there should be a ring of dust in near-ecliptic orbit about the Sun were supported by observations, during a total solar eclipse on 12 November 1966, of enhanced infrared emission^4–6 from the solar corona at a distance of 4 R⊙ from the Sun's centre. The infrared emission was attributed to the sublimation of dust grains as they spiral into the Sun because of the Poynting–Robertson effect, by which solar radiation creates a tangential drag. Two months after the 1966 eclipse, the feature at 4 R⊙ was seen again in observations from a stratospheric balloon-borne coronagraph, as were additional features at 3.5, 8.7 and 9.2 R (ref. 6). Observations since then, however, have failed unambiguously to corroborate the earlier observations. We searched for excess infrared emission in the solar equatorial plane during the 11 July 1991 eclipse, using a wide-angle infrared camera on Mauna Kea, but failed to find any signature of dust evaporation. We argue that the earlier observations were credible, and therefore that the circumsolar dust ring is a transient feature, perhaps due to the injection of dust into near-solar space by a Sun-grazing comet.R AQUARII is a symbiotic binary system surrounded by a complex extended optical nebulosity^1. At radio and optical wavelengths a jet is seen to emerge from the central binary system^2,3. We have observed R Aqr using the Very Large Array. Comparison with earlier radio observations shows that five out of six bright components in the radio jet have moved. One radio component has the same proper motion as the optical Mira, the primary star of the binary. At a distance of 200 pc (refs 1,4), the proper motions of the other components correspond to a tangential velocity of 44 to 160 km s^-l with respect to the Mira. By combining these measurements with radial velocity determinations, we obtain a true three-dimensional velocity map of the radio jet, provided only that the observed proper motions indeed correspond to physical motions of emitting material. Our results rule out the possibility that the radio components in the jet were formed in a single explosive event, and suggest instead that they are 'bullets' ejected at ∼20-yr intervals into a narrow cone. Alternatively, if the components move along the jet and are accelerated during the whole of their passage through the inner 7 arcsec (1,400 AU) of the system, ejection at ∼40-yr intervals would lead to the disposition observed at present.CYGNUS X-3 is one of the most luminous X-ray sources in the Galaxy^1,2, a bright infrared source^3 and a radio source that undergoes huge outbursts^4. The system is a binary, presumably a neutron star plus companion, with a 4.79-h orbital period that modulates the X-ray and infrared emission^5,6 and that increases on a 600,000-year timescale^7,8. Radio observations reveal the presence of a relativistic jet^9. The nature of Cyg X-3 has remained unclear, however, in part because the large interstellar extinction^3 in its direction prevents optical spectroscopy. Upper limits on spectral features in the near infrared have been reported previously^10, but only with recent instrumental improvements have we become able to identify spectral features in the near infrared I and K bands. These are found to be characteristic of Wolf–Rayet stars: strong, broad emission lines of He_I and He_II, but no strong hydrogen lines. These observations strongly suggest the presence of a dense wind in the Cyg X-3 system, and may indicate that the companion is a fairly massive helium star, as had been predicted^11 by a model in which the present system is a descendant of a massive X-ray binary.Is there some impending crisis in the relationship between particle physics, neatly but incompletely described, and the qualitative properties of the Universe at large?Despite resistance, there is a revolution in progress among Hungary's research community. The signs are promising that the legacy of Soviet-style inefficiency will give way to a brighter future.█Crop pests already showing resistance to Bt █ Report calls for industry, government curbs WashingtonThe European budget for the next five years would spend too much on applied research, too little on other kinds.Whether you are hooked on the Apple Macintosh or personal computers, this week's feature has something to suit both camps. Featured products include programs for three-dimensional reconstruction and DNA/protein band matching, and software that is designed to take the strain out of grant writing.EMPTY capsids and complete virions of polyomavirus crystallize isomorphously^1. Here we use difference Fourier analysis of X-ray diffraction data at 25-Å resolution from these crystals to obtain an electron-density map of the inside of the virion. The polyomavirus capsid is built from 72 pentamers of VP1 that form three different types of connections in the T = 7 d icosahedral surface lattice^2. Self-assembly of purified recombinant VP1 into capsid-like aggregates^3,4 has shown that switching of the bonding specificity to form the unanticipated^5 non-equivalent connections is an inherent property of the VP1 pentamers. Our map of the inside of the virion displays 72 prongs of electron density extending from the core into the axial cavities of the VP1 pentamers. We identify these prongs with the VP2 and VP3 molecules, which may function to guide the assembly of the highly ordered capsid on the nucleohistone core. The atomic structure of the closely related simian virus-40 capsid has been determined from the high-resolution diffraction data^6. Our polymavirus map, calculated using all the low-resolution diffraction data, shows no indication of regular order inside the spherical core.WHEN fully grown Xenopus oocytes are stimulated by progesterone, a period of protein synthesis is necessary for maturation^1. Synthesis of the mos proto-oncogene product, pp39^ mos is necessary for the activation of M-phase promoting factor (MPF) in meiosis I (ref. 2). On the basis that mos is translated de novo on hormonal stimulation of Xenopus oocytes^3 and that injecting mos RNA into oocytes induces their maturation^3,4, we have proposed that the mos protein is a candidate initiator of oocyte maturation, needed to trigger the conversion of precursor MPF into its active form^1,3. To determine whether mos is the only protein required for initiating maturation, we have produced a soluble, active recombinant mos protein and injected it into Xenopus oocytes. We report here that in the absence of protein synthesis that mos protein efficiently induces germinal vesicle breakdown and the activation of MPF. The oocytes, however, do not proceed into meiosis II. Thus, the mos protein fulfills the requirements of an initiator protein, but the synthesis of one or more additional proteins may be necessary to complete oocyte maturation.THE murine major histocompatibility complex (MHC) contains two genes ( Ham-1 and Ham-2 ) that encode members of a super-family of ATP-dependent transport proteins^1,2. These genes are believed to mediate the transport of peptide antigen from the cytoplasm into the lumen of the endoplasmic reticulum for binding by MHC class I molecules. Evidence for such a function has come from the rescue of class I surface expression by a cloned copy of the human homologue of Ham-1 , PSF-1, in a human cell line that is defective in antigen processing^3. A mutant murine cell line, RMA-S, has an identical antigen-processing-defective phenotype^4,5. Here we show that expression of a cloned copy of the Ham-2 gene in RMA-S cells results in recovery of the ability to process and present class I-restricted antigens to cytotoxic T lymphocytes, and in partial recovery of class I surface expression. Processing defects for classical (H-2 K and D) and non-classical (Qal and HMT) class I molecules are corrected by Ham-2 . These data indicate that both MHC-linked transporter genes are probably required for class I antigen processing, and that the functional transporter in this pathway may consist of a Ham-l/Ham-2 heterodimer.MAJOR histocompatibility complex (MHC) class I molecules present peptides derived from the endogenous protein pool to cytotoxic T lymphocytes, which can thus recognize intracellular antigen^1–3. This pathway may depend on a transporter (PSF1) (refs 4–6) to mediate entry of the cytosolic peptides into a pre-Golgi compartment where they hind to class I heavy chains and promote their stable assembly with β_2-microglobulin^7–12. There is, however, only indirect support for this function of PSF1 (ref. 6). Here we show that PSF1 is necessary for the efficient assembly of class I molecules and enables them to present a peptide epitope derived from endogenously synthesized viral antigen. Immunochemical and genetic data demonstrate that the PSF1 poly peptide is associated with a complementary transporter chain, which is polymorphic and is encoded by the PSF2 gene^13, which is closely linked to PSF1 .PRESENTATION of cytoplasmic antigens to class I-restricted cytotoxic T cells implied the existence of a specialized peptide transporter^1–3 (reviewed in ref. 4). For most class I heavy chains, association with peptides of the appropriate length is required for stable assembly with β _2-microglobulin^5–11. Mutant cells RMA–S (ref. 12) and .174/T2 (refs 13,14) neither assemble stable class I molecules nor present intracellular antigens, and we have suggested that they have lost a function required for the transport of short peptides from the cytosol to the endoplasmic reticulum^5–7. The genetic defect in .174 has been localized to a large deletion in the class II region of the major histocompatibility complex^6,15,16, within which two genes ( RING4 and RING11 ) have been identified that code for 'ABC' (ATP-binding cassette) transporters^15,17–21. We report here that the protein products of these two genes assemble to form a complex. Defects in either protein result in the formation of unstable class I molecules and loss of presentation of intracellular antigens. The molecular defect in a new mutant, BM36.1, is shown to be in the ATP-binding domain of the RING11/PSF2 protein. This is in contrast to the mutant .134 (ref. 15), which lacks the RING4/PSF1 protein.AT the molecular level, muscle contraction is the result of cyclic interaction between myosin crossbridges, which extend from the thick filament, and the thin filament, which consists mainly of actin. The energy for work done by a single crossbridge during a cycle of attachment, generation of force, shortening and detachment is believed to be coupled to the hydrolysis of one molecule of ATP^1,2. The distance the actin filament slides relative to the myosin filament in one crossbridge cycle has been estimated as 12 nm by step-length perturbation studies on single fibres from frog muscle^3,4. The 'mechanical' power stroke of the attached crossbridge can therefore be defined as 12-nm shortening with a force profile like that shown by the quick recovery of force following a length perturbation. According to this definition, power strokes cannot be repeated faster than the overall ATPase rate. Here, however, we show that the power stroke can be regenerated much faster than expected from the ATPase rate. This contradiction can be resolved if, in the shortening muscle, the free energy of ATP hydrolysis is used in several actin–myosin interactions consisting of elementary power strokes each of 5–10 nm.HERE we report the identification and characterization of a gene defect causing Waardenburg's syndrome with hearing loss in a large Brazilian family. This demonstrates a mutation causing Waardenburg's syndrome as well as a mutation causing a form of congenital deafness. The mutation was found in the HuP2 gene, a member of the paired domain family of proteins that bind DNA and regulate gene expression^1. The mutation occurred in 100% of the cases with the disease in this family and was absent in a random sample of 50 unrelated control subjects. Identification of the Waardenburg's syndrome gene and future characterization of its gene product is likely to increase our understanding of the pathogenesis of this disorder and may allow prevention of deafness of this type.Animal Life at Low Temperatures. By John Davenport. Chapman and Hall. 1991. Pp. 246. £29.95.WAARDENGURG'S syndrome (WS) is an autosomal dominant combination of deafness and pigmentary disturbances, probably caused by defective function of the embryonic neural crest^1,2. We have mapped one gene for WS to the distal part of chromosome 2 (ref. 3). On the basis of their homologous chromosomal location, their close linkage to an alkaline phosphatase gene, and their related phenotype, we suggested that WS and the mouse mutant Splotch^4,5 might be homologous. Splotch is caused by mutation in the mouse Pax-3 gene^6,7. This gene is one of a family of eight Pax genes known in mice which are involved in regulating embryonic development; each contains a highly conserved transcription control sequence, the paired box^8. Here we show that some families with WS have mutations in the human homologue^9 of Pax-3. Mutations in a related gene, Pax-6, which, like Pax-3, has both a paired box and a paired-type homeobox sequence, cause the Small-eye mutation in mice^10 and aniridia inman^11. Thus mutations in the Pax genes are important causes of human developmental defects.WE recently described a new approach for the rapid characterization of expressed genes by partial DNA sequencing to generate 'expressed sequence tags'^1. From a set of 600 human brain complementary DNA clones, 348 were informative nuclear-encoded messenger RNAs. We have now partially sequenced 2,672 new, independent cDNA clones isolated from four human brain cDNA libraries to generate 2,375 expressed sequence tags to nuclear-encoded genes. These sequences, together with 348 brain expressed sequence tags from our previous study, comprise more than 2,500 new human genes and 870,769 base pairs of DNA sequence. These data represent an approximate doubling of the number of human genes identified by DNA sequencing and may represent as many as 5% of the genes in the human genome.PELAGIC tunicates of the genus Oikopleura produce, live in and pump water through mucous structures termed 'houses'. Because these houses contain filters with submicrometre pores, oikopleurids have been proposed as important consumers of participate organic carbon (POC) in the sea^1. We present new evidence that they also consume 'dissolved' organic carbon (DOC) in the colloidal size range down to about 0.2 μm in diameter. Such colloids are more abundant in the sea than previously believed^2,3, and have an important role in the global flux of carbon. Oikopleurid tunicates have the potential to filter a significant fraction of the water mass every day^1,4, and to repack much of the colloidal DOC into their houses, faecal pellets and bodies. Oikopleurids are also known prey for several fish species^5–7. Thus, we speculate the oikopleurid tunicates to mediate a substantial energy flow, from DOC through a two-step 'food-chain', to fish of commercial interest, by-passing energy-consuming respiration by bacteria and small planktonic protozoa.Jack Whitehead, wealthy from success in technology, gave his energy and resources to pure science.SATELLITE images of large volcanic explosions reveal that the tops of volcanic eruption columns are much colder than the surrounding atmosphere^1. We propose that this effect occurs whenever a mixture of hot volcanic ash and entrained air ascends sufficiently high into a stably stratified atmosphere. Although the mixture is initially very hot, it expands and cools as the ambient pressure decreases. We show that cloud-top undercoolings in excess of 20°C may develop in clouds that penetrate the stratosphere; this is consistent with observations of the 4 April 1982 eruption of El Chichón^1 and the 18 May 1980 eruption of Mount St Helens^2. Furthermore, from our model results, we predict that for a given cloud-top temperature, variations in the initial temperature of 100–200°C may correspond to variations in the column height of 5–10 km. We deduce that the present practice of converting satellite-based measurements of the temperature at the top of volcanic eruption columns to estimates of the column height will produce rather inaccurate results and should therefore be discontinued.THE dispersal of volcanic material from large tropical eruptions provides insight into the circulation of the lower stratosphere. Here we infer stratospheric motions from zonal mean cross-sections of satellite observations of the aerosol layer taken during 1979–81 and 1984–91. By examining the aerosol distribution following volcanic eruptions in the tropics, we find that poleward transport occurs readily at altitudes within a few kilometres above the tropopause, whereas in the altitude range of 21–28 km, aerosols tend to remain within 20° of the Equator. We further deduce that the aerosol distribution in this upper regime is controlled by the phase of the quasibiennial oscillation. When the easterly shear is present, aerosols are lofted over the Equator, whereas when the westerly shear is present, descent relative to the mean stratospheric circulation occurs over the Equator. From the aerosol distributions, we suggest that the tropical stratosphere may be regarded as a temporary reservoir for trace constituents entering the stratosphere through the tropical tropopause.PHOTOCHROMIC materials, whose optical absorption properties change in response to light, are important for a number of technological applications. A stable, reusable photochromic thin-film could be used, for example, in optical displays and high-density memories. Thin films of some transition-metal oxides can be coloured blue by band-gap excitation using ultraviolet light^1–6. For use with common semiconductor laser sources, however, photo-chromic materials are required that respond to visible light. Here we report on the preparation of visible-light-sensitive, reversibly photochromic films of MoO_3. Pretreated, vacuum-evaporated MoO_3 thin films were slightly blued by cathodic polarization in a non-aqueous electrolyte; subsequent irradiation with visible light in air produced a strong colour enhancement. The photochromism could be erased by anodic polarization, and the coloration–decoloration process was repeatable over at least five cycles. The behaviour of these films contrasts with those blued by band-gap irradiation, which were not responsive to visible light.SCRAPIE and related animal and human disorders are neurodegenerative diseases^1 characterized by the formation of a modified, partly proteinase-resistant protein (PrP) of the host^2,3,which tends to aggregate as amyloid fibrils^4 and accumulate in the brain of infected individuals^5. There is a general consensus that the pathological form of PrP (PrP^Sc) is essential for the clinical appearance of the disease^6, but whether it is part of the scrapie agent^7 or a by-product of viral infection^8,9is still controversial. Here we report that treatment of scrapie-infected hamsters with amphotericin B delays the accumulation in the brain of the proteinase-resistant portion of PrP^Sc by about 30 days without affecting scrapie replication. The consequence is that hamsters treated with amphotericin B developed clinical signs of disease later than infected controls. We argue that the proteinase-resistant portion of PrP^Sc is necessary for the development of the disease but that it is unlikely to be essential for scrapie replication.PRONOUNCED differences in mating success between males holding territories clustered on traditional mating grounds (leks) are commonly cited as evidence of female choice for male phenotypes^1–6but female ungulates appear to prefer particular territories^6–12 even when no other individuals are on the lek^11,12. Female choice of territories may be influenced by spatial features^7–10,12,but observations suggest that females may also be attracted to successful territories by olfactory cues in the soil^13. Here we report that transferring the topsoil between successful and unsuccessful territories on leks of two reduncine antelope species caused the numbers of females and matings on the unsuccessful territories to increase tenfold. Females were probably attracted to the soil by smells that had accumulated from heavy use by other females. Because of this attraction, stochastic process may play an important part in generating the variance in mating success between territory holders on leks.THE nature and location of the olivine–spinel phase transition inside subducting slabs differ greatly from the situation in the surrounding mantle, due to the different temperature distribution inside the slabs. Two models have been proposed for this phase transition: one in which the location of the phase boundary between olivine and modified (β-phase) spinel is determined by equilibrium thermodynamics^1, and the other including a metastable olivine phase which persists to a depth of ∼550 km (ref. 2). The location of the olivine–spinel transition in the slab may be relevant to the generation of deep earthquakes^3–5, and to the buoyancy forces driving subduction^6. Here we use travel-time residuals from deep earthquakes recorded by the dense seismograph network in Japan to investigate the configuration of the olivine–spinel phase boundary inside the subducting Pacific plate. Theoretical travel-time residuals for the equilibrium model do not fit the observed residuals, whereas those for the metastable model do, implying the presence of metastable olivine inside the subducting slab.AGONISTS that stimulate protein kinase C (PKC) induce profound changes in cell morphology correlating with the reorganization of submembranous actin^1,2, but no direct connection between PKC and actin assembly has been identified^3. The myristoylated, alanine-rich C kinase substrate (MARCKS) binds calmodulin^4,5 and is a predominant, specific substrate of PKC which is phosphorylated during macrophage and neutrophil activation^6–8, growth factor-dependent mitogenesis^9,10and neurosecretion^11,12; it is redistributed from plasma membrane to cytoplasm when phosphorylated^13–15 and is involved in leukocyte motility^14,15. Here we report that MARCKS is a filamentous (F) actin crosslinking protein, with activity that is inhibited by PKC-mediated phosphorylation and by binding to calcium–calmodulin. MARCKS may be a regulated crossbridge between actin and the plasma membrane, and modulation of the actin crosslinking activity of the MARCKS protein by calmodulin and phosphorylation represents a potential convergence of the calcium–calmodulin and PKC signal transduction pathways in the regulation of the actin cytoskeleton.LIPASES belong to a class of esterases whose activity on trigly-cerides is greatly enhanced at lipid–water interfaces^1. This phenomenon, called interfacial activation^2, has a structural explanation: a hydrophobic lid, which at rest covers the catalytic site, is displaced on substrate or inhibitor binding, and probably interacts with the lipid matrix^3–6. Fusarium solani pisi cutinase belongs to a group of homologous enzymes of relative molecular mass 22–25K (ref. 7) capable of degrading cutin, the insoluble lipid-polyester matrix covering the surface of plants^7, and hydrolysing triglycerides^7,8. Cutinases differ from classical Upases in that they do not exhibit interfacial activation; they are active on soluble as well as on emulsified triglycerides. Cutinases therefore establish a bridge between esterases and lipases. We report here the three-dimensional structure of a recombinant cutinase from F. solani pisi, expressed in Escherichia coli ^9,10. Cutinase is an α–β protein; the active site is composed of the triad Ser 120, His 188 and Asp 175. Unlike other lipases, the catalytic serine is not buried under surface loops, but is accessible to solvent. This could explain why cutinase does not display interfacial activation.LYMPHOCYTES(B and T cells) derive continuously from the same multipotential stem cells that produce myeloid cells, including erythrocytes, granulocytes and macrophages^1,2. Tri- and bipotential myeloid intermediates between the multipotential stem cells and later unipotential cells have been identified using clonal methods in culture. Although similar methods have detected committed pre-B cells in mouse fetal liver^3, earlier progenitors with additional non-B lineage options have not been demonstrated in normal tissues. We report the characterization and purification of fetal liver cells that generate clones containing both macrophages and B cells, identified biochemically and morphologically. The common origin of the two cell types was shown by culture of single precursor cells. Their dual potential and unreal-ranged i mm u no-globulin loci place the precursors before exclusive B-lineage commitment in the haematopoietic hierarchy. The availability of such cells in purified form will allow direct study of lineage choice in cells having both lymphoid and non-lymphoid options.THE Drosophila segmentation gene fushi tarazu (ftz) encodes a homeodomain-containing protein, ftz, that can act as a DNA-binding activator of transcription^1–5. In the developing embryo, ftz is expressed in seven stripes^6 which correspond to the even-numbered parasegments^7. These parasegments are missing in ftz ' embryos^8. When ftz is expressed throughout blastoderm embryos under the control of a heat-shock promoter, the odd-numbered parasegments are lost^9. This 'anti- ftz ' phenotype has been attributed to autoactivation of the endogenous ftz gene by the ectopically expressed protein^10. Here we show that the same phenotype is induced by ectopic expression of a ftz polypeptide containing a deletion in the homeodomain. Thus, ftz can alter gene expression without binding directly to DNA.TRACER-CALIBRATED models of the total uptake of anthropogenic CO_2 by the world's oceans give estimates of about 2 gigatonnes carbon per year^1, significantly larger than a recent estimate^2 of 0.3-0.8 Gt C yr^-1 for the synoptic air-to-sea CO_2 influx. Although both estimates require that the global CO_2 budget must be balanced by a large unknown terrestrial sink, the latter estimate implies a much larger terrestrial sink, and challenges the ocean model calculations on which previous CO_2 budgets were based. The discrepancy is due in part to the net flux of carbon to the ocean by rivers and rain, which must be added to the synoptic air-to-sea CO_2 flux to obtain the total oceanic uptake of anthropogenic CO_2. Here we estimate the magnitude of this correction and of several other recently proposed adjustments to the synoptic air-sea CO_2 exchange. These combined adjustments minimize the apparent inconsistency, and restore estimates of the terrestrial sink to values implied by the modelled oceanic uptake.ALTHOUGH anthropogenic emissions of carbon dioxide have today created a greater atmospheric CO_2concentration in the Northern than in the Southern Hemisphere, a comparison of interhemispheric CO_2 profiles from 1980 and 1962 led Keeling and Heimann^1,2 to conclude that, before the Industrial Revolution, natural CO_2 sources and sinks acted to set up a reverse (south to north) gradient which drove about one gigatonne of carbon each year through the atmosphere from the Southern to the Northern Hemisphere. At steady state, this flux must have been balanced by a counter flow of carbon from north to south through the ocean. Here we present a means to estimate this natural flux by a separation of oceanic carbon anomalies into those created by biogenic processes and those created by CO_2 exchange between the ocean and atmosphere. We find that before the Industrial Revolution, deep water formed in the northern Atlantic Ocean carried about 0.6 gigatonnes of carbon annually to the Southern Hemisphere, providing support for Keeling and Heimann's proposal. The existence of this oceanic carbon pump also raises questions about the need for a large terrestrial carbon sink in the Northern Hemisphere, as postulated by Tans et al .^3, to balance the present global carbon budget.PHOTOCONDUCTING materials are employed in many technological applications, such as photodetection and electrostatic imaging.^1 We report here the preparation of photoconducting films of polyvinylcarbazole (PVK) doped with fullerenes (a mixture of C_60 and C_70). The performance of this material is comparable with some of the best photoconductors available commercially, such as thiapyrylium dye aggregates^2. The quantum yield for primary charge separation and the initial ion-pair distance are calculated, within the framework of the Onsager model^3,4, to be 0.9 and 19 Å respectively. The wavelength dependence of photoconductivity is essentially determined by the absorption spectrum of the fullerenes, with the active range extending from about 280 to 680 nm. The isolation of other fullerenes and fullerene derivatives may lead to the development of a large number of fullerene-based polymeric photoconductors in the future.PERIODIC variations in the arrival times of pulses from the millisecond pulsar PSR1257+12 are most straightforwardly interpreted as indicating the presence of two planet-like companions orbiting the pulsar^1. Rasio et al .^2have proposed that the planetary explanation is amenable to a simple test: the deduced parameters put the planets near an orbital resonance, in which case secular evolution of the orbits should be observable in a matter of years. Detection of such orbital evolution would yield the masses and orbital inclinations of the planets. Here we point out that if the masses of the two planets are more than ∼10 times greater than the minimum values (3.4 and 2.8 Earth masses) allowed by the observations, then their orbits will be in an exact 3:2 resonance. The character of the predicted orbital parameter perturbations is then markedly different from the periodic perturbations that result from only a near-resonance. The amplitude of the perturbations is much greater, and is very sensitive to the planet masses.FERMI'S suggestion^1 that a population of low-energy charged particles could be accelerated by momentum exchange with 'wandering' galactic magnetic fields has long been a favoured mechanism for the generation of cosmic rays. A difficulty with this idea, however, recognized by Fermi^2 and others^3–5, is that unless the scattering centres of strong magnetic fields have velocities close to the speed of light, the acceleration mechanism is thought to be too slow to produce the highest-energy (~~ 10^20 eV) cosmic rays before particles escape from the Galaxy. We argue here that this problem is not intrinsic to the Fermi theory, but results only from approximating the essentially stochastic acceleration process as a deterministic one, in which particles diffuse upwards in energy at some mean rate. The stochastic treatment we present here suggests that the particles that acquire the highest energies are those on the wings of the statistical energy distribution, which proceed not in a pedestrian manner but are accelerated much more effectively as 'high flyers'.TRANSLOCATION of proteins across the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) membrane represents the first step in the eukaryotic secretory pathway. In mammalian cells, the targeting of secretory and membrane protein precursors to the ER is mediated by signal recognition particle (SRP), a cytosolic ribonucleoprotein complex comprising a molecule of 7SL RNA and six polypeptide subunits (relative molecular masses 9, 14, 19, 54, 68 and 72K)^1. In Sac-charomyces cerevisiae , a homologue of the 54K subunit (SRP54)^2,3co-purifies with a small cytoplasmic RNA, scRl (refs 4, 5). Genetic data indicate that SRP54 and scRl are involved in translocation in vivo , suggesting the existence of an SRP-like activity in yeast^5,6. Whether this activity requires additional components similar to those found in mammalian SRP is not known. We have recently reported a genetic selection that led to the isolation of a yeast mutant, sec65-l, which is conditionally defective in the insertion of integral membrane proteins into the ER^7. Here we report the cloning and sequencing of the SEC65 gene, which encodes a 31.2K protein with significant sequence similarity to the 19K subunit of human SRP (SRP19)^8. We also report the cloning of a multicopy suppressor of sec65-l , and its identification as the previously defined SRP54 gene, providing genetic evidence for an interaction between these gene products in vivoPROTEIN targeting to the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) in mammalian cells is catalysed by the signal recognition particle (SRP), which consists of six protein subunits and an RNA subunit^1,2. Saccharomyces cerevisiae SRP is a 16S particle, of which only two subunits have been identified: a protein subunit, SRP54p, which is homologous to the mammalian SRP54 subunit, and an RNA subunit, scRl (ref. 3). The sec65-l mutant yeast cells^4 are temperature-sensitive for growth and defective in the translocation of several secreted and membrane-bound proteins. The DNA sequence of the SEC65 gene suggests that its product is related to mammalian SRP19 subunit and may have a similar function^5.Here we show that SEC65p is a subunit of the S. cerevisiae SRP and that it is required for the stable association of another subunit, SRP54p, with SRP. Overexpression of SRP54p suppresses both growth and protein translocation defects in sec65-l mutant cells.MOLECULES of the cadherin and integrin families involved in cell–cell and cell–matrix adhesion have been implicated in epithelial differentiation, carcinogenesis and metastasis^1–6. Having observed that a colon cancer cell line bound avidly to collagen type I, inducing integrin-triggered glandular differentiation^7 we investigated the regulation of integrin function in these cells. We modified a mammalian expression cloning system^8 that used monoclonal antibody selection to clone cell surface molecules. Using attachment to collagen type I to select for adhesive phenotype, we isolated a complementary DNA clone that increases cell adhesion to components of the extracellular matrix. The corresponding gene (cell adhesion regulator, CAR ) is located on the long arm of chromosome 16 (16q) and encodes a protein of 142 amino acids, which has an N-terminal myristoylation motif and a consensus tyrosine-kinase phosphorylation site at the C terminus. Removal of this tyrosine residue abolishes enhancement of cell–matrix adhesion. This gene may encode an adhesion signal transduction molecule that functions in the suppression of tumour invasion.JUST before the onset of labour, uterine myometrium becomes extremely sensitive to oxytocin^1 for which it is a primary target tissue, because of a dramatic increase in the number of oxytocin receptors^2,3. We report here the structure and expression of the human oxytocin receptor complementary DNA isolated by expression cloning. The encoded receptor is a 388-amino-acidpolypeptide with^7transmembrane domains typical of G protein-coupled receptors. The oxytocin receptor, expressed in Xenopus oocytes, specifically responds to oxytocin and induces an inward membrane current. Messenger RNAs for the receptor are of two sizes, 3.6 kilobases in breast, and 4.4 kilobases in ovary, uterine endometrium and myometrium. The mRNA level in the myometrium is very high at term. We conclude that the increase in receptor number in the myometrium at labour is, at least in part, due to the increase in mRNA.THE neurohypophyseal hormone arginine vasopressin has diverse actions^1–7 , including the inhibition of diuresis, contraction of smooth muscle, stimulation of liver glycogenolysis and modulation of adrenocorticotropic hormone release from the pituitary. Arginine vasopressin receptors are G protein-coupled and have been divided into at least three types^8; the Via (vascular/hepatic)^1,9–11and Vlb (anterior pituitary)^12 receptors which act through phosphatidylinositol hydrolysis to mobilize intracellular Ca^2+, and the V2 (kidney) receptor^1,13,14which is coupled to adenylate cyclase. We report here the cloning of a complementary DNA encoding the hepatic Via arginine vasopressin receptor. The liver cDNA encodes a protein with seven putative transmembrane domains, which binds arginine vasopressin and related compounds with affinities similar to the native rat Via receptor. The messenger RNA corresponding to the cDNA is distributed in rat tissues known to contain Via receptors.THE roles of N -methyl-D-aspartate (NMDA) receptors and protein kinase C (PKC) are critical in generating and maintaining a variety of sustained neuronal responses. In the nociceptive (pain-sensing) system, tissue injury or repetitive stimulation of small-diameter afferent fibres triggers a dramatic increase in discharge (wind-up) or prolonged depolarization of spinal cord neurons. This central sensitization can neither be induced nor maintained when NMDA receptor channels are blocked^1,2. In the trigeminal subnu-cleus caudalis (a centre for processing nociceptive information from the orofacial areas^3), a µ-opioid receptor agonist causes a sustained increase in NMDA-activated currents by activating intracellular PKC^4. There is also evidence that PKC enhances NMDA-receptor-mediated glutamate responses^4–7 and regulates long-term potentiation of synaptic transmission^8–14. Despite the importance of NMDA-receptors and PKC, the mechanism by which PKC alters the NMDA response has remained unclear. Here we examine the actions of intracellularly applied PKC on NMDA-activated currents in isolated trigeminal neurons. We find that PKC potentiates the NMDA response by increasing the probability of channel openings and by reducing the voltage-dependent Mg^2+ block of NMDA-receptor channels.US presidential candidates should either forget science or learn a little, if a calamitous forum last week is any guide.The gene ced-9 of the nematode Caenorhabditis elegans acts to protect cells from programmed cell death. A mutation that abnormally activates ced-9 prevents the cell deaths that occur during normal C. elegans development. Conversely, mutations that inactivate ced-9 cause cells that normally live to undergo programmed cell death; these mutations result in embryonic lethality, indicating that ced-9 function is essential for development. The ced-9 gene functions by negatively regulating the activities of other genes that are required for the process of programmed cell death.TWO genomic regions with unusally low recombination rates in Drosophila melanogaster have normal levels of divergence but greatly reduced nucleotide diversity^1,2, apparently resulting from the fixation of advantageous mutations and the associated hitchhiking effect^3,4. Here we show that for 20 gene regions from across the genome, the amount of nucleotide diversity in natural populations of D. melanogaster is positively correlated with the regional rate of recombination. This cannot be explained by variation in mutation rates and/or functional constraint, because we observe no correlation between recombination rates and DNA sequence divergence between D. melanogaster and its sibling species, D. simulans . We suggest that the correlation may result from genetic hitch-hiking associated with the fixation of advantageous mutants. Hitch-hiking thus seems to occur over a large fraction of the Drosophila genome and may constitute a major constraint on levels of genetic variation in nature.COCCOLITHS, the calcite plates formed by unicellular phyto-planktonic algae (coccolithophores, phylum Prymnesiophyta)^1, are produced in enormous quantities and probably constitute the largest single carbonate sink in oceanic biogeochemical cycles. They are major sediment formers, are of great value to geologists as biostratigraphic indicators and have been extensively studied as models for biomineralization^2,3. We have applied the understanding of coccolith biomineralization to the fossil record^4 and present evidence from electron and optical microscopy that there has been a conserved mechanism of crystal nucleation throughout the 230 million year history of coccolithophores. This fundamental feature of coccolith growth, which we term the V/R model, involves the assembly of a ring of single crystals with alternating orientations, radial (R) and vertical (V), and provides a powerful tool for tracing phylogenies, identifying homologous structures and rationalizing the higher taxonomy of the group. The living cocco-lithophorid, Emiliania huxleyi , seemed anomalous because only R crystals had been observed; transmission electron microscopy of proto-coccolith rings, however, revealed relict V crystals which are overgrown by preferential development of R units in complete coccoliths. A speculative model based on a plicated macromolecular template is presented as a possible explanation for the conserved nucleation process.REMAINS of Early Eocene vertebrates from freshwater clays near Murgon, southeastern Queensland, represent Australia's oldest marsupials, bats, non-volant placentals, frogs, madtsoiid snakes, trionychid turtles^1and birds. Radiometric dating of illites forming part of the matrix of the mammal-bearing zone has given a minimum age estimate of 54.6 ± 0.05 x 10^6 years, which is roughly twice as old as any marsupials previously known from Australia^2 and well before the 38 million year (Myr) separation of Australia from Antarctica/South America^3. All marsupials so far known from the Tingamarra Local Fauna are more derived (being dilambdodont) than peradectids. None of them is clearly a member of a previously known Australian family, but some could be uniquely plesiomorphic dasyuroids or perameloids. Another is autapomorphically specialized and indicative of at least partial isolation of the Australian portion of Gondwana. Here we report on the discovery of a tooth of the earliest non-volant placental known from Australia, Tingamarra porterorum gen. et sp. nov., which seems to be a condylarth-like placental mammal. The presence of non-volant placentals in the Early Tertiary of Australia challenges a common presumption that marsupials dominated Australia's therian assemblages because of failure of such placentals to reach Australia before the Late Tertiary.CONTINENTAL flood basalts, and their associated swarms of mafic dykes, are thought to result from melting in mantle plumes^1–3, but the processes by which the resulting magma makes its way from mantle to crust remain obscure. Here we use magnetic anisotropy measurements to reconstruct the pattern of magma flow in the Proterozoic Mackenzie dyke swarm. Our results indicate that magma was injected vertically within 500 km of the focal point of the dyke swarm, and then travelled horizontally at all further distances out to at least 2,100 km. The sharp transition from vertical to horizontal flow at between 500 and 600 km may correspond to the outer boundary of melt generation in the mantle plume believed to be responsible for the Mackenzie igneous events.The successful cold dark matter (CDM) theory for the formation of structure in the Universe has suffered recent setbacks from observational evidence suggesting that there is more large-scale structure than it can explain. This may force a fundamental revision or even abandonment of the theory, or may simply reflect a modulation of the galaxy distribution by processes associated with galaxy formation. Better understanding of galaxy formation is needed before the demise of CDM is declared.Flying Buttresses, Entropy, and 0-Rings: The World of an Engineer. ByJames L. Adams J. L.. Harvard University Press: 1992. Pp. 264. $24.95, £19.95 (hbk); £10.95 (pbk, UK and Europe only).The Covenant of the Wild: Why Animals Choose Domestication.. ByStephen Budiansky. William Morrow: 1992. Pp. 190. $18.To the Ends of the Earth: Women's Search for Education in Medicine. . ByThomas Neville Bonner. Harvard University Press: 1992. Pp.232. $34.95, £27.95.MISSISSIPPI Valley type (MVT) ore deposits in North America are generally thought to have formed from warm brines which migrated from sedimentary basins to sites of deposition in sedimentary strata of the neighbouring craton long after Unification of the sediments^1–3. When and how these migrations occurred is not well understood, but recent geological evidence suggests that continental-scale brine migration can be triggered by tectonic collisions^4–6. Indirect evidence^7– 9has suggested an association of North American MVT mineralization with the Late Palaeozoic Alleghenian/Ouachita orogeny; recently, however, Nakai et al.^10obtained a Rb-Sr age of 377±29Myr for sphalerites from the East Tennessee MVT district, which they linked to the Middle Palaeozoic Acadian orogeny. Here we report Rb-Sr dates for sphalerites from the MVT 'type section' - the Upper Mississippi Valley (UMV) zinc-lead district. Rb–Sr data from two distinct sphalerite bands from the West Hayden ore body yield two independent but indistinguishable isochrons of Permian age (269 ± 6 Myr and 270 ± 4 Myr), consistent with a brine migration episode initiated by the Alleghenian/Ouachita orogeny. In conjunction with the previous data indicating a link to the Acadian orogeny^10,11, our results indicate that North American MVT deposits formed in at least two distinct tectonic episodes.FEATURES characteristic of shock metamorphism in target rocks are the main diagnostic tool for recognizing impact phenomena on the Earth and other planetary bodies^1–4, and experimentally calibrated shock effects in silicate minerals have been important in elucidating the pressure histories of these rocks. Except for a few preliminary results for experimentally shocked pre-heated quartzites^5,6, all available calibration data are based on experiments performed with the targets at room temperature^7–11. Observations at Vredefort^12,13and at the Sudbury impact structure^14–16 indicate, however, that considerable shock stresses occur in deep-seated crustal rocks which are at elevated temperatures during large cratering events. High-temperature shock metamorphism must also have been of great importance in the collision history of meteorite parent bodies in the early Solar System. Here we report the results of shock experiments on single-crystal quartz heated to 630 °C, which show that the physical properties of shocked quartz (refractive indices, lattice parameters, amorphization, type and frequency of planar deformation features) depend strongly on the pre-shock temperature. We conclude that existing shock-wave barometers^1,8,9,11cannot be applied to high-temperature target rocks, and that new barometers independent of pre-shock temperature will be required to understand the shock pressure history of terrestrial and planetary impact formations.MUCH is known about short-range (<5Å) structural order in oxide glasses from experimental probes of local structure such as X-ray absorption fine structure (XAFS)^1, but over the medium range (5-20 Å) their structures are poorly understood. Computer simulations based on measured parameters for local atomic environments, however, can provide structural models on the nanometre scale, which enable dynamic properties such as ionic transport to be considered. Here we describe a molecular dynamics simulation of the effects of mixed alkali cations on the structure of binary silicate glasses. It is well known that the ionic conductivity of alkali glasses falls markedly when more than one alkali is present^2. We demonstrate that the alkalis segregate from the silicate network over distances of a few ångströms. Although ionic mobility is expected to be higher in these microsegregated regions than in the surrounding silicate network, we suggest that stochastic mixing of alkalis nevertheless impedes the hopping process of a given alkali ion. This is manifest as an increase in the average activation energy for hopping and results in a lowering of the total ionic conductivity.ACTIVATED surface dissociation of adsorbed molecules is of basic importance to surface chemistry, but in only a few systems are details of the molecule–surface potential-energy surface well understood. Central to this problem are the processes of energy disposal and transfer during the molecule–surface collision and the manner in which molecular motions (translational, rotational and vibrational) are channelled into the dissociative coordinate. The dissociation of hydrogen and deuterium molecules on a copper surface provides a prototypical system for studying these processes. Here we describe measurements of the scattering of D_2 from a Cu(111) surface as a function of incident translational energy, angle and vibrational state of the incoming molecules. Molecules in the ground and first excited vibrational levels show very different translational-energy thresholds for removal (0.6 and 0.35 eV respectively). At higher incident energies, efficient transfer of translational to vibrational energy occurs in those ground-state D_2 molecules that survive the collision without dissociating. These data will allow a better test of the various potential-energy curves that have been proposed for this system in the dissociative region.A SMALL number of intrinsically luminous, low-mass stars have recently been shown to have an extremely peculiar elemental abundance pattern. Their photospheric carbon, nitrogen, oxygen and sulphur abundances are within an order of magnitude of solar values, but all other normally abundant metals are present in only trace amounts; in two stars, iron is deficient by nearly five orders of magnitude. Two possible explanations are that the low iron content is primordial, implying a very great age, whereas the CNO and S abundances have been acquired during evolution, or that the CNO and S abundances reflect the initial stellar composition and the low iron content is the result of chemical separation by dust formation. The latter hypothesis arises mainly because the abundance pattern of these stars is similar to that of interstellar gas^1, in which fractionation to dust plays an important part, but it is not easily understood how a process that must occur in the circumstellar envelope can so strikingly affect the photospheric abundances. Here we report the detection of appreciable amounts of zinc in the star HD52961, and argue that, because zinc will condense into dust only at rather low temperatures, its detection in near normal amounts is convincing evidence for the fractionation hypothesis.Research opportunities are opening up for the long-neglected study of mycobacterium tuberculosis, a disease of poverty that is once again on the rise. TB is back.All the signs are that global ozone depletion is increasing. Ideas to mitigate the problem that at first glance may seem far-fetched deserve more serious consideration and a scientific process of evaluation.Flurries of Interest in science towards the end of Britain's election campaign promise little, but another election may.The prospect that the 'Earth summit' planned for June at Rio de Janeiro will be a monumental disappointment seems to have been strengthened by the planning meeting in New York over the past five weeks.A competent cell kit for improved protein expression, a new glycan release and preparation system for glycobiology research and a molecular modelling package that turns a desktop PC into a three-dimensional molecular modelling and analysis system - new tools for protein engineering.Homology modelling software can predict the structure of a newly sequenced protein by incorporating conformational similarity information from related proteins for which atomic coordinates are known. Models built using structural data are more reliable than those based on sequence alignments alone.Electrogenic Ion Pumps. ByPeter Läu-ger. Sinauer/W. H. Freeman: 1991. Pp. 313. $44.95, £34.95.THE prediction of a protein's tertiary structure is still a considerable problem because the huge amount of possible conformational space^1 makes it computationally difficult. With regard to side-chain modelling, a solution has been attempted by the grouping of side-chain conformations into representative sets of rotamers^2–5. Nonetheless, an exhaustive combinatorial search is still limited to carefully identified packing units^5,6containing a limited number of residues. For larger systems other strategies had to be develop-ped, such as the Monte Carlo Procedure^6,7 and the genetic algorithm and clustering approach^8. Here we present a theorem, referred to as the 'dead-end elimination' theorem, which imposes a suitable condition to identify rotamers that cannot be members of the global minimum energy conformation. Application of this theorem effectively controls the computational explosion of the rotamer combinatorial problem, thereby allowing the determination of the global minimum energy conformation of a large collection of side chains.ONE serious limitation facing protein engineers is the availability of only 20 'proteinogenic' amino acids encoded by natural messenger RNA. The lack of structural diversity among these amino acids restricts the mechanistic and structural issues that can be addressed by site-directed mutagenesis. Here we describe a new technology for incorporating non-standard amino acids into polypeptides by ribosome-based translation. In this technology, the genetic code is expanded through the creation of a 65th codon-anticodon pair from unnatural nucleoside bases having non-standard hydrogen-bonding patterns^1,2. This new codon-anticodon pair efficiently supports translation in vitro to yield peptides containing a non-standard amino acid. The versatility of the ribo-some as a synthetic tool offers new possibilities for protein engineering, and compares favourably with another recently described approach in which the genetic code is simply rearranged to recruit stop codons to play a coding role^3–9. Spelling of author S.A.B. was fixed in the HTML on 2 February 2016 .CELLULAR locomotion could be driven by the rearward transport of membrane-bound particles observed on motile fibroblasts^1, keratinocytes^2 and neuronal growth cones^3. A force propelling free surface particles backwards could move the cell forwards if the particles were anchored to a rigid substratum. During capping, myosin II ('double-headed' myosin) draws crosslinked membrane proteins to the rear of a cell. The mhcA ^− mutant of the amoebal stage of the slime mould Dictyostelium discoideum , in which the myosin II gene has been deleted^4, cannot cap surface particles but can crawl along the substratum^5,6. Thus, the mechanism driving capping is not essential for locomotion. We show here that the null mutant is capable of a different type of active rearward transport, independent of myosin II and distinct from capping. The transported particles on mhcA ^− cells follow parallel paths. In the wild-type Ax2 strain, myosin II causes particles to converge towards a focal point and significantly increases the velocity of transport behind the leading edge of the cell.GENE delivery by transplantation of normal myoblasts has been proposed as a treatment of the primary defect, lack of the muscle protein dystrophin, that causes Duchenne muscular dystrophy (DMD), a lethal human muscle degenerative disorder^1,2. To test this possibility, we transplanted normal myoblasts from a father or an unaffected sibling into the muscle of eight boys with DMD, and assessed their production of dystrophin. Three patients with deletions in the dystrophin gene expressed normal dystrophin transcripts in muscle biopsy specimens taken from the transplant site one month after myoblast injection. Using the polymerase chain reaction we established that the dystrophin in these biopsies derived from donor myoblast DNA. These results show that trans-planted myoblasts persist and produce dystrophin in muscle fibres of DMD patients.HUMAN colour vision is mediated by three light-sensitive pigments, each found in a different cone-cell type^1. The absorption spectra of the human cone pigments have been sought for over a century^2 using techniques such as psychophysical colour matching^3, reflection densitometry^4, electroretinography^5, single-cell action spectra^6 and, most directly, microspectrophotometry^7,8. We report here a direct determination of the human cone pigment photo-bleaching difference absorption spectra after the production of each cone pigment apoprotein in tissue culture cells transfected with the corresponding complementary DNA clones^9,10. The mean values for the wavelength of maximal absorption are 426 nm for the blue pigment, 530 nm for the green pigment, and 552 nm and 557 nm for two polymorphic variants of the red pigment.GENETIC variation of human senses within the normal range probably exists but usually cannot be investigated in detail for lack of appropriate methods. The study of subtle perceptual differences in red–green colour vision is feasible since both photo-pigment genotypes and psychophysical phenotypes can be assessed by sophisticated techniques. Red–green colour vision in humans is mediated by two different visual pigments: red (long-wavelength sensitive) and green (middle-wavelength sensitive). The apoproteins of these highly homologous photopigments are encoded by genes on the X chromosome^1. Colour matches of males with normal colour vision fall into two main groups that appear to be transmitted by X-linked inheritance^2–6. This difference in colour matching is likely to reflect small variations in the absorption maxima of visual pigments^7–11 suggesting the presence of two common variants of the red and/or green visual pigments that differ in spectral positioning^5,6. We report that a common single amino-acid polymorphism (62% Ser, 38% Ala) at residue 180 of the X-linked red visual pigment explains the finding of two major groups in the distribution of colour matching among males with normal colour vision.ASEXUALLY reproducing organisms occur in a variety of taxa in all biological kingdoms^1 and distinguishing asexually propagated genotypes is essential for the understanding of their population biology. Among the higher fungi, however, the clonal 'individual' is especially difficult to define^2 because most of the fungal thallus consists of a network of anastamosing hyphae embedded in the substratum. Whether fruit-bodies, the most recognizable part of a fungus, are produced by a single supporting mycelium can only be determined by establishing direct physiological continuity or genetic identity. We report a means by which individual fungi can be unambiguously identified within local populations and identify an individual of Armillaria bulbosa that occupies a minimum of 15 hectares, weighs in excess of 10,000kg, and has remained genetically stable for more than 1,500 years.THE eruptive products of calc-alkaline volcanos often show evidence for the mixing of basaltic and acid magmas before eruption (see, for example, refs 1, 2). These observations have led to the suggestion3 that the injection of basaltic magma into the base of a magma chamber (or the catastrophic overturn of a stably stratified chamber containing basaltic magma at its base) might trigger an eruption. Here we report evidence for the mixing of basaltic and dacitic magmas shortly before the paroxysmal eruptions of Pinatubo volcano on 15 June 1991. Andesitic scoriae erupted on 12 June contain minerals and glass with disequilibrium compositions, and are considerably more mafic than the dacitic pumices erupted on 15 June. Differences in crystal abundance and glass composition among the pumices may arise from pre-heating of the dacite magma by the underlying basaltic liquid before mixing. Degassing of this basaltic magma may also have contributed to the climatologically important sulphur dioxide emissions that accompanied the Pinatubo eruptions.HIGH-RESOLUTION palaeoclimate records based on oxygen isotope data have provided important insights into climate variability and rates of natural climate change on about a thousand-year timescale^1–3. Little is known^4, however, about the variation of climate and of palaeoceanographic conditions throughout the Quaternary on timescales of less than 1,000 years (at frequencies far greater than those of the Milankovitch orbital cycles). Here we show that such high time resolution is possible from molecular stratigraphic studies based on 'biomarker' organic molecules (alkenones). We have sampled alkenone stratigraphic records at 70- to 200-yr intervals across glacial terminations I, II and IV in sediment cores from OOP site 658, off northwest Africa^5. Sea surface temperatures (SSTs) derived from the alkenone ( U ^k_37) index^6–8vary rapidly beyond the range of analytical noise by up to 2.5 °C in 300 yr, showing hitherto unknown cycles with about 600-yr periodicities. Some of the changes parallel similar events in the oxygen isotope stratigraphy. SST oscillations may be linked, in part, to abrupt breakdowns in Atlantic deep-water ventilation resulting from meltwater events of Quaternary glacial terminations^3,9,10.RECENT infrared observations^1 have revealed hot gas, with a temperature possibly as high as one million degrees, associated with a small cavity 2 arcseconds in diameter in one of the ionized gas streamers (the 'Bar') that orbit the Galactic Centre radio source SgrA^* (ref. 2), thought to contain a massive black hole. Radio continuum observations^3 show a chain of blobs of emission leading from SgrA^* to the small cavity. We present here further high-resolution radio images which show that the blobs are connected to SgrA^*; by a ridge of emission. We suggest that the blobs are formed by the interaction of stellar winds from the IRS16 cluster with the gravitational potential of SgrA^*. The hot gas^1 then results from the dissipation of the kinetic energy of the blobs as they collide with the orbiting ionized streamer. These collisions are of dynamial significance for the motion of the Bar around the Galactic Centre, and there should be detectable variability in the structure on a timescale of 10 years.HALPERN and Holt^1 have recently reported the detection of coherent pulsations with a period of 237 ms from the soft X-ray source 1E0630 +178, which lies in the error box of the γ-ray source known as Geminga (2GC195 + 04). This observation provides compelling evidence that Geminga, an object whose nature has hitherto been mysterious, is an X-ray pulsar. Prompted by this discovery, we have searched the data from EGRET, the Energetic Gamma Ray Experiment Telescope on the Compton Gamma Ray Observatory, for a comparable signal in the γ-radiation from this part of the sky. We now report the detection of pulsed γ-rays, with energy >50MeV, from 1E0630 + 178, confirming the identification of Geminga with this X-ray source. The period derivative, (11.4 ± 1.7) x 10^−15ss^−1, suggests that Geminga is a nearby, isolated, rotating neutron star with a magnetic field of 1.6 x10^12 gauss, a characteristic age of 3 x 10^5 yr and a spin-down energy loss rate of 3.5 x 10^34 erg s^−1.An unusual protein splicing reaction joins the N-terminal segment (A) and the C-terminal segment (C) of the 119K primary translation product (ABC) of the yeast VMA1 gene to yield a 69K vacuolar H^+-ATPase subunit (AC) and an internal 50K polypeptide (B). This 50K protein is a site-specific DNA endonuclease that shares 34% identity with the homothallic switching endonuclease. The site cleaved by the VMA1 -derived endonuclease exists in a VMA1 allele that lacks the derived endonuclease segment of the open reading frame. Cleavage at this site only occurs during meiosis and initiates 'homing', a genetic event that converts a VMA1 allele lacking the endonuclease coding sequence into one that contains it.Contention over the fate of a dozen endangered crows in Hawaii seems to have been dispelled (for the time being) by sweep reason and a US National Academy of Sciences inquiry.Taxonomy does not deserve its reputation as an arcane science. As the following examples from ungulate taxonomy show, classification has important implications for conservation legislation.Global environmental problems have dictated the need that next week's conference at Rio should be as much concerned with development as with global warming. Both deserve more than a couple of weeks.THE Gram-positive bacterium Listeria monocytogenes is a facultative intracellular pathogen capable of rapid movement through the host cell cytoplasm^1. The biophysical basis of the motility of L. monocytogenes is an interesting question in its own right, the answer to which may shed light on the general processes of actin-based motility in cells. Moving intracellular bacteria display phase-dense 'comet tails' made of actin filaments, the formation of which is required for bacterial motility^2,3. We have investigated the dynamics of the actin filaments in the comet tails using the technique of photoactivation of fluorescence, which allows monitoring of the movement and turnover of labelled actin filaments after activation by illumination with ultraviolet light. We find that the actin filaments remain stationary in the cytoplasm as the bacterium moves forward, and that length of the comet tails is linearly proportional to the rate of movement. Our results imply that the motile mechanism involves continuous polymerization and release of actin filaments at the bacterial surface and that the rate of filament generation is related to the rate of movement. We suggest that actin polymerization provides the driving force for bacterial propulsion.TWO types of developmental events can cause an embryonic cell to adopt a fate different from that of its neighbours: during a cell division particular contents may be segregated to only one daughter cell and cells may experience different external cues, commonly in the form of inductive cell interactions. Work on development in the nematode Caenorhabditis elegans suggests that most cell fates are specified without a need for cell interactions. In particular, the gut cell lineage of C. elegans has been used as a primary example of specification by differential segregation of determinants^1. Here I re-examine the role of induction in gut specification by isolating early blastomeres. In C. elegans , the gut derives from all the progeny of a single blastomere (E) of the eight-cell stage^2. When a gut precursor cell (EMS) is isolated during the first half of the four-cell stage, gut does not differentiate. Gut differentiation is rescued by recombining EMS with its posterior neighbour (P2), but not by recombining EMS with one or both of the other two cells of the four-cell stage. These results demonstrate that P2 induces EMS to form gut in C. elegans .DURING early vertebrate embryogenesis, mesoderm is specified by a signal emanating from prospective endoderm. This signal can respecify Xenopus prospective ectoderm as mesoderm, and can be mimicked by members of the fibroblast growth factor and transforming growth factor-β families^1,2. In other systems, the p21^ c-ras proto-oncogene product has been implicated in signal transduction for various polypeptide growth factors. We report here that a dominant inhibitory ras mutant blocks the mesoderm-inducing activity of fibroblast growth factor and activin, as well as the endogenous inducing activity of prospective endoderm. A constitutively active ras mutant partially mimics these activities. These results indicate that p21^ ras may have a central role in the transduction of the mesoderm inductive signal. Basic fibroblast growth factor^3,4 and activin^5–8 have emerged as candidates for endogenous mesoderm-inducing molecules. The character of the mesoderm induced by these two factors is overlapping but distinct when assessed both by histological and molecular criteria^9,10. The signal transduction pathways used during induction by these factors are unknown. We used messenger RNA microinjection of Xenopus eggs to express a dominant inhibitory mutant ras , p21(Asn 17)^Ha- ras , in cells competent to respond to inducing factors to examine the role of p21^ ras in this response. This mutant, which has a reduced affinity for GTP relative to GDP^11, blocks a variety of mitogenic signals in 3T3 fibroblasts^12 as well as the differentiation of pheochromocytoma cells in response to nerve growth factor^13.FUNCTIONAL, morphological and biochemical evidence indicates that class II major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecules associate with processed peptides during biosynthesis^1–9. Peptide/MHC complexes in living cells have been reported to be less stable than similar complexes generated in vitro , which has led to the suggestion that there may be a peptide exchange mechanism operating in vivo ^l0–12. Although this could increase the capacity for binding incoming antigens, it would reduce the efficacy of processed antigenic peptides by exchanging these for self peptides. Here we measure the half-life of peptide/class II complexes in human antigen-presenting cells and find that it is very similar to the half-life of class II molecules themselves, indicating that peptides are bound irreversibly under physiological conditions. Thus class II MHC retains long-term 'memory' of past encounters with antigen to maximize the opportunity for T cell/antigen-presenting cell interaction.MATURE T cells can be functionally divided into two categories distinguished by surface expression of either CD4 or CD8, which in turn corresponds to restriction by and binding to class II or class I major histocompatibility complex proteins, respectively^1–8. CD8 can be expressed as a homodimer of the α-chain, or as a heterodimer of α- and β-chains on human and mouse T cells, although most peripheral T cells seem to express CD8α β heterodimers exclusively (reviewed in ref. 9). Functional characterization of CD8 has focused primarily on the effect of the α-chain, which enhances or reconstitutes T-cell responses in homodimeric form^10,11 and may play a specific role in thymic selection^12–14. In contrast, no role has been ascribed to CD8 β or αβ heterodimers specifically. Here we show that CD8 αβ transfectants produce more interieukin-2 than CD8α transfectants in response to specific stimuli. Increased interleukin-2 is also observed in cells expressing hybrid CD8α-β molecules (extracellular CD8β plus CD8α transmembrane and cytoplasmic regions) on their surface. These results indicate that external portions of CD8β could be critical and that they may act independently of CD8α in mediating their augmentation effect.THE dendrites of many types of neurons contain voltage-dependent Na^+ and Ca^2+ conductances that generate action potentials (see ref. 1 for review). The function of these spikes is not well understood, but the Ca^2+ entry stimulated by spikes probably affects Ca^2+-dependent processes in dendrites. These include synaptic plasticity^2,3, cytotoxicity^4 and exocytosis^5. Several lines of evidence suggest that dendritic spikes occur within subregions of the den-drites^6–8. To study the mechanism that govern the spread of spikes in the dendrites of hippocampal pyramidal cells, we imaged Ca^2+ entry with Fura-2 (ref. 9) and Na^+ entry with a newly developed Na^+-sensitive dye^10. Our results indicate that Ca^2+ entry into dendrites is triggered by Na^+ spikes that actively invade the dendrites. The restricted spatial distribution of Ca^2–1 entry seems to depend on the spread of Na^+ spikes in the dendrites, rather than on a limited distribution of Ca^2+ channels. In addition, we have observed an activity-dependent process that modulates the invasion of spikes into the dendrites and progressively restricts Ca^2+ entry to more proximal dendritic regions.LONG-TERM potentiation (LTP) of synaptic transmission in CA^1 neurons of the hippocampus, elicited by the conjunction of presynaptic firing and postsynaptic depolarization, is an important model of plasticity, which may underlie memory storage^1–3. Although induction of LTP takes place in the postsynaptic cell^4–7, it is not clear whether it is expressed through an enhancement of transmitter release^8–12 or through an increased postsynaptic response to the same amount of transmitter^13–6. Analysis of the trial-to-trial amplitude fluctuations of synaptic signals, that is quantal analysis, gives an important insight into the probabilistic mechanisms of transmission, although attempts to apply it to the mode of expression of LTP have so far yielded inconsistent results^9–12,15, at least in part because they have relied on models of transmitter release that have not been confirmed experimentally^17–19. Here we report clear evidence for quanta! fluctuation in a subset of cells. Induction of LTP in these cells causes abrupt increases in either quantal content or quantal amplitude, or both. This shows that two different mechanisms can underlie the maintenance of LTP.Astronomical Masers. By Moshe Elitzur. Kluwer: 1992. Pp. 351. Dfl.75, $45, £26.MANY secondary sexual characters are supposed to have evolved as a response to female choice of the most extravagantly ornamented males^1, a hypothesis supported by studies demonstrating female preferences for the most ornamented males^2–5. Comparative studies of elaborate feather ornaments in birds have shown that (1) ornaments have larger degrees of fluctuating asymmetry^6 (small, random deviations from bilateral symmetry caused by an inability of individuals to cope with environmental and genetic stress during development of a character^7) than other morphological traits, and (2) the degree of fluctuating asymmetry is often negatively related to the size of the ornament^6. The negative relationship between ornament asymmetry and size suggests that ornament size reliably reflects male quality because the largest secondary sex traits demonstrate the least degree of fluctuating asymmetry. I manipulated tail length and tail asymmetry independently in male swallows ( Hirundo rustica ) to determine whether ornament size or asymmetry were used as cues in mate choice. Male swallows with elongated, symmetric tails mated earlier, and enjoyed larger annual reproductive success than did males with shortened tails and increased asymmetry. Females therefore prefer large as well as symmetric ornaments, which suggests that females in their mate choice use ornament asymmetry and size as reliable indicators of male quality.IF regional metamorphism occurs in response to crustal thickening, then low-grade rocks are likely to record earlier thermal conditions than will high-grade rocks in the same exhumed terrain^1–4. At Sulitjelma, North Norway, regional metamorphism during the Caledonian orogeny created a type sequence of progressive metamorphic zones^5–7.Garnet and coexisting minerals from the high-grade part of this terrain yield precise and concordant Sm–Nd, U–Pb and Rb–Sr ages which relate directly to the pressure-temperature conditions of mineral growth^8. Here we present pressure-temperature-time ( P-T-t ) information for lower-grade rocks occurring at the garnet isograd. Taken together, these data provide a precise estimate of the timing of mineral equilibration across a prograde metamorphic terrain and indicate that 'peak' metamorphic conditions at the garnet isograd (at 458 ± 20 °C) were attained 8.3±3.0Myr (Δ t , Sm-Nd) or 8.7±3.2Myr (Δ t , U-Pb) before the 'peak' in the high-grade sample (at 544 ± 16 °C). These results clearly illustrate that the exhumed ' P-T array' recorded in such terrains cannot be used to deduce any single geotherm that existed during metamorphism.Apparently the US EPA cannot agree with other agencies on the regualtory status of recombinant DNA.President George Bush has sided with industry against his own environmental chief on an air pollution issue.THE interaction between gravity and thermal effects largely determines the structural and magmatic evolution of volcanic constructs at scales spanning several orders of magnitude, from small cones to the oceanic crust^1–3. Although gravitational spreading is a direct consequence of this interaction and a fundamental process in volcano growth, it is rarely recognized as such. Here we describe a striking example of this process, at Etna volcano, in Italy. The volcano and its clay-rich substratum are slowly spreading towards the east and south, driven by gravity. Spreading produces extensional structures in the summit region and contpressional structures at the base of the volcano. Eastward movement of the volcanic edifice over a stationary magma supply may be the cause of an apparent westward migration of volcanic activity. As gravitational spreading seems to control the location and magnitude of shallow seismicity and flank eruptions, an appreciation of its effects could become an essential element of future volcanic hazard evaluation. Our model proposed here for Etna may also be relevant to a reinterpretation of the geological history of a number of other volcanoes.THE distribution of tropical sea surface temperatures (SSTs) is negatively skewed: a 'warm pool' with SSTs greater than 300.5 K covers roughly half the tropical oceans (15° N to 15° S), whereas SSTs as low as 293 K are observed in regions of equatorial and coastal upwelling and persistent stratus cloud cover^1. SSTs are thus within 2–3 K of the highest values over a large area of the tropical ocean, leading some authors to suggest that some physical process may act to limit SSTs to below about 303 K. Ramanathan and Collins^2 have proposed a 'thermostat' mechanism in which ocean warming produces enhanced deep convection, leading to the formation of extensive cirrus cloud canopies which shield the troposphere and ocean surface from incoming solar radiation. Here I suggest that a mechanism of this sort may not be required to explain the SST distribution. I argue that large-scale dynamical processes will act to maintain uniform tropical tropospheric temperatures to within about 2 K, and that, in the absence of horizontal temperature contrasts in the atmosphere, a negatively skewed SST frequency distribution is bound to develop through equilibration between the atmosphere and spatially varying SSTs. In addition, although cirrus clouds reduce the solar insolation at the Earth's surface in regions of deep convection, they would not necessarily prevent SSTs from exceeding 305 K in the face of extensive greenhouse warming.HEAVY-fermion superconductors (in which the charge carriers have an effective mass ∼100 times the free electron mass) have been the subject of intense study during the past decade^1, in part because of the suggestion that some of these materials may exhibit non-conventional pairing mechanisms^2. Here we report a demonstration of quantum coherence of the superconducting wavefunction between the conventional superconductor niobium and the recently discovered^3 heavy-fermion superconductor UPd_2Al_3, which is a potential candidate for a non-conventional pairing mechanism^4. The experimental method is similar to our earlier work on high- T _ c materials^5,6: we use a small pointed rod of UPd_2Al_3 to bridge the gap in an almost closed niobium ring. We observe persistent currents in the composite ring, and trapped flux, which is in discrete quantum states separated by the flux quantum h/2 _ e . Although the observation of phase coherence between UPd_2Al_3 and niobium may not constrain the nature of the pairing in UPd_2Al_3, we also observe Josephson-like current-voltage characteristics at the junction, but with very small products of critical current and normal-state resistance. If other possible causes can be eliminated, these small I _ c R _ n values may point to a small tunnelling probability between the two superconductors, and hence to unconventional pairing in UPd_2Al_3ONE mechanism by which fluid flows increase their complexity is through the instability of vortex filaments. When an instability brings vortex filaments of opposite circulation together, the filaments may break and rejoin in a process known as reconnection. This process of instability and reconnection leads to some fundamental changes in the topology of flows. Here we present experimental observations of a special type of instability in which two colliding vortex rings become unstable and reconnect to form a series of smaller rings. Although this phenomenon was briefly noted more than a decade ago^1, no detailed observations were made, and little is known about the mechanisms involved. We have used coloured dyes to reveal the detailed structure of the small rings and many other features, including a short-wavelength instability around the circumference of the colliding rings. At high Reynolds number, collision leads to a turbulent cloud, with the occasional appearance of small rings.THE nature of the γ-ray source 'Geminga' (2CG195 + 04) is a problem of considerable importance in high-energy astrophysics. First discovered in 1972 by the SAS-2 satellite^1, Geminga emits virtually all its power at energies above 50 MeV, and at energies above 100 MeV is the second brightest source in the γ-ray sky survey made by the Cos-B satellite^2. It eluded identification at all other wavelengths until the Einstein Observatory found an unusual soft X-ray source, 1E0630 + 178, in its error box^3. This source also has a claimed twenty-fifth magnitude optical counterpart^4–6. This distinctive set of properties is reminiscent of the Vela pulsar, except for the absence of radio emission^7 or a synchroton nebula^3. We have made a more sensitive soft X-ray observation of the Geminga field using Rosat, and have detected coherent pulsations from 1E0630+178 at a period of 0.237s. This result confirms suggestions^3–6,8,9 that Geminga is, like Vela, a γ-ray pulsar. We speculate that Geminga is somewhat the older of the two. With this discovery we consider the mystery of Geminga largely solved.The crystal structure of the diphtheria toxin dimer at 2.5 Å resolution reveals a Y-shaped molecule of three domains. The catalytic domain, called fragment A, is of the α + β type. Fragment B actually consists of two domains. The transmembrane domain consists of nine α-helices, two pairs of which are unusually apolar and may participate in pH-triggered membrane insertion and translocation. The receptor-binding domain is a flattened β-barrel with a jelly-roll-like topology. Three distinct functions of the toxin, each carried out by a separate structural domain, can be useful in designing chimaeric proteins, such as immunotoxins, in which the receptor-binding domain is substituted with antibodies to target other cell types.Short antigenic peptides bound in the groove of class I major histocompatibility complex molecules enable T cells to detect intracellular pathogens. It has been assumed that structural features of the class I molecule alone select which peptides are bound. It is now demonstrated that a complex polymorphism in one of the major histocompatibility complex-encoded putative peptide-transporter genes is associated with an altered spectrum of bound peptides.Duesberg's argument that HIV is not the cause of AIDS gained no new ground at last week's alternative AIDS conference, but his message has already been taken up by a small army of followers.How can the world's population be made more healthy? Study of the age distribution of diseases and causes of death in individual countries will enable nationally appropriate research and public-health priorities to be set.A taxonomic scheme is proposed for the main component of the primitive chondrite meteorites—the chondrules. The scheme provides insight into the variety of chondrules originally produced in the primordial solar nebula, and the effects on them of secondary processes on meteorite parent bodies. It may also contribute to understanding the origin of compositional diversity in the chondrites.The Molecular and Cellular Biology of the Yeast Saccharomyces. Volume 1: Genome Dynamics, Protein Synthesis and Energetics. Edited by James R. Broach John R. Pringle and Elizabeth R. Jones. Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory Press: 1991. Pp. 826. $97 (hbk), $55 (Pbk).Assessments and Decisions: A Study of Information Gathering by Hermit Crabs. By R. W. Elwood and S. J. Neil.. Chapman and Hall: 1991. Pp. 192. £29.95.Natural Knowledge in Preclassical Antiquity. By Mott T. Greene. John Hopkins University Press: 1992. Pp. 182. $28.50, £18.The Meaning of Evolution: The Morphological Construction and Ideological Reconstruction of Darwin's Theory. By Robert J. Richards. University of Chicago Press: 1992. Pp. 205. $19.95, £15.95.Blacks are underrepresented among graduate students in the United States. Why should this be?The European Commission's proposals for a carbon tax are only a first approximation to what will be needed.The World Bank's annual report on development strategy shows its full commitment to environmental causes. When will that go so far as to link assistance with prudent population policies?A killer fungus from Washington State challenges benign Armillaria bulbosa for the title of world's largest mushroom.Featured this week— new Microbial Strain Data Network developments, an artificial capillary cell culture system that is designed to simulate in vivo growth conditions and an anti-mycoplasmal antibiotic to add to your armoury.The increasing diversity of new cell cultures is seriously stretching the capabilities of traditional methods of identification. DNA fingerprinting is set to play an important role in increasing confidence in the authenticity of cultures in research and industry.The Bats of Texas. By David J. Schmidly. Texas A & M University Press: 1991. Pp. 188. $34.50 (hbk), $19.95 (pbk).THE vertebrate body is organized along three geometric axes: anterior–posterior, dorsal–ventral and left–right. Left–right axis formation, displayed in heart and gut development, is the least understood, even though it has been studied for many years^1–4. In Xenopus laevis gastrulae, a fibronectin-rich extracellular matrix is deposited on the basal surface of ectoderm cells^5,6 over which cardiac and visceral primordia move during development. Here I report experiments in which localized perturbation of a small patch of extracellular matrix by microsurgery was correlated with localized randomization of left–right asymmetries. Global perturbation of the extracellular matrix by microinjection of Arg-Gly-Asp peptides or heparinase into the blastocoel resulted in global randomization of left-right asymmetries. From these observations, I suggest that left–right axial information is contained in the extracellular matrix early in development and is independently transmitted to cardiac and visceral primordia.MOTOR proteins such as myosin, dynein and kinesin use the free energy of ATP hydrolysis to produce force or motion, but despite recent progress^1–4 their molecular mechanism is unknown. The best characterized system is the myosin motor which moves actin filaments in muscle^5–12. When an active muscle fibre is rapidly shortened the force first decreases, then partially recovers over the next few milliseconds^5. This elementary force-generating process is thought to be due to a structural 'working stroke' in the myosin head domain^5–9, although structural studies have not provided definitive support for this^10–12. X-ray diffraction has shown that shortening steps produce a large decrease in the intensity of the 14.5 nm reflection arising from the axial repeat of the myosin heads along the filaments^13,14. This was interpreted as a structural change at the end of the working stroke, but the techniques then available did not allow temporal resolution of the elementary force-generating process itself. Using improved measurement techniques, we show here that myosin heads move by about 10 nm with the same time course as the elementary force-generating process.THE rate of mitochondrial DNA (mtDNA) evolution has been carefully calibrated only in primates^1. Similarity between the primate calibration and rates estimated for other vertebrates^2–4 has led to widespread assumption of a constant molecular clock in vertebrates even though this has never been rigorously tested^5. We report here the examination of mtDNA sequence variation for 13 species of sharks from two orders that are well represented in the fossil record to test the constancy hypothesis. Nucleotide substitution rates in the cytochrome b and cytochrome oxidase I genes in sharks are seven- to eightfold slower than in primates or ungulates. This difference in substitution rate cannot be explained by nucleotide composition bias, codon-usage bias, selection, or choice of genes sequenced, and was confirmed by comparing species recently separated by the rise of the Isthmus of Panama. Such differences in mtDNA substitution rates among taxa indicate that it is inappropriate to use a calibration for one group to estimate divergence times or demographic parameters for another group. High-resolution studies of molecular evolutionary rates require taxon-specific calibrations.THEORETICAL calculations show^1 that the occurrence of an earthquake leads to regions of increased shear stress on both sides of the ruptured fault. If this stress increase is sufficiently large, or if neighbouring faults are close to their failure stress, the result may be triggering of earthquakes on pre-existing faults in the region. A search for this effect^2 produced only a few examples, all in continental areas, where clusters of aftershocks were located in the regions of increased stress. The linear dimensions of these clusters were generally less than 20 km, and less than one-half of the fault length that ruptured in the main shock. Here I report an example of this phenomenon in which the fault that is reactivated is a nearly 175-km-long segment of an oceanic fracture, and its length is comparable to that of the main shock, the 1989 Macquarie Ridge earthquake.PROJECTIONS of the ecological effects of global climate change often include increased frequency and/or intensity of forest fires in regions of warmer and drier climate ^1–3In addition to disturbing biological systems, widespread intense fires may influence the evolution of the physical landscape through greatly enhanced sediment transport^4. Debris-flow to flood-streamflow sedimentation events following the 1988 fires in the Yellowstone National Park area (Wyoming and Montana, USA) have allowed us to examine the geomorphological response to fire in a mountain environment. Abundant analogous deposits in older alluvial fan sequences bear witness to past fire-related sedimentation events in northeastern Yellowstone, and radiocarbon dating of these events yields a detailed chronology of fire-related sedimentation for the past 3,500 years. We find that alluvial fans aggrade during periods of frequent fire-related sedimentation events, and we interpret these periods as subject to drought or high climatic variability. During wetter periods, sediment is removed from alluvial fan storage and transported down axial streams, resulting in floodplain aggradation. The dominant alluvial activity is strongly modulated by climate, with fire acting as a drought-actuated catalyst for sediment transport.ATMOSPHERIC concentrations of methane, a greenhouse gas, are increasing at a rate of about 1% yr^-1 (refs 1–4). Oxidation by methylotrophic bacteria in soil is the largest terrestrial sink for atmospheric CH_4, and is estimated to consume about 30 x 10^12 g CH_4 yr^-1 (refs 4–6). Spatial and temporal variability in the rate of soil CH_4 consumption are incompletely understood^6–19, as are the apparent inhibitory^12,13,18or enhancing^20 effects of changes in land use. Dry deserts, which constitute 20% of total land surface, are not currently included in global soil uptake estimates. Here we describe measurements of the rate of uptake of atmospheric CH_4 by undisturbed desert soils. We observed rates as great as 4.38 mg CH_4 m^-2 day^-1; 50% of the measured rates were between 0.24 and 0.92 mg CH_4m^-2d^-1. Uptake of CH^4 by desert soil is enhanced by rainfall after an initial soil-drainage period—opposite to the response of temperate forest soils^12. Methane is consumed to a depth of about 2 m, allowing for deep removal of atmospheric CH_4if near-surface conditions are unfavourable for consumption. On the basis of an annual average CH_4 consumption rate of 0.66 mg CH_4 m^-2 d^-1, we estimate that the global CH_4 sink term needs to be increased by about 7 x 10^12 g yr^-1 to account for the contribution of desert soils.FOLLOWING the development of a method for bulk synthesis of C^60 and other fullerenes^1, the isolation of higher fullerenes ranging from C_76 to C_96 has been achieved using chromatographic techniques^2–5. Whereas C_60 and C_70 have unique, high-symmetry structures^6, theoretical calculations for fullerenes larger than C_76 have suggested that each may exist in at least two isomeric forms^7. For C_84, 24 isomers have been postulated^7, and for C_96calculations have yielded 196 distinct isomers^8. Diederich et al .^9 have used liquid chromatography and ^13C NMR to identify two isomers of C_78, but previous experimental studies of other higher fullerenes^2 have produced ambiguous results. Here we use ^13C NMR to determine the structures of some principal isomers of C_78, C_82 and C_84. We find a third isomer of C_78, which was not reported in ref. 9. Characterization of the structures of these larger fullerenes should provide new understanding of the factors determining the stability of hollow carbon clusters.SEPARATION of heavy particles from a fluid medium by centrifugal forces or by barodiffusion is well known^1. For a homogeneous fluid mixture comprising a suspension of very fine particles (such as smoke in air), on the other hand, for which the centrifugal and barodiffusive effects are negligible, a continuum model of the suspension would suggest that it is not possible to separate the particles from the fluid by flow-induced kinematic action alone. Here we present experimental evidence to the contrary: we have observed spontaneous segregation of smoke particles from air in an initially uniform mixture, when rotational flow is induced in the medium. A definitive explanation for this effect is not yet forthcoming.RESULTS from the Burst and Transient Source Experiment (BATSE)^1 on the Compton Gamma-Ray Observatory show a relative deficiency of faint γ-ray bursts without any detectable anisotropy. This gives strong support to suggestions that the bursts originate at cosmological distances^2, such that cosmic expansion reduces the detectability of faint (and therefore distant) sources relative to a uniformly filled euclidean space. But the Pioneer Venus Orbiter (PVO) observations of brighter bursts show no such deficiency, indicating that the bursts that it sees are at redshifts less than about one. The best-fit cosmological model based on PVO data (peak luminosity L _0 = 2 x 10^50erg s^-1) with no evolution of the source population predicts, when extrapolated to the fainter sources, a factor of 40 more events than BATSE sees. Even the 3a limit from PVO ( L _0 = 9.1 x 10^51 ergs^-1) is barely consistent with the BATSE result. Evolution of the cosmological γ-ray burst sources with epoch therefore seems necessary if the PVO and BATSE data are to be reconciled. The required evolutionary trend is for fewer or fainter bursts at larger redshift.Many mantle peridotite samples are too rich in Si0_2 (in the form of orthopyroxene) and have ratios of light to heavy rare earth elements that are too high to be consistent with an origin as the residuum of partial melting of the primitive mantle. Trace element studies of melt/rock reaction zones in the Trinity peridotite provide evidence for reaction of the mantle lithosphere with ascending melts, which dissolved calcium-pyroxene and precipitated orthopyroxene as magma mass decreased. This process can account for the observed major and trace element compositions of lithospheric mantle samples, and may accordingly be prevalent in the upper mantle.Terman's Kids: The Groundbreaking Study of How the Gifted Grow Up. By Joel N. Shurkin. Little, Brown: 1992. Pp. 317. $22.95.Descartes' Metaphysical Physics. By Daniel Garber. University of Chicago Press: 1992. Pp. 389. $60, £47.95 (hbk); $23.95, £19.95 (pbk).Immunology. By Janis Kuby. W. H. Freeman: 1992. Pp. 585. $46.95, £19.95. Advanced Immunology, Second Edition. By David Male, Brian Champion, Anne Cooke and Michael Owen. Gower Medical: 1991. Pp. 304. $69.95, £39.50 (hbk); $45, £24.95 (pbk). (Distributed by Raven Press in the United States.)The Dynamic Genome: Barbara McClintock's Ideas in the Century of Genetics. Edited by Nina Fedoroff and David Botstein. Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory Press: 1991. Pp. 422. $55.The first close scrutiny of reports of a new virus supposed to cause symptoms of AIDS in people with neither HIV-1 nor HIV-2 suggests that there is no new virus.Next week's American Chemical Society meeting to be held in Washington, DC, USA will feature a collection of US patents on CD-ROM, a protein sequencer and software for the analysis of mass spectral data of proteins and peptides.A new strategy for sequencing oligosaccharides involves generating fragments at 'stop points' along the molecule using enzyme matrices.INCREASING evidence indicates that the integrin family of cell adhesion receptors can transduce biochemical signals from the extracellular matrix to the cell interior to modulate cell growth and differentiation^1. We have shown that integrin/ligand interactions can trigger tyrosine phosphorylation of a protein of M _r 120,000 (pp120), so it is possible that signal transduction by integrins might involve activation of intracellular protein tyrosine kinases as an early event in cell binding to the extracellular matrix^2. Here we report that pp120 is identical to the focal adhesion-associated protein tyrosine kinase pp!25^FAK (refs 3,4). We show that tyrosine phosphorylation of this protein is modulated both by cell adhesion and transformation by pp60^v– src , and that these changes in phosphorylation are correlated with increased pp125^FAKtyrosine kinase activity. A model is proposed to relate these findings to the molecular basis of anchorage-independent growth of transformed cells.British enrolments in science courses are responding to market forces — and falling.INSIGHT into the genetic control of the identity of specific regions along the body axis of vertebrates^1 has resulted primarily from the study of vertebrate homologues of regulatory genes operating in the Drosophila trunk^2, but little is known about the development of most anterior regions of the body either in flies^3,4 or vertebrates. Three Drosophila genes have been identified that are important in controlling the development of the head^5–8, two of which, empty spiracles ^5 and orthodenticle ^8, have been cloned and shown to contain a homeobox^9–11. We previously cloned and characterized Emxl and Emx2 , two mouse genes related to empty spiracles that are expressed in restricted regions of the developing f orebrain, including the presumptive cerebral cortex and olfactory bulbs^12. Here we report the identification of Otxl and Otx2 , which are related to orthodenticle ^7,8. We have compared the expression domains of the four genes in the developing rostral brain of mouse embryos at a developmental stage, day 10 post coitum, when they are all expressed. Otx2 is expressed in every dorsal and most ventral regions of telencephalon, diencephalon and mesencephalon. The Otx1 expression domain is similar to that of Otx2 , but contained within it. The Emx2 expression domain is comprised of dorsal telencephalon and small diencephalic regions, both dorsally and ventrally. Finally, Emxl expression is exclusively confined to the dorsal telencephalon. Thus at the time when regional specification of major brain regions takes place, the expression domains of the four genes seem to be continuous regions contained within each other in the sequence Emxl < Emx2 < Otxl < Otx2.Basic understanding of the Solar System is the poor relation in most space programmes, but the US National Aeronautics and Space Administration should promptly redress the balance by scrapping its planned space station.RECEPTOR protein-tyrosine kinases, through phosphorylation of specific tyrosine residues, generate high-affinity binding sites which direct assembly of multienzyme signalling complexes^1,2. Many of these signalling proteins, including phospholipase Cγ, GTPase-activating protein and phosphatidylinositol-3-OH kinase, contain src -homology 2 (SH2) domains, which bind with high affinity and specificity to tyrosine-phosphorylated sequences^3,4. The critical role played by SH2 domains in signalling has been highlighted by recent studies showing that mutation of specific phosphorylation sites on the platelet-derived growth factor receptor impair its association with phosphatidylinositol-3-OH kinase, preventing growth factor-induced mitogenesis^5,6. Here we report the solution structure of an isolated SH2 domain from the 85K regulatory subunit of phosphatidylinositol-3-OH kinase, determined using multidimensional nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy. The structure is characterized by a central region of β-sheet flanked by two α-helices, with a highly flexible loop close to functionally important residues previously identified by site-directed mutagenesis^7,8.STIMULATION of growth factor receptors with tyrosine kinase activity is followed by rapid receptor dimerization, tyrosine autophosphorylation and phosphorylation of signalling molecules such as phospholipase C_γ(PLC_γ) and the ros GTPase-activating protein^1,2. PLC_γ and GTPase-activating protein bind to specific tyrosine-phosphorylated regions in growth factor receptors^3–9through their sir -homologous SH2 domains^7,8,10,11. Growth factor-induced tyrosine phosphorylation of PLC_γ is essential for stimulation of phosphatidylinositol hydrolysis in vitro ^12 and in vivo ^13. We have shown that a short phosphorylated peptide containing tyrosine at position 766 from a conserved region^14–18 of the fibre-blast growth factor (FGF) receptor is a binding site for the SH2 domain of PLC_γ (ref. 8). Here we show that an FGF receptor point mutant in which Tyr766 is replaced by a phenylalanine residue (Y766F) is unable to associate with and tyrosine-phosphorylate PLC_γ or to stimulate hydrolysis of phosphatidylinositol. Nevertheless, the Y766F FGF receptor mutant can be autophos-phorylated, and can phosphorylate several cellular proteins and stimulate DNA synthesis. Our data show that phosphorylation of the conserved Tyr 766 of the FGF receptor is essential for phosphorylation of PLC_γ and for hydrolysis of phosphatidylinositol, but that elimination of this hydrolysis does not affect FGF-induced mitogenesis.STIMULATION of certain receptor tyrosine kinases results in the tyrosine phosphorylation and activation of phospholipase C_γ(PLC_γ), an enzyme that catalyses the hydrolysis of phosphatidylinositol (Ptdlns)^1–8. This hydrolysis generates diacylglycerol and free inositol phosphate, which in turn activate protein kinase C and increase intracellular Ca^2+, respectively. PLC_γ physically associates with activated receptor tyrosine kinases, suggesting that it is a substrate for direct phosphorylation by these kinases^7–10. Here we report that a fibroblast growth factor (FGF) receptor with a single point mutation at residue 766 replacing tyrosine with phenylalanine fails to associate with PLC_γ in response to FGF. This mutant receptor also failed to mediate Ptdlns hydrolysis and Ca^2+ mobilization after FGF stimulation. However, the mutant receptor phosphorylated itself and several other cellular proteins, and it mediated mitogenesis in response to FGF. These findings show that a point mutation in the FGF receptor selectively eliminates activation of PLC_γ and that neither Ca^2+ mobilization nor Ptdlns hydrolysis are required for FGF-induced mitogenesis.NITRIC oxide is an important bioregulatory molecule, being responsible, for example, for activity of endothelium-derived relaxing factor (EDRF)^1–4. Acute hypertension^5, diabetes^6, ischaemia^7and atherosclerosis^8 are associated with abnormalities of EDRF. Nitric oxide is thought to be a retrograde messenger in the central nervous system^9. The technology is not yet available for rapid detection of NO released by a single cell in the presence of oxygen and/or nitrite, so the release, distribution and reactivity of endogenous NO in biological systems cannot be analysed. Here we describe a porphyrinic microsensor that we have developed and applied to monitoring NO release in a microsystem. We selectively measured in situ the NO released from a single cell with a response time of less than 10 ms. The microsensor consists of p-type semiconducting polymeric porphyrin and a cationic exchanger (Nation) deposited on a thermally sharpened carbon fibre with a tip diameter of ∼0.5 (μm. The microsensor, which can be operated in either the amperometric or voltammetric mode, is characterized by a linear response up to 300 μM and a detection limit of 10 nM. Nitric oxide at the level of 10^−20 mols can be detected in a single cell.THE N -methyl-D-aspartate (NMDA) receptor channel is highly permeable to Ca^2+ but is blocked by Mg^2+ in a voltage-dependent manner^1–4. These characteristics are essential for the NMDA receptor channel to mediate the induction of long-term potentiation of synaptic efficacy, a form of activity-dependent synaptic plasticity thought to underlie memory, learning and development^5–8. Recent studies have revealed the molecular and functional diversity of the NMDA receptor channel subunits, which are classified into the ɛ and ζ families according to the amino-acid sequence homology^9–12. Here we report that replacement by glutamine of asparagine 598 in putative transmembrane segment M2 of the ζ1 subunit, strongly reduces the sensitivity of the heteromeric ɛ 2/ζ1 NMDA receptor channel to Mg^2+ block. The corresponding mutation of the ɛ2 subunit has a similar effect. Furthermore, the heteromeric ɛ 2/ζl NMDA receptor channel with the mutation on both subunits shows greatly reduced sensitivity to MK-801, a channel blocker of the NMDA receptor channel^13,14, but is still susceptible to inhibition by Zn^2+15,16. These findings suggest that the conserved asparagine residue in segment M2 constitutes a Mg^2+-block site of the NMDA receptor channel, and that the MK-801 site overlaps the Mg^2+ site.INDUCED homeotic floral mutants in Arabidopsis thaliana and Antirrhinum majus ^1–3 are used to investigate the molecular mechanisms that establish floral organ identity. Here we describe bicalyx , a naturally occurring homeotic floral variant in Clarkia concinna (Onagraceae) that replaces petals with sepal-like structures. Typical C. concinna flowers have four sepals, four tri-lobed, bright pink petals, four stamens and a four-part ovary. Bicalyx flowers appear to have eight sepals, no petals and wild-type stamens and ovary with no reduction in fertility. All bicalyx organs on a plant are alike and have no developmental abnormalities, in contrast to many of the homeotic phenotypes described^4–7. Bicalyx demonstrates that a large morphological difference governed by a simple genetic change can become established in a natural plant population and suggests that even homeotic genes play a role in the evolution of morphological diversity in plants.OPTICAL imaging of animal somatosensory, olfactory and visual cortices has revealed maps of functional activity^1–12. In non-human primates, high-resolution maps of the visual cortex have been obtained using only an intrinsic reflection signal^3,4,6,13,14. Although the time course of the signal is slower than membrane potential changes, the maximum optical changes correspond to the maximal neuronal activity^3,6. The intrinsic optical signal may represent the flow of ionic currents, oxygen delivery, changes in blood volume, potassium accumulation or glial swelling^3,4,6,8,15–18. Here we use similar techniques to obtain maps from human cortex during stimulation-evoked epileptiform afterdischarges and cognitively evoked functional activity. Optical changes increased in magnitude as the intensity and duration of the afterdischarges increased. In areas surrounding the afterdischarge activity, optical changes were in the opposite direction and possibly represent an inhibitory surround. Large optical changes were found in the sensory cortex during tongue movement and in Broca's and Wernicke's language areas during naming exercises. The adaptation of high-resolution optical imaging for use on human cortex provides a new technique for investigation of the organization of the sensory and motor cortices, language, and other cognitive processes.THE ocean's intermediate^1–6 and deep^7,8 circulation are both known to have differed during the last glaciation from those of today, but little is known about the history of the subtropical gyres. Variations in gyre processes should be closely linked to variations in global climate, as gyre circulation is driven by air–sea interactions and reflects the climate at the ocean surface. The gyres are also a significant reservoir of carbon and nutrients, so that gyre processes affect the distribution of carbon and nutrients in the oceans and thus atmospheric CO_2. Here we use measurements of δ^13C and δ^18O in foraminifera from the Bahamas to produce a detailed reconstruction of nutrient and temperature profiles in the thermocline during the last glaciation. The thermocline of the glacial North Atlantic subtropical gyre lacked the oxygen minimum that is characteristic of the modern ocean, and was depleted in nutrients, indicating greater, more uniform thermocline ventilation at that time. Thus not only intermediate waters^1–5 but the entire upper water column within the glacial North Atlantic was depleted of nutrients. Moreover, glacial thermocline waters were cooler, had a steeper temperature gradient and a shallower base. Both the ventilation and the thermal structure of the glacial thermocline are consistent with what is known of the glacial climate^9–14.FOLLOWING the Gulf war, controversy and speculation have surrounded the extent to which the massive spillage of petroleum and the burning of oil wells in Kuwait have damaged marine ecosystems in the region^1–5. We report here the results of a rapid assessment survey of hydrocarbon contamination undertaken in the coastal marine environment from Kuwait to Oman during mid-1991. Our results show that severe oil pollution was restricted primarily to the Saudi Arabian coastline within ∼400 km from the spillages, and that during the four months following the conflict and preceding our survey, the spilled oil had extensively degraded. Surprisingly, concentrations of petroleum hydrocarbons in sediments and bivalve molluscs from Bahrain in June 1991 were lower than those recorded from our pre-war (1983–86) surveys at the same site, probably as a result of decreased tanker traffic and associated deballasting during and after the conflict. As for carcinogenic polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons produced during burning of the oil wells, we found that concentrations in sediments from even the most heavily contaminated sites were relatively low, and comparable to levels reported for the Baltic Sea^6, coastal locations of the northeastern United States^7 and United Kingdom estuaries^8.DESTRUCTION of surface ozone in the Arctic environment during the spring is thought to be caused by photochemical reactions involving bromine compounds^1. Berg et al .^2 reported a pulse of bromine particles and gases in the Arctic lower atmosphere in spring, which may be responsible for this surface ozone destruction and for which biogenic sources have been hypothesized^1–3. Here we report laboratory and in situ measurements which indicate that Arctic ice microalgae emit significant quantities of bromoform (CHBr_3), which may be converted photochemically into active forms of bromine. Our estimates of total annual bromoform release indicate that polar ice algae might contribute globally significant amounts of organic bromine compounds, comparable with anthropogenic and macrophyte sources.CLASSICAL and dwarf novae are both binary star systems in which mass is transferred onto a white-dwarf primary from a red-dwarf secondary that overflows its Roche lobe. In classical novae, mass accumulates on the surface of the white dwarf and erupts in a thermonuclear outburst every ten thousand years or so, whereas dwarf novae show less intense and more frequent outbursts, on a timescale of months, due to brightening of an accretion disk. V1017 Sgr, the remnant of nova Sagitarii 1919, has shown out-bursts of both classical and dwarf nova type during this century. It has been described as a recurrent nova^1,2 or as a symbiotic star^2,3. Unlike most novae it has a more massive evolved secondary, of type G5 III (ref. 4), and its relation to other nova types has been obscure. Here I report a preliminary spectroscopic orbit determination which yields a period of 5.7 days. This is much longer than the typical periods of cataclysmic binaries, which are generally less than 0.5 day. I suggest that V1017 Sgr, along with a few other systems of unusually long period such as BV Cen and GK Per, may form a distinct class of cataclysmic variables, characterized by their larger, more evolved secondaries.An RNA molecule consisting of an asymmetric internal loop of six nucleotides can be rapidly and specifically cleaved by Pb^2+ in the presence of Mg^2+. The 5′ cleavage product terminates with a 3′ phosphomonoester generated from a 2′,3′-cyclic phosphodiester reaction intermediate. This two-step reaction mechanism resembles that of many protein ribonucleases but has not previously been observed for reactions catalysed by RNA.The world's diffidence at intervention in Bosnia is understandable, but should not be taken to extremes.The most striking difference between the behaviour of the copper oxide high-temperature superconductors and previous low-temperature type II superconductors is the much more gradual decrease in electrical resistance with temperature in the latter, in the presence of a magnetic field. This raises the question of whether a type II superconductor has strictly zero resistivity, when cooled in a magnetic field. Theoretical and experimental evidence now suggests that as the temperature is lowered, there is a sharp phase transition to a truly superconducting, impurity-dominated phase containing a disordered, frozen arrangement of magnetic flux vortices.Bayes or Bust? A Critical Examination of Bayeslan Confirmation Theory. By John Earman. MIT Press: 1992. Pp. 265. $35, £31.50.The Action Plant. By Paul Simons. Blackwell: 1992. Pp. 323. £25, $27.95.Salt and Civilization. By S. A. M. Adshead. Macmillan/St Martin's Press: 1992. Pp. 477. £45, $39.95.Children of Alcoholics: A Critical Appraisal of Theory and Research. By Kenneth J. Sher.. University of Chicago Press: 1991. Pp. 226. $28.75, £19.95.The reasons why mixtures of sand and pebbles seem to separate when shaken vigorously have been illuminated by an intriguing simulation which, among other things, suggests that only large pebbles behave in this way.The space agency may be trying to do too much by trying to combine research with experimental technologyAn imaginative international research project, the Japanese-inspired Human Frontier Science Program, must not be allowed to founder because its managers wish it were something else and more conventional.THE NF-κB subunits pSO and p65 and the product of the rel proto-oncogene are members of a growing class of transcription factors with a unique DNA-binding and dimerization domain^1–13. Nuclear transfer of each of these factors is controlled by cytoplasmic inhibitors, and regulated by specific stimuli. The inhibitors 1κB-α and -β and pp40 recognize either p65 or the c- rel protein^14–16. We show here that the proto-oncogene bcl -3, believed to be involved in certain human B-cell leukaemias^17, encodes a protein that functions as an IκB-like molecule for native NF-κB but is specific for the p50 subunit. The ankyrin repeat domain of the bcl-3 product is shown to mediate complex formation with NF-κB dimers by contacting the conserved dimerization domain of NF-κB.ENTRY of yeast cells into the mitotic cell cycle (Start) involves a form of the CDC28 kinase that associates with Gl-specific cyclins encoded by CLN1 and CLN2 (ref. 1). The onset of Start may be triggered by the activation of CLN1 and CLN2 transcription in late Gl (ref. 2). SWI4 and SWI6 are components of a factor (SBF) that binds the CACGAAAA (SCB) promoter elements^3–5 responsible for activation in late Gl of the HO endonuclease, CLN1 and CLN2 genes^6,7. A related factor (MBF) containing SWI6 and a 120K protein^8 binds to the ACGCGTNA (MCB) promoter elements responsible for late Gl-specific transcription of DNA replication genes^9–12. Nothing is known about how these heteromeric proteins bind DNA. We show here that SWI4 contains a novel DNA-binding domain at its N terminus that alone binds specifically to SCBs and a C-terminal domain that binds to SWI6. SWI4's DNA-binding domain is similar to an N-terminal domain of the cdclO protein that is a component of an MBF-like factor from Schizosaccharomyces pombe ^13 and is required for Start^14,15. An involvement of this kind of DNA-binding domain in transcriptional controls at Start may therefore be a conserved feature of eukaryotic cells.TUBERCULOSIS is responsible for one in four of all avoidable adult deaths in developing countries^1. Increased frequency and accelerated fatality of the disease among individuals infected with human immunodeficiency virus has raised worldwide concern that control programmes may be inadequate^2, and the emergence of multidrug-resistant strains of Mycobacterium tuberculosis has resulted in several recent fatal outbreaks in the United States^3. Isonicotinic acid hydrazide (isoniazid, INH) forms the core of antituberculosis regimens; however, clinical isolates that are resistant to INH show reduced catalase activity and a relative lack of virulence in guinea-pigs^4–7. Here we use mycobacterial genetics^8,9 to study the molecular basis of INH resistance. A single M. tuberculosis gene, katG , encoding both catalase and peroxidase, restored sensitivity to INH in a resistant mutant of Mycobacterium smegmatis , and conferred INH susceptibility in some strains of Escherichia coli . Deletion of katG from the chromosome was associated with INH resistance in two patient isolates of M. tuberculosis.RETINOID response pathways are mediated by two classes of receptors, the retinoic acid receptors (RARs)^1–6 and the retinoid X receptors (RXRs)^7–11. A central question is whether distinct response pathways are regulated by these two classes of receptors. The observation that the stereoisomer 9- cis -retinoic acid binds with high affinity to RXRs^12,13 suggested that this retinoid has a distinct role in controlling RXR activity, but it was almost simultaneously discovered that RXRs function as auxiliary receptors for RARs and related receptors, and are essential for DNA binding and function of those receptors^9,10,14–17. Hence, although RARs seem to operate effectively only as heterodimeric RAR/RXR complexes, RXRs themselves apparently function predominantly, if not exclusively, as auxiliary receptors. Here we report that 9- cis -retinoic acid induces RXR homodimer formation. Our results demonstrate a new mechanism for retinoid action by which a ligand-induced homodimer mediates a distinct retinoid response pathway.The Chemical Bond: Structure and Dynamics. Edited by Ahmed Zewail. Academic: 1992. Pp. 313. $49.95, £33.THE immunophilins cyclophilin and FK506 binding protein (FKBP) are small, predominantly soluble proteins that bind the immunosuppressant drugs cyclosporin A and FK506, respectively, with high affinity, and which seem to mediate their pharmacological actions^1,2. The Ca^2+-dependent protein phosphatase, calcineurin, binds the cyclophilin—cyclosporin A and FKBP—FK506 complexes, indicating that calcineurin might mediate the actions of these drugs^3. A physiological role for the immunophilins in the nervous system is implied by a close homology between the structure of NINA A, a protein in the neural retina of Drosophila , and cyclophilin^4,5, as well as by the high density of FKBP messenger RNA in brain tissue^6. Here we report that the levels of FKBP and mRNA in rat brain are extraordinarily high and that their regional localization is virtually identical to that of calcineurin, indicating that there may be a physiological link between calcineurin and the immunophilins. We also show that at low concentrations FK506 and cyclosporin A enhance the phosphorylation of endogenous protein substrates in brain tissue and in intact PC12 cells, indicating that these drugs may inhibit phosphatase activity by interacting with the immunophilin—calcineurin complexes.CYSTIC fibrosis (CF) is a lethal genetic disease resulting in a reduced CI^− permeability^1, increased mucous sulphation^2, increased Na^+ absorption^3 and defective acidification of lysosomal vesicles^4. The CF gene encodes a protein (the cystic fibrosis trans-membrane conductance regulator, CFTR^5) that can function as a low-conductance Cl^− channel with a linear current-voltage relationship whose regulation is defective in CF patients^6–8. Larger conductance, outwardly rectifying Cl^− channels are also defective in CF and fail to activate when exposed either to cyclic AMP-dependent protein kinase A or to protein kinase C^9–13. The role of the outwardly rectifying Cl^− channel in CF has been questioned^14. We report here that expression of recombinant CF genes using adeno-associated virus vectors in CF bronchial epithelial cells corrects defective Cl^− secretion, that it induces the appearance of small, linear conductance Cl^− channels, and restores protein kinase A activation of outwardly rectifying Cl^− channels. These results re-establish an involvement of outwardly rectifying Cl^− channels in CF and suggest that CFTR regulates more than one conductance pathway in airway tissues.Featured this week — a compendium of immunological reagents, microplate analysis software and an in vitro cell culture system for the production of monoclonal antibodies, which provides an alternative to ascites production.ImmunoDetection is a novel technique combining perfusion chromatography technology with antibodies to perform the steps of an immunoassay in a flow-through column format. Sensitive and precise measurements are performed in seconds to minutes using automated liquid chromatography instrumentation.WE have used optical microlithography to fabricate capped quasi-two-dimensional obstacle courses in SiO_2. We report here observations using epifluorescence microscopy of the electrophoresis and length fractionation of large DNA molecules confined in arrays. Simple reptation theory, based on the work of deGennes^1, predicts that at low electric fields the electrophoretic mobility of a polymer of length L much greater than the persistence length p scales inversely with L (ref. 2). But elongation of the coil in the matrix at sufficiently strong electric fields^3 results in a length-independent electrophoretic mobility^4,5. The application of suitably timed pulsed electric fields restores the fractionating power of gels for long molecules^6 but the protocols of pulsed-field electrophoresis are semi-empirical because the complex and ill-understood gel matrix plays a critical role in fractionation. Microlithographically constructed obstacle arrays, with their low dimensionality, small volume and extremely reproducible topography, will make it possible to understand the motion and fractionation of large polymer molecules in complex but well characterized topologies.UNDERSTANDING the processes that generate and maintain patterns of species diversity is a major focus of contemporary ecological and evolutionary research. In the deep sea, species diversity varies geographically and bathymetrically^1–3, and may attain levels that rival tropical communities^4. Many hypotheses have been proposed concerning the forces that shape patterns of species diversity in the deep sea^5, but so far it has not been possible to relate these patterns to potential causes in a direct quantitative way. The nature of sediments should be important in structuring deep-sea communities because deposit feeders rely on the sediments for nutrition and comprise most of the organisms in the deep sea^6. The composition of soft sediment communities is influenced by sediment particle size^7,8. Shallow-water deposit feeders selectively ingest particular size fractions of the sediments^9,10 and there are interspecific differences in particle size preference^11–13. Partitioning of sediments with respect to size may be more likely in the deep sea if there is strong selection for macrophagy as a result of reduced food supply and digestive constraints imposed by feeding on deposits^14; macrophagy would permit species to ingest selectively the more labile components of the sediments. If deposit feeders in the deep sea partition the sediments with respect to size, species diversity may in part be a function of sediment particle size diversity. Also, sediment particle size diversity may reflect habitat complexity because the organisms live on or within the sediments^15–21. Here we show that species diversity is a significant positive function of sediment particle size diversity. The relationship seems to be scale-invariant, accounting for a similar proportion of the variance at inter-regional, regional and local scales. Bathymetric patterns of species diversity also appear to be largely attributable to changes in sediment characteristics with depth. These results suggest that sediment diversity has an important role in determining the number of species within a community and identify a direct environmental factor that potentially influences species diversity in the deep sea.To assess the future impact of anthropogenic greenhouse gases on global climate, we need a reliable estimate of the sensitivity of the Earth's climate to changes in radiative forcing. Climate sensitivity is conventionally defined as the equilibrium surface temperature increase for carbon dioxide doubling, Δ T _2x. Uncertainties in cloud processes spread general circulation model (GCM) estimates of this parameter over the range 1.5< Δ T _2x <4.5°C (refs 1, 2). An alternative to model-based estimates is in principle available from the reconstruction of past climates^3–6, which implicitly includes cloud feedback. Here we retrieve the sensitivity of two palaeoclimates, one colder and one warmer than present, by independently reconstructing both the equilibrium surface tem-perature change and the radiative forcing. Our results yield Δ T _2x = 2.3 ±0.9 °C. This range is comparable with estimates from GCMs and inferences from recent temperature observations and ocean models^7,8. Future application of the method to additional climates in the geological record might constrain climate sensitivity enough to narrow the model uncertainties of global warming predictions.THE oxidation of sulphur dioxide to sulphate in the marine boundary layer (MBL) is an important pathway in the global sulphur cycle. Oxidation by ozone in the aqueous phase is an important process in cloud droplets^1 but has not generally been thought to be significant in the clear air of the MBL. Yet the lower part of the MBL contains abundant sea-salt aerosol particles, which are largely water of sufficiently high pH (ref. 2) to support ozone oxidation of SO_2 to sulphate. We have argued previously^3 that 5–25% of the total non-sea-salt sulphate (n.s.s. SO^2−_4) observed in the MBL may be formed by this mechanism; here we assess its contribution to the cycling of sulphur in (and particularly its removal from) the MBL. We show that, owing to the effects of mass transfer, the n.s.s. SO^2−_4 so generated will be predominantly associated with particles of 2–9 μm diameter, and will accordingly dry-deposit at a rapid rate. Because part of the dimethyl sulphide (DMS) emitted by marine organisms is converted to SO_2 in the MBL, this additional removal pathway for sulphur may markedly reduce the proposed feedback^4 between greenhouse warming, oceanic DMS emissions and sulphate haze albedo.INTERCALATION of sodium into C_60 has been shown^1 to yield a range of compounds Na_ x C_60 (2< x <6). Unlike the other alkali-metal-doped compounds, there is no evidence of superconductivity within this range of doping. Furthermore, Na_6C_60 retains the face-centred-cubic (f.c.c.) structure of undoped C_60 whereas the analogous x = 6 phases with K, Rb or Cs are body-centred cubic (b.c.c.)^2. Here we report the preparation of sodium-doped C_60 with x up to about 10; the structure remains f.c.c. throughout. Rietveld refinement of X-ray diffraction data yields a structure with ideal composition Na_11C_60, in which the octahedral interstitial site contains a nine-atom body-centred cluster of sodium atoms while the tetrahedral sites are singly occupied. Clusters of four to nine sodium atoms in the octahedral site provide sufficient 'chemical pressure' to prevent the low-temperature lattice distortion that occurs when this site is singly occupied, as in Na_3C_60 (ref. 1). This distortion is thought to suppress superconductivity in the latter compound. Thus we suggest that new sodium-doped superconduct-ing phases may be found in the range 4< x < 11.INTERCALATING solid C_60 with dopant atoms yields materials with a remarkable range of properties^1. Alkali metal atoms, for example, readily form charge-transfer compounds^2,3, A_ x C_60 (where A is an alkali metal), which can be metallic, superconducting or insulating depending on the dopant concentration^4–9. In all cases, the superconducting phase has a face-centred cubic (f.c.c.) structure and stoichiometry A_3C_60, which suggests a common mechanism for superconductivity dependent, at least in part, on the external coordination number of the C_60 molecules. More recently, it has been shown^10 that the alkaline earth metal calcium can also be intercalated with fulleride to form a superconducting phase, again with a f.c.c.-derived structure, near a Ca:C_60 ratio of 5:1. Here we report the intercalation of fulleride with barium, in which a pure body-centred cubic phase with a lattice constant of 11.171 Å is realized near a stoichiometry of Ba_6C_60. This phase is also superconducting (with a transition temperature of 7 K), suggesting that the mechanism of superconductivity is related to an intrinsic property of the C_60 molecules, rather than the external coordination number.CONVENTIONAL techniques for measuring magnetic resonance involve the detection of electromagnetic signals induced in a coil or microwave cavity by the collective precession of magnetic moments (from nuclei or electrons) excited by an alternating magnetic field. In a different approach^1, isolated electron spins have been detected by scanning tunnelling microscopy, with the spin precession inducing a radiofrequency modulation in the tunnelling current. Here, we describe a new and extremely sensitive method of detection, the principles of which derive from magnetic force microscopy^2–5 and a recent proposal^6,7 by one of us (J.A.S.). We measure the small, oscillatory magnetic force (10^−14 N) acting on a paramagnetic sample (a few grains of diphenylpicrylhydrazil, weighing < 30 ng) which has been excited into magnetic resonance in the presence of an inhomogeneous magnetic field. This force is detected by optically sensing the angstrom-scale vibration of a micromechanical cantilever on which the sample is mounted. The sensitivity of this technique to the spatial distribution of the spins suggests that mechanical detection of magnetic resonance has the potential for imaging microscopic samples in three dimensions. So far, we have achieved a spatial resolution of 19 μm in one dimension.THE intrinsic extreme ultraviolet (EUV) spectrum of quasars, in which spectral lines of He and CNO ions should appear, is in most cases strongly absorbed by the hydrogen Lyman continuum of intergalactic matter at cosmological distances. The bright quasar HS1700 + 6416 (at redshift z = 2.72), from the Hamburg survey^1, is a fortuitous exception, the line of sight towards it being relatively transparent. Here we report detailed ultraviolet spectroscopic measurements of HS1700 + 6416, obtained with the Hubble Space Telescope. We observe a rich absorption line spectrum, in which many EUV resonance lines (including He I, O II to O v, and N III and N IV) are seen. The O/C abundance ratios inferred from the line-strengths are higher than Solar System values by factors of 3 to 5. This suggests that the absorbing material is halo gas of early galaxies, from which population II stars have yet to form, oxygen being a primary nucleosynthesis product from a first generation of massive stars.Bright Air, Brilliant Fire: On the Matter of the Mind. By Gerald Edelman. Basic Books/Alien Lane: 1992. Pp.280. $25. £20.THE HCI in the mammalian stomach is concentrated enough to digest the stomach itself, yet the gastric epithelium remains undamaged. One protective factor is gastric mucus, which forms a protective layer over the surface epithelium^1–4 and acts as a diffusion barrier^5,6 Bicarbonate ions secreted by the gastric epithelium^7 are trapped in the mucus gel, establishing a gradient from pH 1–2 at the lumen to pH 6–7 at the cell surface^8–10. How does HCI, secreted at the base of gastric glands by parietal cells, traverse the mucus layer without acidifying it? Here we demonstrate that injection of HCI through solutions of pig gastric mucin produces viscous fingering patterns^11–18 dependent on pH, mucin concentration and acid flow rate. Above pH 4, discrete fingers are observed, whereas below pH 4, HCI neither penetrates the mucin solution nor forms fingers. Our in vitro results suggest that HCI secreted by the gastric gland can penetrate the mucus gel layer (pH 5–7) through narrow fingers, whereas HC1 in the lumen (pH 2) is prevented from diffusing back to the epithelium by the high viscosity of gastric mucus gel on the luminal side.SEX and death are two fundamental but poorly understood aspects of life^1–3. They are often thought to be linked because reproduction requires the diversion of limited resources from somatic growth and maintenance^4–9. This diversion of resources in mated animals, often called a cost of reproduction, is usually expressed as a reduction of lifespan in mated animals, although some debate exists on the best way to measure this cost^4–6,9,10. I report here that in the soil nematode, Caenorhabditis elegans , sex significantly decreases male lifespan without reducing hermaphrodite lifespan. The reduction of mated male lifespan seems to be caused by additional sperm production and not by the physical activity of mating. This conclusion is supported by observations that a mutation reducing sperm production increased mean lifespan by about 65% in both mated males and hermaphrodites. This suggests that spermatogenesis, rather than oogenesis or the physical act of mating, is a major factor reducing lifespan in C. elegans . This contradicts the traditional biological assumption that large oocytes are much costlier to produce than small sperm^11–14.FILAMENTOUS sulphide-oxidizing bacteria, Beggiatoa spp., com-monly grow as submillimetre-thin white films on anoxic marine sediments. Unusually thick mats (>1 cm) of giant Beggiatoa filaments, 41–120 μm wide and 2–10 mm long, were observed at 2,000 m water depth in the hydrothermal vent fields of Guaymas Basin, Gulf of California^1–4. We investigated how such dense communities of the largest known bacteria overcome severe diffusion limitation of their substrate supply, and what advantage they may have by developing such large cell sizes. Oxygen, sulphide, pH and temperature were therefore measured in Beggiatoa mats directly on the sea floor. We report here the discovery of small-scale hydrothermal fluid circulations around patches of the bacteria, causing a pulsatory seawater flow into the mats and thereby enhancing the supply of oxygen and sulphide to the bacteria.Virginia education council says entering students should be able to read and calculateTRUE polar wander—the global motion of the mantle relative to the Earth's rotation axis—is known from the analysis of palaeomagnetic data, hotspot tracks and plate motions to have occurred at velocities of up to 0.5° Myr^−1 since the Late Cretaceous period^1–4. We address here the longstanding question of how fast episodes of true polar wander (TPW) can be excited^5, by analysing the impact of the distribution and activity of subduction zones on polar motion. Using nonlinear Liouville equations, which allow us to treat large excursions of the polar axis, we show that unrealistically fast TPW is excited by subduction episodes unless the lower mantle has a viscosity at least 10 times that of the upper mantle. This need for a viscosity increase with depth in the mantle reinforces the conclusions of previous studies on post-glacial rebound and geoid anomalies, theoretical creep laws and some preliminary results on TPW induced by density anomalies embedded in the mantle^6–10. The lower viscosity in the upper mantle means that upper-mantle density anomalies are most effective in exciting TPW. Changes in the pattern of subduction through time may be responsible for both episodes of fast TPW and times of quiescence in polar motion.INCREASING anthropogenic emissions of greenhouse gases are expected to influence the Earth's climate, but the mechanisms for this are not yet fully understood. One way to determine the effect of such gases on climate is to study their atmospheric concentrations during periods of past climate change, such as glacial to interglacial transitions. Previous studies on polar ice cores showed that the concentrations of the greenhouse gases CO_2 and CH_4 were significantly reduced during the last glacial period relative to Holocene values^1–5. But no comparable studies have been reported for nitrous oxide (N_2O), which is the next most important greenhouse gas and also affects stratospheric ozone^6,7 and, potentially, the oxidative capacity of the troposphere^8. Here we report results from Antarctic ice cores, showing that the atmospheric N_2O concentration was about 30% lower during the Last Glacial Maximum than during the Holocene epoch. Our data also show that present-day N_2O concentrations are unprecedented in the past 45 kyr, and hence provide evidence that recent increases in atmospheric N_2O are of anthropogenic origin.OZONE in the troposphere is an important greenhouse gas, and a key participant in the oxidation of other trace species, but the mechanisms for its formation and destruction are not fully understood. In polluted regions of the Northern Hemisphere, seasonal increases in ozone concentration have been observed^1,2; such changes could arise from photochemical reactions^3–6, but they could also involve transport from the ozone-rich stratosphere^7. In remote, unpolluted (low-No_ x ) regions, photochemical theory predicts net destruction of ozone^8. Here we present observations of a large summer minimum in ozone concentration in the unpolluted marine boundary layer of the Southern Hemisphere. Our results show a clear link between ozone loss and hydrogen peroxide production in the region, demonstrating that in situ photo-chemistry, rather than transport, is the major cause of the seasonal ozone cycle in the boundary layer. These findings emphasize the role of photochemical processes in the lower atmosphere, and may suggest only a limited role for transport in other, more polluted regions.FOLLOWING the discovery of C_60(ref. 1) and the advent of fullerene chemistry, considerable attention has been directed towards the associated cylindrical^2,3 and polyhedral^4,5 forms of graphite. To date, however, observations of such closed structures have been limited to the carbon system. Here we report the formation of equivalent stable structures in the layered semiconductor tungsten disulphide. After the heating of thin tungsten films in an atmosphere of hydrogen sulphide, transmission electron microscopy reveals a variety of concentric polyhedral and cylindrical structures (ranging in size from <10 to >100 nm) growing from the amorphous tungsten matrix. The closed nature of the structures is verified by electron diffraction and lattice imaging. As with the carbon system, complete closure of the tungsten disulphide layers requires the presence of structural defects (for example, edge dislocations), or the arrangement of atoms in polyhedra other than a planar hexagonal geometry.SEVERAL elliptical and spheroidal galaxies have been shown, in recent years, to possess kinematically distinct subsystems. These may be in the form of a central stellar component whose rotation is not aligned with the rest of the galaxy^1,2, or of a gaseous disk, often at large radius, which is kinematically distinct from the main stellar component^3,4. A more unusual case is that of a counter-rotating gaseous component (with some associated stellar absorption) in the inner region of the flattened elliptical NGC4550^5. All these cases are presumed to be signatures of violently interacting systems, which are the result of galaxy mergers or captures, as in NGC7252^6,7. Here we report the discovery of two counter-rotating gaseous disks in the otherwise normal early-type spiral (Sab(s)II; ref. 8) NGC4826. This is the most disk-like galaxy in which any kinematic substructure has yet been found, and our discovery raises the possibility, already suggested by Schweizer^7, that even spiral galaxies may have undergone a significant degree of structural evolution due to mergers.RECENTLY measured abundances of beryllium^1–4 and boron^5 in a number of hot population II halo stars are orders of magnitude above the predicted abundances of those elements from standard Big Bang nucleosynthesis^6. Be and B do not, however, show a plateau of constant abundance over a wide range of low metallicities and high temperatures, as is the case for ^7Li (refs 7–15). The implication is that the ^7Li abundance is largely primordial, whereas the Be and B abundances are due to galactic cosmic ray (GCR) spallation reactions^16–22 on top of a much smaller Big Bang component^23. But GCR spallation should also produce ^7Li. As a consistency check on the combination of Big Bang nucleosynthesis and GCR spallation, we use the Be and B data to subtract from the measured ^7Li abundance an estimate of the amount generated by GCR spallation^21,22 for each star in the sample, and then add to this baseline an estimate of the metallicity-dependent augmentation of ^7Li, due to spallation. The slightly reduced primordial ^7Li abundance is still consistent with Big Bang nucleosynthesis, and a single GCR spallation model can fit the Be, B and corrected ^7Li abundances for all the stars in the sample.The protective association between the human leukocyte antigen HLA-B53 and severe malaria was investigated by sequencing of peptides eluted from this molecule followed by screening of candidate epitopes from pre-erythrocytic-stage antigens of Plasmodium falciparum in biochemical and cellular assays. Among malaria-immune Africans, HLA-B53-restricted cytotoxic T lymphocytes recognized a conserved nonamer peptide from liver-stage-specific antigen-1 (LSA-1), but no HLA-B53-restricted epitopes were identified in other antigens. These findings indicate a possible molecular basis for this HLA-disease association and support the candidacy of liver-stage-specific antigen-1 as a malaria vaccine component.The collision with Earth of near-Earth asteroids or comet nuclei poses a potential threat to mankind. Objects about 100 m in diameter could be diverted from an Earth-crossing trajectory by the impact of a rocket-launched mass, but for larger bodies nuclear explosions seem to be the only practical means of deflection. Fragmentation of the body by nuclear charges is less efficient or secure.The Solar-Terrestrial Environment. By J. K. Hargreaves. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 420. £50. $79.95. The Aurora: Sun-Earth Interactions. By N. Bone. Ellis Horwood: 1991. Pp. 156. £38, $65 (hbk); £15.95, $27.50 (pbk).Terrestrial Ecosystems Through Time: Evolutionary Paleoecology of Terrestrial Plants and Animals. Edited by A. K. Behrensmeyer, J. D. Damuth, W. A. DiMichele, R. Potts, H.-D. Sues and S. L. Wing. University of Chicago Press: 1992. Pp. 568. £59.95, $75 (hbk); £23.95, $29.95 (pbk).In Search of a Better World: Lectures and Essays from Thirty Years. By Karl Popper. Routledge: 1992. Pp. 245. £25.Mr William Waldegrave should not be deterred from consultation by his experience this week.Squeamishness has too often in the recent past inhibited sensible inquiries into the mechanisms by which AIDS is spread through human populations but now there may be proof that these attitudes are changing.In the picture this week - a one-step photographic copier, new microplates for the radioisotopic and luminescent analysis of adherent cells and an inverted confocal microscope that provides simultaneous imaging of three fluorochromes.Microscopic objects, including biological material, can be remotely manipulated with tightly focused beams of infrared laser light. The use of optical traps, or 'optical tweezers', holds great promise for noninvasive micromanipulation and mechanical measurement in cell biology. Optical tweezers are the 'tractor beams' of today's technology.A gene thought to be involved in RNA splicing, and which is imprinted in mice, may play an important part in Prader–Willi syndromeNature 360, 177-179 (1992) IN this letter in the 12 November issue, the two-part Fig. 1 and single-part Fig. 2 were transposed. The figure legends are correct as printed. Nature 360, 225-231 (1992) IN Fig. 3 of this article the layout of parts a and b on page 227 was misleading. The three panels in part b correspond to the first three panels in part a, that is, WT9 a-/- and j3- / - respectively.The discovery of a supernova at a redshift of one-half holds the promise of a new determination of the cosmic density parameter. But promise and practice are some way apart.Britain's first large, national survey of sexual attitudes and lifestyles will allow improved estimates of the magnitude of the HIV epidemic in Britain and should lead to better strategies for prevention.DESPITE the variety of messenger RNA half-lives in bacteria (0.5–30 min in Escherichia coli ) and their importance in controlling gene expression, their molecular basis remains obscure. The life-time of an entire mRNA molecule can be determined by features near its 5′ end, but no 5′ exoribonuclease has been identified in any prokaryotic organism^1–6. A mutation that inactivates E. coli RNase E also increases the average lifetime of bulk E. coli mRNA and of many individual messages, suggesting that cleavage by this endonuclease may be the rate-determining step in the degradation of most mRNAs in E. coli ^7–16. We have investigated the substrate preference of RNase E in E. coli by using variants of RNA I, a small untranslated RNA whose swift degradation in vivo is initiated by RNase E cleavage at an internal site. We report here that RNase E has an unprecedented substrate specificity for an endoribonuclease, as it preferentially cleaves RNAs that have several unpaired nucleotides at the 5′ end. The sensitivity of RNase E to 5′-terminal base pairing may explain how determinants near the 5′ end can control rates of mRNA decay in bacteria.THE human intercellular adhesion molecules ICAM-1, 1C AM-2 and their counter-receptors, the β_2 or leukointegrins, mediate a variety of homotypic and heterotypic leukocyte and endothelial cell–cell adhesions central to immunocompetence^1. It has been found^2 that cell–cell adhesion which is dependent on expression of the leukocyte function-associated antigen LFA-1 is not always blocked completely by antibodies raised against ICAM-1 and I CAM-2. Other leukointegrin ligands therefore probably exist, such as a glycoprotein of M _r 124K that binds LFA-1 and has been designated ICAM-3 on the basis of this function^3. We have molecularly cloned a new member of the ICAM family, ICAM-R, which is related to ICAM-1 and ICAM-2. The complementary DNA encoding ICAM-R is 1,781 base pairs long and the protein has five extracellular immunoglobulin-family type domains. The mature cell-surface form of the ICAM-R protein has an M_r which varies from 116 to 140K in a cell type-specific fashion. Overall identities in protein sequence with ICAM-1 and ICAM-2 are 48% and 31% respectively, with the degree of similarity varying between individual domains. The high level of expression of ICAM-R on resting leukocytes of all lineages and its lack of expression on either resting or cytokine-activated endothelial cells indicates a pattern of expression distinct from ICAM-1 and ICAM-2. In common with ICAM-1 and ICAM-2, ICAM-R is a ligand for the β_2-integrin CDlla/LFA-1 (CD18).The results of a massive telephone survey of sexual lifestyles in France should provide a basis for prevention strategies for AIDS and sexually transmitted diseases.THE co-ordinated function of effector and accessory cells in the immune system is assisted by adhesion molecules on the cell surface that stabilize interactions between different cell types^1. Leukocyte function-associated antigen 1 (LFA-1) is expressed on the surface of all white blood cells^2 and is a receptor for intercellular adhesion molecules (ICAM) 1 and 2 (ref. 3) which are members of the immunoglobulin superfamily^4–6. The interaction of LFA-1 with ICAMs 1 and 2 provides essential accessory adhesion signals in many immune interactions, including those between T and B lymphocytes^7 and cytotoxic T cells and their targets^8,9. In addition, both ICAMs are expressed at low levels on resting vascular endothelium^10; 1C AM-1 is strongly upregulated by cytokine stimulation and plays a key role in the arrest of leukocytes in blood vessels at sites of inflammation and injury. Recent work has indicated that resting leukocytes express a third ligand, ICAM-3, for LFA-1 (refs 11,12). ICAM-3 is potentially the most important ligand for LFA-1 in the initiation of the immune response because the expression of ICAM-1 on resting leukocytes is low. We report the expression cloning of a complementary DNA, pICAM-3, encoding a protein constitutively expressed on all leukocytes, which binds LFA-1. ICAM-3 is closely related to ICAM-1, consists of five immunoglobulin domains, and binds LFA-1 through its two N-terminal domains.THE terminal differentiation of myogenic cells initiates in the proximal portion of the limb bud whereas the distal region remains undifferentiated and proliferate^1–3 The apical ectodermal ridge maintains the progress zone in an undifferentiated state^4 and induces proliferation of limb mesenchymal cells^5. Hox-7.1 , a homeobox-containing gene, is expressed throughout the limb bud when limb outgrowth begins, whereas transcripts are later restricted to distal limb mesenchyme^6,7 which is the proposed site of positional specification^2. Transplantation of proximal limb bud tissue into the distal portion of the limb results in a re-expression of Hox-7.1 in the transplanted mesenchyme^8. Similar grafts result in a positional reassignment to distal structures^9 as well as dedifferentiation of the grafted proximal tissue^10. Because of the association of Hox-7.1 expression with proliferative and undifferentiated cells, we tested whether Hox-7.1 regulates differentiation by transfection of Hox-7.1 complementary DNA into determined myogenic cells which represent one mesenchymal lineage in the limb. Here we report that forced expression of Hox-7.1 blocks terminal differentiation and results in a corresponding decrease in steady-state levels of MyoDl. Consistent with the association of Hox-7.1 with proliferation, Hox-7.1 -expressing cells also acquire a transformed phenotype. Forced expression of Hox-8.1 , a related Hox-gene, does not affect terminal differentiation indicating that the effects of Hox-7.1 are specific.THE invariant chain, which associates with the major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class II molecules in the endoplasmic reticulum, serves two functions important in antigen processing. First, it prevents class II molecules from binding peptides in the early stages of intracellular transport^1–3. Second, it contains a cytoplasmic signal that targets the class II-invariant chain complex to an acidic endosomal compartment^4–6. Proteolytic cleavage and subsequent dissociation of the invariant chain then occurs^7,8, allowing peptides derived from endocytosed proteins to bind to released class II molecules before their expression at the cell surface^3. Certain human cell lines that are mutant in one or more MHC-linked genes are defective in class II-restricted antigen processing^9–11. Here we show that in transfectants of one of these cell lines, T2, this deficiency results in the association of a large proportion of class II molecules with a nested set of invariant-chain-derived peptides (class II-associated invariant chain peptides, or CLIP). HLA-DR3 molecules isolated from T2 transfectants can be efficiently loaded with antigenic peptides by exposure to a low pH in vitro , perhaps reflecting the in vivo conditions in which peptides associate with class II molecules^12–14. Addition of synthetic CLIP inhibits the loading process, indicating that CLIP may define the region of the invariant chain responsible for obstructing the class II binding site.UPTAKE into glial cells helps to terminate glutamate's neurotransmitter action and to keep its extracellular concentration, [Glu]_o, below neurotoxic levels. The accumulative power of the uptake carrier stems from its transport of inorganic ions such as sodium (into the cell) and potassium (out of the cell)^1–3. There is controversy over whether the carrier also transports a proton (or pH-changing anion)^4,5. Here we show that the carrier generates an alkalinization outside and an acidification inside glial cells, and transports anions out of the cells, suggesting that there is a carrier cycle in which two Na^+ accompany each glutamate anion into the cell, while one K^+ and one OH^−(or HCO^−_3) are transported out. This stoichiometry predicts a minimum [Glu]_o of 0.6 μM normally (tonically activating presynaptic autoreceptors and postsynaptic NMD A receptors), and 370 μM during brain anoxia (high enough to kill neurons). Transport of OH^−/HCO^−_3 on the uptake carrier generates significant pH changes, and may provide a mechanism for neuron–glial interaction.GLUTAMATE transport across plasma membranes of neurons, glial cells and epithelial cells of the small intestine and kidney proceeds by high- and low-affinity transport systems^1–5. High-affinity (K_m 2–50 μM) transport systems have been described^1,6,7 that are dependent on Na^+ but not Cl^− ions and have a preference for L-glutamate and D- and L-aspartate. In neurons high-affinity glutamate transporters are essential for terminating the postsynaptic action of glutamate by rapidly removing released glutamate from the synaptic cleft^6,7. We have isolated a complementary DNA encoding an electrogenic Na^+ but not Cl^−-dependent high-affinity glutamate transporter (named EAAC1) from rabbit small intestine by expression in Xenopus oocytes. We find EAAC1 transcripts in specific neuronal structures in the central nervous system as well as in the small intestine, kidney, liver and heart. The function and pharmacology of the expressed protein are characteristic of the high-affinity glutamate transporter already identified in neuronal tissues. The abnormal glutamate transport that is associated with certain neurodegenerative diseases^8 and which occurs during ischaemia and anoxia^7 could be due to abnormalities in the function of this protein.SYNAPTIC transmission of most vertebrate synapses is thought to be terminated by rapid transport of the neurotransmitter into presynaptic nerve terminals or neuroglia^1–5. L-Glutamate is the major excitatory transmitter in brain and its transport represents the mechanism by which it is removed from the synaptic cleft and kept below toxic levels^5,6. Here we use an antibody against a glial L-glutamate transporter from rat brain^7 to isolate a complemen-tary DNA clone encoding this transporter. Expression of this cDNA in transfected HeLa cells indicates that L-glutamate accumulation requires external sodium and internal potassium and transport shows the expected stereospecificity. The cDNA sequence predicts a protein of 573 amino acids with 8–9 putative transmembrane α-helices. Database searches indicate that this protein is not homologous to any identified protein of mammalian origin, including the recently described superfamily of neurotransmitter transporters. This protein therefore seems to be a member of a new family of transport molecules.PATIENTS with damage to the striate cortex have a subjectively blind region of the visual field, but may still be able to detect and localize targets within this region^1,2. But the relative roles in this 'blindsight' of subcortical neural systems, and of pathways to extra-striate visual areas, have been uncertain^3. Here we report results on two infants in whom one cerebral hemisphere, including both striate and extra-striate visual cortex, needed surgical removal in their first year. Single conspicuous targets in the half-field contralateral to the lesion could elicit fixations, implying detection and orienting by a subcortical system. In contrast, binocular optokinetic nystagmus (OKN), for which a subcortical pathway has often been thought adequate, showed a marked asymmetry. In normal neonates, fixation shifts and OKN have both been taken to reflect subcortical control^4; our results are consistent with subcortical control for fixation but not for OKN.THE envelope glycoprotein of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) initiates infection^1 by mediating fusion of the viral envelope with the cell membrane. Fusion activity requires proteolytic cleavage of the gp160 protein into gp120 and gp41 at a site containing several arginine and lysine residues^2. Activation at basic cleavage sites is observed with many membrane proteins of cellular and viral origin. We have recently found that the enzyme activating the haemagglutinin of fowl plague virus (FPV), an avian influenza virus, is furin^3. Furin, a subtilisin-like eukaryotic endoprotease^4–6, has a substrate specificity for the consensus amino-acid sequence Arg-X-Lys/Arg-Arg at the cleavage site^7. We show here that the glycoprotein of HIV-1, which has the same protease recognition motif as the FPV haemagglutinin, is also activated by furin. Furthermore, we present evidence that peptidyl-chloromethyl ketones that have the Arg-X-Lys/Arg-Arg motif and which are specific inhibitors of furin^3 interfere with cleavage of the HIV glycoprotein and hence its activation and the formation of infectious virus particles.THE enzyme ornithine decarboxylase is the key regulator of the synthesis of polyamines^1–3 which are essential for cell proliferation^4,5. Expression of this enzyme is transiently increased upon stimulation by growth factors^1–3, but becomes constitutively activated during cell transformation induced by carcinogens^6,7, viruses^8–10 or oncogenes^11–14. To test whether ornithine decarboxylase could be a common mediator of transformation and oncogenic itself, we transfected NIH3T3 cells with expression vectors carrying the complementary DN A encoding human ornithine decarboxylase in sense and antisense orientations. The increased expression of the enzyme (50–100-times endogenous levels) induced not only cell transformation, but also anchorage-independent growth in soft agar and increased tyrosine phosphorylation of a protein of M _r130K. Expression of ornithine decarboxylase antisense RNA was associated with an epithelioid morphology and reduced cell proliferation. Moreover, blocking the endogenous enzyme using specific inhibitor or synthesizing antisense RNA prevented transformation of rat fibroblasts by temperature-sensitive v- src oncogene. Our results imply that the gene encoding ornithine decarboxylase is a proto-oncogene central for regulation of cell growth and transformation.A WIDE variety of membrane transformations important in intracellular transport are inhibited by the fungal metabolite brefeldin A (refs 1–4), implying that the target for this drug is central to the formation and maintenance of subcellular compartments^5. Brefeldin A added to cells causes the rapid and reversible dissociation of a Golgi-associated peripheral membrane protein ( M _r 110,000)^6 which was found to be identical to one of the subunits of the coat of Golgi-derived (non-clathrin) coated vesicles, β-COP^7,8, implying that brefeldin A prevents transport by blocking the assembly of coats and thus the budding of enclosed vesicles^9. In addition to the coatomer (a cytosol-derived complex of seven polypeptide chains, one of which is β-COP^10), the non-clathrin (COP) coat of Golgi-derived vesicles contains stoichiometric amounts of a small ( M _r ∼ 20,000) GTP-binding protein, the ADP-ribosylation factor (ARF)^11. Binding of ARF to Golgi membranes is necessary before coatomer/β-COP can bind these membranes (ref. 12; and D. J. Palmer et al ., manuscript submitted), so the primary effect of brefeldin A seems to be on the reaction responsible for ARF binding. Indeed, like β-COP, ARF is dissociated from the Golgi complex by treatment with brefeldin A and brefeldin A prevents ARF from associating in vitro ^13, but the mechanism of this action by brefeldin A has been unclear. Here we report the discovery of an enzyme in a Golgi-enriched fraction that catalyses guanine nucleotide (GDP–GTP) exchange on ARF-1 protein, and which is inhibited by brefeldin A. We suggest that activation of ARF proteins for membrane localization by compartmentalized exchange enzymes is in general the first committed step in membrane transformation pathways.THE fungal metabolite brefeldin A is a powerful tool for investigating membrane traffic in eukaryotic cells^1. The effects of brefeldin A on traffic are partly explained by its ability to prevent binding of cytosolic coat proteins onto membranes^2–5. The non-clathrin coatomer complex^6,7 binds reversibly to Golgi membranes in a GTP-controlled cycle^8–10. The low-molecular-mass GTP-binding protein ADP-ribosylation factor (ARF), which also associates reversibly with Golgi membranes^11,12, is required for coatomer binding^13 and probably accounts for the control by guanine nucleotide of the coatomer–membrane interaction. Brefeldin A prevents the assembly of coatomer onto the membrane by inhibiting the GTP-dependent interaction of ARF with the Golgi membrane^13, but the nature of this interaction has not been established. Here we demonstrate that Golgi membranes can specifically catalyse the exchange of GTP onto ARF and that brefeldin A prevents this function.DURING embryogenesis, body pattern is established in a stepwise process^1. After specification of the body axis, the embryo is subdivided into smaller units. Within these units, a diverse array of cell types is then generated. The subdivisions of the Drosophila embryo, called parasegments^2, are defined by the interface between cells expressing the homeoprotein Engrailed and cells expressing the secreted protein Wingless^3–5. We have examined the generation of cell-type diversity within parasegments by focusing on the choice of cell fate made by the engrailed (en) -expressing cells. These cells differentiate as one of two alternative cell types^6. We report here that this choice is mediated by wingless (wg) , in a function distinct from its early role maintaining en expression^7,8. Thus, en cells exhibit different responses to the wg signal at different developmental stages. Early wg input stabilizes the subdivision of the body axis by maintaining en expression, whereas later input generates cell-type diversity.AT early stages of the mammalian visual cortex, neurons with similar stimulus selectivities are vertically arrayed through the thickness of the cortical sheet and clustered in patches or bands across the surface. This organization, referred to as a 'column', has been found with respect to one-dimensional stimulus parameters such as orientation of stimulus contours^1, eye dominance of visual inputs^1, and direction of stimulus motion^2. It is unclear, however, whether information with extremely high dimensions, such as visual shape, is organized in a similar columnar fashion or in a different manner in the brain. Here we report that the anterior inferotemporal area of the monkey cortex, the final station of the visual cortical stream crucial for object recognition^3–8, consists of columns, each containing cells responsive to similar visual features of objects.THE suggestion that the densities of organisms are regulated by interactions involving entire food chains^1 has resurfaced into a new debate about the role of population regulation in environments that vary in productivity^2–5. Past work has shown that density responses of organisms to enhanced productivity should be strongly affected by the number of trophic levels in the food chain^6–11 but more recent theoretical work on this question has suggested that heterogeneity within a trophic level can be just as important^12–15. Here we present direct experimental evidence for such an interaction between environmental productivity and the species composition of herbivores. Our results illustrate that differences in food-web structure similar to those documented in natural communities^16,17 can dramatically alter how organisms will respond to abiotic factors such as nutrients that regulate primary productivity.